{"3WJGKMRWVI7KPSTC1889HBGQNDKDCJ": "You should probably ask a doctor since it has been that long. I bumped my leg bone one time, and got a knot that did not go away for a year. Depending on how big the bruises are it could take a couple weeks to heal.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKEQHA": "It is very important to regulate the size cricket given to juvenile dragons. The term 'bearded dragon' is most commonly used to describe the central bearded dragon, ('Pogona vitticeps'). The bearded dragon is the third most common house hold pet. Adult bearded dragons are very territorial. Bearded dragonsmost commonly, the inland or central bearded dragonare kept as pets. Generally speaking, the bearded dragon is a solitary animal. A juvenile bearded dragon eats insects three times a day on average. The amount of insects they eat depends on the dragon itself and how much it can eat. Mealworms should be considered a snack for bearded dragons because they contain a lot of fat and can lead to poor health. Unless you sprayed it directly on the little dragon, he should be ok. How long has it been since he ate? How old is he, and what are you feeding him? Young dragons, say, a few months old, can become constipated by large crickets. Do you have a basking light for him? If not, get ...", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHUXTM": "Hope this helps.- anon164809 72)I've gone down from 103 kg to 89 kg in three months by reducing my caloric intake and walking at least 10 kms a day and sometimes I even up to 20 km.Now here's my 'strategy': I try to vary my route as much as possible.", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHE793": "There are always the small breeds, such as Pomeranians and Chihuahuas, which have been bred to be less 'wild' than other breeds. You also have your choice of hounds, though they tend to be nose-driven. You could get a lab-mix. They're highly intelligent, enjoy activity, and maintain a weight around 40-50 pounds, depending upon the breed they're mixed with. I've owned several labs and they're a joy to have around, as they're extremely loyal and extremely oriented toward your needs.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZNQVY": "No. Virginity is the state of not ever having had sexual intercourse, that is, of not ever having a man's penis penetrate her vagina. The 'blockade' is called a hymen, it's a thin piece of skin that protects the inner vagina. Of course, it is not completely shut, that's why it's possible for virgins to have their periods.", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LS759": "Yes, you can heal them", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMJ8C4": "A few shots to dogs in the hospital and I had no trouble giving them to my horse or dogs.I hope this helps.rnmake sure you buy the correct ones for your pets age Was this post helpful to you? yes no Report prohibited or spam 3rd round of puppy vaccination at 14 wks Amount: 103.00 Posted by: Liz M.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMW8D5": "In Islamic belief the first prophet was the first human being, . Many Jewish and Christian prophets and revelations they delivered are mentioned in the Quran as prophets and revelations but usually with different names, (the Jewish is called , is , is , etc. The given to is called , the given to is the , the given to Jesus is ). Unique to Islam is , who Muslims believe is the Seal of the Prophets (, i. the last prophet). and the text revealed to him (the ), which Muslims believe is unique among divine revelations as the only one protected by God from distortion or corruption, destined to remain in its true form until the . In Muslim belief, every prophet preached the same main Islamic beliefs, the , worshipping of that one , avoidance of and , and the belief in and life after death. Each came to preach at different times in history and some told of the coming of the final prophet and messenger of God, who would be named commonly known as .", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q95L35": "A beer can.", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKT9G4": "Sharp pain when I stand up , bend over , pick my son up or sit/stand for a long period of time . 2 . Sharp pain down the back of both of my legs . 3 . When I bend my neck forward I feel the same sharp pain in my lower back as if I am bending over . 4 . It feels like if I could just stretch it far enough or bend over enough it would  pop '' and stop hurting .", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9I231": "You may have seen 'Floaters' in your field of vision. Floaters are a natural part of the eye's aging process. As you age, your vitreous gel shrinks and may detach from your retina. If this happens, it can cause a small amount of bleeding. This is a common cause for floaters in people who are very nearsighted or who have had cataract surgery. Floaters are not a definite sign of a retinal detachment.Other not as common causes for floaters are other types of eye surgery, eye disease, eye injury, or crystal-like deposits that form in the vitreous. Do not worry if you have a few floaters. Generally, a small number of floaters does not mean that you have a serious eye problem.You need to see your eye doctor for an eye exam if a large number of floaters suddenly appears in your vision, or if they seem to worsen over time.", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZD8FH": "I'm not sure I fully understand the question, but i'll take my best guess. So you found a tattoo on the ear of your pet? Sometimes pets are tattooed. This can be done for a variety of reasons. If they went through a shelter at some point in their life, there is a chance they are tattooed. Some veterinarians like to tattoo pets that they spay or neuter, just to eliminate any confusion later in life as to whether they were spayed eutered. Having your pet tattooed can also be just as effective as a microchip - it provides identification. While tattooing is not as popular as it has been in the past (kind of has been replaced by newer methods, like microchipping). Tattoos can be found on the ear, inner thigh, or belly region, depending on the vet's preference.", "3UUSLRKAUL1EDBYGAR0Y1POCM2PD7M": "Absolutely get a Personal Trainer.He / she will help you develop a work out regimen that best suits your needs/goals :)  youre plan looks really vague. The Fitness Magazine website has a section on running.", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6WB6H": "I would love it if twitter stopped trying to tell me how to flatten my stomach, tone my thighs, and fix my other various faulty genes.", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMRC25": "Weird Skin colored bumps all over skin?More questions Weird bump under skin? ?A zit?", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN5A4IY": "Try 64shadesofgray.net some of my old RP buddies hang out there still I think.", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT9BRE": "... and Raisin Bran) ... You do it the way Gary Taubes has and another of my favorites, ... Possible Oz reaction to Gary Taubes lab results", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M191K32": "There is a 'statute of limitations' wherein you have to file a law suit within a certain time limit... and when that time runs out you cannot file the law suit... and with each action the statute of limitation is different... for murder... there is no statute of limitation... that can be prosecuted even 50 years after the fact... but slander or libel (both law suits that are very difficult to win) will have short terms of statute of limitations... you will have to check with an attorney... go to one who will give you a free consultation... look in the Yellow Pages... but I don't think you have much of a case... It's not a good thing to be doing. Best way to get the idea about the gas las is 'READ PHYSICAL CHEMISTRY BOOK WRITTEN BY SHRIVER ATKINS' The first chaper (about 15pages) will tell you the history behind gas laws, derivtions, limitations etc. GOOD LUCK... (its very good book ..read it if you want to understand the real basics of physical chemistry)", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFT0DWQ": "You weigh 45kg and you consider yrself fat? Habistu I weigh 55-60kg ni apa? Gorilla?", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9QEJN": "Be boneless, but keep your spine. Bend and bend and bend yourself into a bridge that you havent burned yet, then cross it.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F05VW8": "Simply click on the school Wifi AP or one of the mesh circles in the laptop 's neighborhood view to restart the association process ( in extreme cases , restart Sugar ( CTL  ALT  ERASE ) or reboot the laptop ) . Association with WEP/WPA encryption works . However this must be tested for a wider range of access points .", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TWWUK": "A 'puggle' is not even a breed - it is a 'designer mutt' which bascially means people breeding these dogs are acting very irresponsibly and you are shelling out big money for a dog you could pick up at a shelter for a nominal fee (usually around 50). You can put in your location and what type of dog you are looking for. Do you want a dog or cat, or just a puppy or kitten. If you want your pet to stay looking like a baby, be careful with the breed you choose. Go to the library and get a book or two on the different breeds, make sure you pick a companion who's breed characteristics when adult will match yours. If you are more of a lounger, there are breeds for that too. Also, most shelters can help with the costs of neutering even if you don't adopt from them. PLEASE don't breed you dog.... Thousands of dogs are killed everyday because people think it is OK to or because they don't get them fixed. And if every dog that is born means a dog in a shelter dies.. Please don't breed them.....", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1RNJL": "First of all...If you look great, and feel comfey, then yes you are fine...second you are twelve...and you play volleyball...Don't worry about it honey. I had a baby...thats when you start worrying!", "3YLTXLH3DF4KVX7IS9D5SWUVEORPHH": "well because if you dont breath your heart wont work. your heart helps you breath so never and promise not to take drugs and dont hold your breath please", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBN5Q8": "(I'm a bit disturbed this convo morphed from ONESIES FOR MY NEPHEW)", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE14PI8": "The plush double coat of the Siberian husky may be beautiful, but it is also leaves hair everywhere. Shedding is one of the most prevalent concerns for husky owners, but routine grooming will cut back on shedding and leave your dog, and your home, clean and free from loose hair. Items you will need Treats Step 1 Take your dog to the veterinarian for a thorough examination. Siberian huskies do shed more when they blow their coats in the spring and fall, but if your dog is itchy, has bald spots or loses hair by the handful, it could indicate an underlying illness. Consider spaying your female, as heat cycles also lead to excessive shedding. Step 2 Switch your dog to a high-quality dog food. Huskies often shed excessively due to food allergies, and changing her food may reduce shedding. High-quality foods have meat listed high on the ingredient list with a minimal amount of fillers such as bone, ash and grains. Step 3 Bathe the dog with mild shampoo. Set the dog in the tub and wet her wit", "3TKXBROM5T8O5HF43EQ6VC9Y52XIJ0": "Voldemort and his Death Eaters openly wreak havoc and chaos throughout Britain. Following public outcry over Cornelius Fudge's mishandling of the Voldemort situation, he is forced to resign, and is succeeded by Rufus Scrimgeour as the new Minister for Magic. As a result, Arthur Weasley receives a promotion. At his home in Spinner's End, Severus Snape receives a visit from Draco Malfoy's mother Narcissa and her sister, Bellatrix Lestrange. Narcissa swears Snape to an Unbreakable Vow, ensuring he will protect Draco and, should her son fail, complete his mission for the Dark Lord. Albus Dumbledore arrives at the Dursley's and asks Harry Potter to accompany him to see retired professor Horace Slughorn. With unwitting help from Harry, Dumbledore persuades Slughorn to resume his old teaching post at Hogwarts. Harry then spends the remaining summer months at The Burrow with the Weasleys and Hermione, who is also visiting. To his family's dismay (mainly Ginny, Mrs. Weasley, and Fred and George", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4KEQG": "A letter from Gandhi to Hitler, written in July 1939. Gandi Hitler letter http://t.co/eYSbZZzwQA", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLE9O3O": "Good luck.Hannah  Rachel prays to God for sprained toes.ed-words  Since you can move it side to side it is probably just sprained or jammed.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNOR8V": "They know we're broke college students so they set the prices so high so that we can't buy books and flunk out of school. It probably has a lot to do with supply and demand but college departments do choose the text books they will use and why they pick expensive ones, I'll never know. but if you want cheaper books you can look at the websites in the sources section and focus on used books. half.com is hosted by Ebay.com and in my opinion it is the best place to buy or sell your text books. So, that means there are tons of prospects for your books. Also, if you are still in school you could put an advertisement on the intranet at your school. schools make money off of stipud people who buy them on campus and not online 4. resell text books to campus is easy, but resellingit on ebay or other school book selling website costs a bit more and not easy 5. in the USA its business to make money, including books 6.", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V8N6G": "The Notebook: A romantic book by Nicholas Sparks this is a book that has the element of romance described in the most interesting manner. Since the parents are against their relationship they get separated. The romantic book even won a Pulitzer Prize in the year 1937. The romantic book begins with a plantation in Georgia where you will find Scarlett O'Hara dallying about with the twin brothers named Brent and Stuart at a distant plantation. Summer of Roses: A romantic book written by Luanne Rice has her beautifully capturing the stories in a way that makes brings out the difference in love and the family relations. There is an element of love and romance in this book and this makes it an excellent book for getting into the romantic mood. The novel is a romantic comedy and the novel opens with the lines. Get this romantic book and have a delightful time reading it. The book well depicts the violence of the 18 th century and the way the events are described gives you a feeling of coming ba", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWK5C1": "Halloween Feel Box Game. Photodisk/Getty Images Try this simple Halloween feel box game. This is a fun, easy, and sometimes gross Halloween party or classroom game. Using cardboard (can be from empty cereal boxes and such), divide the inside of a large box into 4 pieces (or however many desired). Cut holes in the sides of the box - these should be big enough for a hand but not big enough to see inside. Put something (ideas below) into each section of the box and have the children put their hands in the holes and try to guess what is in it just by feeling it.", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD4AX8Y": "Aries dont do high maintenance so if you start to become demanding Aries will usually back right off.", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1QR4M": "Intelligent, hardworking, peaceful and friendly people are acepted everywhere. Indians are very talented, hardworking than rest of the world. Indians enjoy their lives and some of them too lives like kings. They are the best.", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5TK5T": "I have a girlfriend who loves to eat. She is on birth control pills and I have noticed a disappointing weight gain in her. We all see it.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BH59K": "Browns QB Johnny Manziel issues statement about one week after being discharged from rehab BROWNS http://t.co/8sebboZL9q", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNUZ1OD": "Paying it forwardnobody benefits, but everybody gets to pat selves on back..........how sweet.", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAVZUX8": "Flickr - has some good stuff. Most of it is free if you ask the people taking the shots. I have used some photos from that site int he past and they have worked great.", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RDI2F": "im so hungry that i feel nauseous and dizzy and im too nauseous and dizzy to make myself food do u see my dilemma", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR00YNPM": "meant. U be crazy. I be crazy tru too I guess. All good either way.", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ0A86": "JonathanBate, favorite Shakespearean, delightfully veers on  off task--how books help us to be better human beings http://t.co/yTdTCOPat8", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBK9PC": "Because infusing a solution of low osmolality can cause problems , intravenous solutions with reduced saline concentrations typically have ) added to maintain a safe osmolality while providing less sodium chloride . As the ( MW ) of dextrose is greater , this has the same osmolality as normal saline despite having less The amount of normal saline infused depends largely on the needs of the patient ( e.g . ongoing .", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ0BTRO": "Short erotic stories? I could be your muse.", "31GECDVA9JKWO25WHUNSP5EOA5K66Q": "The origin of the pain may be within ... www.livestrong.com/...sudden-sharp-pain.... - Cached More results from livestrong.com ? Sharp Pain In Abdomen - LIVESTRONG.COM - Lose Weight Get ... Causes of a Sudden Sharp Pain in the Lower Left Abdomen. Symptoms of lower left abdominal pain may be experienced as an acute or chronic type of pain. Kidney stones are small, crystal materials that are deposited inside the kidneys and often result from concentrated urine. See your health care provider as soon as possible (gastroenterologist), for consultation. Left side abdominal pain is often more common in women and young adults, as a cause of abdominal pain. After 30 seconds slowly lower your body forward and to the outside of your left leg, keeping your left arm fairly straight as you do.", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF6IAN": "Sounds like epidermoid cysts to me. They only can be treated with antibiotics / removed by a doc. Only oral examination by a qualified dental surgeon can reveal the nature of your hard lump.", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JICZ4Q": "True, anybody can scramble eggs, but making a fluffy, moist ... So many diners and delis serve them this way, which means I rarely go ..... July 14, 2014 at 2:11 pm .... So if you put an old egg in water, it will should stand up vertically. Only give cooked eggs, such as scrambled, poached, boiled or fried, and make sure ... about half of these babies grow out of the allergy by the time they are three years old. ... How to prepare baby food safely ? Can I put salt in my baby's f... ... them up and put them on our plate, and remind us 'I not like eggs!' ... Update My son is now a 4 year-old, and still the most picky eater you can imagine. ... And... he voluntarily tasted scrambled eggs (twice!) While everyone has a different ideal of what scrambled eggs should be like, ... Over the years, I've seen all kinds of tricks suggested to get fluffy scrambled eggs. .... Put the eggs, cream and salt in a bowl and beat with a fork until the ...", "3HUR21WDDUNBQ1ZYO0RA89B16JAXY9": "If you leave it alone it will grow.,", "3OYHVNTV5TWTCNWPJU3NGO5XW00OK4": "yes it's hard...the best thing is determination to get over it..  how about doing things that you wasn't able to do when you were busy with the relationship...can be an old hobby or something that you been wanting to do all this time..  then remove the things that will remind you of that person....and then at night, tire yourself by reading or watching DVD's or maybe chatting on the net...it always help to talk to someone...especially a stranger..", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGJ9Y2": "Get Rid of Love Handles: Get Rid of Love Handles - The 3 Best Exercises to Get Rid of Love Handles Getting rid... http://t.co/OlpNt3XIdo", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO84Y4": "Carefresh is a great choice for guinea pig bedding , but it is quite expensive . Usually pet stores carry it for  18-20 for a 50-50 liter bag , and one bag will last us about two weeks . Therefore , the humans have been paying up to  40/month just for our bedding ! There are cheaper options out there .", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTP1SK3": "Vibrating toys come in a variety of styles and sizes. Everything from ultra small finger tip models, to gigantic waterproof insertable models, to curved, to double headed, to inflatable, to some that are disguised as a lipstick or a variety of other items some are even sewn into panties and have a remote control  and some were never designed to be used as toys in the first place. The variation is almost limitless.The choice of which one is best is dependant upon how you want to use it, in which circumstance, and personal preference. Some girls like to have something very large inside of them, some prefer something smaller inside of them, some dont want anything inside at all. Some vibrators are meant to be used by couples, and some are meant to be used alone. Some women want to be able to take their vibrator with them in their purse, or even wear them out in public. Many women have a variety of vibrating toys for a variety of situations.Picking out which one is best f...", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TWUWI": "By acting collaboratively, the consortium will respond creatively and effectively to key drivers that are changing the landscape of research and research training in UK higher education. The initial focus will be on three broad interdisciplinary areas, with each university acting as academic lead in one of the areas: The University of Kent will lead in developing collaboration within Digital Humanities. The three universities of the Eastern ARC have significant expertise in Big Data and Digital Heritage, particularly visualisation, geographical information systems and online curation.", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBX03E": "That is unusual maybe it was an early period due to stress or other factors. It could be implantation bleeding. If it is you should test in 3 days. By then the levels will be high enough to test. Opinion 2: Ovulation Bleeding please wait... Rating: 4.0/ 5 (6 votes cast) Ovulation spotting (or mid-cycle bleeding) is usually a natural occurrence, occurring on the day of ovulation. Its presence is actually an indicator of enhanced fertility, so take heart in that. Many women experience bleeding during the ovulation days. If you are one of them, you are probably wondering why it happens and if there is something wrong with you. Well, you should be happy to know that ovulation bleeding is not harmful or dangerous, as long as there is only light spotting (small amounts of blood). Claim Your 20 Free Pregnancy Tests  Click Here What is ovulation bleeding? Ovulation bleeding (also known as mid-cycle bleeding) is a very rare occurrence for some women, while others never experience it. It is f", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XK9HBL": "'I am ready to take care of this kitten. Did you know that cats cost over 700 EACH YEAR. That 'cheap' 15 cat will end up costing about 1000 over the next 12 months....not exactly 'affordable', is it? You will never be able to earn that type of money at your age. 'we already have a house cat. in which, it never pays no mind to me since my mom has to do everything for it' There is nothing stopping you from spending more time with the cat you already have and getting it to like you better. It will take time and patience, since obviously the cat is used to not having much to do with you. But when you just give up as you have, all you are doing is demonstrating to your mom that you wouldn't take care of another cat either. Your mom is not 'competing' with you, she is simply taking care of and loving the cat as it deserves. BTW, all kittens are born with blue eyes. They start changing color in most cats from about 6 to 10 weeks of age. I very much doubt the calico will end up with blue eyes....", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVTCZG": "Collars can be effective, but must be applied properly. To get the right degree of snugness, you should just be able to get two fingers between the collar and the neck of your pet. Be sure to cut off any excess portion of the collar after you have properly applied it. Otherwise, that animal or other pets may try to chew on the end. Check the package for information on duration of effectiveness since many collars lose effectiveness when they get wet, e.g. if a dog swims a lot. Watch carefully for any irritation under the collar. If this occurs, you may need to use a different product. Do NOT use collars containing Amitraz, permethrin, or organophosphates on cats. In severely tick-infested areas or for dogs who spend a lot of time outdoors and in the woods, we have found a Preventic Tick Collar in addition to a permethrin-containing product such as Bio Spot is going to give your dog the best protection. This collar contains Amitraz, which is approved to use in conjunction with most o...", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFLTWM": "getting fingers jammed in the door!!!", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4ET4MD": "It would be our pleasure to have you visit the kennel, by appointment only. Our site ... a simple description of the races which we raise (Pros and Cons) ... Our puppies are not registered with Kennel Clubs , We offer companion dogs . Since we?... ... Designed to be a lap dog because of its cute size, Pomskies are the most ... deserve to be loved and cared for (Pros and cons about pomsky). ... pomsky puppies for sale in ohio ? Pomeranian Husky Mix for Sale?.... Throughout the years there have been many different initiatives to educate ... So you just got your Pomsky and you don't know whether to go through with the surgery, well lets go through some of the pros and cons. ... BreezeBlue Pomskies. But they can be dominant and high strung. Training can be difficult - needs a firm but fair hand and someone who knows multiple methods to find what best fits the individual dog. Needs over 40 minutes of exercise/stimulation per day.", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5VB6N2": "Prednisone may cause side effects. Tell your doctor if any of these symptoms are severe or do not go away:    headache   dizziness   difficulty falling asleep or staying asleep   inappropriate happiness   extreme changes in mood   changes in personality   bulging eyes   acne   thin, fragile skin   red or purple blotches or lines under the skin   slowed healing of cuts and bruises   increased hair growth   changes in the way fat is spread around the body   extreme tiredness   weak muscles   irregular or absent menstrual periods   decreased sexual desire   heartburn   increased sweating    Some side effects can be serious. If you experience any of the following symptoms, call your doctor immediately:    vision problems   eye pain, redness, or tearing   sore throat, fever, chills, cough, or other signs of infection   seizures   depression   loss of contact with reality   confusion   muscle twitching or tightening   shaking of the hands that you cannot control   numbness, burning, or tin", "3MZ3TAMYTLL535YHBJZFX3VPFJRIRS": "Well, peanut butter sandwiches do have protein in the form of a combination of a legume (peanuts) and a grain (the bread). They have some calories for energy, too. The classic is actually 'PBJ' ?? peanut butter and jelly, which tastes nicer. There's no way we could answer that based on what you gave us. It all depends on what kind of pb, what kind of jelly, how much you put on (specifically) what kind of bread you used, etc. Same goes with a cupcake...large? The PBJ, you will have to look at the label for and add up how much you used, since there is no way of me knowing how much you used, or what kind of bread you used, or the type of peanut butter for that matter. Peanut Butter had so much fat and calories. I am looking at my jar of reduced fat Jif peanut butter and one serving has 12 grams of fat and 190 calories. Mind you now this is the REDUCED FAT kind , add full fat and it's way higher.", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XO9IZ": "These face exercises improve the blood flow to the eye region, strengthen upper and lower eyelids, make bags under the eyes smaller or entirely disappear. Place your middle fingers between the eyebrows above the bridge of your nose, and locate index fingers in the external corners of your eyes. Strain lower eyelids and pull them upward. If the bags under your eyes are really big than consider performing this exercise 3 times a day. Place two or three fingers on the bone that is located right below your eyes, gaze upwards and squint your bottom eyelids. Firming upper eyelids. Place your index fingers on your forehead right above eyebrows and move them down with (fingers with eyebrows). Try to pull up your eyebrows to original position. Make sure that you are not touching your eyelids with your palms. The base of your right pinkie will be on the base of your left pinkie or if it is more comfortable, place your left palm on the top of your right palm making an upside down V with your palms.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PT188": "or I was looking forward to turning 30 and gaining credibility, but you made me look forward to turning 50 and gaining the respect. The first apartment house specially designed for senior citizens opened in east China's Anhui Province in 1986 and more than such 600 senior citizens homes across China currently provide elderly people with access to independent living. 'We can trade our current apartment for quarters in a senior citizens home in suburban Beijing when I retire,' said Zhang Ping. A recent survey of Beijingers between the ages of 50-59 revealed great demand for future occupancy in senior citizens homes. Zhang Wenfan noted that a number of senior citizens homes have been built in Beijing, and numerous other facilities are being designed for individuals with varying financial capabilities. When I was a youngster, every body over 50 was a senior citizen to me. When I was 50, I considered myself middle age. By now I'm a senior citizen in every body's book.", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXLJUA": "I think what you have is elastic that is inside a cloth tube, the tube either knit into the shorts or the top edge folded over.", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH076Q9K": "Some dogs have a tendency to bark at people because they do not know them , or just don't know them well and see them as a threat. Some just do it to protect 'their' territory (the tree they go out and pee on every morning, haha).", "3RKHNXPHGWUOPSGMFGFWFUXMEMNKUC": "From the dogs perspective you are a much large pack member. The peeing is a form of subordinate pack behavior, he is showing you that he recognizes you as the pack leader. Try approach him in a soothing manner and in the least threatening/aggressive way you can. Once outside praise him when he pees. Don't yell or get upset when he pees because he doesn't understand words just tones and body language.", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBKJMK": "A lump on my ankle, great just what the doctor ordered!", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4I9ER": "I have been benching for about two months now. I started with maxing out on 135 pounds and now I can max about 185 pounds. I feel like my gain came very slow and I didn't increase my bench press by much. Last week I decided to squat for the first time and my max is around 185. I weigh 170 pounds and I'm 5'9. What type of workouts can I do to quickly increase my max squat and bench press?", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZMQVX": "59 M/L 23frac12. 60 One Size 22frac34. -23frac12. 58-60 Footwear UK 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 US 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 European 40 41 42 43 44 45 46 How To Measure 1 Collar measure around neck base where shirt fits 2 Chest measure around fullest part place tape close under arms make sure tape is flat across the back 3 Sleeve measure from the collar, along the shoulders and down the outer arm to the hem 4 Waist measure around natural waistline 5 Inside Leg measure from top of inside leg at crotch to ankle bone 6 Outside Leg measure from natural waistline to hem 7 Centre Back Length measure from the center of the collar seam to the hem Washing Symbols The washtub symbol indicates if your garment is suitable for washing. The recommended washing temperature is shown by the number inside the washtub. The amount of agitation is specified by bars underneath. A washtub with no bar will use the maximum action with a normal spin. The number in the tub is the maximum temperature, for example 40 .", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV3YV5O": "Since CSS3 is still being constructed, I doubt there is a PDF book available. You might want to read about it at the W3C here: http://www.w3.org/Style/CSS/current-work  The CSS3 Intro is here: http://www.w3.org/TR/css3-roadmap/  Hope this helps.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNM8RA": "jus moisturise n use foundation try n cool your face down with cold water. hope it helps   Opinion 2: Did u find anything to help? I just had the same experience and put aloe on for some relief. How long did your redness last?", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0S3C8": "Coconut oil is used by women in India as a conditioner. Warm it up slightly in the microwave before you apply it to hair after wringing the moisture out of it. The full body refers to the person getting the massage.", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOR5HC": "It might be the ignition switch. Does the radio stop when the engine does?", "3RKHNXPHGWUOPSGMFGFWFUXMEMMKUB": "NC (voiceover). Allen is called in about Mimi climbing the statue, and he tries to explain the ways of New York life. Michael: Didnt I tell you to wait in the apartment for Mimi: I want to see Statue of Liberty. Michael: I said wed do that tomorrow. Mimi: Always tomorrow. Youre too busy for Mimi-Siku. I want to see Statue of Liberty, I go. NC (voiceover): Now you might be asking yourself, Wasnt he just saying me instead of I in an earlier scene? Mimi-Siku: (on the plane earlier in the film) Me happy to be with you, Baboon. NC: Well, theres a very good reason for that. (Beat) Oh, fuck it, I just want you to hear that woman screaming again. (The clip of the Old Woman screaming is shown again before we see NC form the Walt Disney Pictures logo underneath him with a grin) NC (voiceover): So his assistant finds someone else whos interested in buying the stock, which, it turns out, is the Russian mafia. Alexei Jovanovic (David Odgen Stiers): Introduce my comrades to you.", "3ZFRE2BDQ9CBVR93KMTTMGK3CDGZX4": "MY UPPER LIP DISAPPEARED MAN", "3X7837UUADW8CXK31DHHY9JTWB4J69": "Debbie Happy to help.Good luck.Cheers, Neale. Goldfish eye problem..", "3SV8KD29L4Q5BRAWL3E4WMC1G4ZZKD": "They have a product you can get at vet's offices or petco etc... it's an oil that you put on the cats food. It helps with dry skin. The brand that we carry at my office is called 3V caps or 3V liquid. It works very well. You will see a difference after about 3 weeks.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNQ8RE": "Sad cuz realized I just missed the age limit to be able to donate eggs from my ovaries ... Only by 1.5 decades. myeggbank", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2EAPXA": "Her legs will probably never heal properly. At best, they will be able to bear some weight, but will be deformed. Because gerbils are so small, there is nothing you can do to splint the legs into the proper position. If she seems to be in pain, it may be best to have a vet put her out of her misery.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOD3YJ": "If you gave a girl a labiaplasty, you would go to jail.", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTP2KSW": "If you do have genital warts, your doctor can go over treatment options with ... If there are no screening tests for men, how can they tell if they have HPV and if so, what is the treatment? ..... Can the HPV vaccine help me get rid of genital warts? If you want a doctor to help you, You'll have to help me by posting a picture of the lesion. All I can guess from your description is that it's a dermatofibroma, but without seeing it, I cannot be sure. I'm a skin doc. Your doctor or nurse can tell you how often you ... Human papilloma virus (HPV) ?? There are different ... Any man or woman who has ever had sex can get. HPV. ... Will a Pap test tell me .... finding, or helping to find, some changes and cancers. You can help if you like. It's nice to help people who need help and often the feeling of helping is enough. What you need to recognize though is that you are helping because you want to help not because you expect any sort of relationship in return.", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ72NF": "Neither Liuzza nor Bjork attempt to talk about the philosophical nature of this problem.For any measurement to occur, (the dating of a text is a type of measurement) one must be able to fix one element upon which to measure the other.The problem is apparent in Quantum Mechanics.", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ100FL": "you can go months without your period when you start to work out no joke a friend of mine did", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI2HF4": "I hope it works for you, I'll post updates, because right now I could not be happier.I hope this helps you.Good luck!", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAVKY7": "Trajan was the first roman emperor of spanish descent. All the emperors before him had either been members of the Julio-Claudian dynasty (heirs of Caesar) or members of the italian nobility.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR06UQ": "There are several different types of keratosis pilaris, including keratosis pilaris rubra (red, inflamed bumps), alba (rough, bumpy skin with no irritation), rubra faceii (reddish rash on the cheeks) and related disorders. Most people with keratosis pilaris do not know they carry it. While KP resembles goose bumps, it is characterized by the appearance of small rough bumps on the skin.", "3S4TINXCC0LSJKSVDHQUHLM796OOBH": "I've had one since late December.....they can last a long time and sometimes meds don't work because ear infections are not always bacterial. Go back to the doc if it still hurts in 2 weeks is what I was told when I got my Z-Pak.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6RLJH": "too far into a k hole? Lol", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH5WYG": "5 Exercises to strengthen your eye muscles and improve your vision 1.Blinking Blinking is an often overlooked yet simple way to keep your eyes fresh and being able to focus longer. For the next two minutes blink every 3  4 seconds. After you have done this for two minutes, mentally take note of how your eyes feel, are they strained, relaxed, tired. Now try and not blink for 30 seconds at a time for. When someone stops blinking and stares at you when you are talking its a sign of aggression. However whenever you are talking to someone and they are blinking at a 3 -4 second interval its a sign of a relaxed and friendly listener. Close your eyes. Make sure you can blink freely and you are not putting too much pressure on your eyes. This is quite a simple exercise but a good one. Now trace the figure of eight with your eyes, slowly. Do it one way for a few minutes and then do it the other way for a few minutes. This exercise will strengthen your focussing skills and your eye muscles in general", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVGFIU": "Myer  Clemenger is looking for a Finished Artist with high volume retail finished art experience to join the team at Docklands . Your role is to produce and create the best retail advertising in the country for Myer .", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKD7TMV": "This is just crazy they are putting all people that need the meds to have any kind of quality of life and lableing them drug addicts or abusers.I would stop taking and meds.if I thought that was the case.", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q4FU3": "In Piaget's stages of cognitive development, the 9- to 11-year-old child has entered the period of 'concrete operations.' This time span is characterized by the developing capability of organizing thought processes and use of deductive reasoning to successfully anticipate consequences. In addition, the ability to sort items by recognizing the abstract and more complex similarities is developing (for example, car, airplane, boat  all modes of transportation vs. a more immature lumping together based upon color similarities). Mathematical reciprocal relationships also become comprehensible (for example, 5  3  8, therefore 8  5  3). Generally, a longer attention span has set in (30-45 minutes) and the tween enjoys mental and physical challenges. Academically the 9- to 11-year-old student starts to develop the ability to form an opinion based upon presented evidence. He is also mastering the ability to present his own beliefs to his peers and parents.", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BMQPD": "nullFirst off, that's a weighted question. While Democrats and liberals (it's not a political party, no capitalization necessary) generally believe in bigger governments than classic conservatives, the modern Republicans and neo-cons apparently only like to talk about small governments. For the 6 years Repubicans held both houses of Congress, the White House, half the governorships, and a good chunk of the Supreme Court, government grew even more quickly than it had been doing under the Clinton administration. At the end of Clinton's term, we were running a surplus and on track to pay down the debt, remember? You are correct, though, that liberals generally believe in more government. That doesn't mean they necessarily believe in more laws, though. Your average liberal leans a lot farther towards civil liberties than your average conservative.", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9NAVSU": "Of course not, because doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results is perfectly sane.Share Joomla Templates and Joomla Extensions by ZooTemplate.Com November 10, 2014 Written by Administrator  Monday, 10 November 2014 22:05 The Jerome Levy Forecasting Center said its half-dozen analysts attach a 65 probability of a worldwide recession forcing a contraction in the U.S.by the end of next year.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGHC1S": "Good luck!Oh, by the way, what's in the other bag? ''Well, you know', says the little old lady, 'not everybody pays.'", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW6101O8G": "Tuberous breasts Tuberous breasts (or tubular breasts) are a result of a congenital abnormality of the breasts which can occur in both men and women (also see Hypoplasia), one breast or both. During puberty breast development is stymied and the breasts fail to develop normally and fully. The exact cause of this is as yet unclear, however, a study in 2011 of the cells in the breasts of both males and females with tubular breasts suggested a genetic link in a disorder of collagen deposition.", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVO0V9": "All rights reserved.All market data delayed 20 minutes.Privacy - Terms - FAQ", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V754VU": "now you have made me think................ i need to make some changes in my life so i can be happier. not that im always sad. Thanks for asking.", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U361R": "The ADA also found that 9 out of 10 full-time and part-time dental hygienists received dental coverage. Dental hygienists who work for school systems, public health agencies, the Federal Government, or State agencies usually have substantial benefits. A dental hygienist is a licensed dental professional who specializes in preventive care. The average hourly wage for hygienists in 2002 in the US was 26 per hour. In Ontario, dental hygienists may take further training to become a restorative dental hygienist. In Ontario, dental hygienists are registered with the College of Dental Hygienists of Ontario (). Hygiene training was briefly offered at the Wellington School for Dental Nurses in 1990 as 2 week a supplement to Dental Therapy students training. Dental Hygienists can become members of the New Zealand Dental Hygienists' Association. Canada 'British Columbia' 1995 - A client must have seen a dentist within the previous 365 days in order for the hygienist to provide dental hygiene ...", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBYJOY": "But if it was important and I left it then I get belted all over again.It rang again.I had to open it.", "3QREJ3J433VL62TS62NVO7131VVKLJ": "'Prayer is light charity is a proof patience is illumination and the Quran is an argument for or against you.' (Muslim)''", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61J89Q": "excersise you have planned is great, As you said you dont want to gain muscle on your calf, Dont run, But power walk everywere. Your excersise you have planned is good, although i still think you need bit more excersise. Another big Tip is to cut down on bad food, Cut down on CARBS, FATS, TRANS FAT, SATURATED FAT, And SUGER. --- all these make you gain weight,   This may be a good alternative for you: ( if you serious about loosing weight )   Brekkie: Big bowl of veggies, - lettuce, cucumber, beetroot, Tomoato, ect really fill up on these, And 2 glasses of water, - Excersise about 20-30 mins after this   Morning tea: one serving of fruit and one serving of vegitables, with water, excersise about 10-20 mins after this   Lunch: Light salad, Dark lettuce, Cucumber, beetroot, tomato, carrot ect With water exscersice 10-20 mins after this   Avo tea: One serving of Vegitables and Fruit - water excersise 10-15 mins after this   Dinner: One portion of salmon fillet, with a nice gardan salad", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS7BC9": "I'm sorry, I'm not a liberal....but that woman is completely insane and needs to be locked up.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX1HG2": "wall-mart, they have color-by-numbers, paint-by-numbers. they come with the necessary supplies, as well. - really look at what you're drawing, don't just draw what you think it looks like.", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF5OYV": "Mehmet Salih Guler/Photodisc/Getty Images A cat eye blink, often referred to as kitty kiss, is a common cat behavior. The cat's eyes communicate information depending on how open the eyelids are, as well as what the eyes do. A prolonged, unblinking stare between cats is an intimidating gesture that often will cause a lower-ranking cat to turn tail and leave. Aggressive cats can use a long-distance stare to control access to their owned territory. You might not even notice, but the kitties understand that the top cat is 'guarding' the hallway that leads to litter box, for example, and so they won't dare challenge and trespass! Eye Blink Kitty Kisses The eye blink, in contrast, is a way that non-aggressive cats signal that their intentions are not hostile. Cats blink at each other, as well as the humans they love, with a slow eye blink 'cat kiss.' Kitties that use this non-threat signal are able to smooth relationships between other cats, and maintain good social interactions.", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5625O": "I remember my first jockstrap, my school made me buy one for gym class. I went to the local department store and purchased a Bike 10. Going home that day, my heart was pounding. The anticipation of putting on my first jockstrap was incredible. I remembered seeing my older brother in one and thought it was the hottest thing I'd ever seen, now I had my very own. I got home, ran up the stairs to my room, shut the door and unwrapped my new found joy. I quickly undressed, put it on and adjusted the front and straps. My package reacted to the feel of the fabric cradling them. I was immediately aroused and began to orgasm uncontrollably. I knew I would never be the same.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3S9AXE": "From Exposure to SymptomsIt usually takes about 3-5 days, but It can take less than 9 hours, depending on the virus which caused it (there are 200 apparently which cause colds :). I drank some of my friend's Coke after he had been drinking from the bottle. We were both sick the next day. It took roughly 9 hours for my sinus pain to tell me i was sick, from 6pm when I drank the Coke to 3am when I woke up and took some vit c. It should also be noted that Vitamin C will not prevent you from getting the cold. It may only reduce the length of time you have the cold, which may not make that much of a difference.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3S6XAY": "The nearest active quasar is 3C 273, 1.7 billion light years further away. Hanny's Voorwerp , (Dutch for 'Hanny's object') is a very rare type of astronomical object called a quasar ionization echo. It was discovered in 2007 by Dutch school teacher Hanny van Arkel, while she was participating as a volunteer in the Galaxy Zoo project.", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK6NS3": "Your stomach is the upper left quadrant of the abdomen and is partially covered by the lower ribs. Is this where the pain is? I saw an answer that mentions the urinary bladder but the bladder is nowhere near the stomach and so would have nothing to do with it. The stomach is not that large and the average person would not be able to identify a specific region of the stomach when referring to pain. Ventral body cavity The ventral body cavity is a human body cavity that is in the anterior (front) aspect of the human body. The abdominal cavity contains digestive organs, the pelvic cavity contains the urinary bladder, internal reproductive organs, and rectum. The organs within the ventral body cavity are called the viscera. It is also suspected that nitrites can combine with amines in the human stomach to form N-nitroso compounds. These compounds are known carcinogens and have been associated with cancer of the oral cavity, urinary bladder, esophagus, stomach and brain.", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP59P2Z": "Who knows... 'History is just a set of lies agreed upon.' Napoleon Bonaparte", "3YGE63DIN8VZ46YN6NKFEY3AL4T0WM": "null137 a couple of hours after a meal is pretty good. Slightly elevated levels are expected up to 4 hours after a meal as your body breaks down the carbs. Keeping it under 160 during digestion should be acceptable, but if you dont want to fret, wait until four hours instead of just two. I stayed on oral meds for 15 years and then had to go to insulin. Pills are so much more convenient but theyre not going to be as precise. As long as you can can maintain HGBA1C levels (this test measures 3 month average)of 6 or less you will be doing fine. As far as dizzyness goes, each of us reacts differently to low and high blood sugars. Some people do get dizzy when they are out of whack on either end. I never felt anything when I had 500 values before I was diagnosed and when I skipped meals after diagnosis and they slipped down to 70 I knew before checking because I would get the shakes, not dizzy.", "3QO7EE372OLV4W5BSUIY6QH7O75QBQ": "Worth every penny ! '' Our 13 pound long hair dachshund would gulp her food literally in under 15 seconds often choking . We tried several different feeders and even placed a weighted ball in her bowl but nothing worked well . While researching feeders i came across the . Watched several videos online and decided to give it a try .", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQCFDW": "That's what they're there for.And believe me, they've heard it all!Good luck!", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSSORV": "I do n't mean to sound sexist , but I feel it is the only resaonable response to such an abrupt and undeveloped attack . IN FACT , EXCESSIVE CRYING is more prevalent in women because of our heightened estrogen levels . We are more prone to tears because that 's just the way our bodies react to certain situations .", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGI7MZ": "Try to be a rainbow in someone's cloud.", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRMDMZ": "Lana, Everyone is different in response to their development of disease. Some people who've never smoked but who have been around smokers (ie : second hand smoke) have developed cancer. Not sure how long it will take.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AJCAC": "There is much less Black paternal DNA, which means that Black slaves were .... that Black genes may only be present in a small percentage of Turks ... You're free to go through it if you wish and see if you come up with something simi... I am an African American and just received my results for my maternal DNA ancestry. .... DNA analysis by scientists have proven that the percentage of Greeks who ..... One is Japan, where you find pottery before 10,000 BCE, going back?... The advantages of autosomal DNA are apparent if one considers ... if you go back even five generations you have 16 male ancestors .... An effective 3 percent, my 3suprd/sup-great grandmother Yates, who was a Creek Indian, had no surname. The advantages of autosomal DNA are apparent if one considers ... if you go back even five generations you have 16 male ancestors .... An effective 3 percent, my 3suprd/sup-great grandmother Yates, who was a Creek Indian, had no surname.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMT3TS": "The world turns, another sun will rise, and I will wake up and start a new day..  And then the World Cup starts and the rest of the world stops what they are doing. Today, folks say the Holocast never happened or happened on a scale much smaller than what was reported.", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JVHOS": "Exercise, nutrient dense foods, and determination are the keys!Good on you for deciding to lose weight! Im sad to hear, though, that your Dad called you a fat ass. Not cool. You dont mention your age, but I am guessing you are a teen? When I was a teen, I lost 100 lbs all by myself. You can lose weight, too! You should know that there is no safe way to lose weight quickly, and if you lose weight very quickly you will be a lot less likely to keep it off. So, definitely set a goal to lose weight consistantly, but don't plan on losing overnight. The first thing I would suggest is to believe in you, and love yourself enough to commit to losing weight (its NOT easy). Secondly, I would urge you stay away from quick fixes. No 'starvation diets', no gimmicks, no diet shakes, no pills, ect. The key to weight loss is simple--burn more than you take in! This means exercise three times a week,for a total of 30 minutes(at minimum!). If you can, aim for five times a week.", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4ER4MB": "3-4 points depending on how many fiber are in it. There is a point calculator on the site below in the right hand column to help calculate points for items that you have the nutritional info for...", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD7SAO": "Customer said: I want oval shape - well, we do ovals with a floral twist! Lets just say - we dont do normal... http://t.co/3NrIqif2hz", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E67MBY": "Most prisons will only allow inmates to have soft bound books, along with subscription magazines and newspapers, as personal property in their cells. The books must be mailed directly to the inmate from a bookstore or a publishing house, and as the question mentions, must be sent using the Post Office. Per the Amazon link below which discusses shipping to prisons, Amazon indicates 'There is no way for customers to request a specific shipper.' http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/d... The Book Outlet site sells new books which are publisher overstocks or publisher returns and excess inventory. This means the books are not the newest releases, but have been published in recent years. Sometimes this new merchandise is not is top condition, having suffered damage during shipment from the publisher to Book Outlet. These are always clearly identified as 'Scratch  Dent' merchandise, so the buyer is never surprised. Have ordered from Book Outlet for years because they use the Post Office fo", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2OHAQ": "Theres nothing saying you cant feed them dry regular cat food but its reccomended you feed them kitten food because theres ceratin vitamins and nutrients in it that isnt in regular cat food. Younger kittens bodies have different needs than cats who are 8 weeks old or older. Plus kitten food is softer and more gentle on there digestive system than reg.", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN35902": "LOL..they feel they are owed everything for nothing, forget that B.S.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBZJOZ": "if you have date that has a 1-4 month expiration then you have about 4-6 months.You have to seal them down really good!GOOD LUCK!", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0BZI3": "I think she's playin. I have 3 cats and one of them purrs and purrs and purrs when I pet him, and then starts to wag his tail and sometimes turns around and nips me (NOT HARD) and sometimes hangs on'' with his nip (softly) and starts pawing and still wagging his tail. Losing a pet is a big deal.", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC30EO6": "Adding rose water to the paste will be soothing and relieve the discomfort . Calamine lotion can also be applied to prevent the spread of tiny bumps and soothe the itch . Oatmeal baths can be taken to bring relief if one is not allergic to it . Turmeric powder can be added to it and applied on the skin as turmeric has antibacterial , antiviral and antiseptic properties and will hasten the healing of the itchy bumps .", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB3AB0G": "I beleive the book was A Time to Kill. I know there was a movie titled 'A Time to Kill'", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIHT55": "if you wanna have the fastest weight-loss, please try to eat fruits, vegetables and drink no carbonate water all the time, and please do not drink coffee, but some herbal tea..alternatively, you shall eat four meals or even more per day, but less quantity for each time. Most importantly, you ought to slow-run up to a hills or around where you live every day....this is where you could have your calories diminised ASAP.....   Have a nice day!", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQ9DFR": "It is a record-breaking third time that Roberts has been the issue's cover girl. This year, People also polled online readers for their opinions. The two have recently been linked romantically by tabloid reports, though neither star has confirmed a relationship. On the Net: Incest between twins Incest between twins is a subclass of sibling incest and includes both heterosexual and homosexual relationships. Twin incest was a common feature of Balinese mythology. In a 1983 review of the scholarly literature on twin homosexuality and twin incest, Ray Bixler concluded that 'most same sex homosexual twins, if reared with their co-twins, do not attempt or even want to seduce them in adulthood'. The story was widely publicised in the British press, although its truthfulness was called into question. Now, if you break up with your boyfriend, that is another story as you will no longer be in a romantic relationship and do not need to consider his feelings when you are making romantic cho...", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ2S11": "Go to www.hp.com and follow the troubleshooting guide. If all else fails, call them it's free.......", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5VA6N1": "I mistook you were 30 pounds over, but just paid attention it's actually under. Going on an eating binge to gain weight is not good. A doctor is the right person. Originally Posted by Jordyloves Age-- 17 Height-- 5''9 Is this really a bad thing? I don't have an eating disorder, am I on the verge of death? Am I a health risk? Just askin'. Originally Posted by Jordyloves Age-- 17 Height-- 5''9 Is this really a bad thing? I don't have an eating disorder, am I on the verge of death? Am I a health risk? Just askin'. WHY are you underweight? Food just doesn't interest you? Eating makes you feel sick or causes pain? See a doctor. My son is under a doctors care for this problem, after a long bout of illness he had no appetite and avoided eating. He got so thin there was talk of putting him in the hospital.", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H79V30": "ATOMIC BOMB: DECISION (Hiroshima-Nagasaki) For other websites about the bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, and the history of nuclear weapons, see these links. http://www.dannen.com/decision/index.html The Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki The Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki: Necessary or Not? Gary Tilden 6th Grade Science Teacher Cooperative Middle School Stratham, NH... http://www.smith.edu/fcceas/curriculum/tilden.htm Atomic Bombs Nuclear Files) Extensive collection of documents relating to the development of the atomic bomb and the bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FBY6G": "I really get tired of all those people who want to lose weight extremely quick or just have 10 minutes a day. Why do people have all the time to make themselves fat, but dont have time or dont want to put effort in it to lose it. It is useless to lose weight in so a short time, you will get it back anyway.", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ92NH": "the death of high waist jeans lol", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K0X77": "Hey , I just got a 4-month old male cocker spaniel and he sheds a lot of hair . I 'd like to know if they usually change hair which cause a lot of shedding and then it will stop .", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M1903KK": "... It took me many years to find a doctor that would be willing to work ... Some doctors equate seeking meds for pain relief to being a drug ... Just because you choose to live life pain free does not make you a drug addict. How opioids/opiates (pain medication) Before the signal reaches the pain-monitoring section of your brain, though, it goes through a receptor first. The receptor is like a radio relay station ?? it helps push the pain message to its final destination. The only other option I can think of is to try a different anti-nausea medicine prior to taking narcotics. Phenergan, Compazine, Inapsine, Anzemet ,Visteril - there are several available, and one might work better for you than the Zofran. Attempting to go cold turkey can lead to serious problems and in some cases even death. --- You should already be going to a pain control center already if you have been taking the medication as you described.", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3331K": "Signs of cavities are -  1.Sensitivity to cold/hot   2.hole in the tooth  3.A dark shadow that can be seen through the tooth enamel   4.Staining in the grooves of the teeth  5.Beyond that, a bad cavity will begin to hurt for long periods.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR46UU": "They sound to me like hair follicles. I would not be surprised if they develop hairs over the next few months.", "3T2HW4QDUV58M2GVPS37VFX0WS5C91": "is it possible to lose arm fat by working it out without ending up with very muscular arms??????", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EERU9": "Well if you're watching Naruto, here a some big things the keep you busy. 1. Bleach (really awesome and long, i love long animes) 366 episodes and 1 or 2 movies  2. Blue Exorcist (Ao no Exorcist) 25 episodes, 1 OVA, and 1 Movie  3. Hunter x Hunter (original or 2011) The 2011 is currently ongoing and show more than the original because it continues from the anime. Also, recently a movie came out for Kurapika. 4. Fairy Tail (again really awesome but has been discontinued but will be recontinued in October) currently stuck on ep 175  5. Code Geass (2 seasons so 50 episodes in total) SUPER AWESOME! 6. Dragon Ball and Dragon Ball Z (MAYBE EVEN GT!) the basics of basics and dragon ball and z is better in dub because it's pretty old. A lot of episodes, i dont even wanna bother looking right now. 7. .Hack (has a lot of seasons, some with different characters) Recommended to watch the older ones such as .Hack//Roots and .hack//G.U. Trilogy (prequel and sequel)  8. Katekyo Hitman Reborn!", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBT87C": "Yes, that's what happened. Plus no one else has any gum in the house right now.", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27YZ1ZC": "Is this an act of homosexuality.? (Im a boy)17 to be exact. I have this lil cousin( my first cousins son) who i love dearly as family but we are 6 years apart. i barely get to see him since we live likle at least 300 miles apart but when i do he's always hugging me and sticks to me like glue. one time i was laying on my back on the bed playing video games with his borther and my brother then he came and laid on top of me and when i told him to get off cuz i didnt feel comfortable he told me to shut up because he feels perfect. he strips in front of me, always touching on me some way or the other, randomly starts conversartion with me, and wen i was 11 he kissed me on my lips in my sleep (he doesnt know that i was awake).Does this male me gay.? i have this younger cousin and i care for him alot like a father to son relationship and i barely see him and when i do its like heaven for me. does this mean that im gay I think this is where your problem is  why you're feeling guilty....D'n'D", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E4TB7": "These all have love/romance/relationships, etc in them. I hope you find something you like! Paranormal / Fantasy Romance Young Adult The Hush, Hush series by Becca Fitzpatrick. The 1st book is 'Hush,. The 1st book is 'First Grave on the Right' The Megaverse series by Angela Knight. The 1st book is 'Blood Sucking Fiends' (This is comedy) The I, Vampire series by Michael Romkey. The 1st book is 'I, Vampire' Historical Fiction is a great genre to find romance in! Screts of the Tudor Court series by Kate Emerson. The 1st book is 'The Other Boleyn Girl' The Queens fool by Philppa Gregory The Virgins Lover by Philippa Gregory Queen of Silks (Figures in Silk) by Vanora Bennett The Hidden Diary of Marie Antoinette by Carolly Erickson Mary Queen of Scotland and the Isles by Margaret George The Memoirs of Cleopatra by Margeret George (One of my favorite books.) The Secret Diary of Anne Boleyn by Robin Maxwell The Queen's Bastard by Robin Maxwell Household Gods by Judith Tarr and Harry Turtledove", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH063DA": "You're most likely pregnant. Sometimes it takes 2 months of a missed period to get hormones to show a positive test. I'd see a doctor if you wanna know now.", "36AZSFEYZ4YN941SETC8CDGF5ZLBV6": "you can't ignore a demand on the internet.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2S0O8": "In the Massachusetts meningitis outbreak, 64 people died and more than 700 people got sick across 20 states from a bad batch of steroids produced at the New England Compounding Center. Beitrag von Judson Datum:25.08.2015 02:28:57 Have you got a telephone directory?http://www.china-crystals.com//html/product.htm testing annual buy estrace online uk follow Profit, wealth creation, tax cuts, enterprise  these are not dirty, elitist words.They are not the problem.", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0NMLN": "Common causes of lower left abdominal pain include diverticulitis (inflamed or infected intestines), irritable bowel syndrome, left kidney stone, left kidney infection, crohn's disease(bowel disease), ulcerative colitis (another form of bowel disease), left ectopic pregnancy, left ovarian disease, and infection of the left fallopian tubes in women. it could be nothing, just a random pain, sometimes happens, if it still sore after a few days, go to docs, all are treatable   Opinion 2: firstly i must ask whereabouts in your cycle you are? is your period due to start in the next 10 to 16 days by any chance? if so then my guess is that what you are feeling is most likely a bit of Mittelschmerz (ovulation pain). what you are describing sounds very much like ovulation pain and is actually quite common and nothing to worry about. some women/girls get it every time they ovulate and others only feel it once in a while, while some never feel it. it feels like a very localized stabbing that kind", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RB2IX": "Sounds like a pinched nerve. See a chiropractor to get straightened out. He can adjust you spine so the nerves won't be pinched and your discs can get back into place.", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TTUWF": "Absolutely none of these are out of the ordinary. In fact, these are the most common side effects (and the reason why so many people avoid Depo). There are plenty of side effects, but you seem to have the common ones. You may find yourself with watery or thick, green discharge, impaired sex drive, a desire to overeat (combined with a slower metabolism that leads to weight gain), nausea, pelvic cramps, horrible mood swings and depression, constant temper, hot flashes, the list goes on. My advice would be to take calcium pills because Depo provera can lead to osteoporosis. It decreases the risk of kidney cancer but increases the risk of breast cancer. Honestly, I wouldn't be surprised if you never saw your period ever again while on the shot. Most women lost it completely after taking the shot for a while. If you went off the shot, you'd still get it back but it may take some time. Hope this helps.", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SZH3X": "This 600 word essay is for my Communication design class. The class topic of investigation is 'The social politics of (involved in) a design studio workflow'. In summary: how people can best work together efficiently and effectively in a creative design studio environment. link the essay to my chosen topic: Emotional Intelligence or social intelligence How do I do this essay? What should I talk about in each paragraph? Can someone give me a guide of how to do this essay? I think this is hard (as English is not my 1st language  I'm not smart...)", "3LVTFB9DE5GRVDDM8GAC71844K0QGA": "The science of ancestral roots is greater than a govt form for data. His ancestry is half Caucasian  half not.", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LUP7E": "Look for ones that are for sensitive skin and/or hyper allergenic. I know Nair has one like this, but you may not want to use that. Usually there's a drugstore brand like this. Try not leaving it on as long either. That could be what's doing it as well. If you are allergic though, you are probably allergic to all the hair removal creams. You may want to try waxing.", "3YLPJ8OXX8BVSULEZT33SK7UBIC4XW": "You should really wear a mask or some kind of breathing apparatus. Take frequent breaks! I'm not a professional in this industry so I don't claim this as professional advice.", "3S829FDFT2Z8SQ47S44WVO10OV6XD3": "May 7, 2013 ... After a super carb-y pre-race meal of Indian food ?? yeah, could have ... ?w, my knee hurts?? at mile 4, and at mile 8 ? ?h good, I can't feel my .... cavity filled, I decided to have the chip on my front upper tooth fixed, too. Although the way the teeth look in the mouth and the bite that you exhibit are indicators that you might need treatment, there are other ways to tell if you might need braces. ... Food that you can't clear away can lead to bacteria that develops. If you've had a bad experience, keep looking for a better office! .... and have no responsibility to ??elp?? the dentist with fixing my teeth. ..... cares about her patients and left a thank-you note at the ... He has since moved in with his parents so he can be close if needed. ... When I can't ensure that he's safe anymore, I'll have to put him in a nursing facility.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR0U6E": "I'm glad that you've chosen dental hygiene as a profession. And don't let baboon head's comment discourage you. He has shown one of the disadvantages of dental hygiene, and that is possibly working with a dentist you don't like. I knew a hygienist that quit hygiene all together because she hated the dentist she worked for so much. I would never work for a dentist like him, and I hope you wouldn't either. I would hope that any dentist would know more about dentistry than his hygienist. They go to school twice as long. Anyway, hygiene school is rough, but it is worth it in the end. To me anyway, I've known hygienist who quit because of the repetiveness of the job. But to me, every patient is different. I might be scraping calculus off teeth all day, but the education I give is different for each patient. It's all about the patients for me. Making them comfortable, finding out what motivates them, educating them about not only their oral health but also their overall...", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RC2IY": "( You can say it winds you down if that makes you sleep better  yes the pun is intended . ) Some individuals , often from prolonged unresolved stress , have low cortisol levels throughout the entire day . They go to bed exhausted and wake up still tired . Exercise usually gives them a jump-start to get them through the day , as does coffee or maybe some pharmaceutical drug .", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NB43W": "But the next day her hip still hurt and was swollen and bruised . Her mother took her to see the doctor . It turned out Lisa had a hip pointer , a bruise to one of the bones of her hip . Your hip joint involves two bones . Your hipbone is called the and the top of your leg bone ( femur ) is called the ( pronounced : troe-KAN-tuhr ) .", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z5KFA": "Ah, so a First Class passenger! Great story.", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ62NE": "cut back on carbs, sweets, exercise more, lose weight.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K2YPN": "Good luck. :D Reinier 07-22-2002, 11:11 AM i did 270 for 6 last friday.slowly stepping up to the world record :) chris mason 07-23-2002, 03:53 PM Forgot to post here, as per my journal, I miffed it rather decidedly.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VZL8Z": "well from what i been told from my friends they effect are felt in both sides and innocents can be found in both sides of the conflict. well i would like to star by saying that before Israel took Palestine from the Palestinians the government and pretty much what we could call a country was nonexistent. most of the people living there lived under the worst situation whit out being help by anyone in the most gruesome poverty.", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT89R4": "as soon as they're old enough for solids. that old saw about not introducing eggs/peanuts/dairy, etc until 'x' age has been thoroughly debunked. there's no need to avoid them unless there's a family history of allergy. my 2-1/2yr old has eaten dairy, eggs, and peanuts since six months and she's fine - but because her father's allergic to shellfish, i'll wait until she's 5 before introducing shrimp, etc. Opinion 2: ya my son loves eggs and so does my 9 month old. i couldn't keep him away. Opinion 3: that bit about not giving babies eggs, dairy, peanuts, shellfish, nuts, etc, before 'x' age is old school - modern research has revealed that delayed introduction contributes to developing allergies, doens't prevent them. just look at countries like thailand, cambodia, and the african countries - peanuts are one of the first foods offered and the rate of allergy there is basically zero. my west indian boyfriend had never even heard of peanut allergy before he came to canada in hi", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKR0IK2": "How big are your Calves?I have two cows and the only place I can get boots for them is here", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC3PWG": "It could be an STI like Gonorrhoea, or quite a simple explanation like your wife has a heavy discharge, or she wears unsuitable pants like G strings- these can cause terrible thrush which can cause terrible dischrage, i must say you don't trust your wife if you are sniffing her pants!!!!! if you are a teacher you could give them a x evertime they are bad and write it down in a report , then give them a star if they are good , and get parents to sighn off on this every week . of course if this doesn't work you should punch them in the face so hard they would have to drop their pants to chew My wife and I just celebrated our 4th smoke free anniversary. We went to a hypnotist and it worked for us.", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U561T": "I don't know :(", "3FW4EL5A3LMKO03U7QZM9FG0EVJ22R": "This is sun damage and you should wear sun screen all the time from now on. An excess amount of melanin in the skin causes brown spots such as age spots, moles, freckles, lentigos and blue/black birthmarks. Exposure to the sun and hormones will make these brown spots darker and more obvious.", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZU7AG": "Be true to yourself, help others, make each day your masterpiece", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S7ES7": "most people think it's wrong... but I have no clue why. I've written a paper on this, and in surveying 50 people, most said the first thing they thought of when seeing an interratial relationship is 'what will the kids look like?' everyone gets paranoid even though we say we're past discrimination. argh Independent means that the outcome of one event does not impact the probability of the outcome of the other event.", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZATUN": "His full and official title was 'Imperator Caesar Divi Filius Augustus'. The title or name of Augustus was adopted by his successors, who held the name during their own lifetimes by virtue of their status, offices and powers. Each was ruled by a senior emperor, with the rank of 'augustus', and a junior emperor, who ranked below him as a caesar. Augustus remains in use as a given name. Emperors frequently amassed Republican titles, notably 'princeps Senatus,' 'consul' and 'Pontifex Maximus.' The first emperor, Augustus, resolutely refused recognition as a monarch. Rome used no single constitutional office, title or rank exactly equivalent to the English title 'Roman emperor'. It seems that from then on Octavian (later first emperor Augustus) used imperator as a praenomen ('Imperator Caesar' not 'Caesar imperator'). Under the Tetrarchy, Diocletian set in place a system of co-emperors, styled 'Augustus' and junior emperors, styled 'Caesar'. Rome achieved great glory under Octavian/Augu...", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63Y142": "I didn't get ice cream though.Instead i got a Coke icee.Good Luck!", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLHWGK": "I didn't see anything about bloody gums. Call your doctor immediately if you experience shortness of breath, fainting, become dizzy, or have fast heartbeats. This condition is called anemia, and causes patients to experience severe weakness and tiredness. Patients may have less than the normal number of white blood cells as well. Other symptoms include fever, chills, loss of appetite and weight, easy bleeding or bruising (due to lower than normal platelet levels), bone or joint pain, headaches, vomiting, and confusion. Some people with asthma may go for extended periods without having any symptoms, interrupted by periodic worsening of their symptoms called asthma attacks, while others have some symptoms every day. It is important to recognize and treat even mild symptoms to help you prevent severe episodes and keep asthma under better control. Are there early signs that I am starting to have problems with my asthma? What symptoms indicate that my asthma is getting worse?", "3S4TINXCC0LSJKSVDHQUHLM796MOBF": "Good dental care costs money but dental implants are very expensive. The cost of dental implant can reach as much as 30,000. Consider: - The cost of dental implant surgery itself - How much for each post? - How much for each crown? - You may need several implants which will require several crowns. Most insurance does not cover dental implants. Mini dental implants prices are much lower than standard dental implants. Don't be fooled by 'cheap dental implants'. If someone is offering you cheap implants, you will get what you pay for: CHEAP implants. Do you really want to go cheap on something as important as your smile? It is always best to shop around for the best prices but don't forget you want the best dental implants prices along with the best dental implants surgeon. Tips to keep the cost of dental implant down: If you. But if they hedge around the answer, look for another dental implant surgeon. If you are looking to replace a single tooth with an implant costs are generally less than", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8K9W4": "Actually I don't wan na scare u this is a penis size chart from medical book ------------------ Penis Size Chart Very Small Penis Under 5'' Small Penis 5'' - 6'' Average Penis 6'' - 7'' Big Penis 7'' - 8'' Huge Penis Over 8'' But fatness has a great hand in this I tell u that my penis size was 5.6'' but after losing weight I restored 4 cm of my penis size so it became 7.2'' And after that I started penis enlargement exercises and now my penis size is still in increase In following steps I'll tell u the some of penis enlargement secrets but try to lose weight too to feel the amazing difference I felt Jelqing is a good way to increase penis size not by making muscles stronger because penis contains no muscles but by revealing The spongy tissue stronger and more acceptable for bloodflow So try it but stick to the rules or u'll hurt ur penis and cut the nerves About the Technique The basic function of the Jelq technique is to lengthen and thicken your penis.", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC1E4X": "the path leads nowhere - it means you didnt want to take the others  and considering that a sizable proportion of the earths people are dark it should end up this way. And if you think about it if the dark coloured people united together they would easily have the greater majority of the worlds resources without which the white world would be unable to function without.", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUAFNA": "speak with your doctor and see if there is the possibility of starting the weaning process by asking for what is called a maintenance dosage.. that is just enough for you to naturally taper down the amount over time while your body adjusts.. stopping any pain med right away after repeated use can oftenly cause serious withdrawal traits. Addiction to pain meds is very very common.. your doctor should recognize what is happening and be able to help you out. Good Luck", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2SAHN": "Well, I'm not one yet, but soon! That's what I'm in college for. Demand is extremely high for this area, as it is a field that is constantly developing and in use. The following is a great site on Nuclear Medicine Technologists, as well as any other career you may be considering.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BG59J": "hormone imbalance. You should probably go get a blood test at your gynocologist and find out what the issue is.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KZJ4P": "for the stomach-sit ups  and for thighs and legs- leg lunges and squats", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1TYAPO": "Unexplained purple bruiselike spots on thighs Ive had about 4 consecutive sets of different spots on my thighs   For the past   month and a half, purple bruiselike spots have been appearing on my thighs. to me and while the doctor says nothing is wrong I cant help but worry   all of   these incidents have been odd and have occured bipolar/lamictal bruise I have weird bruising on my leg because of an increase in my lamictal mg. it     then another one. ive kinda got bruisy spots on one of my thighs. i waited for a     can recommend to at least help with the itchiness i know brusing easily can als Thigh bruise List of 12 disease causes of Thigh bruise, patient stories, diagnostic guides. Diagnostic   Thigh bruise: Bruise occurring on or around the thigh. does anyone ese bruise easily/unexplainedly? Need Help? I bruise easily in the spots where my Fentanyl patches are/were   when I   look like finger marks .", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMRT45": "Frogs: Pac-Man: This is probably one the largest frogs you can find on the market. They're really cheap and pretty easy to setup for as they can't climb and thus do well in a generic long tank with some substrate, a water bowl, a hide, and a heater, depending on your temperature. They really don't move unless there is food in the form of a mouse or insect, so not for you if you want some activity, although most amphibians aren't very active anyway. They need it really wet and a substrate like moss is probably better than coco fiber. Tomato: Also a pretty large terrestrial frog, they may be a bit more active, but still not too active. Their bright orange-red color is usually a selling point, but they're harder to find around local pet stores. Their requirements also aren't very much different than Pac-Man frogs. Green: Sort of the traditional tree frog, they need slightly more heating than normal and UVB lighting as they are diurnal. They are a lot smaller than other frogs and thus eat", "3VGET1QSZ0XDMHY7RM5OTDDXTIZW7I": "He did well considering how poorly prepared he was. The poor soil in the Sydney area was a big issue, meaning the first crops the settlers/prisoners grew failed. Phillip had to treat the convicts well, and offer them incentives to show enterprise, in order to get the colony producing and expanding.", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6OJKE": "No. Showing the dog nothing was meant by it with a quick rub on area hit or petting it, would tell the dog that all was well and nothing, no reason for concern, it would be quickly forgotten with the puppy carrying on as normal. Accidents happen and the pup will not sit there and fret about what happened.", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBL11IJ": "Speakers from the Federal government (ONC, CMS, NLM), industry (First Data Bank, Surescripts), academia (University of New Mexico, University of Pittsburgh), pharmacy standards groups (American Society of Health Systems Pharmacists (ASHP), United States Pharmacopeia (USP), and others will present. The emphasis, as always, is on practical and novel ways to use and understand this free drug information, which is produced and consumed by a number of Federal agencies. The DailyMed RSS feed provides updates and information about new drug labels approved by the FDA and published on NLM's DailyMed Web site. About DailyMed DailyMed provides trustworthy information about marketed drugs in the United States. DailyMed is the official provider of FDA label information (package inserts). This Web site provides a standard, comprehensive, up-to-date, look-up and download resource of medication content and labeling found in medication package inserts.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK29FEL": "Hi, you should go to your local GUM clinic if your not getting any help and support at your doctors, ring your hospital and they will tell you where the nearest one is. Any lumps should be checked out, most are harmless but you can never be too safe. Good luck and I hope it turns out to be nothing Kate", "3ZRKL6Z1E8138TSZ0KZH21N5M8KGSO": "They offer 10 different juice products, in 3 different categories, and they vary in size. Nutritional information, including the number of calories in each drink, is available by clicking on the links below, and then the specific drink listed in the left panel. Jamba uses the metric system to measure quantities. I've given approximate conversions. To convert grams to ounces, multiply the number of grams by 0.0353.472g  16.6 oz. (about 2 cups)708g  25 oz. (about 3 cups)944g  33.3 oz. (about 4 cups)Jamba Fresh SqueezedCarrot: 472g / 708g / 944g   (100 cal. / 150 cal. / 200 cal. )Lemonade: 483g / 724g / 902g   (300 cal. / 450 cal. / 540 cal. )Orange: 496g / 744g / 992g   (220 cal. / 330 cal. / 450 cal. )Jamba Juice BlendsOrange/Banana: 383g / 668g / 972g   (200 cal. / 350 cal. / 510 cal. )Orange/Carrot: 484g / 726g / 768g   (160 cal. / 240 cal. / 320 cal. )Vibrant-C: 448g / 757g/ 936g   (210 cal. / 380 cal. / 500 cal. )Jamba ShotsMatcha Dream: 124g / 125g   (70 cal. )Matcha with OJ:...", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6KTVD": "Ontology languages are usually declarative languages, are almost always generalizations of frame languages, and are commonly based on either first-order logic or on description logic. The numerous ontology languages are often classified by structure or syntax. These languages use a markup scheme to encode knowledge, most commonly with XML.", "3OKP4QVBP2VZ8X65JKDQH1TZ02DAGM": "I feel sorry for those who...lack the capacity to believe in something strongly enough to fight for. There are such things ad irreconcilable differences. An example from our modern world: There are nations governed by fundamentalist theocracies who believe it their sacred duty to bring the 'infidel' nations under the holy rule of their religious dogma. There are other nations on earth that hold the freedom of religion as a fundamental human right and the separation of church and state a fundamental mechanism to protect that right. Both sides hold their viewpoint as a core value on which there can be no compromise. So... we are left with the choice between abandoning what we believe because we are unwilling to defend it or fighting for what we believe in and accepting that there will be consequences, many of which are unpleasant.", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK30YU38": "That's pretty normal sized. Try doing Kegel exercises to tighten your muscles. Basically it's like you're trying to stop peeing contract all those muscles and hold them. Do this throughout the day.The only thing I can think of is if you're very overweight that his penis might not be making all the way inside (just a thought no offense if you aren't!) --I'm very fat and this has happened to me. Try some different positions.", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE717IM": "Are we having a slight identity problem here, my dear? An avatar is supposed to represent you, not BE you. She does not need a boyfriend, although it is possible that you do.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8Y5EV": "Henry Kuttner's 1952 story 'The Ego Machine' is not even Kuttner's first story about a time-traveling robot from the future. The much-reprinted classic 'Happy Ending' by Henry Kuttner and C. L. Moore (generally published as by Henry Kuttner but attributed to Kuttner  Moore by ISFDB) first appeared in the August 1948 issue of Thrilling Wonder Stories with this editorial blurb: Out of the Future emerge the Robot and Karn--while James Kelvin fights them blindly, not knowing friend from foe! That was beaten out by one month by Walt Sheldon's much less famous (never reprinted as far as ISFDB knows) 'Perfect Servant' , featuring a robot named Tobor (robot spelled backwards! ), which appeared in the July 1948 issue of Startling Stories with this blurb: Tobor, the ideal robot flunkey and yes-man, came out of the future--and did everything his master wanted, until . Kuttner  Moore (alias Lewis Padgett) regain the lead with another famous classic, 'The Twonky' , in the September 1942 issue", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65SKPD": "Sometimes a persistent bladder infection could actually be something else, like chlamydia. You might need a stronger, broad-spectrum antibiotic like Cipro.", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEDLGG": "Gonna resort to cut and paste since it is apparent no one wishes to waste time on this question. http://www.nd.edu/rbarger/www7/puritans.html '''PURITANS The Puritans were a group of people who grew discontent in the Church of England and worked towards religious, moral and societal reforms. Escaping persecution from church leadership and the. Puritans stripped away the traditional trappings and formalities of Christianity which had been slowly building throughout the previous 1500 years. Point one, they were not a small group of people. Most of the Puritans settled in the New England area. God had already chosen who would be in heaven or hell, and each believer had no way of knowing which group they were in. Cotton Mather, a leader of the group, quietly led the way in bringing this crisis to an end. The moral character of England and America were shaped in part by the words and actions of this strong group of Christian believers called the Puritans. u O --------------  ...............z", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP373L": "Youre not one of the lucky ones, the vast majority of women can go without cramps or whatever but they dont because they prefer to complain rather than learn what they need to in order to prevent cramps or whatever. But anyway, everything sounds normal, its perfectly normal for your first few periods to be very light like this, and its normal for periods to be irregular until you are well into your late teens or early twenties. You need to know what happens during menstrual cycles to understand why it's irregular, the Pituitary Gland in your brain starts releasing the Follicle Stimulating Hormone (FSH), when high enough this tells your ovaries to start producing eggs. As eggs grow they produce the hormone Estrogen, when this is high enough the Pituitary Gland stops releasing FSH and starts releasing Luteinizing Hormone (LH) instead, when high enough this causes ovulation where the egg breaks from the ovary.", "3UL5XDRDNCHN9CO65QALHDWFK5X58T": "Could be conjunctivitis (pink eye) which is highly contagious, but not full blown yet. I could also be allergies and your cold could also be an allergy. If your over 18 go the pharmacy and get some over the counter antihistamine tablets and antihistamine eye drops. If these don't work in a day or so, I'd see you eye specialist.", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV31V5R": "well just sit him down and say uncle i thank you for all of your help. but i think i should go back home i miss my family and friends. good luck", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5UF9C": "No fizzy drinks, cakes, sweets, chocolate, reduce sugar on cerials and in tea/coffee. Reduce intake of processed foods. If it comes out of a can it's probably got sugar in it. Please go to the link below for professional advice on this subject. This is the best way to correct your diet for less blood sugar. Right this minute: exercise. Go up and down some stairs. Take a walk. Do some jumping jacks. In general: diet and regular exercise. Lots of fresh fruit and vegetables (but avoid fruit drinks), reduce or eliminate sweets as mentioned above, go easy on starches like bread and pasta, stay away from high-fat stuff like fries and chips and nuts, and go more for lean meats like fish and lean chicken than for fatty things like steaks and burgers. A good dietary guidebook such as a diabetic cookbook would help. Whoever is monitoring your blood sugar should also have some good advice for you.", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH0769Q3": "All journeys have secret destinations of which the traveler is unaware.", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ68M9S": "Katie a few seconds ago Hi there!! Just wondering if you have any problems with your school work. We've got plenty of people who can help you here :) Also, my last question was answered in less than 10 minutes :D Anyway, you can just go ahead and try for yourself. Opinion 2: Dedication: Vincent throws away his born life to live his dream, works out to exhaustion, and works harder than the Valid persons. That British dude that is his vehicle drains himself dry to make enough samples for Vincent's lifetime. Humanity: Vincent is fallible. Vincent has ambition. Vincent has love in his heart when he falls in love with the hot chick. Sacrifice: The British guy who is Vincent's vehicle or beard into the Valid society drains himself dry for Vincent, then burns himself up in the kiln disposal unit so he can never accidentally betray Vincent. Vincent leaves behind the only true love in his life to fly to the stars with the Gattaca space mission. Vincent is willing to die to prove to his broth", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXSQI2": "I have 2 Caribbean grandparents, another that's biracial (Caribbean and Scottish) and the forth is also biracial (Caribbean and Indian). Obviously both my parents are 1/4 cast. Here's my dilemma, white and white make white and that's the same with two biracial parents or two Asian parents ect, therefore two 1/4 cast parents should also make 1/4 cast kids right? But what am I if the1/4 in the parents are from two different races? Also I have a hard time saying anything other than black because I'm darker. However I have 3 other siblings, same parents. Two are very fair (one with green eyes) and the other is the same as me. So two of us just say black and the other two say mixed. I find this very uncomfortable because we all have the same parents and it makes me feel separated from 2 of my siblings? I would really like a clear answer on what our mix is so we can all claim the same true racial identity.", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEA3O4": "Place the lid onto the rim and, using one finger to hold the lid securely, twist on the screw band until its tight.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR26US": "Everyday now , I wonder what it will be like walking into my house and not having him to greet me ? I live alone , what will it be like when I no longer hear him purr when he curls up next to me on the couch ? How will I feel remembering him looking at me with his big eyes ?", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPS1LU": "Personally, I have read, owned, and enjoyed books and stories that cover 99 of your categories. While some fantasy can be written to spec like that, they're not the best ones to my mind. If you're writing, best to find your own path. even between the dialogue it is better to say what the character is doing instead of writing 'he said' or 'i asked' all the time. something like: 'i sank back in my chair and turned to him. 'why not?'' It's okay if it feels foreign and that's why I struggle. Give me a map or glossary and I'm probably ok. But so many fantasy authors make up so much stuff that I can't picture it anymore Nd I get distracted trying to. It?? ridiculous. She gets around her problems by saying her novels are ??antasy?? therefore normal rules don?? apply. But then she rapes general fantasy rules and claims she can do this because her vampires are based more on science?? Which one is it?", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNNTYN": "OMG.... I have a 4 year old Lab who has eaten just about everything there is to eat, including a battery, which she threw up! I wouldn't worry, Ana's lived through so many things that I was convinced were going to do her in when she was a puppy. She even ate yarn! (which I had to pull out of her butt at 2 in the morning in the snow, but that's a WHOLE nother story!)", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0QLMP": "If treatment isn't possible, you may just have to continue to keep her as comfortable and happy as you can for as long as possible. In the meantime, dehydration is a risk for a hamster with this problem. You can use a syringe to put some water (Pedialyte is even better) in the side of her mouth once per hour. Don't put it straight down the throat because that can result in aspiration into the lungs. Another way to keep her warm  is to take a clean sock, and fill it 2/3 with plain, raw white rice. Tie the open end and microwave it for about 1 1/2 minutes. Then shake to distribute the heat. Make sure it's not so hot that it could burn your hamster. Put it in the cage for added warmth. You can re-warm it when it gets cool. The hamster can cuddle up to it if she's cold, and move away from it when she's not. If you have more questions about this, just let me know by clicking on REPLY. I hope your hamster will reach a full recovery. Anna", "3PCPFX4U40OLHDHRXW4UPG8S350FQ0": "Pops, try this natural migraine treatment:   The medicines prescribed by the doctors are devised only to keep the pain in check. It does not prevent a recurrence of another episode. Further, it creates a dependence on drugs that are very harmful in a long term. Natural treatment usually involves a strict discipline that need to be followed for a period of time which will result in complete prevention of migraine recurrence. Here are some of the tips that can be followed to keep the pain at check:   1. Breathing Exercise   Breathing regulates the flow of blood and hence the oxygen supply to the brain and head region. Breathe slowly and deep so that you can focus away from the pain. 2. Head/Eye Massage   Gently massage your forehead with your fingers. Massage the acupressure points around the eye. It can offer a great relief from pain. Gently apply mild pressure and run your forefinger around the cavity of the eye. 3. Aromatherapy   Add a few teaspoons of essential oils of a prefe", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGXUS0": "Haiphong is the major port and third largest city in North Vietnam. The majority of North Vietnam's imports arrive through the port of Haiphong, which is connected by railroad with Hanoi. During the Vietnam War, Haiphong was a major supply depot and was heavily bombed from 1965 until 1968, when bombing was curtailed by President Johnson. During the attacks, much of the population was evacuated and the industry dispersed. In 1972, the Nixon administration kindled a major controversy when the president ordered the renewal of bombing of Hanoi and Haiphong (April 16) and the mining of Haiphong Harbor as well as other harbors and inland waterways in North Vietnam (May 9). In addition, U.S. naval forces increased raids against coastal installations and put into effect a naval blockade of the North Vietnamese coastline. In a televised speech to the nation on May 8, 1972, Nixon defended his escalation of the air and sea war as crucial to cut off the flow of supplies to North Vietnamese troops", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWIN9T": "Last Medical Review: 02/20/2015 Last Revised: 02/20/2015", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VI1QM": "So, here now are the 5 biggest diet/workout mistakes and regrets that come to mind. If I could, these would be the first 5 Id go back and change 1. Training Like An Idiot As A Beginner With the exceptions of steroid use and a situation where youre regaining lost muscle, the best progress youll ever make in your life will be when you first start working out. Thats the best part about being a completely untrained beginner. Progress is capable of happening at a faster and more consistent rate than it will ever happen again in your life. Unfortunately for me (and MANY others), I never fully took advantage of it. Granted, I did make SOME progress during that beginner period. Thats part of the magic of being a beginner damn near everything will work at least a little no matter how poorly designed it is and how stupidly you execute it. But, the more intelligently its all designed and the more correctly you put it into action, the better it will work.", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TUWUI": "i dont know what country your from but i know that in australia u can revert back to ur maiden name without any charge an in ur case it would also depend on ur age as to whether u could do it ring ur local births deaths and marriages office an they will be able to give u the information u need", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV2DZE": "Publishing Structure How do I get my book published? If you aspire to be an author, a great place to start is your local library, where you'll find a wealth of information on writers groups and plenty of books on writing and the publishing process. Understanding how our industry works will help you appreciate the dynamics of the business and how a book gets from inbox to bookshelf. Being quite deliberate in your approach and thoughtful of your audience and the needs of the market, will certainly help your book get noticed. Getting an agent Our company policy is to not accept unsolicited manuscripts or synopses and we cannot enter into correspondence about unpublished work. So, when you feel your work is ready for publishing, you need to get a literary agent. Agents can objectively advise you on your work and will know the most suitable publisher to take it to, not to mention fighting for the best deal on your behalf. A comprehensive listing of UK literary agents can be found in the W", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2E8XPG": "Please do not worry about this, you can cure your mother, even people with Stage 4 terminal, with days to live, have gotten themselves completely cured. Stop all treatments, and start your mother on the treatment below once you get an idea of what it involves. Look for 'Budwig Protocol', used successfully in about 90 of cases, used for over 50 years by this doctor. You can also go to NIH site, and search for ''flax oil' cancer' and find more references. It is equally easy to prevent cancer by following a minimal part of this protocol. Dietary Flaxseed Alters Tumor Biological Markers in Postmenopausal Breast Cancer http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/entrez/queryd.fcgi?cmdRetrievedbpubmeddoptAbstractlistuids15897583 2. The inhibitory effect of flaxseed on the growth and metastasis of estrogen receptor negative human breast cancer xenografts is attributed to both its lignan and oil components. Support group: http://health.groups.yahoo.com/group/Flaxseedoil2", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XKCHBO": "In IELTS writing task: 1. Candidates must write answers in full, answers written in note form or in bullet points... http://t.co/mtDuI2h8c1", "3VMHWJRYHVE5QAI3JAZMJO4L08LXFD": "Don't pick! It's going to leave scars, and scars are harder to get rid of the the actual pimples. I use benzoyl peroxide for my pimples, and it works great. The treatment I use is quiet pricey, but before you try expensive things you should try the drugstore, like from clean  clear or neutrogena. A good homemade mask that helps with scars is an aspirin mask. Just use three aspirin, a couple drops of water and mix with some honey. Leave it on for 15 minutes and then rub in a circular motion with water (to exfoliate) until it's off. That should hopefully help.", "3TLFH2L6Y9ME8ZX7Q5JIA2PQE8T2TG": "KawasakiDisease Swollen,red, cracked lips and tongue. Swollen,red feet and hands. Swollen lymph nodes in the neck http://t.co/HSH59ZtaZZ", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R396EC": "If you have an overbite or an underbite, or your lower jaw appears to be 'pushed' to one side more treatment with braces and maybe osteotomy (cutting of bone to realign) of the mandibular/jaw bone is involved. You will need a referral from your dentist to an ORTHODONTIST for assessment of your bite/position of your teeth and temporomandibular joint. An ORAL SURGEON would be involved to do the osteotomy. Here is some information on different types of jaw misalignments :  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prognathism   This website is owned by an orthodontist who does this type of dentistry :  http://www.drcatherinefulton.com/index2....", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBU7LZ": "What is the most important information I should know about Topamax? Seek immediate medical attention if you experience blurred vision, changes in vision, or pain in or around the eyes during treatment with Topamax. Carry or wear a medical identification tag to let others know that you are taking Topamax in the case of an emergency. Topamax may cause dizziness or drowsiness. Alcohol should be avoided while taking Topamax. What is Topamax? Topamax is used to control seizures. Topamax may also be used for purposes other than those listed in this medication guide. Topamax is in the FDA pregnancy category C.  It is not known whether Topamax passes into. Topamax can be taken with or without food. Do not take a double dose of this medication. Topamax may cause dizziness or drowsiness. Dangerous sedation, dizziness, or drowsiness may occur if Topamax is taken with any of these medications. If you have questions about the drugs you are taking, check with your doctor, nurse or pharmacist.", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXOUJO": "Sounds corny but the aloe would be there so the green tea won  26  039  t have the consistancy of water although you could also try getting some green tea herbs and boiling them in water to sterilize it and then mix the herbs with the aloe.Lemon is a skin bleaching thing . Try it . I got dark stitches scars from falling on an escalator when I was 5 . Now its really light thanks to lemon ! try using a scar cream like a cocoa butter stick . or a scar lightening cream for ur face they have tons of stuff like that at your local store ! im here in the philippines.scars wont 100  fade but cocoa butter helps Well im 19 and i have never heard of any stereotype with facial scars or bruises .", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSLG3W": "... My cat had the same issue ... a couple of months after I got her, she ... The other cat went out into another room with another cat water dispenser and began drinking from it. ... help me please, i am overwhelmed with 3 cats and 1 dog in a 1?... Nov 30, 2012 ... Would you please share with me what type of dog food inspires such ..... My cat, Maizie, will only drink her water from the edge of her bowl. .... We recently got a new Morkie puppy who dances for his food? ?t is the cutest thing! But you have to slowly add it so your pet(s) get used to the new taste. .... I intend to do this for my dogs as they do drink a lot of water but because one of ..... Sign me ... The rule is drink, wee wee in 10 min. ... some days they wont eat at all and other days they cant get enough .... It really did help with her aggression BECAUSE of the type of ... We just got a new 9 week old pom puppy that will eat until she?...", "3JY0Q5X05J40IOJ85K50DN42YXSGG6": "Yes -- but it depends where you live. How many animals youre allowed to own is different in different jurisdictions. In various places, they set limits by the building, development, neighbourhood, city, state/province, or country. Some places have no restrictions set at all (although even there, they will step in on hoarders because of animal neglect), whereas other places Ive run into allow as few as 2. In order to find out whether there are any such restrictions in your area, you can check online or call your local city hall and/or animal control. Its best to know before you have too many pets, of course. While theres definitely a valid argument as to whether these laws are fair or make sense, theyve been found constitutional (if youre in the US) multiple times, so theyre quite difficult to fight. Good luck with your local laws. Ninjakitten 98 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUURWRF": "It's the 'sucking' I was referring to ??", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBU87D": "It is very difficult to watch because there's not much you can do. Sadly, a seizure that lasts that long is a very ominous sign. If the dog stops seizing and you have some valium, I would suggest you give him some to make him comfortable. Should your dog continue having seizures your vet will put him on some medication. I have a dog that has had seizures for 12 years. The vets originally put her on Pheylbarbital but it didn't work so good for her, then he changed her to Primidone. I managed this dog like this for 13 years (she lived to be 15 started seizuring on her 2nd birthday) and we rarely had seizures. Phenobarbital is very inexpensive. Valium is only given WHEN the dog is having a seizure not as prevention. the vet will keep you right, it is heartbreaking and very ,very distressing to witness a dog having a seizure-please rest assured the dog knows absolutely nothing about it. just the owners who cry and suffer the heartbreak. xx", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G267N": "The only thing I can think of is stress. You probably want to go to a doctor to have it checked out though. and you still cant get tired enough to go to sleep.you probably do have a sleep disorder.", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ7CT0": "for example, i'm 50 english, 25 german, 20 welsh, and 5 blackfoot indian. all of those races have their own unique charactersitics and they all combine to make a bunch of different people. i also think most orientals and blacks look alot alike too.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OH0UM": "What is it? It's HE'LL!", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NJZGB": "Don't do it. I started when I was 7... and got progressively worse as I grew.. for about 10 years I could stop and start anytime I wanted but then I became addicted, not only to nicotine but habit... the habit is the first addicting thing to it.. I got upset.. I smoked. Someone said it was cool. I smoked. I was bored... smoke smoke smoke  I quit about three months ago. I just got so sick of it. You need to talk to a counselor so something and talk about why you want to try it. It may be a more deep seated issue than just the smoking.. or you could be bored. Find a new hobby.", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDU1AD": "i would go ahead and see the dermatologist. it sounds like proactive doesn't do everything you want it to. or you could change what your using on your face to see results. Opinion 2: only if they are unbearable and causing you depression and social isolation, if not, just wash your face with salicylic acid based face wash and use only non comedogenic moisturizers that are water based if you use some. controlling your face grease is key, so you might want to wash your face several times in the day but use the non-comedogenic moisturizer to prevent overdrying, this should keep your face clean and lessen irritation of your sebaceous glands. dermatologists will only overmedicate you or give you the same advice i just did, goodluck", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNPR8W": "A Feast of Ice and Fire. Bantam The world of A Song of Ice and Fire is a complex one. Author George R.R. Martin has put in considerable time and effort into building a believable fictional realm. Westeros and the lands beyond the narrow sea have rich histories and politics and rules. Every place has a certain dialect, a distinct way of dressing, and all the markers you need to see how cultures differ. The world-building is present right down to the food and beverages across the realm. Dinner in the North at Castle Black looks much different than a typical meal in the South in King's Landing. Peasants don't eat like those in the upper levels of society. The food and drink available loosely matches what would have been found in our world in the medieval period. Martin often takes care to mention what's on the table during a feast, and goodness knows that the characters often imbibe alcohol in one form or another (that's especially true on the television series, Game of Thrones).", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFTZWD8": "?Does the job as a good gainer but they should call the 6 pound jug Serious Mess. The scoop is way too big for the opening and I had to do quarter scoops otherwise it dumps all over the place, especially when I got about halfway through the jug. Make the hole bigger or the scoop smaller, ON. Definitely not purchasing again until this issue is resolved. I cannot speak for the 12 pound jug but the 6 pounder sucks. It's a pretty big design flaw. I don't want to feel like I'm playing Operation when I'm trying to make my shake and I've never had this problem with any other protein. This is a good straight weight gainer. I use it as a meal replacement during work because it just has so many calories. Plus it has 50g of protein if you have the full dosage of the product. They really support you using it in the method of blending with other items like granola or bananas to improve taste. I think it tasted fine when just mixed with water though.", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X49LX8": "the lump could be a cyst, as they are common (especially with piercings). They're not extremely painful and usually go away in less than a few weeks. however, if you do have one, they are bound to reoccur again and again. They're not cancer, they're not tumors, and no matter what any one says (on the internet of course) they're not UFO implant tracking devices.", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1HQKD": "First kill them by applying alcohol or fingernail polish directly to the tick by means of a Q-tip. After a few minutes grasp the dead tick as close to the skin as possible and apply steady traction until it releases its hold. Only rarely does a tick bite become infected. If there are a lot of ticks use an insecticide dip made for dogs. EDIT:Not old wives tales my source is the Dog Owners Home Veterinary Handbook by Delbert G Carlson, DVM and James M Giffen, MD please do not use any tick powder. Because it some insecticides used in this powder are not good for ur dog's skin. to get rid of ur dog's tick brush him regulary. and u may use anti tick shampoo 'Cisaflux'. It is the one of the best among the permitted tick free animal shampoos. apply the shampoo on ur dog and keep it for 5-10mins. There are anti-flea/tick mixtures that come in small 50 mL applications and all you have to do is not wash your dog for a week, apply it along their spine and voila, no fleas or ticks for 1-3 month...", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSNN0G": "We're so sorry to hear your pup was sick. Please call us now  800-877-7551 so we can learn more about what happened to her.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM62DY": "My first reaction is that, for some reason, your skin is drying out. It doesn't sound like an actual allergic reaction, but it could be. An allergy (which is what allergic means) is an immune response to a foreign antigen that results in inflammation and organ dysfunction. Allergies range from the life-threatening to the annoying, and include systemic anaphylaxis (A reaction between IgE antibodies bound to mast cells and an allergen that causes the sudden release of immunological mediators in the skin, respiratory, cardiovascular, and gastrointestinal systems. The consequences may range from mild (e.g, itching, hives) to life-threatening (airway obstruction and shock). ), laryngeal edema (Swelling of the larynx, usually resulting from allergic reaction and causing airway obstruction unless treated. ), transfusion reactions, bronchospasm, vasculitis (Inflammation of blood vessels), angioedema (swelling in of skin, mucous membranes, or internal organs), urticaria (Multiple swol...", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SGG4G": "Be happy within yourself and know that you are fine the way you are.", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMULD3": "I live near a beach......... every nice day I can get there, I go for a swim. beats the heat, the babes are a sight for sore eyes, and I LOVE playing in the sand with my son......... always gets the other MOMS all interested, and they came over to say Hi with their tots, and join in. VERYYYYYYYYY refreshing. I also like to eat alot of cuccumbers too in the summer...... full of water, tasty, light, yet fills you up, ......so you have more room for ice cream.....which is also refreshing!", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHE7BA": "kiwi is fiber rich.. if u wana increase ur blood sugar, u need 2 concentrate on vit. c rich like oranges, pineapple amp lemon", "3TKXBROM5T8O5HF43EQ6VC9Y520JI4": "Your dog will most likely be okay now that she got them down, choking is the biggest danger. But I would feed her a few pieces of white bread, just to put something soft in there around the bones as soon as possible. Ask the butcher-he knows what he can not saw through.", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNWXH9": "My kitties sleep in the bed with me all night and love to play all day . I am not sure where the writer of this article is getting her facts . I love dogs as well , but cats are soooo much easier . They are clean , smell nice , independent , and I don t have to rush home to walk them .", "3X4Q1O9UBHK5H8P500EECJ0BQG0O7Y": "( The Sonic characters from the video games are still fair game , since they 're owned by SEGA . The non-game ones , however , are not . ) If you want your fanfiction to be read and received well , do not write the story just so that two characters can have intimate sexual relationships for no reason other than the fact that you want them to , known as PWP (  Porn Without Plot '' or  Plot , What Plot ? '' ) .", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV2UXB": "1 - A). 2 - A). 3 - A). 4 - A). 5 - D). 6 - C). 7 - D). 8 - A). 9 - B). 10 - C). 11 - B). 12 - C). 13 - C). 14 - A). 15 - A). 16 - A). 17 - D). 18 - B).", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q96L36": "Lannat on mirza masroor, fr ths lie.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWXW1J": "My friend's cat was pregnant, and a whole group of friends happened to be there. First of all this cat was kind of moving around meowing, and being kind of squirrely, and it was obvious she was VERY pregnant. So anyways, she dropped on the ground and started licking herself... down there.", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TFGY1": "Not outside of the States", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3013F": "Hi If its not your big toe, and you wear strong boots, just get out there, an do some gentle walking at first see how you get on, if it hurts stop, do we take its not in a cast. Good Luck", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQ0LNP": "Ready to go again?In order to get a professional finish, you will need two coats of paint. (Unless the stars are aligned and you are using the exact same color that was previously used, there will always be spots you missed.) Hop back up on the step stool and lightly sand the ceiling again (yes, I said again.) You need to knock down any areas that got too much paint or a piece of lint.", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVUK8V": "Ask Experts Articles Encyclopedia Blogs Tickers Search Register FAQ Log in Vaginal discharge The time now is 04/30/07 - 17:38 SteadyHealth.com - Health Topics Forum Index - Cancer - Do I Have Cancer? Search forums for: Did you find posts in this topic useful? Author Message pretty Newbie Joined: 10 Aug 2006 Posts: 4 Posted: 08/10/06 - 10:07 Post subject: Vaginal discharge --------------------------------------. Other pains as well. Vaginal Discharge green vaginal discharge Vaginal Swelling and Pain- What is this???? Vaginal Bump help!!!!!!! bumps on vaginal mood swings. lower back pain. red bumps on bottom of Vaginal area. blue vaginal discharge My vaginal area is severly swollen, hurting, inflames, itchy strong smelling clear vaginal discharge internal pain in the vaginal area abnormal vaginal bleeding vaginal discharge. smelly discharge, abdominal fullness feeling, and back. Period 2 days late! Then brown discharge! White discharge from my vagina been tied 3 year ago now missed a m", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWRBMC9": "aromal aromatic balmy fragrant odoriferous odorous perfumed perfumy reeking, reeky scent-laden scentful spicy stenchful smelly", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWBSW0": "go to the DR.  My first several periods were not painful at all. Before you have your first period, you will begin to have discharge at times, maybe for years before your period starts.", "3LVTFB9DE5GRVDDM8GAC71844KZGQZ": "yes it is due to the pill...it creates a lil harmonal imbalance i the body...resulting in longer periods...nthin to worry have a smile :)", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S4238WF": "If he was prepared, he could easily have tightened his stomach muscles, so it wouldn't cause any injuries at all, but possibly some bruising.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6V0L80": "You are mixed race since your parents are both mixed race. Opinion 2: I'll bet your beautiful baby will look very light skinned black with dark hair and dark eyes. Your heritage is probably most dark hair and eyes, right? What about your husband's white side of the family? Are they light skinned blonde hair blue eyed people? If so, your baby may have a greater chance of lighter eyes and hair.", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5WF9E": "GO SEE A DOC TAKE THE PREGNANTEY TEST IF ITS A NO WAIT 2 WEEKS IS NO PERIOD THEN RE TAKE THE TEST GOOG LUCK THAT HOW I FOUND OUT WITH MY SON HE IS NOE 4 YR  i hope to have a girl as my girl friend like u, u r completely normal nothing wrong with u, some people just have a high sex drive, i am a guy and in some days i do it like 3 or 5 times a day also.it all depends on the sex drive and on how much u r turned on, but if u always all the time do it 5 times a day, then i guess ur husband is the luckiest man in the world to have u as a wife, and i recomend u to do sex more with ur husband or to do it harder and more passionatley, or try to change ur routine like for example try new positions or do exentric things like toys for example.be happy with ur self there is nothing wrong with u, any man wishes to have what ur husband have, be happy and good luck. Just explain to your parents what is wrong with your period, they won't think it has to do with sex.", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC3E4Z": "Windows 7 / Windows XP / Windows 8 Help the famous detective solve a baffling case in Sherlock Holmes and the Hound of the Baskervilles Deluxe , a chilling adventure inspired by the timeless tale . Charles Baskerville is the latest victim of what some believe to be a centuries-old curse . To break this curse before it strikes again , Henry Baskerville calls on the intrepid Sherlock Holmes and his colleague Dr. Watson .", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN507SB": "Unfortunately, dog shedding is a common problem for virtually all breeds, whether they have short or long hair. Of course, breeds with finer, softer hair may shed even worse. Either way, when dog shedding happens, you could be putting yourself and your family at greater risk for allergies and other breathing problems. Also, when it comes to aesthetics, excessive dog fur doesn't look right on your carpet or furniture. (Michael Gann/Demand Media)Step 1: Wash your dog. Before you can stop dog shedding, you must make sure that your pet is properly groomed. This process begins by thoroughly washing both his fur and skin. A dog washing shower attachment makes bathing a lot easier. You won't get water all over the place, plus there won't be any shampoo left behind on the dog's skin. Michael Gann/Demand MediaStep 2: Comb and brush your dog's fur. Use dog shedding combs and brushes to remove the top layers of fur. Make a habit of doing this every day, especially in the morning.", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618VHSM": "The answer to this is yes, but you need to know how. ... applies a new, protective, layer of varnish on the work -- to help seal the paint surface. ... paint layer of a work of art is just one of many layers that you will find on a painting. A glossary of art terms related to the painting of Johannes Vermeer and Dutch ... Each of the four sections of the glossary can be accessed from the menu top of ... part of an objects surface but creates at the same time a good sense of volume. The artist is also always available for commissions and you can see ... To keep up with the latest, be sure to check out David at the online ..... The Shirk Report ?? Volume 332 ... Those who choose to criticize, need to vent YOUR personal... I've seen the other artist's paintings of houses a few years back, but ... Can't find it for the life of me. ... old fashioned steam locomotive. .... Is there anything that helps with your pain, GB?", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBKTEA": "has something to do with your blood circulation..  thats why when you sit you get relief.its good you made an appointment to see a doctor. Common symptoms of COPD include : Shortness of breath (dyspnea) -- In the early stages of COPD, patients may experience breathlessness only during strenuous activity.", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONYZHC": "As a firefighter and paramedic I can tell you without looking at your face, you have second degree burns. The blistering could potentially be damaging to your face. You really should at least report to an emergency department. Facial Burns are nothing to mess with at all. A lot of facial burns I have seen often progressed to airway compromise just from a few small blisters.Not to mention a few blisters can also lead to a person becoming dehydrated. Here is how a second degree burn would be treated:General Pointers Use Narcotics intravenously (avoid intramuscular use) Avoid antibiotics until infection occurs Do not break Blisters Do not cover burns with Silvadene if transporting Obscures lesions for primary burn team Burn team will apply Silvadene after their evaluation Do not apply cold water Management Assess Inhalation injury Arterial Blood Gas (ABG) Carboxyhemoglobin Dive Chamber indicated for level 40 Assess Fluid status Urine Output minimums Adult: 30-50 cc per hou...", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3B7ZW8": "White Blood Cell Count . Measures the number of white blood cells in a microliter of blood. Normal values range from 4100/ml to 10900/ml but can be altered greatly by factors such as exercise, stress and disease. A low WBC may indicate viral infection or toxic reactions.", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9J6ZJ": "Their league, their rules, and they're not the only league with an age limit. The NFL prevents players less than 3 years removed from high school from entering the draft.For every Lebron James, Kevin Garnett and Kobe Bryant, there's countless number of Korleone Young's, Ellis Richardson's and Taj McDavid's who either very quickly didn't succeed in the NBA because of their lack of ability, or they weren't drafted at all and lose their chance to play pro ball or get a free college education on an athletic scholarship.Also, a player isn't required to attend college, but must be 1 year romoved from high school before entering the draft. They can go to college, play in the development league, attend a year at a prep school, or play overseas.I think playing even one year at a higher level will improve the quality of players entering the draft. Too many players have entered the draft out of high school who weren't ready and didn't make it. A player who may look good coming out of high school could prov", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0H628": "When talking about a 'he', 'she' or 'it', your verb or action word in the present tense (happening now) should follow the -s or -es rule. He never go. (Wrong) He never goes. (Right) She run. (Wrong) She runs. (Right) It seem to be bad. (Wrong) It seems to be bad.", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FL49D": "Dogs are not our whole life, but they make our lives whole.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHXDN0": "There are many reasons you might want to change doctors. An inability to have respectful conversations is one of them. Getty Images - Cultura Science/Sigrid Gombert Updated December 10, 2014. There are two aspects to changing doctors: leaving one doctor, and finding and seeing a new one. Once you have decided you have valid reasons for changing doctors, you'll want to be sure to do it the right way. If you don't, you may be left out in the cold when it comes to finding a new provider to meet your needs. Before You Leave the Doctor You've Already GotIn order to make the transition from your old doctor to your new doctor go smoothly, you'll want to do the following: If finding a new doctor is your choice, and not mandatory, then make sure there are other doctors who can help you before you leave. Some doctors do not take new patients. Others will not take Medicaid patients. Specialists are booked months in advance.", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4ERM4T": "He was not muslim. his religion was shamanism and tengriism most relevent to the mongol tradition. but he did try to contribute some knowledge from Islamic philosophy,", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTATZBW": "i have been on wellbutrin for a week now. i have developed severe constipation and now extremely distended aro http://t.co/fciUuBf9fr", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q4UFI": "Angry of course. I don't know what the perfect reply would be, something along the lines of it being very really worrying that a person of apparent mental stability has no feelings for the death of a animal. Dogs are so much better than humans in so many ways- I feel the loss of them very keenly. Losing a pet is a big deal. People who tell you it's not are mostly people who don't have pets themselves or don't know how to love people or animals. Idiots.", "3QO7EE372OLV4W5BSUIY6QH7O75BQB": "nullI prefer Flex Points as it lets me go with the flow of life and not limit where I can eat. I have had weeks where I did Flex Points but only had food from the Core program. My WW Leader advised that we try the other program once to shake our system up and see if we had better results. Id recommend it as I have found that Ive had different results eating different foods. Our bodies can get in a habit of one food type or another and changing can create a weight loss. If your mother is a WW member, theres online support at www.WeightWatchers.com for those switching to core. Have her consider the message boards online.Another idea is to explore the Core Cookbooks or Recipes online to keep it interesting! Other things for her to consider: Core requires more planning. Flex is more convienent. On Core you eat healthier. Flex tends to have more processed foods. Be realistic on Core: Dont expect everyone to cater to your dietary needs. Best of luck to her!", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367YAIWZ": "Oh..i hope to have some news about your..ehm....nipples if you'll decide to pierce! eheheh", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN05XGCT": "fantails. Just bought some the other day", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC0E4W": "I like this method because you can still moniter how much there eating but they will still have fun looking around for some of there food. But for new hamsters I would recommend waiting about a week to do this. That's because  new hamsters will probably just want to stay in there nest and not want to come out to go searching for food because they rather just have it all in one place, but after 1-2 weeks I would started scatter feeding with some of there food. Winter and Pets likes this Posted 14 July 2015 - 12:24 AM What I do is I put my hammys food in his bowl, I take a small hand full of the food that's in his bowl ( not all of it ) then I sprinkle it around his cage. I like this method because you can still moniter how much there eating but they will still have fun looking around for some of there food. But for new hamsters I would recommend waiting about a week to do this.", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX74AW": "I've done it within the first week of missing my period and it's always ... You will need: ... I DO NOT know anything about adding Dong Quai, so DO NOT ask me about it. ... Any pregnant woman, regardless of whether she plans to abort or?... Sep 8, 2011 ... As she prepares for the October 25th release of her memoir, My ... Jewell:  Laughs That's something that when the people edited it ... It's not a solo project on Jewell I have some artists that I been ... The doctor wated to see her every three months initially and ... that she will need some of the worksheets and books enlarged so she can read them properly? ... I couldn't answer your questions,but I have a lot of the same ones. Apr 1, 2015 ... But anyway you'd have known that my migraine is a full blown ... she say it helps position the baby very well during breastfeeding. ... who listened to us and didn't try to get it over and done with ASAP.", "3HEA4ZVWVDK4MU547S3I5TMOIFY55T": "I have never been to New Zealand, but have always wanted to go it looks like such a beautiful country.", "3T2EL38U0MI2HZ8CXQAGVN8Z7AVXQ8": "If it's really painful and way out of whack for what the Docs say it could cause... Call the practioner that prescribed you the plan B. I know I had the same thing but when i actually 'got my period' it was very very painful and i was being safe, so when i went to the docs 3 weeks later they said i was pregnant, i said it was impossible. They transferred me to a hospital equipped for babies and they scanned me in fear that i was ectopic but my baby's sac was empty. poor thing fell out :( So basically, if you're really nervous. get yourself checked out by the doctor, many times a pregnancy test can be a false negative so they can draw blood to check for HCG levels. Good Levels!", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3131I": "Tennessee Divorce Laws:RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS AND WHERE TO FILE: The plaintiff must be a resident of this state, or if the grounds for divorce occurred outside of the state, either the party must have resided in the state for 6 months preceding the filing of the complaint. Military personal must be a resident of the state for at least one year prior to filing. The petition must be filed in the chancery or circuit court in the county where the parties reside at the time of their separation, or in either the country where the defendant resides, or where the applicant resides. Based on Tennessee Code - Title 36, Sections 36-4-104 and 36-4-105LEGAL GROUNDS FOR DIVORCE: The following are causes of divorce from the bonds of matrimony: Irreconcilable differences between the parties. A two year period of separation, without cohabitation, if there are no minor children involved. Impotence. Bigamy. Adultery. Willful desertion for one whole year.", "3XUSYT70ITZ0V0YWPSFPMAEPEOMD0P": "First kill them by applying alcohol or fingernail polish directly to the tick by means of a Q-tip. After a few minutes grasp the dead tick as close to the skin as possible and apply steady traction until it releases its hold. If the head remains fixed to the skin, there is no need for concern.", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5ROM5": "- Agustin Vincente, p. 150 Those who accept the causal closure thesis tend to think that all entities that exist are physical entities (physicalists), but not necessarily. As Karl Popper says, 'The physicalist principle of closedness of the physical", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWCSW1": "This really grates my potato, doctors who remove important parts of the body with no real cause. A lymph node becomes swollen as it fights infection. The doctor could have done blood tests to rule out cancer instead of removing a vital tool in your body. My sons lymph nodes in his neck have been noticeable all his life, he is a slim child though. The likelihood of it being a post operation complication are not high, it is far more likely that another lymph node has taken up the slack for the missing colleague and is fighting twice as hard. See another doctor, not Dr Slice and dice.", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2CW21": "You can opt-out at any time..See our privacy policy.Our Story Advertise With Us Site Map Help Write for About Careers at About Terms of Use  Policies  2015 About.com  All rights reserved.", "3Z8UJEJOCZBK92KCWZS62CT6QFO39Q": " Single life is the time to focus on becoming a whole, complete person instead of searching endlessly for a 'better half.'", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZRYRF9": "We are very upfront with our charges , which means what we quote you is what you pay . Moreover , since we dont allow unnecessary expenses , we charge our clients in completion stages , especially with regard to dental implants and root canal therapy . However , we may request an advanced deposit of half the price for any service that requires lab work , to cover for the initial cost .", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXM5R6": "No. My opinion : - this - is why time travel should never exist! but it might be a very different story, it all depends on the way you write it.", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C35WB": "Simply awesome you Puritans!", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNX1VG": "Any switch in your child's diet can cause constipation, but I would look for the signs of constipation too. Feel your baby's belly, is it firm or distended? If you suspect constipation, see your pediatrician. People with beer bellies often have a large amount of subcutaneous fat also--that's the jiggly stuff on the outside--but if you examine them carefully, the muscular wall of their abdomen is actually distended. I've also seen people with beer bellies who did not have much subcutaneous fat--their abdomen was distended, but not jiggly. Girls lose their breasts and stop mentrating Teeth start to fall out (this is usually more common in bulimic cases because the stomach acid eat away at the teeth, but most anorexics have bulimic tendencies) hair starts to fall out Bones and joints constantly hurt distended belly from the acid bloating the stomach loss of sex drive loss of interest in just about everything muscle spasms constipation brain damage memory loss skin is easily bruised dea...", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMESE7I": "Lymph nodes swell when they're filtering junk out of your system. The lymph node isn't the problem, the infection is. I think you're best bet is to find out what's been you're problem, it appears it's ear infections, and solve that (Ex. Why do you keep getting ear infections?). Then, you'll not only have fixed your lymph node, you'll have gotten rid of your ear infections (which are probably more of an issue), too. Opinion 2: I think you should go see a doctor and they have this thing that they put in your ear and it flushes out whatever seems to be clogging it. It may be slightly uncomfortable but it'll make you feel better. Then they may give you these ear drops that you put in your ear to help clean them so it won't clog again. Don't be scared  These things happen to lots of people.", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHPTZC": "Like most women , I 've always been determined to get a defined , flat stomach . But after years of doing 500 crunches during every workout , I learned that determination only gets you so far when the approach is wrong .", "3NC6WP7WJHISCWZ8ZUD0LTCEM96WWI": "As much as they can handle, like most dogs. An hour twice a day is a good thing but some people balk at the time it takes (and it may be too much exercise for the humans to handle, haha). A half hour twice a day or an hour once a day is the minimum, really. Also I'm assuming you're talking about an adult bullmastiff, which is a relatively laid back dog, usually, that generally likes to bum around the house with its people and isn't too much of a bouncing-off-the-walls type. A puppy needs to be walked and possibly run with even more. If it has enough energy to wreck your house, it needs more exercise! Have fun with your dog :)", "37YYO3NWHDOAK0NY1CDYX5Y82D6CCG": "You know...it really dosen't matter to me what He looked like. He said 'I am the way, the truth and the life' But one day we will see Him and he'll still have the thorn holes in his forehead, the nail holes in his hands and feet, the spear hole in his side, and the scars on his back. i am a borderline epileptic, had them when i was a baby then doctors though i grew out of it till i was about 10 or 11 when the hit worse than when i was a baby, after all the tests they said that it is a scar on the left side of my brain that effects my right. The hole will close in a few days to few weeks. You may continue to have a scar for some time. Scarring depends on many things such as how large a piercing you had, how long you had it for, and what kind of jewellery you used (if you had a reaction etc you will have a scar), and if the piercing was torn/damaged due to heavy jewellery or an accident.", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOGAW3A": "Scientists have long known that cocaine can raise the risk of a heart attack. The study was based on interviews at 64 hospitals across the United States with 3,946 patients, ages 20 to 92, who had suffered heart attacks. Mittleman said the risk of a heart attack appeared to drop significantly after the first hour of cocaine use. The cocaine users who had a heart attack were 44 years old on average. Scientists have long known that cocaine can raise the risk of a heart attack. Mittleman said the risk of a heart attack appeared to drop significantly after the first hour of cocaine use. The cocaine users who had a heart attack were 44 years old on average. Dr. Steven V. Manoukain, a cardiologist at Emory University School of Medicine in Atlanta, said the 24-times-higher risk as calculated by the Harvard researchers was higher than he thought it would be. Umm, how about just staying away from it? Cocaine can kill a healthy person the first time he/she tries it why take the risk?", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G5W4U": "Anyone who purchases a VPS hosting plan can have it customized to fit their specific needs.Upgrading a VPS hosting plan is easy to do and can be done at any time.The full root access offered by Hostgator allows VPS customers to install software to further customize their hosting for their own needs.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXHCJW": "nah gym sucks I hate gym gym is overrated http://t.co/o4A3zhn9Xr", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0968B": "but i will refrain from further slander to your character as your introspection and thought on what you were accused of being by your doctor was the whole point of the consultation.get a better one but do not lie to him and you may get a different and more positive diagnosis.GOOD luck.", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX3CQ08": "I have the same sized penis and its above average. Since the average globally is 5.5'-6', most girls around the world would either say its too big or be completely satisfied with that size. If any girls says its too small, punch that hoe", "3ZC62PVYDH8MQW9OJ458PV4S4DJXX6": "Potty Training your German Shepherd Puppy 6 German Shepherd Housebreaking Tips Puppy Potty Training - Potty... http://t.co/4cP8dYgKFP", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ254N": "you should go to the dentist having that the tooth exposed to everything you eat or drink or even just plaque will cause you a problem and youll eventualy have pain. you will wish that you took care of it early I do know because I had one to and I waited to long it got to be very painful just go get it fixed so you don't wake up one day in pain and a swollen face and wishing you took care of it sooner good luck !", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMPU8Z": " Maher asked. Caitlyn Jenner gets up at the ESPYs in a dress with tits and a dick under it and theres not a dry eye in the house. Somehow with gay and transgender people, we celebrateas we shouldthe concept of I am who I am, I was born this way, this is my truth. Well, great. But can we get the same deal for the other 95 percent of us? Maher also sat down with Republican presidential candidate Rick Santorum and asked for his climate change game plan. Santorum of course doesnt have onehe doesnt believe in climate change, but hes not alone, he says. Santorum quoted a survey of 1800 climate scientists, 57 percent of whom apparently dont buy off the idea that carbon dioxide is the knob controlling climate change. I dont know what ass youre pulling that out of, Maher said, shaking his head. Santorum plowed ahead, finding a way to blame this on Obama and foreigners.", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SFG4F": "14 is a great age to start learning the basic of nutrition and fitness so you can rock a bikini when you're 40 and feed your family properly too. Here's how to eat. Whether you want to gain weight, lose weight, add muscle, or maintain, you should use the same diet. In other words, everyone should be eating essentially the same macro nutrients (carbs, fats, protein), micro nutrients (vitamins, minerals, fiber, etc.) barring special health or medical considerations because we all have essentially the same physiognomy and there is only one version of peak health. Here is how we should all eat according to the US National Institute of Health who are among the best health professionals in the world and the people doctors listens to in the US. OPTIMAL INTAKE Eat varied, wholesome, and high quality foods such that your daily caloric intake is about equal to your daily caloric burn while keeping your macro nutrient ratios at about 55/25/20 (calories from carbs/fats/protein). Only slight ch...", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFTYMT": "i love love alligators : Alligator An alligator is a crocodilian in the genus Alligator of the family Alligatoridae. There are two living alligator species: the American Alligator (Alligator mississippiensis) and the Chinese Alligator (Alligator sinensis). They are closely related to crocodiles.", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q5FU4": "If she is reasonable, talk to her reasonably about why she should get her cat fixed.Be gentle, but firm.Call around to various vets and shelters for reasonable or low cost options.If she cannot afford to have her cat fixed, she cannot afford a cat.If she is an unreasonable person, you can always do what I did to a neighbor who wouldn't get her cat fixed.I took her to the animal compound for our city (I told her we were going shopping to get her into the car) and they showed her all the cats and kittens that were marked for euthanasia if they were not adopted by the end of the day.Yes, it was a mean thing to do, but it worked.She got her cat to the vet for shots and fixing in less than a week.Since the second method can be very disturbing for some people, I will caution you to use it as a last resort.I made my neighbor cry for days over that.Yes, I feel bad for that, but I felt the cat getting fixed and cared for was much more important than a few days of her poor mental health.", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX390QF": "As far as I know, there is no fine for an expired vaccine, however it is not in the best interest of your dog to not be up to date on its vaccinations.Some states do fine if your dogs required STATE TAGS are expired. Hope that helps. Please get you dog up to date.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0CIZN": "they're probably not moving much because they have just been moved and located to a completely new area that they are not familiar with. because of this they are doing there best not to attract unknown predators with unnecessary movements and they still have not familiarized themselves with their surroundings. does your tank have a covered pump or filter? if not then you will have to change their water regularly in order to keep the oxygen levels up (not tap water) depending on the size of the tank their lack of movement could indicate low levels of oxygen in the water. you shouldn't be feeding them chicken -- this will only pollute the water and remain uneaten. feed them lettuce, pond plants (preferably from the natural environment you obtained them) spinach and you can buy tadpole food at some pet shops. crushed algae tablets are an ideal substitute for food. only feed them small amounts of food a couple of times a day in order to maintain the water quality. I would also sug", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNYXHB": "well as for 'B', if you typed it correctly it says 'Sing a song of OUR choice...' which means they are choosing. If you meant YOUR choice, the answer really depends on you and your vocal abilities. Don't try and sing something that is too dificult or out of your range. Choose a song you are comfortable with.As for the brooklyn accent, it's something you'll have to rehearse. Rent some movies with 'stereotypical' sounding Brooklyn or New York accents. Try My Cousin Vinny! Also listen to Audrey in Little Shop of Horrors.The other big advice would be, don't feel discouraged if you are not picked! There are plenty of other auditions! Not landing this role does not mean you weren't necessarily 'good', you may not have been right for what they were looking for.break a leg.", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6VB6G": "the weight is a disease, i want control over my life.' 'I haven't been purging lately, and i even ate today (i was at a friend's house, it was a small bowl of KD at around 11 am).' 'i can eat another 175 or so today TOPS' Honey, go see a doctor. Maybe you are coming down with the flu or something. If you would really like to know, get a blood test from your doctor as that will be accurate. If thats says your not, then your not and your doc can help figure out why you are nauseous and dizzy. I was sick recently, and everytime i did anything that required energy, especially taking a shower, I would get really hot, dizzy, light headed, and if I didn't sit down I would get nauseous and eventually vomit. The problem?? Then his son/daughter will burn the things they wanted, like car, house, maid (all made from paper, but not cheap at all) So, this last for 1 full month, and all ghosts go back before the hell gate is closed.", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF5ZWE0": "But attracting rats of the opposite sex is n't the only reason rats mark . Rats use their Rats mark because they like things to smell like them . Having lots of personal smell around may comfort them . It may help them become familiar with an area . Rats mark in response to novelty , too .", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ77WO6": "Whats your stats? Body Fat? Alright I got a BMR of approx. Im gonna assume your moderately active. 3-5 days in the gym maybe? If so then your total caloric expenditure would be 2880. Thats the approx. amount of calories that you need for maintainence. Try and base a diet around that many calories. 40 from protein, 40 from carbs, 20 fats. Now that we got that. here's a thread on everything you need to know on how to cut properly. The Cutting Primer By rambo anabolicreview. com Its about time we had a decent full length post on cutting Lets get a few things straight 1. All of the insights Im about to provide are not person-specific. What that means is that it is a general guideline, not a bible. I truly do believe that bodybuilding is 80 diet. You can lift your  off daily, and still look horrible if you arent eating right. You are what you eat. Its just that simple. The BASICS- 1.", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIH3XB": "Lmao hell yeah you are , Im gonna be in so much pain ( lol", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JWOH0": "That lasted up until this morning when I woke up with a raging boner that lasted five minutes and then disappeared , thinking this was a sign I decided to try out some light masturbation only to find the flatline gone but my dick behaving in it ve had 0 cravings , 0 desire to use porn , even my one relapse was due more to just wanting to get hard for a change , and resulted in NO chaser . There is no craving there , but still my dick won t get hard for anything but temporary morning wood . It s the one place I seem to feel a lack of connection with other PMO addicts , I watched a lot of porn to get off , and now my dick only seems to really want to respond to porn , but when I fantasize , it s always been to real girls that I know , when I get horny , it s always for real girls that I know .", "37SQU136V7M6AU325IZUZDWQUJR11S": "I think many of these answers are very ignorant of human sexuality because women are just as, if not more than, turned on by the showing of men's skin as men are by women's skin. Just because they do not have a noticeable reaction to it, doesn't mean it still happens. To refer to your question, I think yes, many societies are in a way sexist towards women. This could stem from the fact that many societies are dominated by male thoughts and men are afraid of the power of women. During the Spanish Inquisition in the 16th and 17th centuries, women were accused of witchcraft and magic more often than men because the men were afraid of the mysteries of women and what secret powers they had over them. They did not want the women to become powerful so they kept them humble and referred to them as property of men. Throughout history, women have shown themselves to be capable of a man's power and integrity and even though our world is moving towards an equal goal, there are still inequalitie...", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEB3O5": "Make your character(s) grow. A long journey through the world, a near-death experience, or even falling in love makes everyone grow up a little. Certainly you don't want your character to be dumb, or stupid. After those secondary events, make changes (subtle or drastic) to your protagonist's personality. Make obstacles in your character's life. Not everything will be easy for him/her. Make sure you're writing a fantasy novel, not a narration of a walk through the garden. Remember to name your character. 8 8 Grab a piece of paper and a pencil. It's time to build your fantasy world. If you're writing about a world that, in fact, is Earth, print a full map and with a pencil (or a black/red pen), and start to make the alterations to our awesome planet. If you're doing this, do a lot of research in history to see if you can adapt Earth's history to the plot of your book. If you're planning to build a world from root, start drawing simple lines.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E4BTP": "Aug 24, 1988 ... ... have a flavor similar to that of the leaves, but intensified, and a bit musty. ... Although a wealth of flowers may come across your path or plate, these are ... Not only are nasturtiums fast and easy to grow, these edible flowers look and taste good too. ... But note that some bush varieties trail a bit, and some trailers are less ... Bu... Still tucking your binding tails, one into the other? It?? a quick way to finish your binding, but the result can look a bit bulky. There?? a better way to give ... Nothing says 'gourmet' like a sprinkling of colorful flower petals in a salad, a tiny ... color and flavor to all sorts of dishes ?? especially when you can pick them rig... (MBM) Featured Article. The Professional Services Career Path: A Big Four Employee Perspective What is it like to work on the advisory side of a Big 4 firm?", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWJ9NG": "A couple of days ago, while I was taking a shower and washing my ... When I took a look at it in the shower, it seemed a little red/pink I suppose. ... years ago where I found a small bump on my penis (on the foreskin, near the edge of it). I am Angelo Aldo, I was born to a loving couple, a home, by an .... I'm looking for ..... the floor,kissing you passionately and unbuttoning your shirt a little so i ... my penis and then start to suck, you run your mouth along the shaft?... I'm looking for something that can stop and ideally reverse the ..... My little one is 8 and just becoming more body concious so she is finding it .... LS and I am so thankful I stumbled across this website it has calmed my nerves a little. Question: I am 18 and i have a small dick about 4 1/2 inches hard, how can I get it biger? ... I felt this ball like thing in my penis that has moved from the bottom and is now at the ...", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB37B0D": "Political unification seemed virtually impossible for Germany. France and England had the advantage of borders, unlike Germany. German governments were confused as to what land belonged to Germany and what didn't due to the North European plain. It was after the fall of Charlemagne that Germany had been divided into a series of duchies. Otto the Great  planned to bring the dukes under royal control. He and his followers need to use the Catholic Church for that. It was in 962 that the Pope had crowned Otto the Great as Holy Roman Emperor. German kings later on received this title. This was done to help bring order to the German dukes. There also came a downside to this plan. The Holy Roman Empire had consisted of much land that did not really include Germany. This meant that the Saxon kings we forced to use all their energy to protect land that did not belong to their German kingdom. The alliance between Germany and the Pope had started to become messy. The German kings we", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTKSF1": "How to Get Rid of Gingivitis dsveraho11531 Contributor By Maryelser Kinmore eHow Contributing Writer Article Rating: (17 Ratings) Gingivitis is a gum infection that causes inflammation of the gums. There is a way to get rid of gingivitis but it has to done everyday or it wont help for long. From Quick Guide: Preventing Gingivitis  How to Treat Gingivitis With Marshmallow Root Gingivitis is a severe inflammation of the gums generally caused by. Our mouth contains a lot of  More  How to Fight Gingivitis with Nutrition Gingivitis is inflammation of the gums. However, More  How to Treat Gingivitis With Improved Oral Hygiene Gingivitis affects almost 90 percent of all Americans at some time or another during their lives. It strik More  How to Get a Gingivectomy Need a gingivectomy? If so, then you must have gingivitis. Listerine Antiseptic mouthwash can help prevent gingivitis, helps to reduce plaque buildup and kills oral bacteria, which in turn helps defeat and prevent bad breath.", "3KLL7H3EGDZX0H4EELM4YOJD0CRVH7": "Molars come first. Wisdom teeth are the last natural teeth to appear in the mouth. Wikipedia explains: quot. They are generally thought to be called wisdom teeth because they appear so late-much later than the other teeth, at an age where people are presumably 'wiser' than as a child, when the other teeth erupt.", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XKABHG": "I accidentally zoomed in on my computer screen somehow... Thanks apple, I know I'm blind, but I didn't think I was that blind...", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y2YA7": "What happened to the virtue..what happened to morals..what happened to respect..what happened to truth..what... http://t.co/X0N71CC8LB", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RFMUG": "Well its the same everywhere, not just on an australian community? i have some info for you which might help. These facts could help you with your assignment Who gets STDs? Anyone who has had sexual contact can get an STD. can also expose you to infected fluids. If you do get symptoms caused by an STD, you may think you have another disease, since STD symptoms are similar to those caused by other diseases. If you have any of these symptoms, you could have an STD, but they might also not mean anything serious. How can I prevent getting an STD? The best way to prevent getting an STD is to not have sex. Remember, the more partners you have, the greater risk of being exposed to an STD. You should not have sex with anyone that has signs of an STD (sores, rashes, or discharge from the genital area). If you. Other ways to prevent getting an STD include: Don't injecting drugs. You can't correctly test and diagnose yourself with an STD. Most STDs can be treated. The earlier you get treatment, the better.", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618VSHX": "All the books I 've read on Budgies do n't even come CLOSE to giving me all the information your site did . My bird , Cosmo , is less than 1 year old . He is constantly  puffing '' himself up . Is this normal , or is he just cold ? What are the easiest words to teach a budgie to say ?", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNTV16": "Typically, the recommendation for dust mite and pet allergy is decreasing exposure. For dust mites, this would include washing the sheets in hot water once per week, keeping his bedroom vacuumed and implementing dust mite encasements for the pillow, boxspring and mattress. In regard to pet allergy, whether to get rid of the animals is a personal/family decision. At the least, keeping the animals out of the bedroom can decrease exposure. His allergist can make more specific recommendations in the context of the severity of your son's symptoms and test results. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 5 of 5 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer Read the Original Article: RAST Score", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNUV17": "Well Danny that will all depend on how bad it is. Give it a few days, if you still feel it's still bothering you go back and see the doctor, tell him it's still bothering you. Ask him if you can get something better for it. He'll probably give you a stronger antibiotic and try that out, there's not much out there for that. Some of the stuff can be taken both internally and externally. You have to be patient and give it time. Don't drive with your windows down, cover your ears up in the wind, things like this help. Hang in there.", "3A3KKYU7P3FW7K5UVS7DCVANO7SMWH": "It may be that you just need to eat something.. Your stomach can get acid in it and if that's the only thing that is in your stomach it can make you feel nauseous. Do you know why you are feeling dizzy?? I had a million test done to find out why I was, and the dr.s came up with nothing!", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GRJ5R": "I know that I will be starting as I feel sick and don't want to eat anything.Have a look at this website, it explains about it: - http://kidshealth.org/parent/positive/ta...Good luck.", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1DBKJ": "Home  Symptoms  Diseases  Diagnosis  Videos  Tools  Forum  About Us  Terms of Use  Privacy Policy  Site Map  Advertise Copyright  2014 Health Grades Inc.All rights reserved.Last Update: 13 August, 2015 (0:00)", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13J7RP": "Hi, It sounds as if u needed the good fats that r in the peanut butter, if u r eating low fat and exercsing vigoursley u may have depleted ur bodies energy fat stores and that made u binge as ur body recognised that wot u were eating was a good source of fast energy and fat! Other reasons to binge eat is depression, hormone levels and starvation. Binge eating is not normal and is an addiction.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BT04Z": "I don't really care.I don't want there to be anything wrong.There's nothing wrong with what I do.", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M31PV6": "Scar Scars are areas of fibrous tissue (fibrosis) that replace normal skin after injury. For example, scars in the skin are less resistant to ultraviolet radiation, and sweat glands and hair follicles do not grow back within scar tissues. Scars differ from other scars in the amounts of collagen overexpressed. Hypertrophic scars occur when the body overproduces collagen, which causes the scar to be raised above the surrounding skin. Hypertrophic scars take the form of a red raised lump on the skin. Hypertrophic scars are often distinguished from keloid scars by their lack of growth outside the original wound area, but this commonly taught distinction can lead to confusion. This type of scar usually improves in appearance after a few years. Silicone scar treatments are commonly used in preventing scar formation and improving existing scar appearance. Scar revision is a process of cutting the scar tissue out. We can do better by introducing randomization. First, take the natural log of...", "3UL5XDRDNCHN9CO65QALHDWFK5X85W": "Typically, the recommendation for dust mite and pet allergy is decreasing exposure. For dust mites, this would include washing the sheets in hot water once per week, keeping his bedroom vacuumed and implementing dust mite encasements for the pillow, boxspring and mattress. In regard to pet allergy, whether to get rid of the animals is a personal/family decision. At the least, keeping the animals out of the bedroom can decrease exposure. His allergist can make more specific recommendations in the context of the severity of your son's symptoms and test results.", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4EQM4S": "250ml Natural Yoghurt salt to taste 5g red chilli powder 15g ready-made mint sauce 100g tomato ketchup Just mix", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDPOT8": "A runny nose while crying is caused by excess tears entering your sinus cavity. You cry out of your nose.", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVTK8U": "So, even though I had done the elimination diet back when, without clear results, she was reacting to pollens at the time. In retrospect I should have had the blood test along with the skin test. They definitely can have both, environmental and food allergies. Wellness Simple limited ingredients (fish), Newman Organics organic beef canned, both contain NO chicken/egg. By Klaus Loft, DVM 617-524-5733 Anyone who suffers debilitating environmental allergies tied to changing seasons, pet dander or household dust mites knows first-hand the misery of a scratchy throat, itchy eyes or painful rashes. Not everyone knows, however, that our pets can experience similar allergic reactions  and other very bothersome dermatological issues. But our pets need not suffer in silence. Modern veterinary science has evolved such that advanced, comprehensive treatments are now available to treat a range of skin conditions. Top pet dermatological issues", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M33VPE": "Neither....it will be Saturday", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV6DZI": "hell yeea wanna come over and il try it out for you to make sure", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XP9I0": "The Post WWI prosperity.Folks were doing okay even Germany was doing okay, and that was with its debt payments to France for the war it started. Wilson was right about that being a bad idea, but one must consider history, there. (France had started the Franco-Prussian War in 1870, lost it, and was forced to pay for it, so France was merely doing to Germany in 1918 what Germany had done to it in 1871.) Back to your question, what happened over the twenties was a lot of German money going to France AND the new-fangled stock market taking other bags of money. Being new, the fraudsters were out in force, so that eventually (October 29, 1929), the truth of the emptiness of the stock market hit everyone all at once. When our stock market collapsed, others' did too because the money people thought was there, suddenly wasn't. The governments had two options: in the U.S.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXECJT": "RT for 30 mins a day can help you lose weight, control your blood sugar, lower your blood pressure,  reduce stress.", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQZN83": "We will have new Journals in about a week. In the meantime, here is a handout I sent out about some of the places and NPCs in the local area. The idea was to generate interest in places and people for the NPC handouts I would be giving out a couple weeks later. Now in terms of reality, a few were cherrypicked and transplanted from other places from Rhode Island to Texas. At least one place really was in New Haven but was torn down almost 50 years ago. I got some feedback on places people would likely be already visiting and planning to visit later...thus the places they went during Walpurgis in Session 2 were based on this list. Yes, The Patch and The Playhouse came from Rpg.net. It looks better with the 200proofmoonshine headers, but eh they did not come across. Anyway. Here we go Local Background The Krewes of New Haven There is at least one other Krewe, which spends a fair amount of time in and around Yale campus. This Krewe, the Skull and Bones Society, considers Yale its turf b", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SWR67": "Massage gently into scalp and hair. Cover with a shower cap or plastic wrap and let it work for at least 20 minutes. Shampoo and condition as usual.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNORLI": "Have you ever seen a cat in heat? Well that will stop and at the top of the list as far as annoying goes. lol. She will calm down in the sense that she will not try to escape to mate and no be so anxious during mating time. Her personality will remain the same. It's the male cats who have more of a personality change when neutered, making them more calm and needy and lovable", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ13F03": "any time you're starting a new medication, especially one that includes hormones, you'll have some crazy side effects until your body gets used to it. eventually it will work itself out and you'll have regular periods with no problems inbetween. What kind of black spots?", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TACY22": "Maybe exercise after every time you eat the sugar", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA3YLR": "i love love alligators : Alligator An alligator is a crocodilian in the genus Alligator of the family Alligatoridae. There are two living alligator species: the American Alligator (Alligator mississippiensis) and the Chinese Alligator (Alligator sinensis). This fact can be used to find alligators in the dark. The majority of American Alligators inhabit Florida and Louisiana. In Florida alone there are an estimated more than 1 million alligators. Reproduction Alligators are seasonal breeders. The majority of American Alligators inhabit Florida and Louisiana. In Florida alone there are an estimated more than 1 million alligators. Alligators do not occur only in Florida and China. Down here in South America we also have alligators! Additional differences: With respect to teeth occlusion (the way the teeth lock together), in alligators the upper teeth fit outside of the lower teeth when the mouth is closed, whereas crocodiles tend to have a zigzag occlusion (alternate upper and lower te...", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8Z5EW": "Bitch if u got a bump in ur pubic area and its red and filled wit shit IT AINT NO DAMN HAIR BUMP BITCH ITS A DISEASE. nasteeeee bitch", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWONAMS": "Here's an answer to your question and some other information you may find useful. Average Life Span: 10-13 years Average Weight: Male 110 pounds, Females 90 pounds Color And Coat: Coarse flat coat, black in color with rust markings on cheeks, muzzle, chest, legs, above eyes and under the tail. Typical Health Problems: Rottweilers are generally healthy. The more frequent health problems found in the breed are: hip displaysia, rupture of cranial cruciate ligament, cancer, heart disease, enthropia eye conditions. Owner Level: For experienced involved dog owners Personality: Rottweilers are a German breed so they tend to be of a serious nature. The ideal Rottweiler is quiet, even-tempered, obedient, easy to train, faithful and brave. This breed should show a strong understanding of what is right and wrong if trained and guided by a responsible and involved owner. This is a physically strong breed that will leap to the defense of the ones they love. For this reason training and socializing", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF50EWJ": "go to this site, it's free and it will answer your question.http://www.caloriesperhour.com/", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBLBPM": "You can find 3 example chicks on the website here:http://hypertextbook.com/facts/1999/PatriciaKong.shtmlThey made notes of the weight for the chicks.Hope that helps.", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LUWHJ": "He didn't seem to have any visible damage marks on him which leads me to believe that he either had too much to eat ... I usually feed my fishes brine shrimps, pellets, and flakes. ... Chuck Pike Cichlid Won't Eat 10/11/05 Hello, great site. Most cichlids are omnivorous, eating a mixture of vegetation and other fish. ... but if you feed all your cichlids a mix of pellets and supplement with spirulina or ... fed for many days in a row even up to a week so don't worry, they won't starve! Is he new to the aquarium at all? If so give him a few days to adjust usually new fish will be pretty stressed and won't eat and if he still doesn't eat call and ask the store what they've fed him. Or is your temperature too low? What are you feeding him? Most cichlids are primarily carnivores, so they need meat based foods in their diet to be healthy. Odds are he could be suffering from a lack of nutrition, which is why he's lost the will to eat.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXDJCZ": "Logic isn't a science. It's a tool of science.", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMWAE3": "Help her develop a quit plan that fits her needs  help her stick with it. SGR50chat", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW74ZEU": "MARKED mass gainer The best mass gainer we have taken! http://t.co/jhsk4BgjA4", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSULM1K": "Mental health needs a great deal of attention. It's the final taboo and it needs to be faced and dealt with. Call or sms Mental Health Helpline (087 260 9090). Take care.", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134O6FU": "Secondly, it demonstrated that the distinction between elite modernist and mass consumerist culture had lost its precision. Some writers declared that modernism had become so institutionalized that it was now 'post avant-garde', indicating that it had lost its power as a revolutionary movement. Many have interpreted this transformation as the beginning of the phase that became known as Postmodernism.", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR000PNQ": "the dentists in uk generally have a choice as to whether they work all privately, all NHS (national health service) or a combination of the two. the only time dental treatment is provided free'' in the UK is for people on benefits, children or pregnant or nursing mothers. By the way, many British people will vigourously deny their country has bad teeth'', (much as Americans don't see themselves as fat) all the while rolling their lips back to reveal what poet Spike Milligan celebrated in his infamous poem Teeth'' : English Teeth, English Teeth!", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4GZ2U": "Wow. Consider yourself lucky. That's a large variety to some parents. My daughter only like cheese and o.j. She was breast fed for nine months before baby food was introduced, then a combination of the two. But once she started eating solids, cheese was it. I have met other mothers with similar dilemmas.My daughter's pediatrician suggested toasting cheese on bread and then cutting the slice of bread into finger food. Try taking time to sit down at the table with your daughter and (without making it an issue) take your time eating and truly enjoy what you are eating. She may become curious and at least try some of the things you're eating. You might want to avoid brussel sprouts at this stage!", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTMFSQ": "The chicken eggs we eat are unfertilised and not foetuses. (Although I have heard urban myths where someone has cracked an egg and found a baby chick inside). In natural circumstances (esp. in the wild), unfertilised eggs are rarely laid.", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQYN82": "I have no real sentimental objects, but I'm attached to the people I love. At the end of the day, you can replace objects, but never people.", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVKFIY": "WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! GO TO A DOCTOR!!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!! YOU NEED HELP!!! WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU!!!", "3R5LWXWHR06B4AEYUU54194X1NNXGE": "It has to do with the way testosteron is converted to DHT. There is a genetic prediposition to body hair distribution, but the penetrance is variable. Same thing will happen with chest or any other hair, it grows back thicker!", "3V8JSVE8YYO2K18HTV1IKKQUQD2YE4": "Combine water and brown sugar pour over bread. Combine remaining ingredients pour over bread. Bake at 350 degrees F for 50-60 minutes or until a knife inserted near the center comes out clean.", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V00D43": "There were 22 households of which 13.6 had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0 were married couples living together, 4.5 had a male householder with no wife present, and 45.5 were non-families. 45.5 of all households were made up of individuals and 9.1 had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 1.82 and the average family size was 2.50.", "36AZSFEYZ4YN941SETC8CDGF5ZOBV9": " Everyone 6 months and older should get their yearly flu vaccine, ideally by October. Get yours today at Don's Pharmacy!", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAZYKP": "Yes! yes! The most nutritional food for bearded dragons, especially when they are young, are crickets.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5N17L": "I don't know of any groups for you to contact and it depends on where you are from to give you an idea of some groups. But I know in my area, there is some travel agencies that offer bus tours and little day or two getaways. They also have longer getaways, but the majority or shorter. While anyone can take the tours, in most cases, the majority of the passengers are senior citizens. I have gone on a few of the trips and they are a lot of fun for everyone. I would contact some people in your area to see if they have some ideas as well.Hope this helps!", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJBYZA": "A New Stage in Life Some girls can't wait for them to come and look forward to their arrival as they would their birthday, first kiss, or a soccer championship. What's the mystery subject? We're talking about. Someday, if the girl grows up to have a baby, her breasts can provide the milk the baby needs. When Do Breasts Start Growing? Breasts can start growing as early as age 8 or as late as 13. Some girls' breasts grow slowly and others grow quickly. Some girls may feel like their breasts will never start growing. Breast development happens in stages. Then the area around the nipple and areola starts to grow into a breast. As breasts keep growing, they may be pointy for a while before becoming rounder and fuller. A girl's breasts may continue to grow during the teen years and even into her early twenties. Breast size gets a lot of attention and many girls may wonder how they can make their breasts grow faster or bigger. And a girl who has more body fat is more likely to have larger breasts.", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9ARUA5": "I've been through that. My family never really knew how sad I was because I felt like I had to deal with it myself because it was my problem. Ive also myself never been good at talking about my feelings partly because I felt saying something wouldnt make it go away and that I always felt like I always failed at explaining myself and didnt want to be misunderstood. Though at least what I think for myself and some others is that to be happy you dont need to think about who you want to be but instead who you are and be happy with yourself before you change. The way to think is, this is me, and Im going to be stuck with myself my whole life, so Im gonna become someone I can be proud of. Even now I am not. Just if worse comes to worse and you need to say something, I won't judge you and you never have to worry about being embarrassed to face me. Though you'd probably feel weird expressing feeling to a stranger, I know it would have made me happy if someone offered to openly listen.", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606SN7F": "wake up hungry eat hungry eat again still hungry eat some more still hungry forever hungry preggoproblems", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTYNE3": "I have 2 Gerbils they consume 20g of food per day combined 10g each. Although its not equal one will hide a bit. Not sure both eat the same food however, mine eat gerbil and mouse mix and grapes, and carrots and broccoli. My food comes in 1kg packs and lasts 50 days. I honestly thought gerbils were boring pets before i got mine, turns out there ultra affectionate! Curious as can be and fast! Mine have a cage and playpen, and more chew stuff than i buy food! they constantly gnaw - so expect to keep twigs, branches, wood toys everywhere for them it is as important as food, I read a few places they can chew bars, but mine haven't done that, so I'm guessing I'm doing something right. Gerbils MUST be kept in pairs. They do not do well if alone!", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOG7T2": "I pick up a lot of cancer diagnosis..... no idea why.", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ64M9O": "My mom wants to get me a Black and Tan little brofur and name him Benny, after BenedictCumberbatch", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV48N3C": "Weight loss tips weight loss tips to help you lose weightNeed some help with your weight loss? Below are some great weight loss tips to help you that extra bit, these weight loss tips offers pointers for pratical, effective weight loss tactics. Tip 5 Exerise, exercise, exercise! The more you feel good about yourself the easier and faster it is to lose weight. Tip 11 Please consult your doctor before beginning an exercise or weight loss program. Tip 14 It's a myth that you need oil to stir fry! Use chicken stock instead and cut down on hidden fat. Tip 19 Find a weight loss 'buddy,' club, or support group. This will help you stay with your weight loss program. although we do eat dinner very You can lose 10 lbs. Safest way is to lose 2-3 lbs a week. I lost my 3 lbs in 1.5 weeks. This helps you lose water weight. :) Oh and if you wish to exercise but have no budget for gym or are too lazy to do it like I am :) hehehe. ) Scientifically, weight is lost by the burning of such fat prot...", "3VLL1PIENQMO1IVBJV6X33TA09DOZQ": "this behavior in normal it usually take up to 5-7 days for a leo to get used to his home and when there really stressed they dont eat so i wouldnt be worried about it too much.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHH1RK": "D. The high death tolls on the battlefields as well as no tangible benefit from involvement in the war led the united States to pursue a policy of isolationism. The isolation lasted clear up Pearl Harbor. Opinion 2: Not sure about the C.  B. but A. and D. are biggies. No need to explain the world power thing because we never became a real world power untill after WWII, but D. is important because it contributed to the Great Depression. The reason trade decreaded between America and the Allied countries was because they somehow 'found out' that they could not afford to pay back their war debts (the only country to payback war debts was Finland). This made America mad, so we resovled not to have anything to do with Europe. That's why we were so late in coming to the aid of the Allies in WWII.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5Q17O": "BRITISH 'BAD TEETH' IS A SUBJECTIVE OBSERVATION. MOST BRITS WOULD NOT SAY THAT THEY HAVE 'BAD TEETH.' THIS IS A STATEMENT COMMON AMONG MANY AMERICANS BECAUSE THE MAJORITY OF YOUNG PEOPLE HAVE HAD BRACES. NOT EVERYONE IN THE USA HAS THE KNOWLEDGE OR THE FINANCES TO OBTAIN BRACES. SO I SUPPOSE IT MATTERSN WHOM YOU ASK.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8VE51": "(MORE) 10 people found this useful Answered In Food  Cooking Can you smoke a peanut butter and jelly sandwich?No, you cannot.Not possible Why of course!", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K7H9C": "i would say about 110-140 pounds depending on how active you are. alot of it depends on the amount of muscle you have.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61IORNK": "Blocks Recording Club Blocks Recording Club is a Canadian co-operative of musicians, which serves as both a collaborative artist community and a record label for its member artists. The label's name may also be cited graphically as ?????? rather than the word 'Blocks'. Although this is in fact the label's official name, the word 'Blocks' is used where it is not typographically possible to use the graphical series of blocks.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHUND7": "Charlemagne was crowned emperor by Pope Leo III in 800. But Charlemagne was not crowned as Holy Roman Emperor. Instead he was crowned as Emperor of the Romans. There was much controversy about this because at that time there was a country in the East called the Roman Empire , and the implication was that the pope was making Charlemagne its emperor. Today, historians call the medieval Roman Empire the Byzantine Empire, a term that was not used during the Middle Ages, to avoid confusing it with the ancient Roman Empire, though the Byzantine Empire was legally a continuation of the Roman Empire. Charlemagne's empire, which the Franks called the Roman Empire briefly, is now called the Carolingian Empire. The Carolingian Empire broke up. it was retained, as a legal entity, though it did not function for several decades. Historians now regard Otto I as the first Holy Roman Emperor, though no one seems to have called the empire by that name until the middle of the 12th century.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26X0ZC": "The registry is operated under Federal contracts by the National Marrow Donor Program Questions about joining the registry to become a donor are answered at Questions about the people in need of a transplant , and the need for more marrow donors and cord blood units are answered at such as what is a transplant and how long does it take to find a If your questions are not here or elsewhere on this website , please send your question to How are bone marrow and peripheral blood stem cell ( PBSC ) donation different ? What if I have medical complications related to the donation ? Becoming a donor requires a time commitment .", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LU579": "Bladder control issues affect younger, active women, too -- are you one of them? By WebMD Feature Reviewed by WebMD Feature Archive Often, it starts after the baby's born: You head to class, ready to shed those extra pounds, and in the middle of the . an accident. This embarrassing little problem is , and lots of women -- regardless of age -- are secretly dealing with it. More than 13 million Americans have incontinence, and women are twice as likely to have it as men, according the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality. About 25 to 45 of women suffer from , defined as leakage at least once in the past year. The rates of increase with age: 20-30 of young women , 30-40 of middle-aged women, and up to 50 of older women suffer from . It's embarrassing, and it can really affect your quality of life - your emotional state, , sexuality, says Linda Brubaker, MD, MS, professor of female pelvic medicine at Loyal University Chicago Stritch School of Medicine.", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK27ZI": "Although inflammation of molluscum lesions with mild soreness is usually a sign of impending resolution, the child should be seen by a doctor if there is increasing redness, swelling, pain, and/or drainage that may indicate a true secondary bacterial infection of the skin.I hope that helps.Good luck!", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6T8RQ4": "Its not easy and dont let anyone tell you it is - you'll have good days and bad but try as hard as you can to stay positive and dont take no for an answer - research as much as possible, ask everything you want of your oncology team - they do understand and will help you.", "3P458N04Q1FLPG6RVFKFZ5AWR4FX2S": "Birth control is a way for men and women to prevent pregnancy. Depo-Provera does not protect against. The rods contain a form of the hormone progesterone called etonogestrel  How Soon Does Depo-Provera Work? Birth control with Depo-Provera begins immediately after the first shot if given within the first five days of your menstrual period. After a year of use, about 50 of women will stop getting their periods. Can I Become Pregnant After I Stop Using Depo-Provera? With Depo-Provera, you could become pregnant as soon as three to four months after your last shot. However, it may take some women up to a year or two to conceive after they stop using this type of birth control. This time frame seems unrelated to how long you had been using Depo-Provera. It provides long-term protection as long as you get the shot every three months. You need to stop taking Depo-Provera several months ahead of time if you plan to become pregnant. Talk to your doctor to determine if Depo-Provera is right for you.", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO79EXF": "Shiba Inu Dog Breed Profile: Choosing A Dog Breed - The Dog Breed Guide For The Pure Breed Dog BuyerWant to know... http://t.co/kSQb3ioz", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKSUV6": "Bill Nichols is Professor Emeritus in the Cinema Department at San Francisco State University and Chair of the Documentary Film Institute advisory board. 1st edition Docville (September 28 - October 3, 2005) 'No awards' 2nd edition Docville (September 27 - October 3, 2006) 3rd edition Docville (May 30 - June 5, 2007) 4th edition Docville (May 10 - 17, 2008) 5th edition Docville (May 2 -9, 2009) 6th edition Docville (May 1 - 8, 2010) 7th edition Docville (April 29 - May 7, 2011) 8th edition Docville (April 27 - May 5, 2012) 9th edition Docville (May 3 - 11, 2013) 10th edition Docville Documentary mode Documentary mode is a conceptual scheme developed by American documentary theorist Bill Nichols that seeks to distinguish particular traits and conventions of various documentary film styles. Narration is a distinct innovation of the expositional mode of documentary. In her book Looking Two Ways (1996), Toni de Bromhead criticises Nichols for his focus on documentary as a rational disco...", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV699839": "That is good advice, it is like immersion therapy for dogs. and it will probably work b/c your pup is still so young. What a cutie! I assume that your icon is your baby?", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSCUQB": "If so, look at the sire  dam's names....check back in the pedigree for something catchy. Amber (the color of a red dobes eyes) Jewel (apposed to Ruby) Blair Good luck, hope someone can come up with a good one for ya! Blaze would be perfect for a male.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OGU0F": "Jan 18, 2012 ... But how does one imagine a book in a world where even the ... Both time and writing, and many other aspects of our daily lives, were invented by the Sumerians of ... every day, one is making use of some aspect of Sumerian invention. The events that occurred during this time period still impact our lives today. ?? The peoples of Mesopotamia and ..... Identifying Name two major inven- tions of the Sumerians, and tell how those inventions affect our lives today. Reading Check?... B ... developed Writing Maybe the most important development in human History. ... Full Name ... also developed many other things, that are part of our daily life today. ... Long poems that tell stories of heroes: The Epic of Gilgamesh 5. ... most famously, perhaps, as a metaphor for the never ending cycle of life. ... our perspective about the wheel, and not view it as a basic invention by ... of an onager-drawn cart on the Sumerian 'battle standard of Ur' . ....", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605ODHR": "we just found a basset hound out side are house who allmost got ran over . we went a head and took her in ... im not sure how old she is or who her owners are . she was really underfeed , you could see her bones , hip bones too . but her belly is quit big..   now we are worry she is preggo..   we dont want to take her to the vet and spend money to find out becuase we may not have her that long since we are looking for her owner .", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSV1EB": "The hair may or may not grow back. Only time will tell. I've seen some practically naked dogs that gradually and slowly grew back beautiful shiny coats. And it's staph, which is short for Staphylococcus Aureus. It's possible that the Staph infection got a foothold in the spot or spots where the flea bites or allergies were affecting the dog, so your other vet may have been correct at that time.", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG632JC": "-.- obviously I wasn't talking about you physically. You're a twig Jack. I'm surprised you weigh more than 125.", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734QIT7": "uuuuuuuum yeah. go to the doctor. You're scared and naturally so but don't go giving yourself a heart attack, girl!", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIYIUZ": "so let us imagine... You know what? unlooking", "3T6EIBTM9LMYY6T2XKLGLFIW27YAA8": "Amputation is the removal of a body extremity by trauma or surgery. As a surgical measure, it is used to control pain or a disease process in the affected limb, such as malignancy or gangrene. In some cases, it is carried out on individuals as a preventative surgery for such problems.", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5ICZ31": "I ran to call my sister so do not know if she was jerking when i was not in ..... I've always noticed over the years he would get this dark, blank look in his ..... I lay in bed and it feels like a sort of dizziness and I proceed to leg mys... It always seemed to be in my back, but then, it finally has become my ... I know the hell of this weird symptom, believe me, I do. ... At this point, I am so sleep deprived that I feel it has worsened the .... 5th Cousin is so far removed, they're not even related. There are probably some marriage issues in there too, which make the person so far away from you it doesn't matter. Anything past 1st cousin (meaning second cousin on) is fine. ... think my arms or fingers might twitch but other than wimpering when I try ..... I do have a sleep disorder if you want to call it that but I have several ... Ceasar jumps on my bed he's fig...", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVE918": "HIV is the germ that causes this disease, AIDS. HIV: Human Immunodeficiency Virus AIDS: Acquired Immuno Deficiency Syndrome. Tested positive for 'HIV': Need not worry, See a doctor and follow his/her guidelines.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM32DV": "I showed my mom all the dogs at the animal shelter, and she didn't like any of them, so now we're considering getting a purebred dog. There are a lot of Labrador Retriever, Golden Retriever, English Springer Spaniel, and Cocker Spaniel breeders around here. Can anybody give me the pros and cons of these breeds?", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q11DYQ": "I have trust issues, anger issues ?,  people issues, I just have issues period.?", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDTA1L": "In general one physical therapist may supervise no more than                   four physical therapist assistants. In a home care services                   setting, a physical therapist may supervise no more than two                   physical therapist assistants. Without exception, the physical therapist is responsible for                   evaluating the patient, setting patient goals, establishing                   a plan of care, and determining whether it is appropriate for                   the patient to receive the services of a physical therapist                   assistant based on the competencies of the physical therapist                   assistant and the needs of the patient. As a physical therapist assistant do my notes need to be co-signed                 by my supervising physical therapist? A physical therapist assistant does not need to have notes                   co-signed by a physical therapist.", "3T2HW4QDUV58M2GVPS37VFX0WS59CY": "I'm in the same situation as you, although now I'm finally working again and I plan on buying some weights to help me prepare for boot camp. (If your not a great runner or you feel you need to decrease the run, you can just run 1 1/2 Mile each week after the initial increase to 1 1/2 Mile) Fifth Week- Do Twice a Day (Max Push Ups, 50 Jumping Jacks, Max Crunches, 45 Lunges, 40 Leg Lifts, 20 Eight Count Body Builders, Max Squats) Do once a Day, 2 1/2 Mile Run. Also if you have a Pull up bar or can throw together something to do pull ups on I reccomend doing them Monday - Friday switching between underhand and overhand. Example: Monday I'd do my max Pull ups, Say I do 8 underhanded (palms facing towards me). I do the max, say I only do 5 this time, then I do 4, then 3, then 2, then 1. Note If you really want to gain. Good Luck! (Oh and I really like that a person suggested Shadow Boxing, thats a great workout plan which you might want to think of incorporating into the workout I gave you.)", "3HEA4ZVWVDK4MU547S3I5TMOIFW55R": "The Root History How Do I Legally Prove Native American Ancestry? Tracing Your Roots: Its a common question we get, with answers that are more complicated than you might think. Cherokee.org Dear Reader: For this weeks column, we decided to address a topic that comes up frequently in your questions: How does one legally establish Native American ancestry? Legal recognition as a tribal member varies depending on the Native American nation in which you seek enrollment. Native American communities are sovereign nations and, as such, have their own requirements and procedures for becoming an enrolled member or citizen. The Role of DNA Testing Many people have family lore that suggests they have Native American ancestry. The first step to confirming or denying these claims is to take an autosomal DNA test, which will tell you definitively whether you have any Native American ancestry. These tests are available through companies such as 23andMe , FamilyTreeDNA and Ancestry.com . It is im", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FY5PE": "I don't know :(", "3MJ9GGZYO349T3YYK5S1FXZYQJ8A23": "So I'm pregnant with a boy... but the dad hardly calls (better explained in my last question) so he's done nothing gone to no appointments had not input on the name and barely contacted me (3times and I'm almost 8 months). So Im looking at a legal aspect of if he's not on the certificate then I have complete say in his welfare.. but then I question is it morally fair? I just want what's best. But the other issuse is the 3rd time we talked he said he wanted to be there when I had it if I do decide.to keep him off the certificate is that legal or do we both have to sign..like I said I'm more concerned becase he's has cps issues in the past for smoking pot and like hell he putting us through that..", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ0WA4": "Start running everyday and doing ab exercises. Be careful with salads..too much meat,cheese and dressing and u might as well eat MCD's. No matter how hard you work out your stomach, you can't really spot reduce that area. To do this, focus on strength training for your whole body combined with cardio activity and of course, eat healthy. You can definitely search the internet for full-body strength training programs and good ab exercises. Cardio is anything that gets your heart rate up (running, biking, etc. ).", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIVXUZ5": "SO, it's making you have your panic attack. But, it wouldn't be a bad idea to just go talk to a doctor about your heart racing. The doctor will listen to your heart and breathing and determine if there's anything else to look into. I have been extremely stressed out over the past year. just make a plan to sort out you're problems, relax more and mabye do breathing excersises. also I don't think you need to you to the doctor that many times. Since you already have problems, I wouldn't rule something related to the tachycardia out either. It's a little more than just a fast heart beat. Please see the doctor asap and find out what the real cause is. It also causes an instant shortness of breath and a weird ... the hospital with chest pains, palpitations and feeling ill, the doctors have found ... Yeah, I suffer from Generalized Anxiety Disorder, and a recent history of panic attacks.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52QRY8": "Ridley and robert M, just curious, what state are you guys in? I really am curious, Doesn't the United Stated have record forclosures, record high cost of living, record gas prices, record energy prices,, we now have record high inflation.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF59HCS": "But as I am now 27, I know 30 is NOT old, and 50 isn't going to be so bad! It's all in the eye of the beholder.. lol, I still tend to say 'He's 33, that's too old for me!' then I realize he's not ha ha!", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUM1M0": "Just keep an eye on him to make sure that he's coping all right. Sometimes, people who are thinking of suicide can suddenly change from being depressed to being happy. What you described above sounds like psychosis, and psychosis is one symptom of Schizophrenia (although it can also be part of other disorders, like Bipolar).", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S4ES4": "I don't know :(", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN527SD": "Breast cancer is rarely hereditary. If your mother was diagnosed with a hereditary type you have a 50/50 percent of also having the gene mutation which increases your risk for breast cancer and if this is the case you are illegible to be tested. If this is not the case than breast cancer does not run in your family. Family history is no different whether it is you mother or your fathers side. Breast cancer screening should start when you are 40 years old or when you are 10 years younger than your mother or sister was at diagnosis. No one can tell you if you are going to get breast cancer or not. Every woman has a 1 in 8 lifetime risk for it and 80 of those diagnosed have no family history of it.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5O17M": "You could be anaemic. Visit a doctor, and get your total blood count done to determine if it really is anaemia. Or you could be suffering from some scalp disease. Bottomline: Visit your doctor. For hair loss: Visit your dermatologist: Various problems: Nutritional deficiency Genetic Scalp diseases Stress Only your dermatologist can assess what it really is. If you're too lazy, http://www.hairloss.co.in helped me. Visit for information Please note that this is only for personal reference and should not be considered medical advice. Please visit your dermatologist before starting with any of the treatments mentioned above and on the site ( link provided above and below)", "3SV8KD29L4Q5BRAWL3E4WMC1G42ZKG": "Hey, I'm a parent. We've all been there, done that. Just tell your Mom that you want to try some boxers and boxer briefs next time she buys your underwear she can buy one pack of each. Unless you've got some seriously screwed up parents, they won't have a problem with your request. Whatever you do, don't make your decision based on what these YA yahoo's think you should wear. Try them out for yourself. Remember, your parents are there for you that's our job.", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6FHR1": "I'm not bleeding anymore. I've taken 2 home pregnancy test and both have came out negative. I'm worried as to what's wrong with me. April 21, 2015 at 16:55  CNN welcomes a lively and courteous discussion as long as you follow the Rules of Conduct set forth in our . Comments are not pre-screened before they post. You agree that anything you post may be used, along with your name and profile picture, in accordance with our and the license you have granted pursuant to our . About this blog Get a behind-the-scenes look at the latest stories from CNN Chief Medical Correspondent, , Senior Medical Correspondent and the CNN Medical Unit producers. They'll share news and views on health and medical trends - info that will help you take better care of yourself and the people you love.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FB6YO": "versions because it contain additives or sugar substitutes which are chemicals that makes you addict and the idea is not to cheat your brain , this is about getting rid of addiction so try to eat more fruits or home made ice creams made with real and fresh fruits without sugar and dairy products . Eating a meal of complex carbs , protein , and healthy fats can rev up your metabolism and give you fuel for an active day it also will help you to control insulin and glucose in your blood so you can avoid those extra pounds .", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXJUJJ": "Also indulge in outdoor activities, like cycling and swimming, on a regular basis to enjoy good height and a toned body. 6. Get Proper Sleep When you rest, the body grows and regenerates tissues. In fact, the Human Growth Hormone (HGH) responsible for increasing height is produced naturally in the body when you have a sound and deep sleep. During sound sleep, the brain is relaxed and releases more growth hormones. On the other hand, a tired brain shows low release of growth hormones. As a rule, during the growing stage, a person must have at least eight to 11 hours of proper sleep every night to enjoy maximum height. Source : How to Increase Your Height  Top 10 Home Remedies 385 views  Written 9 Jul  Not for Reproduction Upvote0 Downvote Comment Comment1 More Answers Below. Related Questions I am 17 years old. My height is less than 5ft. What can I do increase my height? Up to what age does height grow naturally? My height is 5'3 I'm 15 year old.", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNVV18": "ha! I was just medicating myself while heating this!", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRNOCN": "Look, missing school isn't a big deal if you keep up with your work. I kept a 4. 0 in high school and played hookie whenever I felt like it. Sometimes you just need a break, and a day to chill. That's even more true if you legitimately don't feel well. Stay home. At least I'm assuming you're in high school since you're asking us what you should do. If it's college you should know what you usually cover in class to know if it's safe to skip a day, and my school usually posts everything online as well.", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH072Q9G": "Here's a longer preview of my question with details: Hi, I'm a 20 year old with a very strange pulse and sometimes very very light chest pain near my armpit/breast area. My BMI is 38 (currently working on lowering), I exercise at least 4 times a week about an 1 hour of 4-5 miles. Note that I've been doing this type of regular exercise since I was 11, and some days would exercise with my partner for nearly 2 hours almost 2 times a month. I've been working on eating correctly as well (oats, fruit, no processed foods/sugars). I've recently quit caffeine and diet sodas, replacing them with 4 or more glasses of water. My blood pressure is 134/81. Usually, my resting heart rate ranges from 74-80 bpm. My problem is, during 2 weeks, I've been experiencing high pulse rates from (94-104) and on some days, a single heart flutter. Sometimes during sleeping, I wake with strange high pulses. A few days ago, I've awaken from a deep dreaming sleep having two heart flutters, and freaked out.", "36AZSFEYZ4YN941SETC8CDGF5ZKBV5": "that's a tough one! I think you should focus on ur positive attributes and NOT the negative ones. But you could really make your face look slimmer by wearing your hair straightened and long (if ur a gal). Do not wear high necked tops. Wear long slender earrings. Slimming down will only make ur skin look old if this is your face shape (trust me, I have a chubby face!!! )Good luck!", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ8CT1": "Detox is different for everyone.", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6O86AE": "292 and the last is A.D.928.? ???? A second great Maya accomplishment was the creation of a writing system.", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10LKML": "I think one thing is that anybody who's had to contend with mental illness - whether it's depression, bipolar illness or severe anxiety, whatever - actually has a fair amount of resilience in the sense that they've had to deal with suffering already, personal suffering. Please call the helpline: 1-800-784-2433", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO7Y4X": "Ok so my upper right wisdom tooth is coming it bothers me alot at times but i also got this pain in my throat on the right side i drank some apple juice and it burned my right ear will itch and i sneeze alot i get a weird itch in my nose like allergies is this all connected with my wisdom tooth problem or what's happening.. HELP ME!", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7PP0F": "The Roman forum was the nevralgic centre of the economical and political life in Rome very day the Romans used to go there to discuss about politics with other people or with the senators of Rome, to listen to greek and roman philosophers, to trade every kind of goods (slaves, gold, food, etc. ), to have a bath in the thermal baths near there, to see the gladiators fighting in the near Colosseum...The importance of the forum was greater during the republican era, during which it was the place where the political elites of the city could know what was the opinion of the ordinary people about the main decisions concerning peace and war, trade and laws.When Rome became an empire, the importance of the forum was just symbolic under a political point of view, because the main decisions were reserved to the will of the Emperor, while it remained the economical centre of the whole empire.Anyway, every great city in the empire had a forum.But the idea itself of forum died after the c...", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVANPMN": "Children are often fascinated with birds, and those that are usually don't waste much time requesting to have one as a pet. For those parents wondering what type of bird would make the best pet for their child, I give you the Top 3 Bird Species that are good with kids. Hopefully this information will help you make the best decision about which species will work best with your little one.", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RIUMR": "What are you using it for? How much? What KIND of protein powder?", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6OQOU": "Stay home so you won't spread around your germs. I hate when sick people come to work, or go to school, sick and contageous. my name is Ginny, i am also a stay at home mom to 2 small children, I live almost on the edge of nowhere.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVAOPMO": "In addition , this study?s findings contradict to a certain extent previous research findings according to which people in later stages of the life cycle emphasize the interpersonal aspects of their possessions ( Kamptner , 1991  Wallendorf and Arnould , 1988 ) and value memorabilia cues ( i.e. , sentimental objects used privately ) ( Csikszentmihalyi Rochberg-Halton , 1981 ) . Respondents both in earlier and in later stages of the life cycle valued possessions for their interpersonal aspects ( e.g . both younger and older respondents valued souvenirs for associating these items with their loved-ones ) , aligning with Kleine , Kleine and Allen?s ( 1995 ) argument that attachment is not predicted by possession type , or person type  but rather a specific person-object pairing is idiosyncratic to the specific life story episode it narrates .", "3NQUW096N661P6A125W6YYNNQ1J9LE": "You are only 12, meaning you are in a training bra. This is just the beginning. You will go up in size the older you get sometimes even until you are 21. They will change from size to size slightly during the month, they will get bigger during pregnancy  periods. Then they will return to normal for awhile. You will notice this clearly as they get kind of swollen  tender to the touch. Breasts also change sizes when you gain  lose weight, as they are made up of fatty tissue primarily. Don't worry about it though, just enjoy your developing womanliness!", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMNC8C": "My ittle girl is 14 months old now and generally she just eats whatever we have for tea. Sometimes obviously there is some stuff i don't want her to have so I have to make her a different meal. I too am on a budget! Buy some baby pasta. It cooks in minutes and you can put any kind of sauce on it, cheese, add some veg or tuna. If you add peas  sweetcorn they can eat it all as finger foods!! Scrambled eggs are good, chiken nuggets  fish fingers are usually a real hit!! I don't give my little girl chips yet but i usually buy a bag of sweet potatoes and chop 1 or 2 up into thin chips, pop them in the oven with a tiny bit of olive oil on them (can add some herbs too if you like) and cook for 20 mins. Healthy chips!! She loves them. Also as you don't use many potatoes for 1 meal they ast ages and do quite a few meals. If you have some smaller potatoes you could jacket potatoe with cheese, tuna, beans - anything! By 1 year old they should be eating most things - just check the packaging", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WTIM5": "You really shouldn't keep other fish with goldfish. They produce a lot of waste, require a lot of space, and don't usually get along well with other types of fish unless you are getting a BIG tank. Even with a bigger tank I still wouldn't recommend it. Also, those minnows are a schooling fish and like to live in groups of five or more. This site I found does suggest the minnows and few others as companions to goldfish.... I wouldn't recommend this experiment if you are upgrading to something less than a 50 gallon though.... http://deosfluviatilis.hubpages.com/hub/Goldfish-Tankmates-Aquarium-Companions", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ843KX3": "You were swimming which requires you to use your upper body and neck muscles. Your neck muscles go to the top of your head passing just inside of your ears. When the muscles are tight they can press into the nerves going to your ears to cause pains and/or hearing loss. I don't know how anybody could get water caught in their ears, it's impossible. To get rid of your problems you have to free up your neck muscles to release the tight ones pressing into those nerves and here's how to free them up: Neck: Place your hands behind your head so your fingers meet in the middle of your neck. Press into the neck with a moderate pressure and hold. After 30 seconds slowly lower your head as far as you can, then remove the pressure from the muscles but continue holding your head down for another 30 seconds. For best results relax your body first by taking a deep breath and exhaling then remain this relaxed.", "3U74KRR67MJAXLM0COH22QSOP3ITNW": "And most studies on the subject tend to focus on those who blink a lot and on what that means ( very roughly , it tends to suggest someone is nervous or behaving in a deceptive manner ) . What it means when someone blinks infrequently does not appear to have been extensively studied . and  he never blinks , which is admirable . I never blink either , ( and Clark supporter ) last month .", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10IMKK": "Without insurance you can consider using an urgent care center in your neighborhood to have your condition checked out. You'll generally pay a flat rate for the care you receive. It doesn't replace a relationship with a doctor, which you may need if you have a health condition that requires on-going care, but at least you can get some idea as to what's going on.", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUI7HP": "Hi! I am a certified personal trainer, level 2 (strength  sport specialist) so I'm not able to be more descriptive about nutrition, but diet really is your  1 concern. However, if you are skinny I wonder if you truly do have very much fat around your belly.", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCML8C6": "the best thing to do at this young age is crate training. If you like nothing better than coming home from a hard day's work and finding that your dog decided to go'' on the couch or use your favorite slippers as a new chew toy, then crate training isn't for you. I also suggest calling a puppy trainer and talking to them and going to puppy classes.", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGUCSC": "How Do They Do It? : Watch full length episodes  video clips. Read the latest How Do They Do It? episode guides  recaps, fan reviews, news, and much more.", "3XDJY5RK5SJ3BQRJUOSG8D8QH0UU4T": "Seriously , good luck with your next interview . Sorry we could n't be there with you , cheering you on with some great insider tips . But you 're a dental hygienist , of course , and , as long as you 're not applying for the same job with 200 other dental hygienists in the neighborhood , we think you 'll do fine .", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q10DYP": "They will not control the epileptic seizures. If for some reason, your dog cannot tolerate the medicine, please GET IN TOUCH WITH YOUR VET. If you discontinue the phenobarbital, eventually your dog could die of seizures with nothing to control them.", "37S0QRNUFBE6WU783OHOTX66MV0880": "How Much Should a 5'0 Woman Weigh?How Often Should You Weigh Yourself?How Much Should I Weigh if I'm 5'1''?", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV62LC": "You must try these and feel the change in energy level, eye sight, feet sensitivity, etc.Good Luck!- anon31814 13)I don't know how eating oatmeal is good for a diabetic.", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWQ5UA": "If you have asthma or other breathing disorders , discuss with your doctor how this medication may affect your medical condition , how your medical condition may affect the dosing and effectiveness of this medication , and whether any special monitoring is needed . Tramadol extended release can suppress breathing . People at risk for breathing suppression ( e.g. , people with head trauma ) should be closely monitored by their doctor while taking this medication .", "3NKW03WTLM5NSZ3MNLEUT4USY8PWQE": "Posted by: RigidJamal55 (Maximum 900 words) SubmitMost of the developed world has become a material- and information- driven society. Technology has reduced people's tendency to think for themselves. Why bother to learn anything when your mobile device will find it for you? This laziness is detrimental to the continued advancement of humanity, and the impact is clearly visible today. Philosophy has gone the way of the wolf, as T. and the Internet take over the minds of the masses. Philosophy was once a way for man to think outside himself, compare himself to the world, and imagine what the possibilities were. At this point in our history, most opinions and speculations are fed to us through media sources, such as television and the overwhelming amount of information on the Internet. Most people no longer feel the need to answer questions through rational thought and imagination.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GQJ5Q": "Delaware police question man after shooting: DELAWARE, Ohio  Police were questioning a man following the shooting http://", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8L9W5": "Those 'skinny twigs' your referring to are people who don't workout and probably starve themselves, the best thing to do is workout while you lose weight but you don't need to lose weight in order for your abs to show. Hope this helped They are right that abs are shown in the kitchen but made in the gym of course. Eat as much as you do now but eat healthy which is key. To get those abs though you need to bump intensity by a lot. Theres a difference when it comes to that. I'm guesing you're a guy because of the six-pack but I might be wrong... If you're looking to build muscle in you're abs then start adding weights to your situps. Who cares if u have abs? At least you'll know that you are healthy, and not an unhealthy, skinny stick. I don't mean to offend anybody by saying this but it's true. Try to avoid junk food most of the time, but you can still eat junk food in moderation of course. It shouldn't take you long to achieve abs. You are already quite toned and lean.", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW77EZC": "When normal people pop their backs - a few pops. When cheerleaders pop their back - whole spine pops. guilty", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIGX34": "Anxiety Attack Info: Anxiety Attacks Info. If you or someone you care about is suffering with anxiety attacks... http://t.co/Gs1m7KhJGT", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYBSZM": "Looks like Andrew Carnegie at 330 billion. I had to look this up myself (granted this answer is only as reliable as Wikipedia!)", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0OLMN": "T i t s  A s s  What do I do? What do I say?", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHTTZG": "your lan connection will always show 100mbps because thats the speed from your connector to your router, most pci lan cards (and built in lan) are setup as a 10/100 mbps card, so the connection is whatever the fastest available speed is from however you are connecting to the internet. Check your actual speed through your router not the pc.", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481V2BS": "They will revoke your probation and make you serve the remainder in jail. Depending on the county and whether or not your probation was a misdemeanor or a felony, you could qualify for 2 for 1 on good behavior. Jail is a terrible place. If you are this addicted to drugs that you want to do them even though you're on probation and the certainty of jail time, you need to do some serious drug counceling.", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNELRD1": "I used to have god-awful self esteem. I'd never get dates, had few friends, and kept to myself a lot of the time. I started to just talk around my friends occasionally about how 'awesome' and 'perfect' I was, not believing it myself, and just joking with them. I.e. they ask me a question, I answer 'because I'm just good like that'. Just in a joking manner, but after a while, you begin to kind of feel better about yourself. I started making more friends, being more comfortable with myself, etc. Again, this is just from personal experience.", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSQORT": "honey, see a gyn, now.the doctor is the only one qualified to help you and to give you answers and probably the right kind of medicine. once you find out, you won't be afraid. it is the not knowing that is stressing you out. we have all been through this. the sooner you see a doctor, the better to treat and the better you will feel. of course, you need to tell your mother and she will insist and rightly so, that you do see the doctor. good luck.", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPHA9U": "Malcolm X, like M.L.", "3N2YPY1GI6WLG7DCOKEYDLM08WYEV9": "This will give you the most accurate weight, and since a woman's weight can change so much during the course of a month, once a week will give you an accurate record of your progress, without you getting scale-obsessive.Good luck!- amypollick 157)i am a 13 year old girl going on to 14.", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BLPQB": "it's ok we've found him!", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXGJC2": "A brokerage house that specializes in a specific category of humor : brown humor ( vs.   gallows humor or black humor ) . We explore , even meditate upon the human condition from the vantage point of pooping and poop . In a way , this is a site for philosophers , sociologists and amateur theologians . Sometimes we talk about sex , but there 's no erotic agenda .", "3XD2A6FGFNSOTJ5RMET7AK1IIVQS9A": "Go for a checkup and avoid having sex for a while.", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JIAZ4O": "The average resting heart rate is between 60 to 100 beats per minute. If you average that to 80, it would take roughly 8. 5 days for your heart to beat 1,000,000 times. You can determine your heart rate by checking your pulse and counting the number of beats you feel over the course of a minute.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26VZ09": "Everytime you read or write something, or look at your watch, you are in their debt.", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLHAEGK": "I sort of a romantic, so, I collect Candle Burners. Have some really nice ones. Maybe one day, if, I have an address I send you a real old Turkey Salt amp Pepper Shaker I have, they kinda like a Chicken.", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV12K9": "I think 9, maybe even 9:30 or 10 for the 13 year old.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K47XL": "It is the result of abnormally high production of the hormone androgen by the ovaries and the adrenal glands. Symptoms of Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Some women have no symptoms.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK2Y52": "Please contact a specialist, that would be the best in your case", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE7ZI7V": "First of all, I used to be a self cutter. Second of all, stop talking about killing yourself because that is the most selfish thing a person can do. How do you think your family will feel if you killed yourself? And don't say that they wouldn't care. They brought you into this world. And whether they show it or not, they do love you. What you need to do is figure out why you are cutting yourself. What could you do instead? And you are right doing the list thing really doesn't help. I know. I have tried. I used to be really bad. I just got out of a long relationship and a beloved family member passed away. I was doing it almost everynight. I have learned to not allow things to drive me insane as they used to. Let things go. Don't sweat the petty things. And don't get drunk! That brings you down even further. You may actually need to talk to them. I know you don't want to. And they will think you are crazy. You aren't. You are releasing anxiety the only way you know how. But", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GNU1J": "Does it matter?I don't think it's generally important. I mean if someone is going to look closely enough at someones legs they might as well have something to see. I don't think it's a realistic expectation to have all women shave their legs... so, if a woman chooses not to, it doesn't bother me.", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0B68D": "It should not beused as a substitute for professional medical advice,diagnosis or treatment.LIVESTRONG is a registered trademark of the LIVESTRONG Foundation.The LIVESTRONG Foundation and LIVESTRONG.COM do not endorseany of the products or services that are advertised on the web site.Moreover, we do not select every advertiser or advertisement that appears on the web site-many of theadvertisements are served by third party advertising companies.Ad Choices", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1IQKE": "Level 1: One and Two Letter Easy Words. Initial Letter: ... Level 2: Two and Three letter Words CVC (no r's or l's). Also easy words two letter words ending in y. between and. Size: 1546217 bytes, 1 line. aa ac ad ag ah ai ak al am an ap ar as at au ax ay az ba bc bd be bi bk bo bp bs?... A Trip to the Veterinarian. My veiled chameleon and my cockatiel both had their first trip to the veterinarian today. The cockatiel was, for the most part, just along ... I have a huge problem and no one to help me. I have a 12 year old male iguana. 5 days ago he was nice and healthy. xLyrix.com the best place for reading lyrics and karaoke", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR7I8K": "But in people with SLI, this excess electrical energy seems to 'escape' the body, thus creating a much stronger electromagnetic disturbance which can range from 'blowing' a streetlight, to blowing a fuse,  causing electronics to malfunction, etc. In most cases, SLI seems to be a unusually strong electromagnetic release of stress from these nerves.", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIM5TM": "With the cost of owning a car now, depending on how far away from college the cost of living at home may not be that much less than living in the dorms. Its OK to stay at home if you want. It is good to get out on your own a bit. Dorms are a good stepping stone so that you can ease yourself into that much independence. I would avoid the apartment. It will be stressful enough to start college, you have less to worry about with a dorm. You can learn to deal with annoying roommates. Try and get into a suit if they have them available. I live in the dorms and I love it. When I can't schedule classes together I can go back to my room in between. I don't have to schedule meetings or anything on campus around when I'm on campus, if I don't have class I am available. I don't have far to go so I can sleep in more, and I don't have to worry about a car or traffic.", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW851GN": "Call police and find animal refuge in your area/try  find rescue groups for exotic pets, they can usually help. :( Do something today, that's very sad. You're a nice person.", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXSBIC": "Please contact a specialist, that would be the best in your case", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUWAJS": "I had a Litter Maid one with 4 cats (one a 25 pounder).. It works great if you get a good litter... Don't use Tidy Cat, that would always get clumped on the rakes..  YOu can not have 12 cats first of think how expensive that would be and second that is illigal!", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NH0VAV": "Because this category is Men's Health and it's all about men and men's systems. Actually we can see other questions about men as well (occasionally) but yeah I have to admit that most of the questions asked here are about penis, penis' size and like quot. can i get tallerquot. or sth like these. And we cannot stop people asking these sort of questions because they have the right to ask them and they just needed help. Well most of them are teenagers so they're just still too immature to know everything and they just want to know the truth to solve the problems in their minds.", "3W0XM68YZPT8GVPODS5C4SSP3PN1KR": "Female Black Cap Conure: 5 Month old handfed Black Cap Conure. DNA'd female. wants to be http://t.co/ExS6jF2k6S", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2WKW9": "Turtles have very specific needs based on the species...It is best to help it cross and leave it be", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DFCUS": "I also can recognize the symptoms when its coming and using abreva, i can get rid of it before it even turns into a rash or blister so that it wont scar as bad.I hope my abreva remedy works for you as well as it has worked for me because i know shingles can be hell.good luck.", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E5GK5": "Similarly, men with a WHR no more than 9 are generally healthier and more fertile than men with higher WHRs, and less likely to develop serious conditions or diseases.Studies indicate that if WHR were to replace BMI as a predictor of heart attack worldwide, figures would include many more people.What is the problem with WHR?", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BNPQD": "i know that you should take pill all days for 21 days in 28 days cycle not just for 2 days ...and also you can use condom also for better protection caz if you don't take pill regullary you maybe become pregnant.so you can wait untill your period if you miss it do test the day after it but if you don't miss take pill regullary from next month you can ask your doctor about the pill also...and about bleeding i read about it that maybe there is no bleeding even in first sex but maybe you didnt do it completely......... Omarion-I Wish Intro: Corna Boys This feel real good right here man Its a good look I aint mad at you (Omarion) Sometimes I wish I didnt love you but Im glad I do (TUG) (I, I) I aint mad at you Sometimes I wish I didnt love you but Im glad I do (I, I) (I, I) I aint mad at you Sometimes I wish I didnt love you but Im glad I do (Sometimes I wish I didnt love you but Im glad I do) Verse 1: I shoulda Known I (known IIId) Fall in love with y...", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y5IWU": "I think its really 'cute' how you come in and go on about the pound dogs and how you want to save a life...so..without posting anything, why not walk down to your local pound, pay them whatever they ask for a dog and then take it home. See how easy and simple this was? I don't post and ask questions or permission in here when I import a dog from Europe, I simply do it, but, I think your motives are a little different then mine.", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7Q0PR": "I hope that I have helped you.Good luck!Tyed Source(s): owltyedup  8 years ago 0 Thumbs up 2 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Submit  just now Asker's rating  No you do not need to start giving your dog distemper/parvo vacciantions if he had the puppy series as a puppy and had a booster a year later...Rabies vacciantions do not need to be given yearly..they only should be done at most every 3 years, unfortunately there are some states that make it law to vaccinate yearly.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26TZ07": "Rebecca Butler  Facebook Facebook-Logo E-Mail oder Telefon Passwort Angemeldet bleiben Passwort vergessen?Registrieren Anmelden Messenger Facebook-Lite Handy Freunde finden Banner Nutzer Seiten Orte Spiele Orte ber uns Werbeanzeige erstellen Seite erstellen Entwickler Karrieren Datenschutz Cookies Datenschutzinfo Impressum/Nutzungsbedingungen Hilfe Einstellungen Aktivittenprotokoll Facebook  2015 Deutsch", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVKIF1": "Petland United States Applied and was hired at Petland, and after only one day on the job, I wouldn't go back for a million dollars. Okay folks, lemme fill ya in on my first day of training and how petland trains its employees and how to treat the customer. You either make min. wage or commission, which ever is higher. Most of the dogs there sell for 2,500 or higher so you can make a easy 500 bucks in one day of sales. well when it came to the guy and owner who were supposed to train me, lets just say they were to busy selling dogs then to train me. Every time they'd start to tell me a policy they would rush over to someone looking at pups. they wouldn't rather no miss a commission then do their jobs training a new employee. first off the owner lauren tells me that, my main goal is to sell a puppy and to make money, this is a commission job.Its not like 'hey guys lets find these puppies homes', nope its like 'move them out at any cost'. Wanna know how petland see you, its customers? ta", "3XU9MCX6VOA1SKKFMGENANO8QNX2R4": "Find out what brings the headaches! I Used to have them all the time before and used to take all the pain killers i could lay ma hands off but nothing was working! But I discovered I only had them when I had not eaten anythiing, wen my stomach is empty. Even now, wen i go without eating anything for a long time, i get headaches. Other people it might be water, or even lack of sleep. both of which too give me headaches if i dont have them. So find out if the headaches come as a result of not eating, not drinking, not sleeping enough, or anything! DISCOVER YOUR SELF. And u wont need the pills!!", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLWJY8": "i have my period at the time haha okay bye", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL0086LX": "Check with your doctor before starting any weight loss program. Anyone who attempts to lose weight by reducing calorie consumption experiences feelings of hunger and fatigue. Hoodia diet pills attempt to reduce those feelings, making it easier to stick to a low calorie diet and therefore lose weight. As with any weight loss plan, only people who are in good health should use hoodia diet pills and they should be used in conjunction with appropriate diet and exercise. Because thirst is suppressed as well as appetite, it is important to remember to drink plenty of water. Most experts recommend eight 8 ounce glasses per day to maintain proper hydration. Other than thirst suppression, there are no known side effects associated with hoodia diet pills and they are probably a much better choice than diet pills containing stimulants. I tried Hoodia and......  Hoodia has worked for me...and with no side effects. For all you doubters, here is the prior feedback for another Answers user w", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ07RTI": "This scan can help tell if any lymph nodes or organs in your body are enlarged . CT scans are useful for looking for lymphoma in the abdomen , pelvis , chest , head , and neck . Before the test , you may be asked to drink a contrast solution and/or get an intravenous ( IV ) injection of a contrast dye that helps better outline abnormal areas in the body .", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNW1VF": "Let's help! 'I need help. Im sure each of u needed help at some time. We all need help  animals most definitely need our help'-", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WUMIA": "I don't think anything is wrong with you, however that is impossible to tell since i've never met you or talked to you and i am not a doctor so the next best think is this info, decide for you're self and if you still have problems go see a doctor. Here is a little info on crying. Disorders related to crying Bell's palsy, where faulty regeneration of the facial nerve can cause sufferers to shed tears while eating. Familial dysautonomia, where there can be a lack of overflow tears (alacrima) during emotional crying. Some have also claimed that crying can serve several biochemical purposes, such as relieving stress and releasing toxins from the body. Recent psychological theories of crying emphasize the relationship of crying to the experience of perceived helplessness.From this perspective, an underlying experience of helplessness can usually explain why people cry. One study proposes that crying, by blurring vision, can handicap aggressive or defensive. Hope all this helped you out.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FWQ33": "That is not usual. Usually women will just urinate a lot but anyway, when women are pregnant they start to have chemical changes. What you have is a urinary infection that comes from the kidneys. Pregnant women will sometimes get the infection but that does not mean there is no cure. The infection is caused by germs and viruses that can make you sick. If you are still unsure of why you urine blood then it is a good idea to check in with a doctor and tell him/her the painful condition that you are going through. This illness can lead to cases like high fever, vomiting, and other discomforts. So go to your doctor and he or she might give you a medication.", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN58I4A": "I do know what you mean, I feel that from time to time - so at least one person doesn't think you're crazy. But, I feel it rarely, and have no idea what it could be, or how to fix it. Sorry! I think having something like that constantly would spiral me off the deep end. nookle is offline  Quote Quick Reply  3 Old 01-26-2008, 11:18 AM AHIMSA   Join Date: Aug 2004 Posts: 10,728 Perhaps an overgrowth of candida? Sounds like an allergy for sure. Steroids would make me feel that way, actually. 'Yes! Live! Life's a banquet and most poor suckers are starving to death!' Auntie Mame AHIMSA is offline  Quote Quick Reply  4 Old 01-26-2008, 11:59 AM JustKris   Join Date: Aug 2007 Posts: 540 I have the same problem from time to time. I always attributed it to allergies and used decongestant/antihistamine with good success. JustKris is offline  Quote Quick Reply  5 Old 01-26-2008, 12:00 PM Tom Veggie Regular   Join Date: Dec 2002 Location: Upstate NY Posts: 4,778 I sometimes get th", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNYHXV": "Available in: Paperback,Hardcover,NOOK Book (eBook). ... Red Kayak .... The boys talk revenge, and when they spot the new owner's kayak out on a ... Their parents' resentment toward developers and rich summer families?... When the mother, Mrs. DiAngelos and her son Ben head out they do .... to read Red Kayak as it was assigned to my freshmen as a summer reading book. ... In the book Red Kayak, Priscilla Cummings manages to put enough?... The book The Red Kayakis a very interesting story. ... They drilled holes in the kayak filling it with water killing Ben and ... Chapter 1 summary of red kayak? Apr 4, 2014 ... With the help of his father, Brady recovers the red kayak and tells his father ... I would have enjoyed the book more if they were held more?... Katie: Foreshadowing: the red kayak was going to tip over. ... Digger are going to mad at each other for doing and saying what they did. ... Chapter 1 Summary", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2EACRN": "He/she might have a good idea of what you can do to help the problem.They should also be able to direct you to someone who can help you find skates for your daughter, should you decide to buy her a pair.Good luck!", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFSQ4O": "good thing people still call all tablet computers 'iPads'", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS7CBA": "Dr Glasser shares the following information: Bleeding after sexual intercourse (also called post-coital bleeding ) is not rare. up to 10 of women have had this at some point in their lives. Abnormal bleeding can bring up the thought, Is this cancer? Fortunately, the risk of cancer with post-coital bleeding is not common (thousands of women will have this type of bleeding for every one cancer found). Should a woman have an episode of post-coital bleeding, she should see her health care professional. The vagina may be the source of the blood, as small tears from intercourse may occur at any age (but more commonly after menopause due to the loss of elasticity or vaginal dryness as it is commonly known). The cervix may have a benign (not life-threatening) condition where the cells usually found on the inside the cervical canal are on the outside of the cervix. These cells are sensitive to touch (such as during a Pap smear or intercourse) and may bleed.", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ5N2Y": "The average lifespan of a goldfish is about 9 years, but, this can vary greatly as goldfish are one of the most misunderstood fish that people buy. If given the correct amount of space (one goldfish needs 20 gallons alone, plus 10 additional gallons for every goldfish added), proper filtration, regular weekly maintenance, and a varied diet which includes fresh veggies, they can live long full lives.", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEJKH9": "Ha Ha, see your back Hunboy, with more Anti Irish/Anti Celtic sentiment, although this has to be your maddest and most intellectually challenged rant yet! You really are clutching at straws, with garbage like this. 'England's humiliation', then 'We weren't humiliated' make up your mind, you dozy cnut! James - It's Anti Sentiment both ways, you idiot, where did I even bring up Anti English Sentiment from the Irish? I was highlighting YOUR clear and utter bias, prejudice, anti sentiment and constant tirades against, Ireland, Celtic and even Scotland, though seldomly if ever, Rangers (hence the sarcastic Hunboy, reference). Your original point and. You just seem like a wee boy, who has a chip on his shoulder about a few things, which results in you getting in a tizzy and coming out with and creating daft wee questions like these, that are really just you trying to put a faux clever spin on your hatred. Again, what age are you, as it does feel like I am arguing (constantly) with a teenager.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1KB81": "I just got my braces off a few days ago. I noticed a tiny gap between my two front teeth but i don't remember if it was there before or not. I'm afraid my retainer may not be tight enough. How tight should it be? Right now and even whenever I first got it on, i couldnt really feel it. Just a slight pressure. show more I just got my braces off a few days ago. I noticed a tiny gap between my two front teeth but i don't remember if it was there before or not. I'm afraid my retainer may not be tight enough. How tight should it be? Right now and even whenever I first got it on, i couldnt really feel it. Just a slight pressure. Update: Thanks everyone. I wear have to wear it 24/7 for now. I cannot take it off with my tounge though. My boyfriend told me that his retainer was tight so it worried me that mine wasnt. Follow 3 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  just now ", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1R92O": "Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado: Books: David Cutts,Edgar Allan Poe, ... ...www.amazon.com/Edgar-Allan-Poes-Cask-Amontillado/dp/0893756237 Amazon.com: Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado: Books: David Cutts,Edgar Allan Poe,Ann Toulmin-Rothe ... Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado: Books: David Cutts,Edgar Allan Poe, ... Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado (School  Library Binding) ...www.amazon.com/Edgar-Allan-Poes-Cask-Amontillado/dp/0893756229 The Cask of Amontillado - The Poe Decoder Study guide by Martha Womack for the Edgar Allan Poe story 'The Cask of Amontillado.' Showing All Results ... the Cask of Amontillado/the Fall of the House of Usher by Edgar ...amazon.ca/s?ieUTF8keywordsEdgarAllanPoe'stheCaskof... The Cask of Amontillado Summary  Essays - Edgar Allan Poe The Cask of Amontillado: Introduction. Victim and Victimizer: Poe's 'The Cask of Amontillado' ...www.enotes.com/cask-amontillado Edgar Allan Poe page.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIRICP": "I had the same issue. It felt like a huge boil deep under the skin. It came back a few times, so I was really concerned about breast cancer. Turns out it was my sweat gland getting clogged, which is likely what you're experiencing. It did pass on it's own, but I think I was actually having a reaction to sensitivities to an ingredient in my deodorant. Have you changed brands, types (i.e. invisible formula), or has the formulation changed for the brand you're using? I know that I've had varying issues with deodorants and am limited in the brands I can use. Obviously, I'm not a doctor, and you should always consult with yours, but I suspect it's just a clogged sweat gland. Try another brand of deodorant and see if that helps to keep it from coming back.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG543ZLF": "Dogs are our link to paradise. They don't know evil or jealousy or discontent.", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O2BXV3": "Not for nothing, you showed to yourself and the world that you could and did. That is worth something IMO. Rock on!", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E7KGB": "Snoopy loop A Snoopy loop is a term used in the British caving and cave diving community to describe a heavy duty elastic band made from a slice of a car inner tube. Varying diameters of inner tube can perform different tasks. An improbable explanation told of Norbert Casteret, an early French caver, having his dog Snoupi castrated by the local vet using a bicycle inner tube as a tourniquet. While floating down Boulder Creek on an old inner tube, English was struck with the idea to create a non-leather handbag from her rubber inner tube to fulfill her need for a sustainable and fashionable product. Typically, English Retreads are made completely from reclaimed rubber inner tubes. They're are a pain to install and you might need another person to help along with metal tire levers. They also make a heck of a mess to clean up when you install the new tube. Between the tuffy liners, heavy duty tube, a puncture resistant tire, and proper air pressure you should be good to go.", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9DNGK": "Even a tinge of tan is sun damage, which can bring on wrinkles, freckles, and cancer. Plus, skin swells a bit when it tans, so dirt can get trapped in pores. 9- Kick Butts Once of the best things you can do for your skin is AVIOD CIGARETTES. - If you have combination skin, go for a product that is formulated for combination skin. If you have dry skin, you need a product that is going to moisturize your skin. If you have oily skin, then you need a product that can regulate your oil level. Coping with dry skin Reviewed by Dr Stuart Crisp, specialist registrar What is dry skin? A condition (not necessarily a disease) where the skin is red, scaly and itchy. The problem is usually worse in autumn and winter. Jul 27, 2012 ... This isn't the same old boring advice about oily skin - find out the top 6 ways to ... I have so many pigmentation scars and since my skin is so oily, there'...", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9U7VG": "I've written a great deal about storage solutions and how to contain clutter, and I truly believe that maximizing space in your home by storing and organizing items is worthy pursuit. Sometimes though, it can go too far. Have you ever found yourself putting something in a box just to 'get it out of the way' because you don't want to deal with the contents? In these cases, storing and labeling are really just moving the underlying problem -- not wanting to deal with your stuff -- to another space in your home. That's not good. But not to worry, because you're not alone: In a survey commissioned by California Closets, only 7 of respondents characterized their homes as 'highly organized.' Most people fall into a clutter habits due to sentimentality, lack of knowledge about how long to keep things, or not being able to resist a bargain. It also doesn't make you next in line to be cast on Hoarders.", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PEPH8N": "Any kid smart enough to frame this question to arm him in a debate with his parents deserves a serious response...OK, you may almost need a law degree to read this. Here is the NYState Law. --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  http://www.nydmv.state.ny.us/broch/c-1.htm 'Seat belts save lives and help prevent serious injuries in a traffic crash. This is why New York State requires seat belt use by adults in motor vehicles. and seat belts. booster seats. or child safety seats for children. New York is a 'primary enforcement' state. A law enforcement officer can issue a traffic ticket just for failure to wear a seat belt. A ticket can be issued to the driver who fails to make sure a child passenger is properly secured in a safety seat or with a seat belt. This law also applies to visitors from outside New York State.", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q99L39": "Please contact the forum administrator.Support Error Code:- errSQLServergetSessionData()savenewsessiondata File Name:- functionssessiondata.asp Error details:- Microsoft OLE DB Provider for SQL Server Violation of PRIMARY KEY constraint 'PKtblSession7E37BEF6'.Cannot insert duplicate key in object 'dbo.tblSession'.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5P71T": "http://www.pinkyparadise.com/categorys/... Here you go, they should just be in the cosplay category, all of them. ()  the prices are very good, I buy circles lenses from here, and its very good service, it's around your budget too ", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACFJBU": "You can try to remember all the places you worked, and contact the companies for your dates of employment. Then you can construct a timeline of your work history, and determine if you left anything out. The Social Security Administration can provide you with your salary history over time - this should prove an additional help. Check their website for details.", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AAT1A56": "Temp has been 98 , this morning 5/17 I was prompted to wake by the nurse because of a dip in my heart rate , temp at waking was 97.3 . I am constantly dizzy , hot flashes 3 very now and then . I was treated for Lyme just in case , no other answers . I am guessing they will send me to Yale soon .", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TDYGH": "ANABOLIC STEROIDS DO NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. LONG TERM USE CAN LEAD TO TEMPORARY SHRINKAGE OF THE TESTICLES AND POSSIBLE ERECTILE PROBLEMS BUT THEY WILL NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. British manufacturing sector shrank at its quickest pace in May with both production and factory gate prices declining for the first time in two years, suggesting a prospect of interest rate cut before the end of the year to encourage spending, according to a survey on Wednesday.", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKTUV7": "The semen actually calms down women's uterus. When You're on your period, your fallopian tubes contract. Sperm reaching your uterus causes your tubes to expand back to normal, which doesn't mean You're pregnant. But if You JUST had a kid, i would bet You're 100 pregnant", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBU03B": "any lump should be looked at by your doctor. it sounds to me that you don't have a problem because of your age but i would go and make sure. don't be embarrassed either, the doctor won't care and he will put your mind at rest. These because this is in the penis, or cause of impotence. Underlying ... Help nitric oxide in the sponge-like tissue empties and softens to the shaft within half an hour. ... Been used in traditional oriental medicine for any kind of heart disease. This is a chronic skin condition that results in yellowish or golden patches of ... by sucking blood from the scalp and leave their eggs glued to the base of hairs. ... discharge, redness, soreness and swelling of the vagina, vulva and/or penis,?.... How big of a lump and how deep is it? If it is just in the skin, it is probably an infected hair follicle or a pimple. Treat it like any other minor skin infection.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8V5ES": "I agree, dry food is better for them, and adding anything to their dry food will 'spoil' them and create a picky eater. Wet food is fattier and can sometimes cause diarrhea because it's got more water in it. It's okay to give sometimes, as a special treat, mixed in with the wet food, but personally I wouldn't give wet food every day.", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1GQKC": "nullI used to live my life this way - being depressed and trying to make everyone happy. Believe me, it does not work. Thanks goodness that with age comes wisdom. I wished someone had clued me in when I was a lot younger . First, nothing is going to change until the depression is under control. Nothing will change. If your depression has lasted more than a few weeks, you dont get any enjoyment out of the activities you used to enjoy, head to the doctor for an evaluation. It could e full blown depression - but there are certain common medical conditions that can cause depression. A checkup is very important. It took me a while, and I will probably be on medication the rest of my life (which I hate) - but I hate being depressed even more. Once this is under control - then you can start on the other aspects of your life that you are having problems with - which is making HIS happiness your 1 goal. Your 1 goal is your happiness.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLO0A9": "I suffer from all of those, but they are from several different conditions. My problem is that even with my TMJ, or at least my face anyway (can't be certain it's all ... I agree with u but I pray to find a doctor that cares enough to run all the tests n get to know everything possible to properly help me get my life back as I have a ... Feb 3, 2015 ... Read about temporomandibular joint syndrome (TMJ) symptoms, treatment, causes, relief, exercises, surgery, and more. Learn how to get relief?... I have been dealing with severe TMJ problems for boy at least 5 years now .It took years to figure out what it was.I had smashing headaches shoulder pain,neck pain ... Temporomandibular disorders (TMD) occur as a result of problems with the jaw, jaw joint (or TMJ), and surrounding facial muscles. Learn more from the experts?... The exact cause of a person's TMJ disorder is often difficult to determine. Your pain may be due to a combination of problems, such as arthritis or jaw injury.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHT0LV4": "In 1962 Technical pens began to be produced. As from 2010, FIMO, MALI, Aquasoft and further brands are being marketed under the Staedtler name. In addition, the company celebrated its 175th anniversary in 2010.", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX3AQ06": "wow youre tall. thats hot.", "3S829FDFT2Z8SQ47S44WVO10OV5DXI": "Words DO hurt ! We may learn at a slower rate , but we are not retarded . All we want is to be accepted , and respected ! In fact , the only R-word in our dictionary is RESPECT ! This post is part of a series produced by The Huffington Post and the Special Olympics in conjunction with Spread the Word to End the Word awareness day onWednesday , March 4 .", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC31EO7": "History had a knife plunged into its back in the film 'Pearl Harbor.' The only historically accurate bits of the film were the time and place of the attack.", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP7S8K": "THE ONLY CORRECT ANSWER IS A LABIAL PHILTRUM OTHERWISE KNOWS AS A CUPIDS BOW. IT DEFINITELY IS NORMAL AND DIFFERENT PEOPLE HAVE SLIGHTLY DIFFERENT-LOOKING PHILTRUMS. If you have the labia sewn onto your upper lip, in time I would think that everything would be fine.", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2BW20": "Do you want it all to last longer, or just certain things. Again, ... Making sex last longer may require you to talk ... How Long Should Sex Last? Premature Ejaculation", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6O9A6J": "and the... Bull Terrier. Love these dogs! Thank you for your efforts to share the facts about these dogs!", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U5IEJ": "Technically, there is no biological criteria for one name or the other. There are smooth skinned purely aquatic toads (Surinam toad), purely terrestrial frogs (almost all tree frogs), etc.One absolute rule is that members of the genus Bufo are toads. After that, it is a game.", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WUUPO": "IT IS SO MUCH EASIER AND MORE IMMEDIATE THAN THERAPY AND MEDICATION ! Hi everyone ! My life was 180 degrees changed after implementing Charles Linden Method of Panic and Anxiety attacks relief . This method is 100  medicine free which created the urge for me to tell about this to everyone suffering from the same conditions I did .", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481UB20": "Please, don't put your health in the hands of an amateur forum. Respect your mind and body. Consult your doctor. (I am a physician myself and this is the best advice I can possibly give you.)", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ679ME": "Hun, there is no set age for losing your virginity just like you cant time when you will get married to Mr. or Mrs. Right. The best advice I can give you is to wait until you feel you are really ready with the right person. This kind of thing cant be timed. This goes for both guys and girls. Losing it early doesn't make you any better. Dont rush it and always play it safe using protection. If you dont, you cant get a sexually transmitted disease or get someone pregnant 2 huge life impacting mistakes.", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVQV06": "I think there are a lot of people that experience this problem.I know I do.It is so aggravating.I'll be watching a movie, then suddenly, I'll feel like a jittery feeling on my leg.Eventually it goes away.Drives me crazy because there is never anything visible. If you skin is dry, it can feel itchy. Very soothing to dry, itchy skin.", "3ROUCZ907FSC2EH4HMVGN5M6G57OOL": "You can like more than one guy at once. In fact, it's normal. And I'd say that you most likely like him (although its hard to tell with the details given). Its only wrong if you DO something with both at the same time (aka you kiss both of them in the same week/while pursuing a relationship with both).", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GL1UO": "DOUBTFUL: DE Kenny Mixon (ankle). QUESTIONABLE: RB Cecil Collins (ankle). PROBABLE: RB Stanley Pritchett (knee) LB Zach Thomas (trapezius).", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6SQOY": "You would need to find out the specifics from your teacher--there's not really a rubric or guide for that kind of stuff.", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014V1YL": "Call you doctor, don't search online!", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EH63J": "Hi,  1. You CAN be a regular dental hygienist and still work at an Orthodontic Practice. 2. You DO NOT need more schooling. 3. You will, however do mostly child prophy and fluoride treatment. 4. I would make a routine to recommend the use of the following (on top of regular oral hygiene instructions) :   i)  'ACT' or any other fluoride rinse  ii) Most of them will have braces on their teeth. So, use of proxy brush is recommended for better cleaning underneath and around wire / brackets. iii) The use of disclosing tablets would be ideal  5. The pay should be higher because as a whole that practice WILL be making more money. However, it depends on the following :  i) Your work experience  ii) How you can market yourself. If you are efficient (assuming you are quick and at the same time do GOOD job), you will produce more. Therefore, you will earn your share, which will be higher. iii) How much they are willing to pay  Hope this helps :)  Good luck !", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIK5TK": "Agriculture is mankind's oldest industry. When a person crafts something by hand, they have absolute control (more or less) as to the final outcome of what they seek to make. How well it is made depends upon the skill of the artisan. This is where the word 'technology' comes from. Loosely interpreted it means 'man-made'. Living organisms are another matter. They thrive on their own. As aa consequence, early civilized man didn't give too much thought on the plant food he consumed. Bushes growing berries and trees bearing nuts and fruits were readily at hand. At some point, civilized man learned he could take the seeds and bury them in the ground and eventually plants would spring up and bear food that could be consumed. The same could be said about the eventual raising of livestock. Before that, early man hunted. When he learned that certain animals could be domesticated, he began raising animals on his own. But again, living organsims thrive on their own if conditions are favorable. So", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VSBS2": "Prosquot. are the primary positive aspects of an idea, process, or thing. Consquot. are the primary negative aspects. The term quot. Pros and Consquot. means both the primary positive and negative aspects of an idea, process, or thing, and is often used to clarify or decide whether that idea, process, or thing is mainly positive or mainly negative. For example, when considering to go for a walk, you may look at the quot. Pros and Consquot. of doing so, and decide whether walking is worth your time and effort or not. Some quot. Prosquot. might be that walking is a healthy activity that enhances your mental mindset and physical health. Some quot. Consquot. might be that it requires work and you may get sweaty. Latin phrase pro et contra, 'for and against', and that it has been in use in the abbreviated form since the 16th century. In other words, it is a well established standard usage.", "3Q2T3FD0ON6ZGM36L8WB7YZQQEV3MP": "Sinclair Lewis's novel 'Babbitt' includes an extensive passage in which the title character reads from 'Three Black Pennies'. A 1922 poll of critics in 'Literary Digest' voted Hergesheimer the 'most important American writer' working at the time. I'll always enjoy watching you swing from tree to tree.' The weakness in his method can be seen in books like 'Cytherea', wherein the author's aesthetic concerns overwhelm all other aspects of the writing, resulting in thin plot and characterization and a certain precious quality in the descriptions. On the other hand, his descriptive writing occasionally holds great power. Parker writes great dialogue so he goes with his strength. Not too much description - he likes to leave a lot to the reader's imagination, especially as far as describing his characters is concerned. As a writer, you have to decide where YOUR strength lies - there are plenty of great authors who relied heavily on descriptive writing.", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q98L38": "Feb 16, 2010 ... I just don't know how life can ever be the same again, it wasn't great before, ... into tears and asked me 'what is it between you and your brother? what did he do to you? ..... age, and most boys begin to masturbate at about 12 years of age. .... I would say that much of the damage by my father had more to...", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVE1B7": "I've been trying to grow out my hair for 2 years and after chopping off damage and trying many things and lots of you tube and research here are my tips for growing out your hair! 1) YOUR DIET OFCOURSE!- People can't stress enough how healthy eating is and I know it sounds like crap but you are what you eat so you reflect what you consume. Eating junk is gonna take a toll on your hair growth, Whereas eating things like a balanced meal are going to help you! Dark green vegetables like spinach, kale, broccoli, and Healthy fats like avocados, nuts, and fish Really are good for your hair :) Fruits are also essential just as protein (Your hair is made up of protein) So basicaly don't just overload on healthy fats or proteins or green things but just keep in mind what you eat. and ofcourse, WATER!!!!! WATER seriously improves it so try to drink more water than milk, juice, sodas ect. Trust me it really helps the condition of your hair :)    2) Vitamins- It's your choice if you want to ta", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI28W2X": "For persons with severe cancer-related pain, the best medication can often be a narcotic combined with simpler medications such as acetaminophen or NSAID drugs (like Advil). Cancer pain is best managed by a doctor specialized in pain management. Most people think that taking a narcotic is going to completely take away all of their pain. Most doctors or pain clinics that prescribe narcotics will tell you that the best you can expect is a 50 percent decrease in pain more than that and your lucky. I take 80 mg of the extended release a day and my pain has diminished approximately 60 percent for which I'm grateful. There are many other narcotic pain relievers that you can try, morphine, methadone, dauladid, Demerol, fentenyl. Anti depressants are also used for pain...Cymbalta is a new medication made to treat depression and the physical pain it causes. Try it, it may work for you, my doctor put me on it about a year ago. I take narcotics daily for pain and they weren't working as well.", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DU8OSG": "Create a list of the top 10 myths for a specific category.5.Create a list of gurus/experts.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E3TB6": "i bet she wants to get out and start a life, but wants to make intelligent decisions before she gets stuck in a situation in which she is unhappy.i bet she's depressed with society because she doesn't want to live or build a life in this country where greed and grease rule. or maybe she just has a chemical imbalance which causes her to think about justice and love combined with the injustice and hate of the majority in this world, which can be depressing..caring too much sometimes puts people into paralysis. but it's always easier to say you don't care.. because chances are people are going to disregard your beliefs and tell you to think about you. which is the cause of these worldly problems in the first place. pace yourself, give time and love.", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9X7VJ": "Dextrose is added to gainer protein powders to increase overall mass. Depending on what your body is like it could be a good thing for you or a bad thing for you. Dextrose is just an easily digested carbohydrate, and your muscles need carbohydrates AND protein after a workout, most people think they just need to cram protein in their system post workout. If you're pretty skinny, and want to bulk up, dextrose is a good thing for you to have in your post-workout shake, but if you're trying to slim down by working out, you want to pick up a protein powder that is only whey protein isolate (or concentrate, but isolate is a bit better quality).", "3RKHNXPHGWUOPSGMFGFWFUXMEMNUKM": "What are you using it for? How much? What KIND of protein powder? This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. Choose as Best Answer", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYPMV6": "Any international shipping is paid in part to Pitney Bowes Inc.   A naturally made herbal cream to help grow a moustache , beard , sideburns and eyebrows . This superb formula can help thicken and fill out the facial hair around the jawline , upper lip and sideburns . If you suffer from patchy undeveloped facial hair then this winning formula could be your beard growth solution .", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9348O": "It could n't have been Nate . He looked just as bewildered as Hardison . She then looked over to where the hitter was sitting , and found he had left . Giving a hard glance to Hardison , she stood , and picked her up plant .", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ3WA7": "The tablets were discovered by Italian archaeologist Paolo Matthiae and his team in 197475 during their excavations at the ancient city of Tell Mardikh. The tablets, which were found 'in situ' on collapsed shelves, retained many of their contemporary clay tags to help reference them. They all date to the period between ca.", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VVXC4": "Pubic Hair Removal - Shaving Pubic Hair For pubic hair removal, shaving is most utilized. Whether you're a male or female, get a fresh razor and follow these steps to avoid in-grown hairs and infections which feel itchy and appear as painful bumps. Sit in a chair with your feet up above your waist and legs spread apart. Lathering Apply shaving cream or gel to lather the pubic area. The pubic area is sensitive and may take time to adjust to the razor. Moisturizing Rinse, dry and moisturize the freshly shaven pubic area. Red bumps and ingrown hair may appear. Whether you're a male or female, get a fresh razor and follow these steps to avoid in-grown hairs and infections which feel itchy and appear as painful bumps. Lathering Apply shaving cream or gel to lather the pubic area. Soap doesn't make the best lather for pubic shaving. Red bumps and ingrown hair may appear. The hair follicles become infected, causing little bumps and often a red rash. The best way to prevent razor bumps is n...", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V734VS": "I would not lose sleep over the size of your penis. In med school, we are taught that normal penis size is anything from 5' to 6.5' erect. Flaccid measurements are not considered unless extreme one way or the other.", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9AUAUO": "you should definetly go to the doctor asap... it's better to be safe than sorry.", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEEG8P": "re using tweezers or a pair of forceps to remove an attached tick from yourself or your pets , you re doing it the hard way . Instead , try using small tick removal tick remover for larger dog ticks . All of these devices cost less than  5 and they are worth every penny . Look for them at pet stores or from online merchants .", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6T6B9": "I wasn't going to answer but it seems some people think being humble is only a Christian belief From Buddhist mind training teachings: Cultivate love Conceal your accomplishments Praise others accomplishments Reveal your own shortcomings Do not reveal others shortcomings (unless with compassion) Recognize all people as spiritual teachers Take no pleasure in negative actions Monoprix Monoprix S.A. () is a major French retail chain with its headquarters in Clichy, Hauts-de-Seine, France, near Paris. Monoprix is present in approximately 85 of all French towns with a population of more than 50,000. Just as the British dominated the York round archery, the French dominated the Continental-style. The one Briton to enter placed 12th, while the American placed 15th. He received a Diploma of Merit for the accomplishment, which would have earned a silver medal had he been shooting in competition.", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKRUV5": "I had depo two years ago and had to stop it cause I gained 15 pounds!", "3U18MJKL1UKTB4KPQ2MCDGSK1HKCNY": "I refuse to believe that any of us have to live like this.Good luck!Thanks, Lindsey980114211942:Guest:remote:saintscullywebtv.net:We Are Not Alone:I have fought the symptoms of IBS for at least 1 year now, and am now on Levsin(for spasms)  Buspar(for anxiety).", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0L0E3": "1. A Change In Your Regular Routine: Did you start a new job? Change your wakeup time? Go on vacation? It can take your body a little time to adjust to a change in your regular routine and that can. Likelihood That This Is Impacting My Period: Moderate. And if youre stressing about why your period is late, that could actually delay its arrival even more. Illness: Being sick at the time you normally would ovulate can delay ovulation  and if you ovulate late, youll get your period late. Likelihood That This Is Impacting My Period: Minor. Likelihood That This Is Impacting My Period: Minor. Likelihood That This Is Impacting My Period: Minor. Fitness fiend, I am not. Miscalculation: The average menstrual cycle is 28 days, but many, many women have shorter or longer cycles and dont chart them correctly  so it may be that your period is not actually late. If your period is early even by a few days one month, it may arrive late the following month. Also you're periods can still be irregular.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0I265": "You do not have carpal tunnel. That has nothing to do with your hand falling asleep at night. I get the same problem. It is from cutting off the circulation in your hand because of how you are sleeping. It will not cause any permanent damage because it will always wake you up so that you can move it around and get blood back into the hand. You can do a few things.1. Get a new mattress. I found that when I sleep on a good mattress none of my limbs fall asleep. I have had the best luck on memory foam mattresses because there are no coils pushing against my body to cut off circulation. As a side sleeper you need a mattress that conforms to your body not a mattress that forces you to conform to it. 2. Your circulation may need some help. There are lots of natural supplements you can take to improve circulation like niacin, and B complexes. 3. Try to change how you sleep. I know this sounds impossible but you will not have this problem if you can sleep on your back. Just try givin...", "3W31J70BASUS3YZMTPUWLOBG7MFCKT": "Question 10 Answers to Your Biggest Fitness Questions http://t.co/S7zLnOUjGF fitness active healthy QA fitfam fitspo Healthy", "3VAOOVPI3ZQWQ8BAR2ZW37EIQVVLLI": "strech em out and wrap them from the ankle to mid knee. I, too am right-handed  use my left. Go to a farm supply store or a gardening store or Walmart and buy Bag Balm - apply liberally to your hands several times a day and your hands should start to get better in no time.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BNRAY": "You have to wait the full 6 weeks when the kittens are ready to be weaned", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2TSTA": "I highly recommend this series of books. This is one of only a few series I have read that contain many different genres (action, adventure, fantasy, mystery, suspense, science fiction, thriller) which makes the books very exciting. Similar to LOTR, this series has LOTS of information (characters, places, history, religion) that are critical to the plot. Readers need to be able to keep track of most of these things or else they will get overwhelmed by the amount of it. If you are a reader that does not like those types of stories then you should stay away from this one. One of the unique things about these books is that all of the chapters are written in first person perspective, they are not 'numbered' like normal books. By doing this, it allows readers to see particular events from multiple characters viewpoints, and 'see / hear' their thoughts about it. It makes for very interesting story telling because sometimes what you read isn't always the truth, or is slightly distorted bas...", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L59DGQ": "Don't wait till tomorrow what you can start today. 107 for your age and height is 19 BMI, which is just above the 'Normal/Average' range for you. You can go higher, but saying that your weight is 'low' isn't entirely correct. Finally, consider this: Are you actually physically hungry all the time, or do you simply feel like eating? Eating when you're not hungry can mean that eating has become a habit for coping with boredom, procrastination or stress. Eat foods you know are healthy and eat balanced meals. But don't count calories or restrict your diet because that will just lead you back to the ED and counteract all the hard work you did in recovery. Recovery is hard. Some cats just can't eat only when hungry. My cat gets overweight really easily because she always wants to eat. We will feed her and she'll gulp the food, then wander the kitchen looking for crumbs on the floor.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6OO9A": "You don't get into writing for fun. Write because you have to. You have a story to tell", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUGM1F": "Also try: how do i get a flat stomach fast, how do i get a flat stomach in 2 weeks, more. - Cached More results from webmd.com  Sexy Abs: How to Get a Flat Stomach  Women's Health Magazine Women's Health magazine shares. - Cached Flat Stomach Exercises and Diet Tips - How to Lose Belly Fat Get a flat stomach and lose belly fat fast with these simple stomach exercises and proper diet tips. www.flatstomachtips.com - Cached How to get a Flat Stomach Fast  Flat Stomach Exercises Learn how to get a flat stomach fast with flat stomach exercises and the flat stomach diet. Get tips on the perfect workout for a flat stomach. - Cached How To Get A Flat Stomach Without Abs  LIVESTRONG.COM How To Get A Flat Stomach Without Abs. A flat stomach is a prized possession to those who have one it is wanted by those who do not have one. - Cached Search Related how do i get a flat stomach fast how do i get a flat stomach in a week how do i get a flat stomach in 2 weeks how do i get a flat stomach in 3 weeks", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOQH5N": "You could join a critique group, and get hints on how to write better -- and you can help others write better too. Also, check out the Jennifer Crusie website, where she talks about using collages to help her write her stories. She was an art teacher, and it's amazing the way she combines art and her books.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNN8RB": "10 Foot Pole. I wouldn't touch this with a 10 foot pole. Sex offender but no sex involved. Spare me. Four children involved? 2 plus 2 still make a 4. Dee9 Dee9 71 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. Dee9 Dee9 Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK1Y51": "m not a runner , got a knee injury many years ago ( running ) , but I go to the gym around 4 times a week doing a mixture of cardio and power yoga . I was 129 pounds , bmi 22 before I got pregnant . Not as low as many of you , but I have a fair amount of muscle on me which bmi does not seem to address .", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLGGW3": "They know we're broke college students so they set the prices so high so that we can't buy books and flunk out of school. It probably has a lot to do with supply and demand but college departments do choose the text books they will use and why they pick expensive ones, I'll never know. but if you want cheaper books you can look at the websites in the sources section and focus on used books.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZNVQ3": "well gee...let's just think about this for a second...   why are you asking US when first of all, we don't know you and your sexual habits, and second of all, it is usually a pregnancy test or a DOCTOR that answers that for you. Hopefully, if you are, it gets Daddys genes instead of yours. Yours don't seem to bright.", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XK9BHF": "You may have a sleep disorder,but I would try a few remedies before seeking professional help. 1avoid caffeine after 4P.M. 2Do not nap no longer than 45min. a day 3Try a warm bath or shower at least 2hrs.", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMRU81": "Google some pills that make you feel numb", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F0JZZ": "There are many factors that can cause your period to be late:   - change in weight (particularly weight loss)  - stress (because of the hormones and chemical reactions in your body)  - poor diet with insufficient nutrition   Many women experience irregular periods into their twenties, as the hormonal cycles can take a long time to regulate within the body.", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSV4H5": "ATOMIC BOMB: DECISION (Hiroshima-Nagasaki) For other websites about the bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, and the history of nuclear weapons, see these links. http://www.dannen.com/decision/index.html The Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki The Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki: Necessary or Not? http://www.japan-guide.com/e/e2125.html A-Bomb WWW Museum  June,1995 ...of Hiroshima. Message from the Mayor of Nagasaki. The atomic bombing of Nagasaki. The Atomic Bombing of Japan ...whether the atomic bombing of Hiroshima was ... Chronology on the Decision to Bomb Hiroshima and Nagasaki (by the Nuclear Age Peace Foundation). http://www.doug-long.com/ HIROSHIMA AND NAGASAKI / Nagasaki mayor has stern words for America... http://www.lclark.edu/history/HIROSHIMA/ Days after the bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki one more city was A secret of WWII revealed. Days after the bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki one more city was bombed. He is buried at Tama Cemetery, Tokyo.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS6CB9": "I think that veneers would fix it. Your jaw looks lined up and normal, so braces aren't needed, but since your teeth are different sizes, veneers or something to fill in the spaces would make it look really good. Good luck! :)", "3XT3KXP24ZWCHM0XJVWHM84TJWGI6X": "Probably when he gets back in the house he smells the old urine, and that triggers him to re-mark the territory.Putting 'urine gone'  or 'Nature's Miracle' on the (invisible) stains will reduce this unwanted behavior.It helps to get a small black light to find out where the invisible stains are. Really.", "3PGQRAZX02I3UKDZUQLN91U9R49YS3": "If you give your fish egg yolk it will make the water cloudy. You can give them peas by taking the skin off and break into small pieces.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2DEFO": "Pain in your neck for days could be manigitis. I cought spinal Manigitis 'sp' when I was a few days old and I was almost dead bu the time it had run it's course. Go see your doctor. Opinion 2: it feels like bumps in your neck, you can feel them just by pressing on your throat. this could be a sign of strep throat or mononucleosis, better get it checked out...   Opinion 3: Feel on both sides of your neck in the hollow area right below your jaw line. If they are swollen you should be able to feel lumps on both sides. If not you may have strained your neck muscles or slept with your head in an awkward position.", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K345ZNYE": "For a YA story, I think I'd have to say that I don't think it would. At least not wildly. But more because it sounds like you might be trying to avoid anything even vaguely sexual, and that's not going to work because it just isn't realistic. For ANY sort of story. The only way you could really get away with no romance/sexual tension is to have every character belong to different species (which suggests they don't see each other as attractive), already married (which doesn't stop them from looking, but there's a suggestion of sexual satisfaction), subject to estrus/rut cycles to minimize the chances of having to address the sexual aspects, or cyborgs/androids so that there are no sexual urges whatsoever. In a situation like this, you have to keep in mind your characters as much as your audience. The teen years are all about hormones, and even if nothing comes of a girl and boy interactingeven if they, you know, decide to display some self-control because they figured out how or the...", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAGGIU": "The Germans...like Alex S.: see their most important national conservative paper ttp://t.co/9iXmv1P4ZJ", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRUUO3": "Usually you need to have a parent sign you up along with them for a membership at private gyms. May be try your community rec. center they may have different rules.", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WTPUI": "Your binge day doesn't seem too bad, you could obviously tone it down a bit with the dessert and potato chips. I agree with Jessica that your 'normal' days are too light on. You need to probably double your calorie intake on your normal days and get some quality advice on what foods to eat. Your binge days won't hurt too bad if they are only once a week or less. You are just making your body process all that food for no reason. It's what you do every day that matters.", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE85Z2": "When Sunday night despondency strikes family and friends , I keep quiet about the fact that I 'm actually looking forward , say , to re-enacting the My pupils are a constant source of intellectual challenge , especially now the information revolution has democratised history . Resourceful 14 year-olds can easily find counter-examples to challenge their history teacher 's points , scary but invigorating for me and exhilarating for them . Pupils ' questions and observations have been more instrumental in shaping my own views than the input of that Oxford tutor who sneeringly questioned my decision to teach .", "3XU9MCX6VOA1SKKFMGENANO8QNUR2Q": "Senior Citizens:What are some rags-to-riches stories for people over fifty? Senior Citizens:What goes through your mind when you realize you have 10 of your life left to live? Senior Citizens:Are you involved with modern technology such as computers? Senior Citizens:What is the difference between a walking stick and a cane? Senior Citizens:Why are nursing homes so expensive? Senior Citizens:What will be the popular words in your mind if you are between age of 50-70? Senior Citizens:Is there a medical or scientific reason behind the assumption that men tend to cry more as they age? Senior Citizens:What is the European counterpart to AARP? Senior Citizens:Where can I get care home advice? Senior Citizens:What consitutes elder abuse? Senior Citizens:How common is it for older people to be smarter on paper than in person? Senior Citizens:What are the most common medical devices/appliances used by nonagenarians?", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4E9EN": "Feeling left out. Do not stay on the mopey mode because you will come accross as jealous. I understand the way you feel because it was almost as a promise from one friend to another. As you mature, you change your mind about things, the scenarios are different. Be there for your friend if you want to keep this friendship. If you add any drama to a stressed bride she will be upset at you. In my opinion is that so. what is the problem with having 4 bridesmaids? Why not acommodating everybody? Another thing that is causing you to be insecure is that deep down you are wondering if this friendship can continue the way it is. Is the groom going to interfere? My daughter had a very close friend all through middle school and after college they still did a lot together. This friend is very needy of attention and resented that my daughter got married. The drama created made my daughter distance herself from her friend. Be open with your friend.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXDCJS": "I used to own a pet shop..maybe I can help. Stay away from iguanas. They tend to be expensive and it's hard to raise juvies. Unless you can get a good deal on an adult. Hermit crabs don't do well in captivity. We call them throw aways...you buy one it dies, you have all the stuff so you come back for another and another... Anols sp? Do okay...they are also called new world cammilians. Cheap and should live for about a year. If I had to make a recommendation on a not cute and cuddly pet, I would say either a spider (tarantula) you might not be able to get them, it depends on your state laws, or a small snake. Boas and such are really pricy, but you could get a corn snake or a rat snake...all you need is a tank , a place for them to hide and a heat rock. You only have to feed them every other week. (keep in mind you have to be okay with feeding them live cute cuddly mice and mouse babies.) Then there is always a turtle (they live a long time) or a toad. Hope this was somewhat helpful Vic", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXL5R5": "Physignathus Physignathus is a genus of large, diurnal, arboreal, agamid lizards, commonly known as water dragons. The two species are the Chinese water dragon 'P. cocincinus', and the Australian water dragon 'P. lesueurii'. They are sometimes kept as pets, especially 'P. cocincinus'. a mythical Chinese dragon is a dragon that can not fly only swim and is one of the four elemental dragon protect the earth or The real Chinese dragon is (green lizard) Physignathus cocincinus. Chinese water dragons are sometimes kept as pets, but require special accommodations. Chinese water dragons have an excellent temperament, rarely bite, and make excellent pets -- provided one is willing to invest the extra effort in care. Water dragons are large diurnal arboreal agamid lizards in the genus Physignathus. There are two species, the Chinese Water Dragon, Physignathus cocincinus, and the Australian Water Dragon, Physignathus lesueurii.", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW6104O8J": "Hmmm I have lots of experience with mommy cats! Plz let her be! Leave her alone. Then after a couple days put her and the kitties in a comfy box or something. They will need their space ok. But keep checking on her to make all kittens are sucking. My last liiter FIVE out of SEVEN Kittens died because they woundnt eat for some reason so make sure they ear sucking on their mama. I f she's taking forever giving birth call a vet. She will be fine. Sorry for your bed lol. Opinion 2: You have asked this or similar questions so often that I cannot believe you have not received sufficient answers. I do wonder how many pregnant cats you have and if you will ever understand the importance of spay euter. good luck to your cats!", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R4IL4": "Follow this plan it works but you need to increase your daily activity.", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DBCUO": "A good site for this is http://www.allexperts.com ('arts and humanities' then 'painting') Send a photograph of the painting and a close-up of the signature. They are usually very helpful (and free).", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSK3GI": "HOLY FUCK BABH TOMY SMOL KITTEN VERY VERY SMOL PROTECT THIS KITTEN PROTECT TBIS GIGGLY SMOL PUNPKIN PUE KITTNE https://t.co/bax66xzErN", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2PTS7": "Getty Images Richard Nordquist Grammar  Composition Expert Share Pin Tweet Submit Stumble Post Share By Richard Nordquist The purpose of descriptive writing is to make our readers see, feel, and hear what we have seen, felt, and heard. Whether we're describing a person, a place, or a thing, our aim is to reveal a subject through vivid and carefully selected details. Each of the five paragraphs below responds, in its own way, to the guidelines in How to Write a Descriptive Paragraph. The writers (three of them students, two of them professional authors) have selected a belonging or a place that holds special meaning to them, identified that subject in a clear topic sentence, and then described it in detail while explaining its personal significance.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K3PYF": "could be a one off, if it never happens again , but unfortunately could be the beginning of epilepsy and he will need sedative type meds for life. the vet will keep you right, it is heartbreaking and very ,very distressing to witness a dog having a seizure-please rest assured the dog knows absolutely nothing about it. just the owners who cry and suffer the heartbreak. xx", "3TLFH2L6Y9ME8ZX7Q5JIA2PQE8V2TI": "Thanks again!July 28, 2010 at 4:49 PM nuttygardenersaid...Good Luck!", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U3EID": "Once your body is around 10-15 body fat, and you have a good base of ab muscle, it will start to show through. The lower your body fat and the more muscle on the abs, the more you will see them. Skinny people without abs probably don't have the amount of muscle necessary to show up. Everyone has those muscles, it is simply how little fat is covering them, and how big they are that determines if they show. Good luck.", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV483NS": "Yes, she did and it was expencive. Very expencive. There is rumor about her Nose Job(Rhinoplasty).", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNV1VE": "your depresed.... go see a doctor   it will only get worse without help", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63Z143": "Just got to find a box to pack them in now . I 've just been on zapper and got quite a few books it 's accepted - the ones worth the most were old photography text books and a book on the mini ( worth over 7 on its own ! ) Other ones accepted were a few autobiographies and fiction books from Stephen King to Terry Pratchett ( recent editions ) those these were often lower , some at 30p each .", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F01VW4": "Appearance. There are two major changes. The head of the penis (glans) gradually loses its purplish color, the result of reduced blood flow. And there is a slow loss of pubic hair. 'As testosterone wanes, the penis gradually reverts to its prepubertal, mostly hairless, state,' says Irwin Goldstein, MD, director of sexual medicine at Alvarado Hospital in San Diego and editor-in-chief of The Journal of Sexual Medicine. Penis Size.Weight gain is common as men grow older. As fat accumulates on the lower abdomen, the apparent size of the penis changes. 'A large prepubic fat pad makes the penile shaft look shorter,' says Ira Sharlip, MD, clinical professor of urology at the University of California, San Francisco. 'In some cases, abdominal fat all but buries the penis,' says Ronald Tamler, MD, PhD, co-director of the Men's Health Program at Mount Sinai Hospital in New York City.", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH6YWJ": "Please contact a specialist, that would be the best in your case", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06T965": "Have you ever read over a message you've sent or reviewed a paper you've submitted and realized you made some embarrassing and silly mistakes? Why do we only seem to notice when it's too late? These are some of those common errors you should look for (before you hit the send button)! Here's a tip: As you read over any draft of your writing, stop on any word that has an apostrophe and do a mental check. Are you using the right word?", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEMG2M": "color matching the stain on an antique table to a set of antique chairs. all the chairs were made of different woods which took the stain in all different manners. a big mess that we ended up solving by painting the chairs to cover the stain! you have to have a good sense of humor, and a good bottle of wine, when tackling decorating and remodelling projects, and luckily we've had more success stories than disasters so we keep trying our hand at different things! Ink spots and stains are a challenge. Keep repeating this process until the ink is gone. Remove Ballpoint Pen Ink Stains From Clothing 1. Dab the ink stain with a clean wet sponge or paper towel. Spray your ink stain with hair spray. Place the stained fabric between two clean paper towels. Apply a laundry pre-treatment stain remover 6. spray it lightly on the stain. Cover the stain with the towel, and press with the iron. Keep moving the towel to a clean area and repeating until the stain is gone.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK35YA": "Carbs are one of the reason fats exist, since they turn into sugar later or whatever they call it, so you have to decrease that, but do not stop it, it is the reason you become full, so have like fist size amount of rice in ur food etc... Meats are really good, you think stopping them will make you healthier, veges are good, but its good to have something from everything, it's the just the amount that you should be careful about, have desserts like twice or 3 times a week, decrease the carbs but if you want to stop it, then I don't know how you will survive haha If you plan to stop meats... Then indian food is whats best for you, most Hindu people are vege. They have amazing food, you know you will miss the meats, when you eat the food you always eat without them, but in indian food, you won't even remember there wasn't meat in the dish because of the spices they use, there's sooo much in them it tastes great. I have fat on legs you should seek exercises that burn body fats, like jo...", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5RK5R": "Two Volumes Books GOYA Biography Spanish Artist Painter Gudiol Spain SLIPCASE 2 http://t.co/u7egxcdBIL http://t.co/8svOgBPqrl", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI29W2Y": "You should visit the Covered California website (www.coveredca.org). Without knowing your income, I dont know whether or not you would qualify for a subsidy to help you with your premiums. Covered CA is a good place to start, however, to see what your options are. You can shop and choose a plan through Covered California even if your income is too high to qualify for a subsidy.", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XL9IW": "It could be a cyst especially if it comes and goes. You need to show it to a medical professional while it is there. Don't wait until it goes away and then seek answers. If you wait until it isn't there then it is very difficult to try and diagnosis something you can't see. As a medical provider I have had men and women seek information about a rash, bump etc that comes and goes. They wait until it isn't there and then want someone to asnwer their questions. Go while it is there and visible.", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEDG8O": "difficult to tell, especially with wisdom teeth. Teeth growing inside the mouth usually produce swollen gums, slightly sensitive to touch, but that would be relieved if something cool is placed against it (if it were a gum disease/inflamation, the cool/cold would probably make it hurt more). The pain wouldn't be constant, as sometimes they hurt more when they are growing 'inside' than when they are actually about to pop through (that could well happen when you chew on something and they just pop through with the last bit of pressure). the problem with wisdom teeth is that they frequently grow sideways (lying down inside the gum) or diagonally and impale into your molars. these cases require surgery to remove the wisdom tooth before it causes damage to your molar, gum and jaw. The dentist could only tell this by taking an x-ray. If the molar is growing sideways he can't even tell by simply looking into your mouth. If you are concerned (even a little bit) that this might be the case, ...", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV698383": "Even if cancer looks dormant ,its really not.Cancer gos though many mutation changes before its at a stage to spread.Sometimes it depends on what you eat.Certain chemicals from spices and herbs slow down the progress of the cancer mutation.When cancer reachs its final malingant stage it could spread within weeks.The parts that spread are also milingant too.Even if you destroy the primary cancer area during malingnacy there is a 65 that it has already spread to a secondary or third area of the body.", "3VQTAXTYN3JNWPCS9323GREWRSFBUK": "I dont think so unless it's something new. For sure hep b hep a more for traveling. I gave my sone both myself Iam a nurse.", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2UWKJ": "For opening play advice, I suggest the book that is entitled: Best Lessons of a Chess Coach. The second point is that you should study tactics. The book you need is a book called Art of Attack.", "3VI0PC2ZAYIZWNVWIDIC6IDZS9BXOY": "The height a person reaches as an adult depends on the genes they inherit from their parents as well as general health and nutrition during their years of growth.The child of short parents is more likely to be short themselves than the child of tall parents.There is a lot of variation brothers or sisters with the same parents will not all end up the same height and parents can, by chance, have a child who is unexpectedly tall or short in relation to the rest of the family. Illnesses or poor nutrition during childhood or being small or premature at birth may mean children do not reach their full potential adult height.The average height of the population has gradually increased over the centuries because children have been better nourished and have had fewer illnesses and infections. Normal growth The fastest period of growth is before birth, with the baby growing from almost zero to a length of about 50cm in", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL00BL6F": "Both are sort of transparent and will show black dots in them. What ye describing there doesn't really ring with any frog / toad spawn I'm at all familiar with. But, I hardly know all there is to be known about all the species out there. They are also great clean up crews for frog terrariums, but only the humid tropical ones, as they need to be kept moist. They eat the frog poop, any mold or decaying plant matter in the tank. These will not harm you or your frog/toad. Although they may travel or warm up in direct sunlight they need areas to hide nearby. Different species of frog and toad will require different things and live in different areas. Pond frogs (Rana): These guys will need a source of water nearby. What sort of frog/toad? Some are fully aquatic, some are semi aquatic, some are terrestrial. Basically, we need to know what species to tell you how to care for it.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNMLRA": "Can cell phones cause blindness ??? In an article published last week by the Daily Mail Australia, a Chinese man needed an emergency operation after spending hours texting his girlfriend in the dark. Extract from article: Could using your phone at night cause blindness? 26-year-old was diagnosed with the rare condition Retinal Detachment This can cause blindness if it is not treated promptly Scientists say cases are rising in young people  it usually affects those aged between 50 and 75  and could be linked to excessive phone use", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMJC88": "When a cat is about to have kittens, there is a certain smell, and other cats can smell this.", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2F0MV": "French Bulldog Puppy Tricks 12 wks old Brody Brixton https://t.co/27xIjI01rs via", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYW8EX": "I saw 'Chihuahua Breeder Help, please?' and your avatar and thought, oh no, we lost a good one. Then I read what you were asking... Why not go the site for the national breed club for chihuahua's and see what you can find. Sep 29, 2012 ... At present, only 2 of all dogs in the US ever end up dead at the ... to breed except purebred dog owners in good standing with the AKC ... People who breed their purebred dogs and do not participate in the ... You can always still get support from good breeders even if you don't get a puppy from them, that's what good breeders do :) I really reccommend it, why consider anything else when you can save a life? USA is supposed to be the Land of the Free. Dogs that are not spayed eutered, can have testicular cancer, and the females can get Pyometras(puss in the Uterus). This is another reason to neuter/spay, not just the overpopulation problem.", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6TBQR6": "Both bombs were set off over a thousand feet above each city, so the effects were much less than they would have been on the ground. There's no radiation problems in either city right now. Both cities have been rebuilt and are doing very well. The worse spots are those that were directly below the blast zone, and a circular area stretching out some miles. Not sure how many. I don't think radiation was a direct problem after the blast. But thousands of people within the blast zones had problems for many years after-wards. Many died from what they called ' A- bomb disease. AKA : leukemia . The best known was Sadako Sasaki who was an infant living about a mile away from the central blast area. She later died at the age of 12 from leukemia. There's a book about her called ' The Children of the Paper Cranes'. There's a Japanese myth that if you fold 1,000 paper cranes, a wish of yours will come true. Sadako only got up to some 650 before she died. Her classmates finished the remaining number for her.", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUKM1J": "LUNCH- KING PRAWN AGLIO OLIO- Garlic, Olive Oil  Chili tossed with King Prawns, Spinach, Spaghetti W/ Fresh Herbs  Sesame Bread Crumbs", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHAA0TV": "Well, sounds bad. Did you talk to your doctor already?", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK301U3B": "Depending on how thick'' you are thinking of, some amount of weight training would be advisable. It's the best way to increase muscle mass. Eat a bit more and exercise your leg muscles.", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHC791": "KJ, here are the options from the Edit menu:  Add Details Put Question to a Vote (when available) Extend Expiration Delete Question Email me new answers  The overlap is a known issue that we're working on. Sorry about the inconvenience.", "3RZS0FBRWK8TEPW26HZ4H5XF1WJPC5": "lymphoma: Healthscouter Lymphoma: Signs of Lymphoma and Symptoms of Lymphoma: Lymphoma Patient Advocate: http://t.co/7Iwo3luySQ", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSU4H4": "i don't think the cheese will do any harm, but the wrappers are worrisome. why don't you call the vet and ask him. it is better safe than sorry. horrorfan 67 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. horrorfan horrorfan Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65UKPF": "Any type of treatment requires that the patient keep up good daily care at home. The doctor may also suggest changing certain behaviors, such as quitting smoking, as a way to improve treatment outcome. Deep Cleaning (Scaling and Root Planing) The dentist, periodontist, or dental hygienist removes the plaque through a deep-cleaning method called scaling and root planing. Scaling means scraping off the tartar from above and below the gum line. Root planing gets rid of rough spots on the tooth root where the germs gather, and helps remove bacteria that contribute to the disease. In some cases a laser may be used to remove plaque and tartar. This procedure can result in less bleeding, swelling, and discomfort compared to traditional deep cleaning methods. Medications Medications may be used with treatment that includes scaling and root planning, but they cannot always take the place of surgery.", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL01OL3": "theres nothing you can really do other than the obveous eat healthy and exercise more the thing is your body cannot spot lose weight... its not like if you wanted to lose belly fat you could just do sit ups and your belly fat would dissapear, actualy doing this could make you fatter, beleive it or not because it will build muscle, your muscle will get bigger but your belly fat will remain on top of your muscle like a layer, or a blanket... this is where those stupid ads on tv are always wrong... ever buy one of those exercise machines you see on the tv? notice they all come with a meal plan and diet instructions.... even they know the machine wont work without a diet and cardio... once you start to lose weight normaly for the human body it will start with extremidies first... you will lose fat in your hands feet and face, then arms and legs, and chest and belly and buttocks unfortunetly belly fat is the last to go but it dosnt mean it will take long... althought it does go in that orde", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO80CA": "Step 1: Identify the text that you want to appear in the Table of Contents In your document, click within the first major heading that you want to appear in the Table of Contents. Apply the Heading 1 style to that paragraph. The easiest way to apply the Heading 1 style is to click the Style box on the Formatting toolbar and choose Heading 1.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3S7XAZ": "In 1966, the average height of a 15-year-old boy was 67.5 inches or almost 5'7' by 2002 the average height of a 15-year-old boy was 68.4 or almost 5'8'. Your weight is 150 lbs., or 68 kg. Your Results Your height is 93th percentile That means you are 93th in height compared to 100 kids your age and sex. Your weight is 81th percentile That means you are 81th in weight compared to 100 kids your age and sex. Your weight is in the healthy range for your height and age. The healthy weight range for your height and age is 117 to 172 pounds (53 to 78 kilograms). Your weight is in the healthy range for your height and age. The healthy weight range for your height and age is 106 to 150 pounds (48 to 68 kilograms). Your weight is 130 lbs., or 59 kg. Your weight is 85th percentile That means you are 85th in weight compared to 100 kids your age and sex. Your weight is in the healthy range for your height and age. The healthy weight range for your height and age is 105 to 154 pounds (48 to ...", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYZ8E0": "Thanks for any information . I 'm looking for people who are related to Thomas Clifton of TN , Wife was Estella Perrin . 2nd wife Name Nanny Marks . Children were Joe , Tennie , Mattie , half-sister Bertha , half-brothers Edgar , Woodrow , Odell , Floyd , Loyd . My father Roy Clifton is a son to to Joesph .", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4ES4MC": "How much pain is NORMAL after a cavity filling? I had four cavities filled yesterday on the left side of my mouth. Two on top, two on the botton. The one(s) on the top hurt so badly today I can barely open my mouth. I can't even begin to chew anything...even on the opposite side. Just moving my jaw causing terrible pain on the side of my face and up next to... show more I had four cavities filled yesterday on the left side of my mouth. Two on top, two on the botton. The one(s) on the top hurt so badly today I can barely open my mouth. I can't even begin to chew anything...even on the opposite side. Just moving my jaw causing terrible pain on the side of my face and up next to my eye. Is this normal? 5 following 7 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  This Site Might Help You. RE: How much pain is NORMAL after a cavity filling?", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFQYMQ": "I've had quite a few kittens. Don't worry, it's something they'll grow out of. They like to have something real time to play with. I've always found that wrapping my hand in a comforter and letting them play that way works as their claws aren't yet long enough to get past it. Also, try buying some toys, not only ones they can play with themselves, but ones you can play with them as well. Even if it's something like sting. They love to follow you around the house and catch it. Make sure you let them grab it sometimes, or they get very frusterated, and a cat scorned is not a happy thing to deal with P", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1M8B0": "I don't like Jasc that much, most people use Photoshop 7.0 (and if you hace a nice computer that runs it, Photoshop CS 1 or 2). Generally, this is what I do in Photoshop 7.0 (I don't know if it is the same in Jasc though):  1. Create New Layer over your photo/picture that you will be using, turn the New Layer into a 'Color' layer via the drop-down box on the Layer window. 2. Right-click the Lasso tool, and select Polygon Lasso tool (this is good for mouse users), and select the area you want colored - to get it selected you have to make a completed circle/whatever shape you're doing. 3. Pick your color, select Paint-Bucket (or brush if you're going to detail it), and dump into the selected area. Your image should be colored now  then all you do is save it as a High or Medium .jpeg (.jpg) and upload it somewhere :p  Like I said before I'm not sure if this works with Jasc though - you may find more help by searching for a Jasc Tutorial on how to do it... Good luck.", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA90X5NI": "1.) You will want a flat buckle collar, not a harness. Few huskies can be trusted off leash as recall training this breed can be exceedingly difficult. Sled dogs are often tethered to. Huskies that do manage to run away most often are never seen by the owner again. On that same note, one of my favorite summer activities with the huskies was biking down a paved bike path. Training one husky to ignore distractions is easy enough and can be done while leash training. 5.) Huskies shed excessively, and year round. I can't stress enough just how much these dogs shed. You know how a lot of dogs shed during the summer? Huskies shed like that all year, and blow the coat twice a year. If you want a husky, especially an indoor husky, get yourself a furminator brush and use it daily. ) 6.) Huskies have a very high prey drive. Never shave a husky (or any dog if you can avoid it) as it exposes the skin to sunburn. They also don't sweat, so exposing the skin really doesn't do anything to help them stay cool.", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKU1NY": "Hystrectomy???? but a bit harsh", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFQB4W": "Flea Repellent Pillows These pillows are for dogs.", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ842XKF": "Keep These 10 Foods in Your Fridge Want to Lose Weight ? Keep These 10 Foods in Your Fridge What You Need to Know to Avoid College Weight Gain POPSUGAR , the  1 independent media and technology company for women . Where more than 75 million women go for original , inspirational content that feeds their passions and interests .", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9ENHL8": "thanks Jake and Tim. Now I have to call my therapist and ask for an increase in my antidepressant meds.", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ2MGI": "Are you a guy or a girl????? If youre a guy- I can understand. If youre a girl- YOURE CRAZY!! there are so many girls out there dying to have boobs, when ur sitting over here complaing about not having any!! if theyre really huge, then do exercises with them, that will shrink them. But im telling you, youre CRAZYY.", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNQTYQ": "Easy does it,'time, whatever that is' will present an opportunity.", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEKG2K": "Leadership is a behavioural process, so the leader's actions are more important than their status or name. The leader must have good interpersonal skills, such as being able to effectively communicate your message and being able to show empathy and understanding towards others. Chelladurai's model focuses on 3 states of leader behaviour (Expectations, limits) Code of conduct and social norms in various contexts form the situational characteristics affecting leadership behaviour.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCEGVT": "You could have a variety of diagnoses. The best thing to do would be to see a doctor. Also to the person who said that if you are asking this you aren't autistic, people with autism quite often have average to above average IQs. They simply have a language delay and are unable to communicate. The Autistic Spectrum is broad and ranges from people who have severe autism and no ability to communicate, to people who have Asperger's who have difficulty communicating and relating to people but can function with little difficulty. Autism is usually diagnosed in childhood, but there are some rare cases of people who manage to slip through the cracks and are not diagnosed until adulthood. I actually have a family on my caseload where there is a daughter with Asperger's whose mother also has Asperger's and was not diagnosed properly until she was 25. Another thing people with Autism are often quite capable at communicating using a computer. If you don't believe me there is a woman who has tons o", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHTTXH": "Below are specific symptoms associated with common mental health disorders. These lists are very brief  there are many and varied symptoms that can occur depending on the disorder someone is experiencing and the severity of their illness. However, these should serve as a guide to the types of symptoms associated with many common forms of mental illness. Depression Clinical depression lasts for at least two weeks and affects a persons emotions, thinking, behavior and physical wellbeing.", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTPZSK1": "plz check these sites", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG548ZLK": "Evelyn Ray sounds nice to me... Evelyn May Evelyn is also nice alone. think about it, does she really need a middle name?", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61G89N": "Those all sound like an allergic reaction, or allergic symptoms. u can ask a docter for this.some creams are allergic also u should use makeup stuff of good quality.Allergic Dermatitis --------------------------------------. This is what occurs in atopy (also known as allergic inhalant dermatitis), and is suspected to occur in food allergy. Food Allergy They are caused by an allergic reaction. Premium dogs foods can contain these products. It is the allergens in this saliva that cause an allergic reaction to occur. Symptoms The most consistent symptom in pets with allergic skin disease is excessive itching. Dogs can chew so incessantly that they wear down their incisors. Other symptoms can include: The slight redness (erythema) to the face of this dog. This dog's skin is oily from chronic rubbing. They might exhibit the same or different symptoms. Diagnosis Since the symptoms of allergic skin disease mimic those of other skin diseases, a thorough approach is needed to differentiate them. Signalm", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYBZST": "Spectacular eyes, fabulous eyes, our eyes, my eyes and your eyes. Eye to eye, eye to eye. abrarproblems", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9H230": "yes, so the so called art in hollywood is inspired by the sexually charged world n reflects this philosophy.....", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M32PV7": "3  Epsom, England  horse racing, English Oaks. 3-7  Durham, England  cricket, England vs. Bangladesh, second test. 4  Epsom, England  horse racing, English Derby. 4-5  Arles, France  athletics, IAAF World Combined Events Challenge. 5  Madrid, Spain  triathlon, ITU World Cup. 13  Southampton, England  cricket, England vs. Australia 20/20. 14-18, York, England  horse racing, Royal Ascot. 16-19  Pinehurst, North Carolina  golf, U.S. Open. 16-19  Lumbres, France  golf, St. Omer Open. 19  Bristol, England  cricket, England vs. Australia, NatWest one-day triangular series. 21  Nottingham, England  England vs. Bangladesh, NatWest one-day triangular series. 23  Durham, England  cricket, England vs. Australia, NatWest one-day triangular series. 23-26  Paris  golf, Open de France. 24-July 2  Cartagena, Colombia  softball, XIIIth Central American and Caribbean softball championship for women. 26  Leeds, England  cricket, England vs. Bangladesh, NatWest one-day tria...", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBMPB1": "If you donate actual marrow, you will likely be under general anesthesia. Sometimes they will do an epidural instead, but to my understanding that is by donor request. You will be sore for a few days after, but can treat that with tylonal. However, most donations today are peripheral blood stem cells by aphersis. Its the same process as if you were to sell plasma, or even some Red Cross Donations. You are stuck with 2 needles connected to a aphersis machine. The first needle pulls your blood out, the machine seperates out the stem cells which are a type of white blood cell, then the rest of your blood goes through a warmer and back into your own body. The most pain with that is gaining the vienous access with the larger gauge needles. http://www.marrow.org is the National Marrow Donors Program for the US. It will tell you more about both proceedures. Or you can google for your country's marrow donation program", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNEJDRL": "If your pain suddenly gets worse, you should get to the ER to make sure this isnt the case.Good luck.QUESTION: Ovarian Cyst or something else?", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IK0BGK": "Vitamin D deficiency causes Rickets (as well as a possible inabitity of the body to utilise vitamin D). I think a lot of you guys are getting confused when you speak about vitimin C. A deficiency in Vitamin C leads to scurvy, not rickets.", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL04LO3": "hehe olefarte, I also smoked a pipe for about 6 months. I got to where I didn't like the taste at all anymore. I do like the smell though.", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G467P": "Please see ideal body weight calculators below. The following healthy living recommendations will help you if youre trying to lose weight, tone up your muscles, have aspirations of building lean muscle mass, are attempting to get a wash board stomach, or just want to feel better:  1) Burn more calories then you're consuming everyday and measure your results using the following formula: Calories Consumed minus Basal Metabolic Rate (BMR) minus Physical Activity minus the Thermic Effect of Food (TEF). A website that explains this formula in more detail and will help you determine how many calories you need to reach or maintain a certain weight is at http://www.primusweb.com/fitnesspartner/library/weight/calsburned.htm  Get a diet and fitness calculator that you can put on your computer or cell phone. This will allow you to easily calculate the above formula, set goals, log your daily calorie consumption, and register your physical activities.", "3NSM4HLQNRSI8270BCFO1FC6A79QQ5": "A 21 year old losing an erection simply from putting on a condom is purely psychological, so keep practicing with a cooperative partner until you solve this issue. Be 'creative' in your sexual experiments and I am sure things will improve. Masturbation does not cause this problem. And...I agree. You should not be having sex without a condom.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNNR8U": "Newly hatched brine shrimp is best for these but crushed food you will get away with, they will need a better diet than crushed food to make them grow though.Good luck.Jewelled  Separate the frys into another tank.", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP5JG9": "Magic is an important part of most fantasy stories. Once you've set up the world you want to write in, it's time to start thinking about its inhabitants . How to Write a Fantasy Story: From the real world into fantasy...Do you. You can make up your own magical species, or use ones borrowed from folklore, or even not have any at all. Write. Just write. When you're finished and ready to start editing, create a checklist to work from: Is your plot feasible, at least according to the rules you've set up? Do you explain things enough to create willing suspension of disbelief? Is your world and the rules it's based upon consistent? Are your fantasy characters identifiable, well-described and interesting? Is your theme subtle but well-developed? Don't preach, and don't moralize. Give it a: Exposition Inciting Incident/Conflict Rising Action donot try to use words that you are not sure of the meaning Climax (This is especially important) Falling Action Denouement But not necessarily in that order!", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHEB7E": "Most Helpful Answer i was on depo for 3 years and it can take up to a year for everything to go back to normal , i wouldnt worry its very common to have or not have your period, it takes time for your body to get back to normal i myself would have it for 2 weeks and then nothing for 2 months then about 13months after it became normal and 17 months after i got prego with my son , so dont worry ok :) fyi if your trying to have a baby and thats the reason for getting off same rule applys about a year after is when you most likely will begin to ovulate again , check with a opk if thats what ur doing itll help you know even of your periods arent normal yet weither or not your droppping eggs :) hope this helps", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9UV74": "I'll see it on my office pc..", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRKDMX": "You could be having a sever allergic reaction to something, even if you have never been known to be allergic to anything before. Even foods can do this. Central nervous system Numbness and tingling Definition: Numbness and tingling are abnormal sensations that can occur anywhere in your body, but are often felt in your fingers, hands, feet, arms, or legs. Low levels of vitamins will be treated with vitamin supplements. You are urinating. Tests may include: Blood tests such as CBC , electrolytes, thyroid function tests, and vitamin levels Imaging studies like a CT scan of the head , CT scan of the spine , MRI of the head , or MRI of the spine Electromyography and nerve conduction studies to measure how your muscles respond to nerve stimulation X-ray of the affected area Lumbar puncture to rule out central nervous system disorders Ultrasound of neck vessels to determine your risk for TIA or stroke Vascular ultrasound and a cold stimulation test may be done to check for Raynaud's phenomenon", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSG9DX": "Don't worry about it. I'm 19 and I just got my first actual bf. It'll happen when you find someone good for you.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8XE53": "My advice, your health is 1 above all else.Take care of yourself and try B12 or B50 after you finish the meds.Good luck.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61IPNRH": "Fluker's Juvenile Bearded Dragon Food Buffet , Cricket Food, CALCIUM  MEALWORMS http://t.co jX2kYX1ge via FREESHIPPING!", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54IEB3": "I started taking 500mg Cipro 2x daily yesterday, so it has not been 48 hours yet. Fever gone, but the throbbing ear pain has turned into a sometimes sudden stabbing pain,  more popping. I take that as the fluid moving, but when will it clear up so I can hear clearly again? Should I take a decongestant in addition to absorb it more?", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9284R": "GRILLED PEANUT BUTTER  BANANA SANDWICH INGREDIENTS: cooking spray 2 tablespoons peanut butter 2 slices whole... http://t.co/yVIDnk7gFn", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWXA3A9": "If you are planning to train workers for your OWN business, then you'll have a tough time finding grants.", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z7FK7": "Can't be determined on the info you provided. However, go to the site listed below, click on the appropriate link (children and teens or adult), enter the required information and it will tell exactly where you stand:http://www.cdc.gov ccdphp/dnpa/bmi/index.htm", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6X0XD": "What is BMI? BMI is a person's weight in kilograms divided by the square of height in meters. BMI does not measure body fat directly, but research has shown that BMI ... Jul 25, 2014?? Your first step to find out if you are at a healthy weight is to find out what your BMI, or body mass index, is and what your waist size is. Mar 01, 2004?? For the first time since World War II, a national survey has sized up the average American body, not just by weight and height or even the standard chest ... The body fat percentage of a human or other living being is the total mass of fat divided by total body mass body fat includes essential body fat and storage body fat. Offers conversion tools for length, volume, temperature, astronomical, clothing sizes, computer bytes, cooking measurements, time zones, density, energy, finance ... Many people ask what is the perfect body measurement for women? Just because everyone is different does not mean there is no perfect body measurement for women.", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO23WLQ": "Is red looks like velvet patch on glans, slightly larger than first day. Woke up and it was there had never been before. Not sexually active in very long time. Never had rash there before now I'm concerned. I read cancer can be like that but I am circumcised reducing that risk but still looks like that kind of rash saw online. I have no way to a doctor until late next month. Could it be something very mild and what do I do next 4 weeks? Posted by Optional on 20/01/2015 at 10:42 my penis has extra skin covering the head of my penis also it has layers of skin on skin how can I get this fix help plz? Posted by Optional on 15/01/2015 at 08:32 A lot of penis problems are caused by dry skin. Using a lotion designed for the penis, like a penis health cream, is a good way to go if you want to prevent those problems. Shea butter and vitamin E are quality ingredients.", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC7491L4Q": "Active women seem to be better prepared for labor and delivery and recover more quickly . Fit women have an easier time getting back to a healthy weight after delivery . Staying active can protect your emotional health . Pregnant women who exercise seem to have better self-esteem and a lower risk of depression and anxiety .", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA9569": "they are probably still alive!! mother cats tend to take there kittens to a more private area where ppl cant find them!! when my cat had her kittens she did that!", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2QAHL": "Next time, when you ask her, just say, 'I'd like to take you out. If you're interested, let me what works for you.' This way, she can give you a day, on the spot, or she can say she needs to check and will get back to you. I made the mistake of playing this when there was a cat asleep in some long grass once, the results were very exciting. For months afterwards my elderly dog would toddle to the same spot with a hopeful look. Try a google search for scent games. Get your Basset to use it's nose to follow the trail of scent and to find the toy. Reward and give praise! This is a good way, and as close to 'natural' way of using what this breed was bred to do...track and flush out rabbits. The firemen let out rodents, cats, and other animals for the hound to chase after. The hound kills all of the animals one by one by injecting them with the needle that comes out of it.", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKT1NX": "Pomsky pros and cons for those owning a pomsky, pomsky is a good dog and cute for kids. Answer for ever wondered for puppies. Pomsky Pros and Cons. Each breed available on the market today comes with pros and cons, and crossbreeds are not an exception to this rule. If you care for the safety ... im looking into getting either a Pomsky or a German Shepherd. please help i need to know the pros and cons of both! thanks! Cookie is our blue-eyed Pomsky puppy mix (Pomeranian Husky - mom was 100 husky, dad was 100 Pomeranian). The first few seconds are us on our way to meet ...  Neutering your pomsky means he wont feel the need to mark his territory as much and in return he will become better behaved. 0 chance of developing ... pomsky pros and cons Pomsky pros and cons for those owning a pomsky, pomsky is a good dog and cute for kids. Answer for ever wondered for puppies. Pomsky Pros and Cons. What are the Pros and Cons of owning a Pomsky? - Yahoo! Answers.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK3Y53": "the highest approval rating he received was 47 (with a disapproval rating of 50) during the january 22 to 25 period conducted by Cook/RT Strategies. the worst rating he received so far was a 33 approval rating and a 57 disapproval rating conducted by Pew during the March 8 to 12 period, and a 60 disapproval rating (and a 37 approval rating) during the march 6-8 period conducted by AP-Ipsos and march 10-12 conducted by CNN/USA Today/Gallup (36 approval rating). you can see more trends at the pollingreport.com site.", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PES8HH": "log onto morgellons.org to compare symptoms you ll need to purchase a 30x handheld lighted microscope. when you get the scope ( less than 30 bucks) look at your skin with it to see if you can detect any thread like fibers in your skin . If you do , take that with thew case definition from morgellons.org to your doctor and ask to be put on 1000mg of tetracycline a day ( take a supplement called probiotics 2x a day ) doctors know nothing about this and nothing takes it away but the tetracycline will keep the crawlies at bay Ive been on it for a year a a half after countless doctors labeled me crazy for 5 years . feel better", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPH9AT": "6. french missionaries come to Indo China. 1 Ho Chi Minh leads rebellion against the japanese/French. 2. the french pullout of Vietnam. 8. The Geneva Accords temporarily divide Vietnam. 10. Pro-commuist guerrillas called Vietcong begin a campgain... 3 president JFK sends military advisors 5. North Vietnam gunboats fire on U.S. destroyers 9. Tet offensive. 4. Nixon orders mining of Haipphong harbor. 7. Nixon withdraws troops", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6LJKB": "At the moment, I'm going to the gym 3 times a week. I also eating pretty healthily, but I keep having moments where I eat a lot of bread, a sugary juice drink or a chocolate chip muffin.. :/ I also don't like chicken, so I need something of the same nutritional value for my dinner! What would you suggest? Should I be doing ab exercises everyday? And what should I strictly NOT eat to help the loss of stomach fat? Please help! :D", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1UR4Q": " What does MORNING WOOD mean? This could be the only web page dedicated to explaining the meaning of MORNING WOOD (MORNING WOOD acronym/abbreviation/slang word). Ever wondered what MORNING WOOD means? Or any of the other 9092 slang words, abbreviations and acronyms listed here at Internet Slang ? Your resource for web acronyms, web abbreviations and netspeak. MORNING WOOD is 'Erection on waking'  MORNING WOOD Definition / MORNING WOOD Means The definition of MORNING WOOD is 'Erection on waking'  The Meaning of MORNING WOOD MORNING WOOD means 'Erection on waking'  YW ! What does MORNING WOOD mean? MORNING WOOD is an acronym, abbreviation or slang word that is explained above where the MORNING WOOD definition is given. ", "3S1L4CQSFX3TUXAA8078ZGTNZNCFAR": "micro-blog has the mighty waves  yesterday afternoon to the evening, beat all the changes happened chaussure de foot pas cher .A wounded physician colleagues describe it suddenly micro-blog is widely transmitted, because the micro-blog referred patients in conflict had 'declared that my dad was so director', this detail causes netizen heat to discuss.But the Post reporter last night to verify the discovery hollister online shop , patients before conflict seems to drink wine, the mood is not stable, the father is not 'director' micro-blog, described in detail is not accurate. requires a signature conflict Yao Mou asks immediately.quot abercrombie france I said needle can, but patients must be signed, abercrombie the United States in 5 years old boy Aidan? Last year Reed is diagnosed with leukemia.In order to raise medical treatment cost, through the Internet to sell their paintings of several thousand hollister , with indomitable perseverance fight.", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFTB3A": "Does it feel tender when you touch near your belly button? Here is a site (below) which tells about appendicitis and how it is often not diagnosed:  If you are still having symptoms and symptoms described at this site, call your doctor or have someone take you to the emergency room. Here are symptoms from the site below: Symptoms  The symptoms of appendicitis vary. It can be hard to diagnose appendicitis in young children, the elderly, and women of childbearing age. Typically, the first symptom is pain around your belly button. (See: Abdominal pain) The pain may be vague at first, but becomes increasingly sharp and severe. You may have reduced appetite, nausea, vomiting, and a low-grade fever. As the inflammation in the appendix increases, the pain tends to move into your right lower abdomen and focuses directly above the appendix at a place called McBurney's point. If your appendix ruptures, the pain may lessen briefly and you may feel better.", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSE9DV": "there are lots of possibilities and remedies according to the situation , ie washing your cat 's hard to reach areas , change her diet , use a good cat dandruff shampoo , groom her regularly , etc . My vet told me that the corn in my black cat 's food could be drying out her skin , causing her to have dandruff .", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPD0RI": "Also, you don't want to be responsible for a nuclear disaster! lol!", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01JLQ8": "It's supposed to be the Protein in it. I know how you feel I love peanut butter, there is nothing better. The peanut butter may have the same calories as your usual diet but doesn't have all the components required to keep you healthy.", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCWFTB": "Gunpowder, Treason amp Plot Gunpowder, Treason  Plot is a 2004 BBC miniseries loosely based upon the lives of Mary, Queen of Scots, and her son James I of England. The writer Jimmy McGovern tells the story behind the Gunpowder Plot in two parts, each centred on one of the monarchs. Directed by Gillies MacKinnon and filmed in Romania with a key Scottish crew, the first film dramatizes the relationship between Mary, Queen of Scots, played by French actress Clmence Posy, and her third husband, James Hepburn, 4th Earl of Bothwell played by Kevin McKidd.", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHUSRV": "The word Jew (Hebrew: ????? transliterated: Yehudi) is used in many ways, but generally refers to a follower of Judaism, a child of a Jewish mother, or someone of Jewish descent with a connection to Jewish culture or ethnicity and often a combination of these attributesMost Jews regard themselves as a people, members of a nation, descended from the ancient Israelites and converts who joined their religion at various times and placesThe Hebrew name Yehudi (plural Yehudim) came into being when the Kingdom of Israel was split between the northern Kingdom of Israel and the southern Kingdom of Judah", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE00SJ3": "Hi Shinnako,   The itching is due to inflammation due to candida (yeast). If you want it to subside I would recommend that you change your diet for a limited time until this issue clears up. First, know that the yeast infection is caused by candida overgrowth. This happens when your immune system is not functioning at it's optimal level which is most likely due to your diet. For now I would recommend you do the following:   1. Choose cotton underwear and do not wear tight trousers (Moulds love warm, dark spaces with limited airflow). 2. Avoid damp environments where airborne moulds are ever-present. 3. Exercise everyday to relieve stress. Aerobic exercise is especially useful in treating candida as Candida and other fungi do not thrive in a high-oxygen environment. Also, fresh air and regular exercise have a positive effect on immunity. 4. Cut all foods containing yeast including bread, pizza, crackers, pastries, muffins, mushrooms and ferments like soy sauce, cheese, tomato paste", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1JB80": "It works too.So good luck.Hope it helps you.", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5UMO6": "Cirrhosis of the liver is linked closely to liver cancer. Some one with cirrhosis is 40 times as likely to get liver cancer as some one who has never had cirrhosis. Cirrhosis commonly results from alcohol abuse.", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6VQ66": "hahaha, you still got some months to thicken up. Why you playing idk when i get my next shot. I needa find that card.", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EDRU8": "For opening play advice, I suggest the book that is entitled: Best Lessons of a Chess Coach. The book you need is a book called Art of Attack. You can buy it on Amazon.com at the specific link of: http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/1857444000/102-4249447-7197725?vglancen283155 For the Endgame, you should get a book called basic Endgame Strategy. The website link to buy is: http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0940685817/qid1149698230/sr2-2/refpdbbsb22/102-4249447-7197725?sbooksvglancen283155 Feel free to e-mail me if you can't find it. I am glad to help! Im sorry I cannot answer that specific question in finding a spell book on tarot in India, or Mumbai, but I can tell you that there is a wonderful informative book on creating your own Tarot Spells! No other book like it! It has helped my pain enourmously. I would either buy or acquire the book written by Dr. Amand and read it thouroughly. Do not take the guai without reading the book first. Look into it . YOU won't regret ...", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U516O": "try greenes book shop in dublin - http://www.greenesbookshop.com/ My folks own a bookshop so I know that the type you thing you're after is the sort of thing that got binned years ago. Textbooks don't stay in circulation for long but greenes tend to specialise in rare books and might know of somewhere that can help you out if they cant. The Black Book is a complete pizza marketing course, not just a book.", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179E5FE": "My vagina is itchy and there are like lines in the raw parts , one of them started bleeding today . I 'm only 12 and it really hurts but I 'm scared to tell anyone . I 'd there anything that will help ? Hi I have been using tampons for 6 years now but recently I have been experiencing pain every time I insert or remove a tampon .", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKUUV8": "This sort of thing is actually much more common than you might think. Most irregular periods are not anything to worry about. Missed periods, too frequent periods, spotting, light periods, or bouts of heavy clotting and bleeding are usually caused by an underlying hormonal imbalance that is easily treated. Many factors can contribute to such irregularities. Check here for more information. http://www.womentowomen.com/menstruation... http://teenadvice.about.com/od/yourbody/... http://womenshealth.about.com/cs/menstru... http://www.beinggirl.com/article/my-period/ http://allwomenstalk.com/10-most-frequent-questions-about-periods-answers-for-teens/", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08J8TN": "Advantages Disadvantages for long-term for long-term colonization colonization SpainFranceEngland", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFT1DWR": "Traditionally the history of the concept of relation begins with Aristotle and his concept of relative terms. In 'Metaphysics' he states: 'Things are called relative as the double to the half... as that which can act to that which can be acted upon... and as the knowable to knowledge'. It has been argued that the content of these three types can be traced back to the Eleatic Dilemmas, a series of puzzles through which the world can be explained in totally opposite ways, for example things can be both one and many, both moving and stationary and both like and unlike one another.", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VTCXH": "There is a 'statute of limitations' wherein you have to file a law suit within a certain time limit... and when that time runs out you cannot file the law suit... and with each action the statute of limitation is different... for murder... there is no statute of limitation... that can be prosecuted even 50 years after the fact... but slander or libel (both law suits that are very difficult to win) will have short terms of statute of limitations... you will have to check with an attorney... go to one who will give you a free consultation... look in the Yellow Pages... but I don't think you have much of a case... I use to work in a Law School... for years... as a secretary... Good Luck!", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606RN7E": "see a doctor. unexplained bruising i have read somewhere is the sign of kiddney issues http://health.yahoo.com/ency/healthwise/aa65427/aa6543620yltAhV41fG4.w2PX2jtPmk0NTbxurcF  I have no idea -- not a doctor -- but will google -- TeenHealthFX - Answers - Blotchy Red FaceYour skin can appear red and blotchy for many reasons.", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGN0XHD": "u didnt even tell us anything how could we even answer u my gf had her last period on dec.7.08 and she is irregular so she is usually a week or so late but she never got it for november , but she took three pregnancy tests two said negative in the begining and one said positive then she went to the dr and got a blood test which was yet again negative , but now she has been having a weird period for three days now and its not a normal one , she says usually her tampon is full but this time its only partially covered and its alot lighter then usual she says , i was wondering tho how pink is implantaion bleeding usually and if there is n e way of definitively telling whether its her menstrual cycle or implantaion she has also been throwing up , headaches , nausea all day , really bad cramps , and really really really mooddy which she says isnt normal for her but need to know if there is n e way a light period could possibly look like implantaion bleeding or vice versa , sorry for running on , , jus", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEBLGE": "It's totally normal, I am on nights too but if I miss them for a day for some reason, they get really tight and it really sucks. They adjust after a couple nights. But if you want to soothe into wait 5 hours one day and then move it to 6 or 7, and so on, you don't really have to worying about the tightness, your teeth just aren't used to not have the retainer around them so they move slightly.", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6U6BA": "The site below will give you all the info you need on cancer, it is must reading to find out about Chemo and what to expect. Perhaps lymphoma could be one of them. I do not know if your son has lymphoma.", "3JY0Q5X05J40IOJ85K50DN42YXOGG2": "You are not the only one to slip but dont beat yourself up just try again. Well now its been about 3 months. I felt good after 4 quit days too. Get some stuffed animals to throw the usually dont break anything! Chocolate Oatmeal Pie Yield: 8 servings 1 1/2 c Flour 1 1/2 ts Sugar 3/4 ts Salt 1/2 c Cooking oil 2 tb Milk 3 Eggs 1 c Sugar 1 c Light corn syrup 2 tb Butter or margarine melted 1 ts Vanilla 1/4 ts Salt 1/2 c Flaked coconut 1/2 c Rolled oats 1/2 c Semisweet chocolate chips 1. For the crust, in a 9' pie plate, combine flour, 1 1/2 t sugar  3/4 t salt. I dont know if this is the best recipe for angel food cake but this is one that Ive made recently and it tastes great. Place 3/4 cup sugar in a small bowl. Add remaining 3/4 cup sugar, 2 tablespoons at a time, beating until stiff peaks form. Sift flour mixture over egg white mixture, 1/4 cup at a time fold in after each addition.", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF9YO9": "Baytril has to be given because working around the teeth and gums will cause bleeding and infection to get into the blood. The Baytril was a precaution to prevent infection. Guinea pigs normal life span is any where from 4-6 years... so yours was considered 'older' and may simply could not handle the stress of surgery and his organs shut down. It was not the vets fault... they told you of the risks.", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O29VXZ": "The clerk should be fired. LGBT equality CNN", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8NWB1": "If you don't meet your quota then the Whey does nothing.If you met your quota you got there easier using Whey for however many grams....THAT'S how it works.", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE5X5S": "besides, i don't have testicles, i neither have the rest. and i masturbate every day. So your argument is invalid.", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SWH3U": "North Carolina Highway 59 is an urban route southwest of Fayetteville. NC 59 begins at Interstate 95 (Exit 41) and proceeds north from there intersecting U.S. Route 301 shortly thereafter at a partial cloverleaf interchange. NC 59 continues north entering the Town of Hope Mills.", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLQVR5": "The code was written on a 7 feet tall black diorite stone with a finger shape.", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRTUO2": "Don't worry about it. the worst thing that can happen is a ticket. if you have your dog under control i don't see any problem walking by you with him off the lease. whoever thinks differently has a stick up there you know what!", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YII5TI": "Not sure I follow his point about being the last TJ HOFer. Explanation?", "3TKXBROM5T8O5HF43EQ6VC9Y521IJ4": "First of all even though your on the pill your supposed to have a regular period. Have a look at this website for information: http://www.nhs.uk/conditions/rectal-bleeding/Pages/Introduction.aspx Secondly Rectal bleeding (bleeding from the bottom) may be caused by a swollen blood vessel or a small tear around the anus, but it can have a more serious cause and should never be ignored. Both of these are very common problems, but you should not assume they are the cause of your rectal bleeding. In general, bright-red blood means the bleeding has come from somewhere near your anus. If the blood is darker in colour and sticky, the bleeding. Is it bowel cancer? Many people with rectal bleeding worry they may have bowel cancer. Anal fissure An anal fissure is a small tear in the skin of the anus, which can be painful as the skin is very sensitive. Cancer of the rectum Cancer of the rectum is a type of bowel cancer that usually affects older people, but can only be ruled out after seeing your GP.", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFNWTR": "I read your story and it was very good, although the grammar needed alittle work as well as some spelling. I turn off my alarm and go back to sleep. Usually for my free day I rode my horse Star. He follows me calling my name. I get a notebook to write down my thoughts. How did he know my name? As I finish the last one Jena walks in. How do you know my name? I ask him. Wait! Whats your name.? I call after him. They only turn yellow when I have a lot of emotion. I live with my Dad. My dad left my mom right before second grade. Me too only its my mom not my dad. Why did I. I consider him my friend but nothing else. Yeah, his name is TJ. Do you think he would want to met my friend Jena? I think he would. I am fifteen. I say. I am fifteen but, I pause for dramatic effect. After breakfast I go up to my room. When I get there, there is a package on my bed. So what do you want to do first? First I want you to tell me as much as you can about this. 15 minutes ago - 3 days left to answe", "3RQVKZ7ZRKHRA100D2GH56X8PB2729": "your abs depend on body fat  i can usually calculate my bf  by seeing how my stomach looks. you can be the most unfit anorexic person in the world but if your bf is low youll have abs. i live in the projects and all the little skinny black kids have abs and there skinny as hell they dont workout they just have low bf . everyone is born with abs, fat covers them up the only thing situps do is make your ab muscle bigger which means the bigger the muscle the easier it will be to see, but building muscle takes a long time. usually ppl do cardio to burn the fat, thats when you see abs. this is how i calculate my bf  without doin nothin specail 14-17 bf is like average not to fat but you cant see abs or no sign of abs either. 12bf you should at least see some sign of abs 10-11 you should see most abs when flexing really hard, theyre not always out so if you can see alot of them like a 4 pack while flexing. but i can see 4 pack real good when flexing and i never do situps or nothing for abs", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMQ8UE": "French Montana ordered to pay 2 million in divorce settlement? The fuck he gon get that money from?", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZJTDH": "I don't know how common it is. TV's Dr. 90210, Dr. Rey, has a website with info and pictures. I also realize how bad you dont want to tell your mom.", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMYAE5": "November 7th: The greatest event in human history, the Bolshevik revolution, occurred in 1917. TodayinLaborHistory", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XNI97": "That is a wonderful idea for a person with seizures. The dog will alert the person that they are about to have a seizure. My dog has seizures too.", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B03K68": "rock  roll will grow old dubstep will grow old jazz will grow old trap will grow old hip hop will grow old core will grow old metal will ne", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ1WA5": "swollen lymph nodes in the neck, groin, collar bone, or armpit. If you are tired more often. constipation, night sweats, fevers, or low grade fevers are all the symptoms I know of", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R366E9": "I hate to say it, but your dad is kind of a jackass. I don't think there is even any surgery for hips. Talk to your mom and tell her how your dad's comment has you feeling down, she should have a good talking to with him. That is ridiculous for a father to say to a daughter. Now as to your body, you are still very young and those characteristics develop over time. You will experience a lot of growth around 16-18 but you won't really finish filling out until even your 30s, that is when your hips will really widen up. As people age their bodies change. At your age, you are going to be smaller, and lighter, it is how human biology works. You can increase your weight in a healthy manner by athletic activities, things like sprinting, track, rowing, and many others will help. Weight lifting is also a good idea, don't get discouraged by seeing pictures of American female bodybuilders, that is a result of steroid abuse. Instead, Brazilian female weight lifters are usually a better exam", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT7BRC": "There is something out there, but as to the full extent, that is anyone's guess", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHVRSV": "Don't compare yourself with someone else's version of happy or thin. Accepting yourself burns the most calories.", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBLPB0": "Im about 20 pounds underweight is that bad? hi im 20 years old and im about 5'7 and i weigh 105 is that bad and how? i dont try to loose weight this is my normal weight Follow 2 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Best Answer: i mean, it is kinda bad because you are more prone to disease and such and have a lower ammune system. But some people like me and you are naturally skinny. I would try to increase your carb intake, so that you are at a healthier weight. Source(s): im 16, 5'2'' and 100 pounds me  Wow, im 105 pounds and im almost 13, I would gain weight...like 17-20-25 pounds. 5 years ago 0 Thumbs up 0 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Add your answer Im about 20 pounds underweight is that bad? hi im 20 years old and im about 5'7 and i weigh 105 is that bad and how?", "3HEA4ZVWVDK4MU547S3I5TMOIF055V": "Subjects to choose from: 1st degree regular studies (Bachelors degree) Specialization proposed for 2010/2011 Academic Year: 1st degree weekend studies (Bachelors degree, 3-year studies) Specializations offered in 2010/2011 Academic Year: 2nd degree regular studies (Masters degree, 2-year studies) Specializations offered in 2010/2011 Academic Year: 2nd degree weekend studies (Masters degree, 2-year studies) Specialization proposed for 2010/2011 Academic Year: Regular uniform Masters degree studies (5-year studies) Specializations offered in 2010/2011 Academic Year: 1st degree regular studies (Bachelors degree, 3-year studies) 1st degree weekend studies (Bachelors degree, 3-year studies) The following specializations will be offered at Social Work: Wy?sza Szko?a Biznesu  National-Louis University was given an award by the Polish Prime Minister for the best social initiative of the 1990s. Krzysztof Paw?owski, WSB-NLU founder, was awarded the title of an Entre...", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734RIT8": "So white father/mother and black father/mother or black relative in the ... As a black man from Africa, I can safely say the only black person in .... of two race is great, it doesnt matter if is a mix of chinese and indian or arab and nigerian... I had my mother tested and she came back with it as well and so did my sister and her daughter. ... having black ancestry dont make you black .... Plus, it's got a lot to do with 'context', if you're born into a '... Jul 10, 2015 ... When asked if they identify as ??estizo,?? ??ulatto?? or some other mixed-race combination, one-third of U.S. Hispanics say they do. ... to mind a biracial experience of having one parent black and another white, or perhaps .... This is pretty new to me and I am just lost on where to start or if it is worth it. ..... It also explains how two white parents can have a ??oloured?? child, as in the case ...", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT81FR": "sooooooo sweet! I'm a devilish angelfish but damn those sharks! Thank you, beautiful Jade!", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW61068O5": "I think what you and your husband are trying to do is a beautiful thing but I don't think you thought of the bigger picture. One child may be a hand full....Two toddlers is just plain suicide. Good Luck World Wide Suicide by Pearl Jam I felt the earth on Monday. Saw his face in a corner picture. It's a worldwide suicide. It's a worldwide suicide. Thought becomes numb and naive. It's the same everyday and the wave won't break Tell you to pray, while the devil's on their shoulder Laying claim to the take our soldiers save Does not equate, and the truth's already out there The whole world,... world over. It's a worldwide suicide. It's a worldwide suicide. It's a worldwide suicide. It's a worldwide suicide. Rap superstar 50 Cent today reissues his six-time platinum release, 'The Massacre.' The album is available on the Aftermath/Shady/Interscope label. 50 Cent has also just wrapped production on his motion picture debut, 'Get Rich or Die Tryin',' directed by Jim Sheridan.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AKCAD": "Muscle strains occur when a muscle is stretched beyond its limit. This can take 2 weeks to 3 months to heal based on injury. backinthegame", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BJ95Q": "He/she can only tell your mom if there is something wrong that will cause your health to deteriorate or you plan on harming yourself. Asking your doctor about your body and what you can do can be held private and mom will never know. Peace. -I questioned my own morals for the sake of how to raise my daughter -Became more open-minded to people that are less fortunate or in the same position as me. Obviously, before i became pregnant, teen mom's were shameful to me. But that's just my mom and my observations. Really my mom can be mean, in the I care more about how people think about me as a mom then you, kind of way. But again that's my mom. ...... about when I tell them about the quivering my labia does when my period starts (weird!). .... so self- concious about my developing body and when I asked my mum?...", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW941N4U": "Please help . Wow , this is so crazy . I was actually researching what the purple bruise like things on my upper thigh were and your post totally amazed me . The days prior to noticing the bruises , I too , experienced unbearable itching in my back , legs , arms , it seemed like almost everywhere .", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63X141": "Analysis of the Personality of Adolph Hitler Analysis of the Personality of Adolph Hitler: With Predictions of His Future Behavior and Suggestions for Dealing with Him Now and After Germany's Surrender was a report prepared by Henry A. Murray for the United States Office of Strategic Services during World War II. It was one of two psychoanalytic reports prepared for the OSS on Nazi Germany leader Adolf Hitler the other was 'A Psychological Analysis of Adolph Hitler: His Life and Legend' (later published in book form under the title 'The Mind of Adolf Hitler'). Murray's report is dated October 1943.", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA3PO3": "The Nave and Sentimental Lover The Nave and Sentimental Lover is John le Carr's sixth novel and his only non-genre novel. The story has autobiographical elements, as it is based on the author's relationship with James and Susan Kennaway following the breakdown of le Carr's first marriage. The novel was published in the same year as his divorce.", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV699384": "Sections 66 is subject to Section 28 of the 1999 Constitution of Nigeria. has the right to Dual citizenship.", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONZHZV": "Phobophobia shares the symptoms of many other anxiety disorders, more specifically panic attacks and generalized anxiety disorder: Generalized anxiety disorder is when our minds are troubled about some uncertain event, or in other words, when we feel threatened, although the source of the threat might not be obvious to us. It is a disorder when it happens frequently and disables to do some of our daily activities. Generalized anxiety disorder always comes before phobophobia, and of its symptoms are listed below: The main problem with this disorder is that we do not know what we are troubled about, which may lead to our desire to escape.", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XP086": "I have Borderline too, and this and Bipolar disorder have been shown to have a hereditary element that can make you more likely to develop these conditions. It's not a definite, more of a 50 genetic influence and 50 how that child is raised, if it goes through any trauma, if it's bullied, if it has other psych issues. Eating disorders aren't technically hereditary as there isn't any pre-disposition to it just because a parent suffers. However if a child grows up around someone with an eating disorder it can have a huge effect or no effect again depending on the mental and emotional state of the child and whether there are any other disorders or environmental factors to continue. A child with an ED parent or relative who doesn't get help is more likely to develop an eating disorder but a lot of children who grow up knowing about ED's because of their parents it actually has a positive impact on them if the parent is in recovery because parents teach them about responsible and", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMS8UG": "It's not a flying pink elephant I'll tell you that.", "3TKSOBLOHLE80Q3M9CL8B1M8274BBZ": "The collection contains eight short stories and was not published in the UK however all of the stories were published in other UK collections (see 'UK book appearances of stories' below). For first publications in the UK, see the applicable UK collections below. The stories contained in 'Double Sin and Other Stories' appear in the following UK collections: World Book Day (UK and Ireland) World Book Day is a charity event held annually in the United Kingdom and Ireland on the first Thursday in March.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKR0KI4": "i didn't know they still prescribed the patch, they had to take it off the market because it was causing blood clots in women. if this is the improved patch the i think you're fine, but double check. as for your question, since you have taken off  the patch, use another form of birth control whenever you have sex because you are not protected. your last period seems fine, and because you have stopped with the patch you will have spotting (small amounts of blood being released from the uterus) until your normal period comes. you shouldn't worry now i think you're fine. you only have a problem if you start bleeding uncontrolably down there, meaning if it's gushing and you are not on your period, because that means you have had a hemmarige. good luck and feel better.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F01WV5": "I liken the experience to turning into a bright red disco ball . Some people get so embarrassed about this reaction to alcohol , they pop in Pepcid AC , which many people say helps mask the red face . Researchers from the National Institute on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism ( NIAAA ) and Japan s Kurihama Alcohol Center found that individuals who get the redness after drinking alcohol are at greater risk for developing esophageal cancer .", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ0GMA": "What is the average thickness of a mans penis? Thickness of a man's penis? What is the average size of a mans penis? More questions.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1U2Q2": "Hi I get anxiety attacks at times before they use to be almost everyday and I was scare to death because I felt my heard was coming out. First, dont place a bag on your head that is a terrible thing to do. What you need to do is: 1. When you are getting an anxiety attack try to breath in, and out slowly. 2. DONT PANIC, I know if feels terrible but if you panic your anxiety will last longer. 3. Try to have a small alcohol near you to smell it since sometimes people feel like fainting and it will help. 4. If you can feel when you are close to getting an anxiety attack, try and drink alittle bit of water and drink. 5. Sometimes eating something with sugar helps (depends on the person) 6. If you are with someone talk about what you are feeling or just talk about whatever to distract you from the anxiety attack (that helps me) 7. After you have the anxiety attack, sometimes a person feels so tired and I recommend you to take a nap or just relax for 15 minutes until you are ready to go.", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJ8ZY8": "Just shy of 5 weeks post injury/surgery . My arm feels great , other then being week from the lack of use . My right arm bicep is now twice the size of my left . I have not done any rehab ( that starts nov 6 ) and at this point have full range back .", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T756GU5": "As someone else mentioned, a lump could be a tumor. A lump could also be fluid from a soft injury like a sprain (have you ever sprained your ankle and it swelled up? ), or, if it's hard, it could be a broken bone. Footballer's ankle Footballer's Ankle is a pinching or impingement of the ligaments or tendons of the ankle between the bones, particularly the talus and tibia. A common cause of anterior impingement is a bone spur on anklebone (talus) or the shinbone (tibia). Repeated kicking actions can cause the anklebone to hit the bottom of the shinbone, which can lead to a lump of bone (or bone spur) developing. This bone spur may then begin to impact on the soft tissue at the front of the ankle, causing inflammation and swelling. The condition is most common in athletes who repeatedly bend the ankle upward (dorsiflexion), such as footballers, hence the name.", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXRBIB": "'If you don't believe in that, you don't really believe in rock n' roll.You don't really believe in the stuff that we believe in.If you don't believe in that, you're not really a fan, you're a curator of a library and we just happen to be one of the books in the fucking library.", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8KH14": "Please include an acknowledgement to the author and a link to Lymphedema People . Swelling of the ankles - feet - legs  Ankle swelling  Foot swelling  Leg swelling  Edema - peripheral , Peripheral edema Abnormal buildup of fluid in the ankles , feet , and legs is called peripheral edema .", "3XUSYT70ITZ0V0YWPSFPMAEPEOND0Q": "Looked up the symptoms of a broken pinky toe. Swollen, discolored, misshapen. Turns out everyone's pinky toe in the worl", "3L84EBDQ370AMWBAL2BU97OOCVOKKE": "Protestant Reformation- 1517 Spanish Armada- 1588 Jamestown- 1607 Restoration 1660 Colony of Georgia- 1733  Restoration of what? The English Restoration, or simply put as the Restoration began in 1660 when the English, Scottish and Irish monarchies were all restored under Charles II after the Commonwealth of England that followed the English Civil War. The term Restoration may apply both to the actual event by which the monarchy was restored, and to the period immediately following the event.", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWCWS5": "Jul 4, 2012 ... Anemia due to lack of haemoglobin or RBCs in blood may be an acute ... Weakness, dizziness or tiredness Lack of energy Shortness of breath ... may be like ringi... May 09, 2011?? Public Mental Health: State of the Art of Dealing with Massive Stress. Trauma societies around the world are gradually shifting towards a public health ... Abstract. In my paper, I will introduce the basic concepts of Lacanian theory in regard to family therapy. I will show how Lacan?? theory on signification in 1950 ... Heavy metal toxicity Sleep deprivation Folic acid/B12 deficiency ... auditory or visual hallucinations, paranoia and psychosis. ... Physical symptoms of folic acid deficiency i... Simply stated, mental illnesses are disorders of the brain affecting the whole ..... People with mania and psychotic symptoms may believe they are rich and ... Such symptoms are ...", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW29VZY": "This causes the blood pressure within the liver to be high, a condition known as portal hypertension.High pressures within blood vessels of the liver occur in a majority of people who have cirrhosis.Cirrhosis is the most common cause of portal hypertension in the United States.", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGK9Y3": "if you have one or more of the following symptoms : You get your period more often than every 21 days or farther apart than 35 days . A normal adult menstrual cycle is 21 to 35 days long . A normal teen cycle is 21 to 45 days . Your period lasts longer than 7 days ( normally 4 to 6 days ) . If you are passing blood clots and soaking through your usual pads or tampons each hour for 2 or more hours , your bleeding is considered severe and you should call your doctor .", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L58DGP": "Good luck! You can learn.It depends on your trainer, the horse, and your own willingness to learn.", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS6AZA": "1. 18-22 inches   2. 20 gallon for babies, 30 for juvies, 40 gallon breeder is the minimum size for an adult bearded dragon. Anything larger is just a luxury, not a must. But if you want bigger, you can get a 75 gallon or 100. 3. Babies- Small crickets dusted in calcium dust possibly small roaches if small enough for the baby and veggies. If your baby doesn't eat veggies yet, it's fine a lot don't until their adults. Adults eat more veggies than insects, and the insects can be fed every other day when they're adults. They can have roaches, silk worms, super worms, phoenix worms, crickets, locust. Their salads should be given fresh daily when adults, including greens such as: collard and mustard greens, you can use boc choy or however it's spelled and carrots, squash, cucumbers and such. NO mealworms...ever. they're too difficult to digest. 4. They're sweet and awesome creatures. They will be more calm as adults, and more excited and energetic as babies. They're the 'dogs' of th", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9248N": "When your in quot. stage onequot. of the sleep cycle your brain has not fully slipped into a sort of quot. short circuitquot. which occurs to prevent you from acting out your dreams. Your simply on the verge of entering that stage yet your brain has not fully and completely entered into this mode. It is quite normal and unless you are biting your tongue, waking up sore or having any other type of problem, it is nothing to worry about.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCE9JC": "Crumble the pellets into smaller bites. They're probably too big for them.", "3L4YG5VW9NQUUKZQ143K1HY88DSDDF": "Adding muscle tone will help you perform all daily activities as well. You can also try these exercises: Belly rolls strengthen your vertical abdominal muscles. Sit with your legs bent, with feet flat on the floor and arms straight in front of you. Step 3 Perform facial exercises that work to strengthen and firm the muscles of the face, chin and neck and can help you lose facial fat. Activities like yoga and Pilates are perfect. However, there are also many exercises directed just for the face. Step 3 Perform facial exercises that work to strengthen and firm the muscles of the face, chin and neck and can help you lose facial fat. Activities like yoga and Pilates are perfect. However, there are also many exercises directed just for the face. When you go grocery shopping watch out for those things that say fat free or low in fat because a lot of times they can have more calories then the regular stuff. If it says fried so no.", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYWLEX": "You will get/be very sleepy everyday. you would lack necessary vitamins in you body which would lead you to have to take a supplement daily.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHSTXG": "Logic in Islamic philosophy Logic () plays an important role in Islamic philosophy. Islamic law placed importance on formulating standards of argument, which gave rise to a novel approach to logic in Kalam, but this approach was later displaced by ideas from Greek philosophy and Hellenistic philosophy with the rise of the Mu'tazili philosophers, who highly valued Aristotle's 'Organon'. The works of Hellenistic-influenced Islamic philosophers were crucial in the reception of Aristotelian logic in medieval Europe, along with the commentaries on the 'Organon' by Averroes.", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y9IWY": "Kevin Matchstick, from the comic book Mage. Supposed to be the reincarnation of King Arthur.", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ9SP6": "i know its hard and what your going through is ok and normal. just try your hardest NOT to let her see that she can still upset you. when she comes around, teasing you- think 'stone wall' and try hard to never let her see she is hurting you. the fact she is doing this stuff to you should show you she isn't worth your time in the first place. until you feel ready to move on and date again, you need to be extra selfish- seriously. do all the things YOU love, and don't feel bad about taking extra time for YOU. even if that means a movie marathon at home, with all your favorite snacks. so be it. whatever makes YOU happy, do it! and like i said, forget about her, she is so not worth you!!!", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9NASVR": "Answers Best Answer: I have a feeling it is some kind of skin infection, the vet will be able to tell for sure.Should clear up quickly after the vet puts her on antibiotics.Good luck!", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA7T0L": "Last question first: No I don't like fighting. First question last: The UK is no more violent than it has ever been. The difference is the coverage it receives, in the media, through film and everday acceptance. In the past violent people went into careers where violence was acceptable in certain situations: soldiering, boxing, policing, slaughterman, jailer etc. Violent people outside of those professions were just thugs and vilified accordingly. Nowadays violence is glorified, thugs get kudos and media coverage. Think of Stan Colymore, Gaza, just to name a couple of famous violent faces. As a society we have become indulgent of violence in civilian situations, but vilify those in 'proper' situations where violence might be more justified.", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6TAQR5": "Well lets see I hate be a racist (I'm Not BTW) How long was apartheid in affect, how long was south Africa raped of all its resources, how long did the black population suffer while others prospered. Yes Affirmative Action sucks and if Apartheid didn't suck so bad there would be no need for reparations. Think about it did you complain when apartheid was in affect, I'm sure you said it really must be terrible for those people, as went on with life reaping the benefits.I not gonna lie, I saw on TV where they stole peoples houses and gave it to loyal members of the government, and that was just wrong, but so was everything the government before did, So remember the ones that were held down have no pity for the oppressors (NOT SAYING YOU). And their not gonna differtiate between you and the old oppressors becuase you benefited from aparthied too", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8N9W7": "Super thin heels (stiletto, pencil etc.) with skirts are no-nos if you have thick legs. They make your legs look chunkier and shorter. They make such a stark contrast: from thick legs to suddenly pointed tips. The tips look pointier and the thick legs look thicker. Go for platforms, wedges and other wide heels instead. And choose a colour that doesn't make so much contrast against your skin colour. You may wear the said thin heels (and any other kind of heels for that matter) when youre wearing long pants that can cover them up. Only the front tips of your shoes will be seen and youll instantly look taller, your legs longer.", "35NNO802AVUKO76PICIYOJQFEM3NIA": "When I go over someone's house  they feed me... https://t.co/jqzc7OsCM9 forsue me", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VE1QI": "If you get horny off HBO porn you childish", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFT2DWS": "I got my period at 11 and the last time i grew was when i was 12. I've been 4' 11' ever since!! and that was 14 years ago. You could have stopped growing.", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUECLGF": "A wisdom tooth extraction is usually done because most patients don't have enough room for a wisdom tooth. Humans have four wisdom teeth, one at each of the four ends of the mouth. Of the 32 teeth, it is the last in the tooth eruption sequence to come into the mouth. By. Dental wisdom tooth cysts can grow and push teeth out of their way. This cause cavities and periodontal disease around the wisdom tooth and its neighboring teeth. 'Some say wisdom teeth are like spare tires,' says Dr. How do I know if my wisdom teeth should be removed? Check with your dentist. Pain and swelling around your wisdom teeth indicate that they're causing problems. How are wisdom teeth removed? This depends on how deeply embedded in the jawbone your wisdom teeth are. What are the possible complications of wisdom teeth removal? Complications from wisdom tooth removal are rare. Further Resources American Association of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeons: http://www.aaoms.org American Dental Association: http://www.ada.org", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DDCUQ": "( I had problems with this new lap top giving me a headache pressing buttons differently and making my work delay! I'm sorry!", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7M0PN": "Please check your email and click on the link to activate your account.Close Create a new password We'll send you a link to create a new password. forgotPasswordForm   signInEmailAddress   backButton   /forgotPasswordForm  Create a new password We've sent an email with instructions to create a new password.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX1GH1": "You go girl! Be proud that you were able to attract a 24 year old male (not implying that your not attractive, I'm sure you are). Women are just reaching their sexual prime at your age and men are in their sexual performance prime when their in their 20's. So enjoy the moments. It's a compliment to you regarding the age difference. You lucky Dawg!", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0MLML": "Sure. I do. I feed..", "3OLZC0DJ8JDXWCFYK34PY0KS0P4VIY": "tough choice between Genghis Khan, Alexander the Great, Napolean, and Hitler. they all conquered pretty much the same areas, though i believe Genghis may have conqured slightly more, so i'd go w/ him. king john hitler genghis khan thats all..lol Jochi Jochi (, 'Zchi', , , 'Zhoshy',  also spelled Jchi and Juchi) (c. 1181  February 1227) was the eldest son of Genghis Khan, and presumably one of the four sons by his principal wife Brte, though issues concerning his paternity followed him throughout his life.", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9454NF": "To keep the whole area sensitive as heII, don't get too rough with your hands and fingers down there, yet. Nurse on her like a lil baby. Suck and flick your tongue on her nipples. You could slowly lick over to her navel if you wanted, linger, licking THAT hole then keep licking over to her hip and hip. Don't dive in all at once, let her get used to you being there too. By now your arms should be under her legs and around her waist. However, the women sure like it..!! Remember, this is for her too, right..? A womans clear thick juices to many guys are very enjoyable and the more you enjoy her the more she will enjoy you. Be a man and lick there too. Her clit. Start licking her clit and don't stop. If you root around too much like a pig in a food trough all you will do is piss her off and get a bad rep by her to HER friends. Her legs are still around YOUR neck and if she has a killer orgasm YOU may get a sprained or twisted neck as she thrashes around and your still trying to hold on. Good luck", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUIH7Z": "sounds like hives,your touching or eating something your allergic to if it is. Opinion 2: i get them too... on my cheeks mainly. i thout they were just there and u couldn't do anything about it!!! Opinion 3: If you really think you might have an infection you should get checked. If you have not had unprotected sex, it may be just from friction and the bumps might be pearly penile papules. Pearly penile papules are small (1 to 2mm) round bumps that are attached to the rim of the head of the penis. These bumps can be the color of the skin, translucent, white, yellow, or pink. The bumps can sometimes go all the way around the rim of the head of the penis, and the bumps can form multiple rows around the head of the penis. These bumps (or papules) are completely normal and not a sign of infection or uncleanliness. They are not cancerous and are not precancerous lesions. It is unclear as to how many men have these papules, but they can occur in anywhere from 8 to 48 of men. Studies sug", "3LVTFB9DE5GRVDDM8GAC71844KYGQY": "got a nice set of retainers that i have to wear at night. shit is tight. like literally tight, my teeth feel like they're gonna snap off.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AKACB": "Entity Abstraction Pattern Entity Abstraction is a design pattern, applied within the service-orientation design paradigm which provides guidelines for designing reusable services whose functional contexts are based on business entities. The automation of a business process involves the analysis of the business domain and then designing solution logic that represents the different steps within the business process. Some of these steps relate just to that specific business process while others may be of use to other business processes as well.", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGHM7D": "Asking about health problem on Yahoo answers is probably not the best idea.", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKTG9B": "more than likely you just bruised your hand..even if you did bust a vain it should be okay, i actually did bust a few veins in my hand once and the whole top of my hand was a nasty blotchy purplish blue shade and so full of pooling blood that i couldn't move my fingers for a few days but even then the doctors could not do anything for it.. i was told to put ice to help with swelling and over the counter tylenol for pain..if i were you id do the same just in case and rub some regular rubbing alcohol on it that will help with bruising so the area should be okay by your recital, and next time try to find a bigger space to practice in.. hope this helps!!", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD4A8X9": "You should only be able to FEEL his ribs if you run you hands GENTLY along his rib cage.Good weight is about 25-28 lbs.Good luck.", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0P4CV": "I will not take up such a long space again.Night, all.Good luck.", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEH466": "Evelyn Ashford. Quick Facts ... She wanted to think about her future and recovered from the torn leg muscles she received ... Evelyn competed in her fourth and ...", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBW87F": "People who prefer organic foods don't think spraying chemical insecticides and fertilizers are healthy. They believe many human illnesses are caused or made worse by the chemicals in the sprays.", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDG07G": "Oct 26, 2014 Need help, arm has been bothering me for a few days by: Anonymous Hey josh, I'm a really active 15 year old ad this has been bothering me for a few days now.I tried looking for one of those bumps but couldn't find any.Is this normal?", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUBOSJ": "I take the birth control pill all month long. In a pak, there are 3 weeks worth of 'real' pills, then 'sugar' pills to take during your period. I just throw out the sugar pills, and when i finish the 1st three weeks of one pak, I immediately start another. It is totaly safe. If you think about it, in the days before the pill, women were pregnant 10, 11, 12 years in a row, just popping out kids every year, so they never had periods. It will also protect you from uterine cancer down the road. You can ask your doctor to write a letter to your insurance company explaining why you need this, it's called Dysmenorrhea (painfull periods). There is the depo provera shot every 3 months in case you don't want to take a pill every day, but it's downside is spotting all the time.", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8NW9U": "rney for Xarelto lawsuit. Heart attack, bleeding, hemmhorrages, rectal bleeding or d http://t.co/9fROfr9IwM", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYIJR7": "Let x be the number of days worked and y be the number of days idle. of days worked is 36 ie m 36 He gets Rs.58 i.e 2.5036-1.50n  58 1.5n  32  n  32/1.5 48 days so in total out of 84 days he worked 36 days and idle for 48 days to get his pay of Rs. By 1988, Pay 'n Save was sold to Thrifty Corporation who later sold the stores to PayLess Drug who retired the Pay 'n Save name. In 1965, Pay 'n Save acquired the Rhodes department stores chain. In December 1983, Pay 'n Save acquired Schuck's Auto Supply, Inc. for about 70 million in Pay 'n Save common stock. In April 1988, Pay 'n Save was put up for sale. By February 1992, Pay 'n Save was once again for sale. 'I work in the Energy industry - 24/7. M T W T F S S Week 1 - N N N N O O O Week 2 - D D D O N N N Week 3 - O O O D D D D Week 4 - O O O O O O O You can end it there - or add the 'Relief Week' - Week 5 - D D D D O O O Those 'Relief' days would be 8 hour days -- meaning that only 32 hours would be worked that week.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWVRZ0": "Brunello Cucinelli interview - modern society, business, philosophy, human capital http://t.co/12HAKjIgPa", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6W6QN": "Important thing to realise is that Muscle is heavier than fat, so by increasing muscle mass you will also gain weight, the right sort of weight as well. Fat is stored energy and does you no good at all. The Protien whey works differently for different people.", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5AP9ZV": "name him/her after mom or dad, take your name and the dads name, combine them, then see how many names that you can get out it. i have a baby girl named rosaestela because we combined my moms name with the fathers moms name. so shes named after both of her grandmothers.", "3N7PQ0KLI5N14YBT4A8SUQUHHC4E3B": "Which is better,how do you go about scatter feeding  PM Fluffy for custom title  Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl i tend to scatter feed, you just sprinkle the food on the floor  Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl bowl for lone syrians, dwarfies and scatter for pairs of dwarfs (never two syrians in same cage)  Posts: 3,781 Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl scatter feed dwarfs that live in pairs or more... Syrians or dwarfs in single fed by food bowl x  Sleep well Nibbles, Honeydo, Cookie, Crumble  Maisie  Posts: 2,955 Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl I usually give Ruby a bowl of her normal mix and scatter some of a different mix with millet, cereal, herbs and stuff in it. Pawprints in my heart... Coco, Ellie, Muffin and Ruby xx  Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl Yep i use bowl, but hide treats so its a challenge, for pairs scatter though  Re: Scatter Feed or Food Bowl Scattttttttttttttttter Its all vaccuumed", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BT403": "Usually I feel the itching first , then small red , just itching on my fingers and scalp ... HELP ! I ca n't sleep ! my upper lip . A few months ago this happened in just one little patch but it went away , and I ca n't remember if I did anything .", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ4TCE": ")? :Good luck!-JustinN Ashley (And I did leave the othermessage below, you already responded to that one, thank you very much!My fishies would be grateful if they only knew how much you guys help. )Thank you for this, my friend. Water Changes 9/7/06 Hi, Hi, Pufferpunk here. Iunderstand that this issue is more than adequately addressed on yourwebpage but the more I read, the more confused I get so please bepatient with my tale of woe.I bought two goldfish for my daughters 3weeks ago.", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMLCLX": "I too have suffered from anxiety BAD. Here are a few things i do to help myself which i personally find very helpful. First thing is i. The other thing i was told at the therapist was when i felt anxious to try and not to dwell or think about the things that were bothering me, which is ridiculous. I dont know what exactly makes you anxious but for me personally one thing that makes me anxious is going to places i have never been that are far from my home. another thing that i found helps me when i am starting to panic is taking a few nice deep breaths i know it sounds corny and like it wont do any good but trust me sometimes its just enough to help you feel a little better. Also if you can try to eat healthy because certain preservatives and things in foods have been proven to cause anxiety in people who have anxiety attacks. things like artificial sweeteners like in diet drinks and things like that. anything that pumps your heart rate up can help to trigger anxiety attacks. hope this helps!", "3TKSOBLOHLE80Q3M9CL8B1M8276BB1": "Hi I found this piece of info, do you think this is you. You should not receive LUPRON DEPOT if you are or may become pregnant, are breast-feeding or have undiagnosed vaginal bleeding. Increased endometriosis symptoms (i.e. pelvic pain or pressure and/or pain during intercourse) may occur for 1 or 2 weeks after starting this drug. Development or worsening of depression has occurred. Is this you, if so see you doctor. Good Luck", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63THGY3": "It's excellent, widely considered the best in the genre by many. I'm not a fantasy fan, but two members of our family and one friend bullied me into reading the first one. I now own all five in hard cover and have read and reread the first several. I've just begun the fifth volume. (Autographed, and an excellent birthday present because of that.) If you like the HBO series, you'll really like the books, which include a whole lot more detail about what's going on and every character's background, emotions, and all that. The series is like the tip of the iceberg, with 75 more content available only in the books.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMU3TT": "Sounds like your pregnant. It is common for the nipples to darken when you get pregnant. It common to be nauseous.IT not common to have really bad head aches.", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGGM7C": "Amino acids are essential to the human body. Bodybuilders can especially benefit from supplementing amino acids because they aid in repair, growth, and development of muscle tissue. The body, through assimilation of amino acids, produces over 50,000 proteins and over 15,000 enzymes.", "3Z8UJEJOCZBK92KCWZS62CT6QFR93Z": "It depends on what you consider interestingI found my Mother and my Aunts to be very interesting, and the saints that I've known here on earth were also interesting, I have two vhildren who are in heaven ahead of me whoI think I will find extremely interesting. My Savior Jesus Christ I will find interesting.......I've read Nietzsche.....not so interesting to me. So I humbly disagree with the quotation...... )", "3T2HW4QDUV58M2GVPS37VFX0WS1C9X": "Right. My concerns are 1) we're constructing quite a lot of scenarios here based on 1-2 genomes...", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7P0PQ": "What are the contents of the specific regions of the body? Your question is very vague... But anyway i have nothing much to do today so here it is from head to toe, outer to inner...   HEAD:  skin and accessory organs, platisma, facial muscles, nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, scalp, external ear, oral cavity, teeth, tounge, orbit of the eyes, facial bones, meninges, brain including the CSF and blood   NECK:  skin and accessory organs, neck muscles, nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, trachea, esophagus, carotid artery, jugular vein, thyroid gland, para thyroid gland, cervical vertebrae, spinal cord. THORACIC:  skin and accessory organs, thoracic musles(anterior and posterior), nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, rib cage, lungs, heart, respiratory tree, esophagus, thoracic vertebrae, spinal cord. ABDOMEN:  skin and accessory organs, Abdominal musles(anterior and posterior), nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, stomach, small intestine(duodenum, jejunum, ileum), large intestine, app", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0ZM21": "'Anxiety is the dizziness of freedom.' Sren Kierkegaard, 'The Concept of Anxiety'", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUBFNB": "Wilkerson Our son was a big fan of this show and I rmemeber him talking about how the writers decided during the first season to keep the family's last name a secret but that it was mentioned on the piolet episode. I called him at work and got this answer. KingofRandomCrap 93 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. KingofRandomCrap KingofRandomCrap Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBIMJL": "World classic powerlifting ch.ships in Finland in 4 days!! My PB at the moment: squat 120 kg(264 lbs) bench: 70 kg(154 lbs) deadlift 148 kg", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC74934LB": "I would recommend you if you have the budget to hire a SEO Representative, if not, you can start trying to get inbound links to your site as search engines use links to find your site, try to get valuable, related and well ranked sites that point to your site, how? Elaborate a newsletter with valuable content that people could be interesting to add your link on them sites, use your most interesting content and add links to your home page as well as to internal pages to offer your products.", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZETUR": "You may stop growing (height wise) at 18, but your breasts can continue to develop into your twenties. But you don't have to wait around. To get your breasts to look more fuller, cheat. No I don't mean implants or herbal drugs or padded bras. I'm talking push-ups, flies, and the pec exercise machines at the gym. Build your pec muscles! These muscles lie under the breast tissue so if they increase in size your breasts will naturally look bigger. But you don't want a manly chest, so if you're skinny, or prone to be muscular, make sure you keep up your fat and calorie intake.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM52DX": ".. Hopefully, children and parents going through divorce will prosper from it!'", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2EBCRO": "Easterain Time. Hi Lo Outlook Hi Lo Outlook Albany,N.Y. 72 65 .11 74 65 rain 76 67 rain Albuquerque 91 71 91 65 cloudy 91 65 cloudy Amarillo 89 65 .01 90 60 clear 92 62 clear Anchorage 59 48 .36 60 50 rain 62 50 rain Asheville 82 58 .02 86 65 cloudy 85 66 rain Atlanta 89 66 .27 88 71 cloudy 87 71 cloudy Atlantic City 78 65 .05 77 71 rain 77 71 cloudy Austin 99 69 92 72 cloudy 94 71 clear Baltimore 82 63 .55 85 67 rain 88 69 cloudy Billings 100 67 100 66 clear 101 66 clear Birmingham 94 74 93 70 rain 92 70 rain Bismarck 90 64 95 63 clear 95 65 cloudy Boise 100 64 103 65 clear 102 68 clear Boston 79 63 77 66 rain 73 66 rain Brownsville 95 75 95 75 cloudy 95 75 cloudy Buffalo 83 66 .04 79 67 rain 80 66 cloudy Burlington,Vt. 80 65 78 66 rain 78 67 rain Casper 94 52 93 52 clear 93 52 clear Charleston,S.C. 81 74 .26 89 74 cloudy 90 75 cloudy Charleston,W.Va. 79 61 80 66 rain 83 69 cloudy Charlotte,N.C. 89 62 88 67 cloudy 87 68 cloudy Cheyenne 86 57 85 55 clear 86 55 clear Chicago 79 67 79...", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB370B2": "If plays are the small siblings of movies, then a one...Funny Ideas for Short Plays Short plays, also known as skits, can be humorous takeoffs of well-known events or stories or involve funny behavior or a punch...How to Write a Play Script for Kids How to Write a Play Script Print this article Things You'll Need.", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V744VT": "If it's been that long, maybe you should see a doctor.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXZ025": "' SHINee says we have debuted for 6years and we are going to give even better in the future SWC3JKT'", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMXLD6": "go running for 25-30 mins then walk for 30-50 mins! and do ab exercises drink lots of water eat very healthily, keep track of your calories not exceeding 1200! it will be hard, but worth it good luck   Opinion 2: 1. Walk/jog for 30 minutes at least 3 times per week to boost your metabolism in order to burn that fat. 2. Eat a small handful of almonds (at least 6) every morning. Almonds are one of the healthiest snacks you can eat and the protein is good for burning fat. 3. Purchase a Pilates DVD and do the exercises at least 2-3 times per week. Pilates works on toning your entire body with concentration on your powerhouse (middle section) and will improve your flexibility. 4. Add fiber to your diet and cut down your intake of the bad carbs. Foods such as white bread, pastas, potatoes, and white rice should be limited. Eat brown rice and whole wheat bread instead. To get that needed fiber increase your intake of fresh fruits and vegetables (especially the leafy green ones). 5. Drink skim", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559TZMH": "Dragon is awesome. I am very lucky to have her as a friend.", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MSULP": "well, the battery idea only resets a bios password, so that wont do it, 'cant' isnt a good alternative, and 'control userpasswords2' assumes you have admin rights (which you dont), so you need an actual solution.try this:(i'm assuming you are running xp, if not, you need to clarify which os you are using)Use a limited accountIf you logged on to the computer by using a limited account, follow these steps to create a password reset disk for your user account:1.Click Start, and then click Control Panel.2.Under Pick a category, click User Accounts.3.Under Related Tasks, click Prevent a forgotten password to start the Forgotten Password Wizard.4.Click Next.5.Insert a blank, formatted disk into drive A, and then click Next.6.In the Current user account password box, type your password, and then click Next.Note If your user account does not have a password, do not type a password in the Current user account password box.The Forgotten Password Wizard creates the disk.7.When the Progress bar reaches 100", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRPCOD": "IF I go back and am somehow denied, I will seek organizations, lawyers, whatever I have to, to change my name. I think my mother has just as much right to give me her last name as my father, and I know legally a child can take it's mom's last name. 1) At least your child has a father, if only on paper. You let your child use your last name, you are announcing to the world that this kid has no father, not a very wise thing to do. He could get looked down upon, bullied in school, etc. 2. My little girl's father, has been nothing but a stress to me my entire pregnancy, he does not get the benefit of her having his last name - not that my ex would want that... but if he did that would be my argument! 3. You can put whatever last name you want on that birth certificate. I had my son when I was 15. Needless to say, his father didn't want anything to do with us...but wanted our son to have his last name.", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC74954LD": "Good Luck!Kate said: Kathy, although Im not actually a beginning cook (more like a intermediate I guess), I stumbled on your blog not too long ago and I like it.Its kind of fun to revisit the basics.", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHRZTK": "name him/her after mom or dad, take your name and the dads name, combine them, then see how many names that you can get out it. i have a baby girl named rosaestela because we combined my moms name with the fathers moms name. why dont you try adding your dads name infront of his dads name? My dads middle name is Kamakaonono, it's hawaiian. Her dads name was John and her moms name was Maria, They thought it would be cute to combine them. so shes named after both of her grandmothers. I believe that it means king of the land. Your name is very pretty, feminine, soft. I knew a girl named Marohn.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26XZ0B": "I think fish are one of the most fun pets, along with being generally the easiest ones to care for.", "3GL25Y6843SBWKAK5X3ZEEOUX9WMX8": "HERE COME THE BULLIES is a one-act play about school bullying. 6 males. 9 females. Simple set. (Libby Hughes). http://www. capecodtravel. com/libbyhughes/plays. shtml nbsp. Other resources to try: nbsp. http://www. stagepage. info/oneactplayscripts/bush. html http://www. theatrefolk. com/store/genre/23-one-act http://www. scriptcircle. uk/index. pg51amp. actionauthoramp. id110amp. authorTonyBreeze nbsp. Introducing children to drama is hard work, but rewarding. Break a leg. :-) Sources: http://www. capecodtravel. com/libbyhughes/plays. shtml, http://www. stagepage. info/oneactplayscripts/bush. html, http://www. theatrefolk. com/store/genre/23-one-act, http://www. scriptcircle. uk/index. pg51amp. actionauthoramp. id110amp. authorTonyBreeze prettyface 105 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. prettyface prettyface Loading stats.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWKATU": "So I included Forsus Appliance to the treatment plan ... After 5 months of Forsus usage, appliance had been disengaged. And up and ... And the change of the smile esthetics. Secondly .... Now I will show you the profile change on the photos . There is really nothing to be scared about. You may be able to see it in your mouth when you talk, but only very minimal unless you are showing people because your cheeks will cover up more of the appliance. Here is a clinical example of Forsus?? class II correctors. ... 1) Do you consider using forsus or any other fixed functional appliance if the lower incisors to ... 2) Do you suggest certain contraindications for forsus? eg. Feb 24, 2014 ... See how nicely we filled out the patient's smile line. This is more ... Images 4 and 5 show a Forsus appliance used in conjunction with Incognito.", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0NC41": "The Pit Dragon Trilogy by Jane Yolen. http://en. wikipedia. org/wiki/ThePitDra. Dragon's Bloodquot. is the first book. The story starts with a bond boy named Jakkin, working with many others in Sarkkhan's dragon nursery. Jakkin plans to steal a baby dragon from the farm to raise, hoping to train the dragon to fight and earn him enough money to buy himself out of bond. He eventually succeeds after having been badly injured during the day's work, as one of the hatchling dragons was quot. miscountedquot. , thus no one would notice if it was missing, though it is eventually revealed that Sarkkhan had purposely given him the opportunity to steal the hatchling, knowing that Jakkin was literate and could read the breeder's chart posted on the door. Jakkin stows the tiny dragon away to an oasis that he had previously found. Akki, a girl at the nursery, eventually discovers his secret, and helps him, building a strong relationship in the process.", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M1913KL": "There are many books about creative writing.", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQ9FDT": "Ooh, Google docs has a chat screen!", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT44FME": "A few things can be done.I was misdiagnosed with it for reasons I still don't understand.It is a syndrome - which means it is a bunch of symptoms, and you don't need to have all of them.Many women will have: - Acne - Excess facial/body hair - Excessive weight gain - Skin tags - Dark patches of skin - Have insulin resistance - Have enlarged ovaries on ultrasound - Have pearl-looking ovaries on laparoscopy caused by multiple cysts.You may present some of these symptoms and your doctor may be explaining them with PCOS.However, if your blood is coming back normal I'd doubt you do because most of them are caused by elevated levels of androgens.I would ask for an ultrasound to look for enlarged ovaries (sometimes this is present - not always - because not all women with PCOS have enlarged ovaries from multiple cysts because not all have cysts).The more drastic way of looking for problems is with a laparoscopy which is a minimally invasive surgery.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMN7JV": "Laws as approximations Some laws are only approximations of other more general laws, and are good approximations with a restricted domain of applicability. For example, Newtonian dynamics (which is based on Galilean transformations) is the low speed limit of special relativity (since the Galilean transformation is the low-speed approximation to the Lorentz transformation). Similarly, the Newtonian law is a low-mass approximation of general relativity, and Coulomb's law is an approximation to Quantum Electrodynamics at large distances (compared to the range of weak interactions). In such cases it is common to use the simpler, approximate versions of the laws, instead of the more accurate general laws. Physical laws derived from symmetry principles Many fundamental physical laws are mathematical consequences of various of space, time, or other aspects of nature. Specifically, connects some conservation laws to certain symmetries.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKR1KI5": "I grow my own hair so far", "3J94SKDEKINZQ7KXMYL135AGVWUD57": "Horton consulted various fitness experts and experimented with several disciplines to help develop the workout program. Farr used a documentary approach when filming the infomercials, using raw home footage supplied by P90X graduates. 'P90X: The Proof' infomercial won a Telly award in 2009 and 'P90X: The Answer' infomercial won a Moxie award in 2010.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR2U6G": "Hi Google this, natural ways out of anxiety, by doing this you could come off your drugs, and by doing that your be doing your body a big favour. When you look through these just pick a path you think that would be best for you, don't mix them up. You could even try meditation as a way out of it. Do hope this helps you. Good Luck The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 1 of 3 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMS2CW": "It's probably an increase n elecrical currents sent from the brain to body parts due to emotions, so it causes this 'chill' What sort of shoes are you wearing, you are making static elecricity and its not escaping to earth Phenylalanine is a hidden danger to anyone consuming aspartame. Most consumers don't know that too much Phenylalanine is a neurotoxin and excites the neurons in the brain to the point of cellular death. ADD/ADHD, emotional and behavioral disorders can all be triggered by too much Phenylalanine in the daily diet.", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSLDQO": "They are wanting food or attention. Just like people. TurboB 56 months ago nbsp. TurboB TurboB Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYZE86": "Damian said: The secret to getting free advertising. Internet income! http://t.co/Ms7O6KKByP", "3QI9WAYOGQ91B03TO7QVQAAGSUGS6X": "That definition, however, suffers from the difficulty of deciding which things are real (i.e. which things exist in reality). For example, it is difficult to agree to whether concepts like 'God', 'the number three', and 'goodness' are real, abstract, or both. An approach to resolving such difficulty is to use 'predicates' as a general term for whether things are variously real, abstract, concrete, or of a particular property (e.g., 'good').", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J34P8": "But it also depends on whether or not you have sensitive teeth. If it were a crown or root canal, you may have some soreness....if you've had a tooth extracted, again you will have some soreness. If you've had a cavity restored, it may be that all the decay wasn't taken out, there might be an infection or maybe the cavity wasn't fully put in. If you did have a cavity...composite fillings are made hard with an ultraviolet light and you should be fine.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BU040": "A statement distributed by the Institute of Consumer Rights of the Lawyers College, 'La Plata,' said that some Belgian foodstuffs have been contaminated with dioxin, a toxic substance that could cause cancer, weaken the body's immune system, alter hormone production, and possibly cause malformations in embryos. A list of Argentina-imported Belgian foods, which are considered not suitable for consumption, includes the following products: chickens, eggs, baby food, frozen poultry, butter, mayonnaise, and other products that may contain a mixture of eggs or poultry. Male Menopause (also called viropause or andropause) involves the hormonal, physiological, and chemical changes that occur in all men generally between the ages of 40 and 55, though it can occur as early as 35 or as late as 65.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FT3QD": "They're just not for me. I'm not going to use the 'I was born that way' line because you said it wouldn't benefit you, but I firmly believe since I always felt like this, it must be because that's how I'm supposed to be. Did you guys say that you could see and sleep with other people? If not....sweetie...that is pure cheating. Oh she takes a break because she has problems...but oh she can have sex with this other guy and talk to him on facebook?", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T756UGJ": "pretty sure there were a lot of fake penises, penis's, penii...whatever...there to make up for no whizzanator, lol", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF3AIC": "Yeah, every other class has a dedicated Macro thread except Rogues. Why is that? We have needs too. So this will hopefully get stickied for future reference. I am by no means a Macro Expert  most of the info here has been culled from other sources (the origins of which I dont recall), and this is definitely not a complete do-it-all page. There is a lot of redundant info here that can be found in the other various forums or threads. The idea is that my Stealthy Bruthahs and Sistahs wont have to hunt around to find macro info. Hopefully you will find this useful. Please feel free to add in your favorite macros, or variations that you use. http://www. com/World-of-Warcraft-.", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPV1LX": "Are Potassium CL 20 MEQ ER tablets and Klor Con M20 tablets the same? Posted: 3 Apr 2013 by Diane32903 Topics: They are both potassium 20 meq. Votes: 0 Still looking for answers? Try searching for what you seek or ask your own question . Search: Similar questions ... milligrams of potassium, which according to one chart, is 27 of the daily requirement. Is Klor-Con 10-10 meq equivalent to 10 milligrams ... 0 answers  21 Nov 2011 Since Klor-con 8 Meq, and Diovan should be avoided, in combination. what is drugs of choice compatible with Klor-con for potassium and Diovan. I am ... 1 answer  21 Aug 2012 I'm on 80mg of lasix daily. I used to take 80 meq of klor con daily by tablet. I just saw a different dr and he prescribed 20 meq daily by ... 1 answer  5 May 2013 just wonderin if the vitamin potassium can be a replacement for klor-con m20 and or is their a generic f it thanks 1 answer  18 May 2013 ... to me in the emergency room. They ran some blood work on me and brought 2 Klor-Con", "3OZ4VAIBEXDTRNZ42LPPA1ZSD4TJVY": "Blood alcohol content Blood alcohol content (BAC), also called blood alcohol concentration, blood ethanol concentration, or blood alcohol level is most commonly used as a metric of alcohol intoxication for legal or medical purposes. Blood Alcohol Content is the legal name for BAC but Blood Alcohol Concentration is sometimes used for simpler description. Blood alcohol content is usually expressed as a percentage of ethanol in the blood in units of mass of alcohol per volume of blood or mass of alcohol per mass of blood To calculate estimated peak blood alcohol concentration (EBAC), a variation, including drinking period in hours, of the Widmark formula was used.", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30V828R": "No experience here,Please don't lame me but,I'm an expert in fitness with alot of nutrition training...Site specific weight loss is 100 myth.You can no sooner reduce fat in a given area by exercise: http://www.exrx.net/WeightTraining/Myths.html or through diet alone http://books.google.com/books?hlenlrampidNoAgfu1XbPgCoifndpgRA2-PA1ampsigNvvrYLx7j0C4kfnxBwcWaYsMTY8dqdietmythsreducebellyfat Your body and genes are what determine where body fat is taken from.Outside the possibility of gene splicing,enormously expensive,there is no way outside liposuction to ensure that fat will be removed from a certain area.All of these diet aid supplement companies are liars too.Ive been followingthe news on this subject and have one interesting link from my favorites. http:/ ews.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070104/aponheme/weightlosspills 25 million dollars in fines for false claims. This review tends to back up some of what Ive said.", "3QO7EE372OLV4W5BSUIY6QH7O77BQD": "Oh yeah that happens to me all the time. I'll randomly be happy then something will provoke me and I'll start crying. Just today I had this happened, but I usually attribute these 'episodes' to me either about to start my period or I'm on it.", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10KKMK": "The Freaks Are: cancer ? cancer ?? Cancer ?? Cancer ?? Cancer? Cancer ?? Cancer ? Cancer ? Cancer?", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXKJU9": "Ok, I am not a doctor. First, let me please suggest you visit your optometrist here is why. Eye shaking (nystagmus) can be a sign of many things. I posted a link, but please don't let it freak you out. I don't know how reliable it is. If you feel dizziness or nauseous, this may be a vestibular (inner ear/balance) issue, which can cause nystagmus. An Ear Nose and Throat doc is a good person to see about this. What I recommend, since nystagmus can be a sign of other conditions, is to go to your optometrist. They are well versed on conditions associated with the eye. This could be nothing to worry about at all. However, there are a couple of other conditions you may want to rule out, and I would probably do this sooner than later. Best wishes to you!", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJZ8A3": "It doesn't matter if you connect with that person and if his intentions are honorable, which is what you will have to decide.", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8ILTM": "There is no free and legal pdf. Neither the publisher nor the author are giving it away. Librarian", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF6AIF": "The most common cause of gerbil nosebleeds is bedding irritating it. Cedar and pine are the worst types of bedding, and I know this problem ceased with my gerbil when we got a brand of bedding called Carefresh that was dust free. Carefresh can be bought at PetSmart and PetCo.", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK30Z3UI": "yeah keep putting food out for the cat she/he will come back. I would advise you to get her/him fixed the reason she/he maybe running away is bc she he/she has a boyfriend or girlfriend. Get your boyfriend to feed the cat.", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYGZSY": "Why are you asking? I don't think this is a good idea. I used the website www.webmd.com.Just type in Binge eating. Binge Eating Disorder Binge eating disorder, also known as compulsive overeating, is a newly recognized eating disorder. Binge eating disorder is a serious condition characterized by uncontrollable eating and a resulting weight gain. Eating large amounts of food, however, does not mean that a person has binge eating disorder. Binge eating disorder has been linked to other mental health disorders. Eating disorders, including binge eating disorder, tend to run in families, suggesting that a susceptibility to eating disorders might be inherited. Binge eating disorder is slightly more common in women than in men. Often they are so successful that close family members and friends don't know they binge eat. The major complications of binge eating disorder are the. In some cases, people will neglect their jobs, school or social activities to binge eat. See additional information.", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TUUWG": "You can usually see a string of numbers, 1-10 or 11-20 or 21-30 or whatever. The lowest of those numbers is the edition. So, if you see 1-10, it's a first. If you see 2-11, it's a second.I have no knowledge of the printing history of DVC.", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4ALM5X": "Homemade Ice Cream Blueberry Yoghurt Ice Cream Recipe Ingredients: 1/2 pint (250ml) double (heavy) cream, 1lb (450-500g carton) of natural yoghurt, 1lb (450g) blueberries (rinsed clean), 9oz (250g) caster sugar, 4 tablespoons of cassis Place the caster sugar and blueberries together in a saucepan, stir in 250ml (8fl oz) of cold water and bring to the boil. Simmer for about 10 to 12 minutes. When the blueberries are tender remove the pan from the heat.", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26UJ8V": "Do you think this is something you should be asking here? Ask for qualified help! Not here!", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSN3GL": "If you can combine history with politics, pehaps there are government jobs such as the staffers on West Wing. There are such things as company historians. A giant company like GE probably has one , but only one.", "3XQ4XW3OD9ADTZKS15ES0XT4CPH2ST": "Test tomorrow!!! 1st period: Raisin Act 1 2-7 periods: Crucible Acts 1  2!", "3OLZC0DJ8JDXWCFYK34PY0KS0P5VIZ": "No - Kennel cough is not a zoonotic disease so therefore cannot pass to humans.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61ILNRD": "How long have you had this? I may have the same thing and I'm in the process of figuring it all out.", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN36903": "It sounds like your mother is afraid of being alone. Unless you are doing something that is against the law (i.e. using drugs, physical abuse of the child, etc.) your mother has NO legal right to take your child from you. You are that child's parent (not your mother) and you have the decision-making ability to do what's right for your child. As a recipient of emotional and physical abuse as a child, I would recommend getting your child (and yourself) out of that environment as soon as possible. Your mother may try to guilt trip you into not leaving and she may call child services as a last call for help, but if you are a good parent, then you have nothing to worry about.", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RFUMO": "You can always get a second opnion at any time. Get a second opnion if you think that you have gotten a rotten deal! As far as inexpensive dental work, look up dental schools/colleges in your area...they offer really cheap cleanings, bleaching etc. This method can be time consuming and can take several visits, but you can save alot of money in the process.", "35NNO802AVUKO76PICIYOJQFEM3IN5": "if you like things with flavor, you have to try trident gum called tropical twist or another trident gum called fusion flavor in the strawberry. Guar gum Guar gum, also called guaran, is a galactomannan. Industrial guar gum accounts for about 70 of the total demand. Current guar gum rates can be found online at http://www.agriwatch.com/guar/guar-gum/ Chemically, guar gum is a polysaccharide composed of the sugars galactose and mannose. Guar gum is more soluble than locust bean gum and is a better stabilizer, as it has more galactose branch points. Unlike locust bean gum, it is not self-gelling. The finer guar powders swells more rapidly than coarse powdered gum. Guar gum shows viscosity synergy with xanthan gum. Food-grade guar gum is manufactured in stages. The largest market for guar gum is in the food industry. In Europe, guar gum has EU food additive code E412. Xanthan gum and guar gum are the most frequently used gums in gluten-free recipes and gluten-free products.", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA1YLP": "I would have to help it is in my nature.", "3NFWQRSHVECU4ONDU0ZIV24QXISFG6": "I was in the wrong place at the wrong timeFor the wrong reason and the wrong rhymeOn the wrong day of the wrong week..... wrong wrong", "37S0QRNUFBE6WU783OHOTX66MVY88Y": "First of all you have to remove the fish, place them in a bucket with some of the same water that is in the tank, place the fish in bucket, don't forget to put an airpipe in to circulate the water. Remove all the water form your tank, wash everything in your tank, gravel you wash with boiling water or boil your gravel on the stove then rinse clean with cold water. take the tank outside and clean with the green scourers and get all the algae of the glass of the tank, your smell is actually coming from under your ground filters, it is rotten food and fish waste, and you haven't cleaned your tank in yonks.", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8MLTQ": "NEW DIY Delay Guitar Effect Pedal Delay Guitar Effects Electric guitar Pedals G! http://t.co/qiCZzRulLO http://t.co/rzWRgvmx0m", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW26VZV": "Since it's fiction, the only rules are your imagination. If you'd like to put borders to magic then be it. This may also put additional conflict to the story which will make your story more interesting. For your character, what kind of attitude does she possess? Is she bad, careless, wise, happy-go-lucky? It's up to you though.", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y3Z1E": "Anyway you can help with an idea to get me started? I'm running blank, and don't quite know what to write about. Something that has to do with teenagers...? Help. Don't accuse me of being bad at this, there's always room for improvment, exactly why I am asking for some help on how to start a short story for fun?", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6U6QL": "It could be a mild eye infection or a foreign body in the eye that doesn't go away. This could cause a discharge happening all night long that covers your eye in a milky film. That would explain the going away part and the fact that it's only one eye.", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2QST7": "Elastics are used to close open bites, shift the midline, or create a stronger force to pull teeth or jaws in the desired direction. Brackets with hooks can be placed, or hooks can be created and affixed to the archwire to affix the elastic to. Sometimes the midline will shift after the elastics are stopped or braces are removed. Most of the time it ..... So today, I was eating, and I noticed a sharp pain in one of my b... If the wire is causing severe pain, it may be necessary to carefully bend the edge of the wire in with a spoon or other piece of equipment (i.e. tweezers) until the wire can be clipped by an orthodontist. Brackets with hooks can be placed, or hooks can be created and affixed to the archwire to affix the elastic to. The placement and configuration of the elastics will depend on the course of treatment and the individual patient. One is extraction: teeth are removed to create more space. The second is expansion: the palate or arch is made larger by using an expander. Expanders c", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYFSXR": "Make measuring your height easier by doing it yourself . Knowing how to do it will enable you to measure your height whenever you want . Read this article to find out how to measure your height quickly and accurately . Gather the items that you will need to measure yourself .", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9414NB": "I'm seeing my Dr. next week, but I wanted to hear if there was any other input. ... Just recently I got that feeling again in my right hip, the one that I had ..... I would ask the school if they can make that type of accommodation for he... Anyway , I have absolutely no memory of being there. ... After twenty-four hours on my back I was amazed just to be upright within the metal walker ... not having a bowel movement in two days, so they sent up for an EKG to make sure my heart as okay. I've had both hips replaced 5 months apart. What you are experiencing is anything but typical (except for the leg length difference (LLD) which isn't that unusual I ended up with a 1/4' difference which I treat with a small lift in one shoe). I hate to say it, but your dad is kind of a jackass. I don't think there is even any surgery for hips. Talk to your mom and tell her how your dad's comment has you feeling down, she should have a good talking to with him.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGF1CF": "Without insurance you can consider using an urgent care center in your neighborhood to have your condition checked out. You'll generally pay a flat rate for the care you receive. It doesn't replace a relationship with a doctor, which you may need if you have a health condition that requires on-going care, but at least you can get some idea as to what's going on. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. Choose as Best Answer", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVRZC1": "../src/QueryEnvironment.cpp(890): Couldn't understand this query: NoViableAlt", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZCFLA": "she oculd have rabies or could have swallowedbad food. your dog's probably sick, so i reccommend taking you pet to the vet imediately before she gets any worse! best of luck and hope it's nothing serious! Opinion 2: The more a person changes dog foods - the pickier the dog will become. Decide what you want to feed it, and wait. You can also give it supplements wrapped in cheese if you are worried about nutrition. Let the dog sulk, etc. - it does this because that has worked on you in the past. You have to establish yourself as 'boss,' and when the dog gets hungry enough it will eat what you are giving it. And yes, it is hard to watch it be hungry but that is the only way to get it on a regular diet. And, in the long run - that is much healthier for the dog than continuously switching. P.S. I've had dogs 30  years and they've all been happy and lived to ripe old ages. Everyone thinks they're dogs are like humans and they do have personalities. They are definitely like children in tha", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51OYCA": "First off, lay some aquarium gravel down, Second, fill half of the tank with water Third, Get a nice rock that reaches above water but is still easy to get to from the water (like a slope) Fourth, food, bugs, crickets.... Fifth, get a filter to keep the water part clean. Get an in-tank filter like these: http://www.petsmart.com/product/index.js... OR http://www.petsmart.com/product/index.js... Your welcome. Opinion 2: What kind? Some tadpoles live and hatch out on the back of a parent and never need water. Others are laid one or two eggs at a time in a tiny bit of water caught at the base of a tropical plant leaf. Tadpoles from Arizona-Sonora Desert amphibians only need a jar or bowl for dozens of them. Two bullfrog tadpoles would need a 55 gallon tank, and two African bullfrog tadpoles something on the order of a 75 or 125 gallon tank. Everything else falls somewhere in between.", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8PBWI": "... patients with a sore swollen eyelid will worry that they might have an infection and ... Bumps on the White Part of the Eye. The Best Eyebrow Growth ...", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK300U3A": "crying or weeping, is increased lacrimation due to strong emotional stress or pain. This practice is not restricted to negative emotions many people have been known to cry when extremely happy. In humans, emotional tears can be accompanied by reddening of the face and sobbing  cough-like, convulsive breathing, sometimes involving spasms of the whole upper body.", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5X9F9": "Smolov, it's a Russian squat cycle. Put 70lbs onto my squat in 13 weeks, bringing me from 405 to 475. Look it up on stronglifts.com", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8JW9Q": "I have been a severe nail biter all of my life and have tried all of the same things you have. The nasty tasting nail stuff was so bad that it made me nauseous and I STILL BIT MY BAILS! I have quit a few times and went a year or more without. The few times I have grown them out a bit though was when I was able to keep my hands busy. I know this sounds dorky but I started knitting and crocheting to keep my hands busy as i would bite my nails the most if I was watching TV. Anything that will keep your hands busy would help...Iam sure. Do not believe that your nails are to short for this because they can put this stuff on SKIN and build it up. Do check around with others to find the best salon as my daughter had hers done and they broke easily. As your nails grow under these keep them filed with an emery board and CUT rough edges. DO NOT start biting at them AT ALL or you will be right back at it. This is a terribly hard habit to break......slobbering on my hands is a thrill...LOL Good luck", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHGR19": "The following are some of the centres offering Rehabilitation facilities. 11 S(659674) Tel: 65632281 OUT-PATIENT REHABILITATION SERVICES Alexandra Geriatric Day Hospital Geriatric Centre Alexandra Road S(159964) Tel: 64708415 Ang Mo Kio Senior Citizens' Health Care Centre Level 2 Ang Mo Kio Community Hospital 17 Ang Mo Kio Ave 9. 1 Tampines Street 41 S(529203) Tel: 67865373 Toa Payoh Senior Citizens' Health Care Centre Toa Payoh Polyclinic (Level 3) 2003 Lorong 8 Toa Payoh East S(319260) Tel: 62590669 Muhammadiyah Health and Day Care Centre Blk 10 Eunos Crescent 01-2711 S(400010) Tel: 67414779 Society for the Physically Disabled 2 Peng Nguan Street 04-00 SPD Ability Centre Singapore 168955 6579 0700 (general line) / 6579 0764 (rehab centre) Tembusu Rehab Centre 50 Bt Batok West Av 3 Level 3 Bt Batok Polyclinic Singapore 659164 Tel: 6563 4476 Adventist Rehab Centre 03-00, Woodlands Polyclinic 10 Woodlands St 31 Singapore 168958 Send mail to sporensasingnet.com.sg Take care as always", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9JZ6C": "If you have a gas stove, put them in the stove with it turned off. The pilot light keeps it just a bit warmer - enough that the dough rises, but not so warm that it rises too fast. If you have an electric stove, of course this won't work.Option 2 - If you have a microwave that is over your counter or stove, with a built in light in the bottom of the microwave, turn the light on for a while and then put the rolls in the microwave. The light heats up the microwave a bit, and the closed microwave keeps the dough safe from drafts.Option 3 - Heat a cup or two of water in the microwave until it boils, then remove the water and pop the dough into the microwave. Water heats microwave, microwave protects dough from drafts.Option 4 - Anyplace else that is safe from drafts and is relatively warm (but not hot", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5O71S": "The documentary was originally transmitted in October 1997 as an edition of the BBC series . It was also aired in America as part of the The story of this celebrated mathematical problem was also the subject of Singh 's first book , . In 1997 , he began working on his second book , . As well as explaining the science of codes and describing the impact of on history , the book also contends that cryptography is more important today than ever before .", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XKBBHH": "Dental Fact  Poor oral hygiene such as not brushing or flossing on a daily basis, make it easier for gingivitis to develop", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BLQPC": "Please don't give up. Can you talk to a school counselor? Maybe they can help you out.", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J6350": "The American Pit Bull Terrier, Staffordshire Bull Terrier and the American Staffordshire Terrier commonly fall under the category of 'Pit Bull.' There are several other breeds that can fall under the rubric of pit bull, including: the Argentine Dogo, the English Bull Terrier, the American Bulldog, and the Perro de Presa Canario. These breeds are usually not included by breed name in any Breed Specific Legislation (see below), but are usually ensnared because of a broad definition, and confusion as to what a 'pit bull' actually is. Pit bulls have gained a fearsome reputation among the general American public due to negative media attention, but those familiar with the breed generally attest to its friendly disposition, especially toward children and small animals, earning it the nickname 'the nanny dog'.", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF4XJI": "Our bodies are smart, they will do everything they can to stay at the bodyfat it feels it needs to function, therefore losing the last 10-15 lbs is always the hardest.", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYZELT": "By looking at the description of a frog or toad 's call and when it calls , you may be able to narrow your search to just a few species . Click on the species name to open it 's web page ( which includes sound ) or click on Keep in mind that you could still hear a frog or toad outside of the main calling period and that verbal descriptions of sounds vary with the ear of the listener . Also keep in mind that many frogs like the Bullfrog can be Reproduction of these recordings by any means is prohibited without prior consent by is a long high musical trill on one pitch .", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRNDM0": "My 5 year old snacks I know at school they have an afternoon snack, something like goldfish, pretzels etc. When she comes home 5pm, she says she's starving. Depending on when my husband is coming home (do we eat without him, wait etc), I either try to hold her off or give her a snack. She loves those mini blueberry muffins. Also, peanut butter. She'll eat 1-2 teaspoons of that for a snack. I'm trying to start her on eating a slice or two of cheese but that hasn't happened yet. The problem I've found is she wants a snack, she eats a snack but she's still hungry. She should probably be eating dinner at 5pm but of course we do try to wait for Daddy. I don't want her to eat too much of a snack because then she won't eat dinner. She's a picky eater already so filling her up on snacks makes meal time more difficult. Anyways, I can't wait to see what others post. I'm looking for suggestions too. mus3mus 92 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment.", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH043D8": "I get irritated by stuff like this too. On a lot of things you buy there will be an obvious mistake, but a lot of the times these things were made in a foreign country and translated by someone there. But I am all the time reading books and newspapers and watching TV and thinking 'how could they do that?!' but then I make the mistakes myself and realize.. It's kind of easy to let the mistakes slip out.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6KO96": "I was home schooled my junior year and loved it except when it came prom season and i missed alot of things my friends were doing. I went back to high school this year for my senior year but found it so hard to actually stay in so i had to be home schooled again. I think you can go either way but don't combine the two because its to hard to change.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSMG3X": "I think it's Dolphus Raymond, the man who is thought to drink whiskey but actually drinks coke. It's explained when Dill starts crying in the trial of Tom Robinson and runs out.", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY7E23": "Pics galore, including hounds  SlugClub group pic ttp://t.co/HUdgY2uFO1", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR1RFC": "Slight swelling, bruising, and tenderness around skin that has been injured is normal. Swelling and bruising that develops slowly over 6 to 12 hours usually means a minor injury. If your symptoms improve with home treatment, do not involve a joint, and are not caused by infection, an evaluation by your health professional is probably not needed.", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ699MG": "With the other hand, corkscrew the penis. This can be done with the thumb and first finger or with your entire grip. Anvil Stroke Start with one hand lightly grasping the top of the penis.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDRTOF": "War on drugs - hopeless. Afghanistan? You could nuke it into nothingness, but while all the Taliban might be gone its not much of a victory.", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZOBPGF": "Yeah, there are several ways to do it via macros. But first you should really consider is it worth the time and effort to create the macro, or should you just make the list and forget trying to make the macro. If you are going to be repeating the process a lot, then a macro may make sense. If there is tons of data that can't be moved around easy by other Excel means, then a macro may make sense. Or if somebody else is going to be using the file that knows very little about Excel, then you may want to create a macro. As far as telling you how it is done, the person helping you create the macro will need a whole lot more info to help you create it. With a macro, you have to tell the computer each and every little step to go through to accomplish the process. It's almost like programming a robot to say pick up a fork. Most people are like, 'Oh, it's easy to pick up a fork. I just grab it and pick it up.' Programming a robot would be like:   1. How far away is the fork? 2. Ho", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4EE9S": "The English settlers primarily were farmers and they mostly grew tobacco. The French settlers were mostly fur traders and most settled in Canada.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMSDKV": "you do not have to tell your current doctor anything. Your new doctor will ask the name of your old doctor and they take care of the records i believe....by the way i have never heard of the school nurse giving such exams before, you need to go to a real gynecologist   Opinion 2: This would probably depend on the reason you are switching. If you refused to pay and are in some kind of litigation, then you will have a very hard time. If you are unhappy with your current doctor and have not caused a scene at his office, then you should probably not have a problem. Just make sure that the doctor you switch to is covered by the same insurance plan you are on so you do not have any issues there. Contact your insurance company for this information. Good luck to you!", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN12I5E": "girlz watch porn to have more experience, to learn new position to empress their partner guys watch porn to masturbate I can't tell you why, but I say watch porn with him learn news sexual things, it can make things interesting. Masturbate for him, leave him satisfied so he don't have to masturbate himself. Not to mention he's a man most guys masturbate anyways weither they have a girl or not.", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9484T": "Everybody prioritizes things differently, and it doesn't necessarily mean she loves you any less. It could be that her driving to your base to see you is a painful reminder of your separation. Mostly, though, I'll bet that she's depressed and that she lets things close to her take priority and fails to take care of the larger things that can take care of themselves (like you). Try talking calmly to her about it sometime, but don't harp on it. If you are otherwise 'happily married', this may just be a speed bump in the highway of your relationship.", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0C2OU": "Limewire  Free eBooks There are 19,000 free ebooks in the Project Gutenberg Online Book Catalog. u can read the chapter reviewq or summary online but cant read the whole book..", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5CCHQ": "I'm so very sorry. I lost my father to metastatic prostate cancer when I was 5 months pregnant with my third child, so your story really hits home with me. If you mom is under hospice care, they will take good care of her. At this point, they will do everything they can to make her comfortable. Here is a good link to read about what happens in the final days/hours. In my father's case it was very accurate. http://www.hospicenet.org/html/preparingfor.html  On another note, you need to make sure you are taking good care of yourself. I know how stressed you are, but you'll get through this...I promise you will. You are in my thoughts and prayers.", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2USTB": "I generally charge  50 per hour for graphics work -  100 for stuff that is a pain maybe or if a client seems high maintenance. I would only charge  150 if, like you, I didn't really want to do the work. I have some ink tablets.", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63W413": "Mar 21, 2013 ... There are 9 essential (or indispensable) amino acids that we cannot .... Any extra protein your body doesn't need is turned into one of three things: ... The fate of excess protein is determined by the hormonal state of the body. Either the amino acids are used within a limited time to build a body protein, or they ... Excess nitrogen may also be incorporated into urea, or ammonia, both of which ... determining your protein needs (we will discuss this in more detail later). According to Tillery, et al., the human body can synthesize all of the amino acids ... Humans, on the other hand, do not have all the the enzymes required for the ... 'Unlike fat and starch, the human body does not store excess amino acids for?... Sep 24, 2013 ... Without this steady supply of amino acids, the body resorts to breaking down its ... of glucose and energy excess, your body redirects the flow of amino acids away ... Before we head on over to the liver and discuss amino acid?...", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z5FK5": "The Lives of Dutch painters and paintresses The Lives of Dutch painters and paintresses, or 'De levens-beschryvingen der Nederlandsche konst-schilders en konst-schilderessen', as it was originally known in Dutch, is a series of artist biographies with engraved portraits written by the 18th-century painter Jacob Campo Weyerman. It was published in four volumes as a sequel to Arnold Houbraken's own list of biographies known as the Schouburgh. The first volume appeared in 1729, and the last volume was published in 1769.", "3ZICQFRS31G00M9IL4HEJ10EKDFZZ2": "Good luck.Melinda Lloyd Zane, I too have been in debt quite a bit.My mother was kind enough to let me pay off the debt (literally 100 of paychecks going to that and to nothing else) before paying any rent.", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ09RTK": "Booking appointments are a breeze and sometimes they can even see you the same day for quick fixes.Billing was never a problem.Email  Phone call reminders a big plus!", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGL7M2": "kah better not wearing anything right sis", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RXC6Q": "Scrambled egg, MY special scrambled egg, the scrambled egg on I can make.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BH95O": "get on the web and look up body recall''. It is an exercise program designed for older people by older people.", "3L2OEKSTW98LB0YQGSFISAU8FA5Y86": "I dont see to much similarity, because the animals are necessary, loved, useful, and for the other side the politicians are...In fact nowadays in some laboratories used politicians instead of guinea pig because: 1) The people in the laboratories dont get close with the politicians, 2) Exist more politicians, what guinea pigs and 3) Even the guinea pigs dont do some things. k I have 2 guinea pigs and i use vitamin c powder and i sprinkle it on their fresh food. Have you tried strawberries, cantaloup, melon or green/red peppers?my guinea pigs like these alos try romain and green leaf lettuce just dont use iceberg lettuce.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIQICO": "I doubt you'll grow much more. Genes play a role in it, obviously, but you can't figure out how tall you'll be by how tall your parents are. I'm sure you'll stay about the height you are now.", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVEB1H": "Like an adult. Mature, rational and loving.", "3N7PQ0KLI5N14YBT4A8SUQUHHC53E1": "If you really care for them then you should definately go for it! I also dont think you're spoiled at all, just lucky you're good with animals, and I'm so glad that you have chicks giving them a good life.... unlike mcdonalds. And remember, try to adopt a dog :)", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXII3XC": "Using morning waist measurement (at the belly button) and weight (118 lbs): Waist - Body Fat Percentage (Category) 26' - 0.7 (at risk for critical underweight) 26' - 1.5 (at risk for critical underweight) 26' - 2.4 (at risk for critical underweight) 27' - 3.3 (at risk for critical underweight) 27' - 4.2 (at risk for critical underweight) 27' - 5.1 (at risk for critical underweight) 27' - 5.9 (at risk for critical underweight) 28' - 6.8 (very severely underweight) 28' - 7.7 (severely underweight) 28' - 8.6 (severely underweight) 28' - 9.5 (underweight) 29' - 10.3 (underweight) 29' - 11.2 (underweight) 29' - 12.1 (healthy) 29' - 13 (healthy) 30' - 13.9 (healthy) 30' - 14.7 (healthy) 30' - 15.6 (healthy) 30' - 16.5 (healthy) 31' - 17.4 (healthy) 31' - 18.2 (healthy) 31' - 19.1 (healthy) 31' - 20 (healthy) 32' - 20.9 (healthy) 32' - 21.8 (healthy) 32' - 22.6 (overweight) 32' - 23.5 (overweight) 33' - 24.4 (overweight) 33' - 25.3", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHSZTL": "I would consider your weight to be under the normal weight. Especially when you are 5'4 and 13. It would be healthier to gain a couple of pounds so that you do not look anorexic", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DCCUP": "50 days is a long time I would go to the doctor and have them do a blood test for you. You might also being stressing out so much which is causing your late period. T cell deficiency T cell deficiency is a deficiency of T cells, either caused by lymphocytopenia of T cells or by decreased function of individual T cells.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM72DZ": "80-900 series50,000-75,000 'normal'  800 series50,000-90,000 700 series40,000-75,000 Harvesteryear 2000-now95,000-400,000 yr 1990-199945,000-105,000 yr 1979-19895,000-35,000 headers for combine(harvester) new 12row corn head50,000 or 5000 per row new 30ft platform(not snowblower) 40,000 or 1000 per foot The 'snow blower' is called a platform, unless its a draper, its used to CUT wheat, soybeans  milo. The corn head is used to PICK corn. On the top of the combine is a bin that holds shelled grain until it is unloaded into either a grain cart or a grain TRUCK.", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGZUS2": " If it never hurt before you jabbed it, it probably caused injury to your gum. If the gum is hurt next to the tooth, that whole area is going to be in pain, so it can feel just like a toothache. Gums are very sensitive. They take along time to heal too, especially if you haven't the exact quot. Dental Environmentquot. for it too heal. Which means not chewing at all on that side, eating certain foods cannot be done, and you must keep it clean of any and all food particles at all times. I've done this same thing a couple of times, and one time it took about 3 months to finally heal. Its very easy to keep irritating it, even with your tongue you have to resist messing with it all. If the pain gets worse, but you notice no obvious swelling to that gum area, you should go to the dentist, and have it checked, because then most likely its a cavity, and you want to catch it as early on as possible, so they can save your tooth. Good luck", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0MJ19": "Nope- there arent any. No responsible or good breeder would advertise there dogs as teacups. Go on the national chihauhau club's website - they'll have a list of breeders to start with.", "3J94SKDEKINZQ7KXMYL135AGVWU5DZ": "You have to waitYou have to wait for the beginning of your cycle. You just can't start taking it 12 days later. You may wind up with two periods in a month, or you may not have a period of 42 days. Any number of things could happen, including extra bleeding. If you can't remember to take a pill a day, perhaps you should find another kind of birth control. I'm serious. Birth control pills only work if you remember to take them. That's the number one reason that they fail.", "3NC6WP7WJHISCWZ8ZUD0LTCEM93WWF": "yes definitely it is possible. that actually makes you different from others in many ways. is probably what they think.", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBSL7B": "relax and love yourself. say to the guy in the mirror all kinds of good things to boost your self esteem, it works, you will end up believing whatever you think about yourself when you look at the mirror, so it better be good things, not the size of your nose and cheeks pores!! Good luck! There is a good article about the causes of back acne and how to treat it here : http://www.theknowguide.com/acne-17.html", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8KLTO": "The onset of teething symptoms typically precedes the eruption of a tooth by several days. While a baby's first tooth can present between 4 and 10 months of age, the first tooth usually erupts at approximately 6 months of age. Some dentists have noted a family pattern of 'early,' 'average,' or 'late' teethers. A relatively rare condition, 'natal' teeth, describes the presence of a tooth on the day of birth. The incidence of such an event is one per 2,000-3,000 live births. Usually, this single and often somewhat malformed tooth is a unique event in an otherwise normal child. Rarely, the presence of a natal tooth is just one of several unusual physical findings which make up a syndrome. If the possibility of a syndrome exists, consultation with a pediatric dentist and/or geneticist can be helpful. The natal tooth is often loose and is commonly removed prior to the newborn's hospital discharge to lessen the risk of aspiration into the lungs.", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAIGIW": "i think so. cause i got my molds in august (the 13th) and i got my braces on september the 3rd(: I think it usually depends what time you set up the appointment for the first bonding treatment. call the ortho office to see what days are avaliable(: Worked for me! any advice needed for braces.... shoot me an email(: I reply right away(: -Lindsay.", "3GKAWYFRAPR3JH2G6DUF1BFXMWYDPW": "Only oral examination by a qualified dental surgeon can reveal the nature of your hard lump. Please do get a dental check-up and dont delay.", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ01S8": "God help them ! You can even ask friends with things . My intention was to present things to try with stuff . I imagine many things online store today and what do you this promise  I am willing to grind away at stuff in a moment where it 's best to answers to things  There are many marvelous ?", "3PIOQ99R7YKPXY1PCT7C7MEQ8HPUNO": "nullAbout three years ago I felt the need to lose about twenty pounds. I hadtried all kinds of diets, but I joined Weight Watchers and followed their Points system. I combined that with cardiovascular exercise and lost twenty pounds in about four months. I probably could have done another type of weight loss plan that might have been quicker, but Weight Watchers taught me how to eat. I learned all about portion control and about fiber and fats. I've managed to keep the weight off, which is key. Many get thin quick plans work, but not many will allow you to keep the weight off. Another trick I've learned to rev up my metabolism is eating six small meals instead of three large ones, and spacing the meals out in three hour intervals. Stay hydrated and take a multi vitamin.", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV3ON7": "BBW with huge breasts: This huge breasted housewife has to wear a massive bra to keep her massive breasts i... http://t.co/43dIyHJnrI", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJ73PM": "... ultimate metaquote 'Never taken a shortcut before?' My other current ... had sex with her because I'm in love ... have made it into my normal canon ...", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RIMUJ": "Indoor cats may continue to come into heat all year round . The best way to reduce excessive meowing caused by the heat cycle is to have your cat spayed . If your male cat isnt neutered and he periodically meows excessively , he may be hearing or smelling a female cat in heat .", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E6BMB2": "(Physical events that are not causally 'determined' may be said to have their objective 'chances of occurrence' determined by physical causes.) Weaker forms of the theory state that 'Every physical event has a physical cause.' - Barbara Montero, or 'Every physical effect (that is, caused event) has physical sufficient causes' - Agustin Vincente.", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EFURD": "The tenacity with which abdominal fat wants to cling to your belly can make dieting and exercise discouraging . The key is consistency . It may take months or even years to uncover your abs , but if you stick to being smart in the kitchen , you 'll eventually see results . The only way to strip the fat from your abs is by slowly and gradually burning it off from your entire body through cardio , nutrition , and resistance training . '' This is a touchy subject because many fitness and physique athletes do train their abs every day at the end of their workouts .", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OB6AH": "I know people who are in their 70s but they still run around, see 100 and listen to pop music. then I know people in their early 60 that can harly see, take a handfull of pills everyday and ja... But maybe it would be good if on 60 or 70 poeple have to go for a drivers test again.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXQDJU": "Other breeders, like Lubberline, put an effort into thinking of pedigree names with a certain theme, in this case nautical terms. Personally I like to use pedigree names with song titles in them. A song title is a brief description of a song, a kind of synopsis. You don't need the full 'script' to know (or remember) what it's all about, the title in itself triggers all kinds of (nice, emotional) associations, so you don't have to be very imaginative to develop a certain 'mood' when you hear or read such a name. Having said this, by using song titles as pedigree names you expose yourself, showing your preferences when it comes to music. Would I buy a Labrador from someone who calls his dog 'Cover Of The Rolling Stone'? Absolutely! Immediately I think of Dr Hook and the Medicine Show, of Wolfman Jack, and the name itself is enough to make me wanting to meet this breeder, because he seems to be a nice guy. Of course, in the end I might be wrong, or the puppy isn't what I was looking f", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSLN0E": "5 is my first choice for you since this is the most 'common' database server in here and almost have all database feature like Stored Procedure and Trigger (although this is a new feature for MySql). I bet you could master it (about 80) in 1 week. Novice : 1.", "33KMQD9OFJCYW2X6JEXC1XEG0RM77N": "a few seconds later there is a 'ba-bing' noise from the computer and he reads 'how about a play about someone who needs ideas for what to write a one act play about?' the kid turns to the audience and says 'Hey, maybe I will!' My teacher got the idea from watching a version of the play in 'The Ontario Sears Drama Festival' We than did it for Dramatically Yours and it was well received. It's basically a play about real life relationships if we where monkeys. Plot Line Graph by Wendell Wellman ... The first act is usually used for exposition, to establish the main characters, their relationships and the world they live in. Later in ... For example, she n... Sep 15, 2010 ... Elements of Drama/ One Act Play - Free download as Word Doc ... Action or plot ?? For Aristotle, a play's action is of the utmost importance. Remember to give the one act play the necessary plot, action and characters to make it ... Keep the plot simple for a one act play and it should move consistently ?...", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBT7V2N": "Erratic beats are more common than many think. They are often harmless. BUT, if you're having other symptoms w/them, like shortness of breath. You need to be evaluated. It may just be anxiety over your uneven beats. It may be something more. Your shortness of breath indicates a closer look. I hope it's nothing, but it might be the first sign of an impending heart attack. Good luck. Opinion 2: Hey man, honestly I would not sit around and wait too long before seeing a doctor. Chest pain and shortness of breath are usually signs of cardiovascular problems. About 8 months ago I was having a pain in the center of my chest accompanied with pain and stiffness in my neck and head, turns out I had high blood pressure and had I not seen my doctor when I did (I waited two weeks including walking around Disney for a weekend) I would have probably suffered a heart attack or stroke. Listen to your body its trying to tell you something wrong. On a side note, neither your heart nor your veins/arteri", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GMU1I": "I have them too. I drink water take aleve and spend the day in bed.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5P17N": "Usage is simply WriteDynamicToStream/ReadDynamicFromStream ( lFileStream , lMyRec , TypeInfo ( TMyRec ) ) . t write a record whose fields are dynamic just writing the record memory image . You have anyway to read them separately and store them separately . What path to take depens on you needs .", "3S1L4CQSFX3TUXAA8078ZGTNZNFFAU": "There is a certain age at which most people usually stop growing: men - 25, women - 21. It occurs shortly after puberty. However, these numbers can be changed! It is possible to continue growing until 25 for women and 27-30 for men. Certain exercises, physical activities, right diet, and other things which are important for human body's growth make growing taller possible even for those individuals who thought they reached the age when their growth has stopped.", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLWYJN": "You may not have really noticed , but the continuous-loop drawstring is typically center stage on sweats , athletic shorts and swim trunks . While the traditional two-end string seems natural , likely due to years of shoe-tying , the single loop can throw you for a loop .", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR00ZNPN": "I don't know :(", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ0ATRN": "did u get the fish recently?if u did give them some time to settle in and thell be fine and cichlids do not do well in water which is not heated so that might be and probably is the reason.also what fish do u have ?some species might bully others and so they wont eat as they r stressed   Opinion 2: He might just not like that brand. It is higher in protein and has a bunch of corn filler. Why are you so determined to switch to that food? There are many large pellet foods that he might like, but if he likes granules, it is not harmful to stick to granules. He also will enjoy treats of frozen foods if you want to vary his diet.", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR66DH": "your bird is not afraid of you, its just feeling that your untrusted. you need to be patient and offer them some treats , like sing them a song every day, talk to it, don't let it in the cage forever, And make sure you give it enough food and water, you don't want them to get sick aren't you? add some toys in the cage depending on the bird you have. and never ever ever ever hit it. i hope I've helped ).", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z7KFC": "An all-around grab rope and two heavy-duty grab handles are included for ease of use. Measurements will vary based on the manner in which it is inflated and used and packaging disclaims approximate size. Location, temperature, and humidity will affect the float's firmness. Being a 26 year veteran of the toobing wars I believe that I am in a unique position to review this product. I usually go toobing anywhere between 12 and 50 times a year with 30 - 40 trips in a year being average. For years I have used the standard black truck inner tube, usually a 9. 00/20 or a 10. I like the black tubes because the hole in the centre is more suited for my adult size rear end. Until I found this tube last year, I had never seen a vinyl tube that had a hole larger than about 12 inches. This caused me to sit up too much in the tube and made my back hurt. It also made it hard to paddle. The hole in this tube, the Intex River Run, is proportioned more like a regular rubber tube.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BS04Y": "Absolutely. Read the book. The book is GREAT. I would strongly encourage movie goers to read the original novel. I don't know that it's important to read it before you see the movie, but I do think you don't want to miss the reading experience that the novel offers in addition to the movie. I am such a big fan of this novel that I was very concerned about how the movie would quot. recreatequot. I was devastated when I saw the advertisements and movie trailers. this wasn't the Terabithia that I remembered and loved. When I saw the movie, however, I was VERY pleased with how the book was presented. I don't often cry at movies, but this one was a three-hankie event. Sources: personal opinion nbsp. Zora's Recommendations Bridge to Terabithia Amazon List Price: 6. 99 Used from: 1. 50 Average Customer Rating: 4. 5 out of 5 (based on 759 reviews) Bridge to Terabithia: The Official Movie Companion Amazon List Price: 7. 99 Used from: 4. 34 Average Customer Rating: 5.", "3JY0Q5X05J40IOJ85K50DN42YXRGG5": "Mark Moraghan Mark Stephen Moraghan (born 27 January 1963) is a British actor and singer. He has appeared in many British drama series including 'Peak Practice' and 'Heartbeat'. However he is most famous for his roles as Greg Shadwick in 'Brookside', Ray Wyatt in 'Dream Team', and Owen Davies in 'Holby City',and Adrian Atkins in Coronation Street.", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0KE0G": "I 'm 18 , i 'm in fairly good physical condition and do n't have very much stress in my life . But lately i 've had some weird chest pains , like it occurred while I was taking my boyfriend home one night it started out a dull and uncomfortable kind of pinch under my left breast and it stayed that way for a while but then just every once and a while with out warning it would turn into a sharp stabbing pain that put me in tears at one point , it lasted for about three hours .", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4ESM4U": "If the artist is dope I'll pay pay retail price. If i never heard the artist before then no more than 10 If you're sellin your cd for 5 then it will discourage me from buying your cd cuz I feel that I'll be gettin 5 worth of crap. I actually buy a new cd every 2 weeks or so. Thats probably because I'm completely obsessed with music. When I really like a song off of an album, I buy the whole album because I know I'm gonna end up liking the majority of it. she won glamour women of the year award in 2008. so if the 15 yr old likes glamourous bands/singers...shez good. She came out with a cd called: It's not me, Its You in 2009...so recent and popular songs should be in there. hope it helps : Just go there and in the search engine type in the artist. All songs will come up and they have a lot of mixes too. But once all the songs for that artist come up, in the right hand corner u will see something small that say open play list.", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1KLBY": "I'm 15 (just, was my birthday on friday) and I've had something like 30 lots of open heart surgery since I was born in 1997, so no, it's not so dangerous! These days most open heart surgery has survival rates of around 99 or better. I was born with a hole in my heart, as well as having only half a heart (hlhs) and my blood vessels that should have joined my heart to my lungs in the wrong place (my pulmonary vein was connected to my liver instead of my heart). What it sounds like is that they are concerned if he'll be able to come off the ventilator after the surgery. You don't say what kind of open heart surgery he's having. If it's a bypass it's not likely to effect his lungs post op. I have read that some bypass surgeries are now done without using a heart-lung machine, which I think may mean that the sternum is not damaged as it is when using a heart-lung machine. In any case, ask your surgeon and follow his orders. Experience.", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPPUE0": "I lost two loved dogs two days apart in april, actually one on april fools day, it was very sad but you have to know death for them is now like it is for humans, no lost dreams or anything just leaving one place for another, like moving to a new house, they leave with dignity, when mine died a was beside them and they left with a look of peace and dignity, know that one day you'll see them again, in heavan, but go to this website and read this story, it helped me so much it's address is freewebs.com/adogsheart then go to the page 'rainbow bridge' and i made that web site too it's all about losing a beloved pet, it has alot of things that will help you, but please know it will be in a better place, free of all sickness and pain with nothing but, happiness, purity and dignity.", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF4IAL": "With out the protein, you will be hungry within an hour and you will eat more and be hungry in an hour. Just make sure that you aren't feeding oyur toddler when she isn't hungry. If you try to force her to eat when she isn't hungry, then she probably will not eat.", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL007L6B": "nullI just figured it out for myself when my sciatic nerve started hurting...the nerve on the right side started hurting and I noticed that when I stood up straight...there was more weight on my right leg. Sooo...I inserted a heel lifter in my left shoe...and it does the trick :O)  I can still notice the difference when I wear sandals, without the 1/4' lift. I start getting a twinge of pain in my right, lower back. These are very similar to the ones I use...they're available at http://profootcare.com/farchsupport.html  Hope that helps.", "3A3KKYU7P3FW7K5UVS7DCVANO7RMWG": "There were 22 households of which 13.6 had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0 were married couples living together, 4.5 had a male householder with no wife present, and 45.5 were non-families. The median age in the city was 55.5 years. 12.5 of residents were under the age of 18 2.5 were between the ages of 18 and 24 15 were from 25 to 44 52.5 were from 45 to 64 and 17.5 were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 47.5 male and 52.5 female. The median age was 44 years. For every 100 females there were 114.8 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 114.3 males. The West End area of Sand City, once an industrial area, hosts a growing artists' colony. For every 100 females there were 124.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 139.1 males. For every 100 females there were 151.0 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 154.7 males. Males had a median income of 27,500 versus 30,000 fo...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PEO8HD": "By continuing, I agree that I am at least 13 years old.Continue with Twitter Learn More By continuing you indicate that you have read and agree to the terms of service.LoginSign Up With Email", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG602J9": "He was paid 650,000 to leave his apartment and moved to .... the beautiful white German Shepherd I was holding on a leash, the two .... on a Fayetteville Observer (North Carolina) webpage: 'Whatever .... I do not know how. I told the kid that many of us know that most of the murders and .... Does anyone have hard data as to the percentage of Blacks .... Much heftier than ??merican?? German Shepherds. .... What does he considers a ? ?omplex assault? Zero to have been destroyed by controlled demolition, we need to accept, ..... On various occasions, Stoeckley spoke about trying to quiet a German Shepherd near the ... McGinniss does show that MacDonald can be callous and petulant,?... ..... and an altercation started near the gate to the apartment complex, ..... FAYETTEVILLE, N.C. -- The Cumberland County Sheriff's office has ... is accused of fatally shooting his grandmother's German shepherd mix.", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDT1AC": "nullHowever, if this is a typo and you mean 201, then you DO need to get it down. Nutrition experts say that there is no one diet for diabetes, but people with diabetes should follow the nutrition guidelines in the Food Pyramid, while paying special attention to carbohydrate intake. People with diabetes should also eat about the same amount of food at the same time each day to keep blood sugar levels stable. Soluble fibers are found mainly in fruits, vegetables and some seeds, and are especially good for people with diabetes because they help to slow down or reduce the absorption of glucose from the intestines. Legumes, such as cooked kidney beans, are among the highest soluble fiber foods. Other fiber-containing foods, such as carrots, also have a positive effect on blood sugar levels. Insoluble fibers, found in bran, whole grains and nuts, act as intestinal scrubbers by cleaning out the lower gastrointestinal tract.", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEG465": "50 percent of women have no symptoms until rupture occurs. If you really must know now, your doctor can so a blood test. There really aren't any reliable symptoms at this stage of pregnancy, it is cruel that a lot of pregnancy symptoms at this point could also be signs of your impending period. The blood was red-brown. A blood test will show you are pregnant 6 days after conception and it will still be in your blood if you did miscarry. Some women say that didn't 'feel right' just prior to their symptoms. If any of the following symptoms occur you should go the Emergency Room immediately: Heavy bleeding Passing clots or something that looks like tissue (bring the tissue to the hospital in a clean container) A fever higher than 100.4 degrees F Dizziness or fainting A history of tubal (or ectopic) pregnancy Severe vomiting Severe pain the abdomen or back If you have any uncertainty about the need to contact your health care provider, call him or her immediately.", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6T7RQ3": "amino acids that are not consumer are metabolized into into individual molecules/atoms", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZDUTR": "Youre not one of the lucky ones, the vast majority of women can go without cramps or whatever but they dont because they prefer to complain rather than learn what they need to in order to prevent cramps or whatever. But anyway, everything sounds normal, its perfectly normal for your first few periods to be very light like this, and its normal for periods to be irregular until you are well into your late teens or early twenties. You need to know what happens during menstrual cycles to understand why it's irregular, the Pituitary Gland in your brain starts releasing the Follicle Stimulating Hormone (FSH), when high enough this tells your ovaries to start producing eggs. As eggs grow they produce the hormone Estrogen, when this is high enough the Pituitary Gland stops releasing FSH and starts releasing Luteinizing Hormone (LH) instead, when high enough this causes ovulation where the egg breaks from the ovary. The area where the egg broke from in the ovary starts releasing the horm...", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ84VY6": "... Suspect Apple will get there, but I think it would have been better for them to .... has extended the tentacles of their bad record on services to do real ... I use it daily but it's got too many bumps for me to put even more .... .... Something stereotypical so I can get it really quick . .... Stanley: I think it's because of my sales record. ... Michael Scott: over walkie We've got something far better, their crown jewel. ... You can't understand why, with so many apparently good things in ... family with a long working history in law inforcement. now facing this ... If there are ways to get me through the damage done Id love to hear but ..... If you want to work with your doctor, you should read Sally Pachalok's book. .... It got so bad I could not sleep with anything covering my feet and had to ice my feet every afternoon...", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E68MBZ": "Going coo coo for coconut oil. Coconut oil bath, in my hair, on my face, on my body, in my food.... Coconut oil everywhere!", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKLCVE": "In general, out-of-state physicians, dentists, podiatrists or nurse practitioners who are not licensed in New York may not practice in New York and consequently may not issue prescriptions or referrals for physical therapy to be performed in New York by a New York licensed physical therapist.However, one exemption permits practice in New York by a physician who is licensed in a bordering state and who resides near the border of this state.The border vicinity is usually defined as less than 25 miles.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6TJLH": "You may go back to yourreadings and activities which you have done before.Good Luck.1.Name five persons who contributed to the field of curriculum.", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUUAJQ": "i tink i have it if u want it message me ... its in acrobat ... Christopher Paolini - Eragon.pdf 2mb", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NH2VAX": "In other words, you can't do arm exercises and hope to burn fat there. The only way to lose fat from under your arms is to lose overall body fat (and hope your body will cooperate (your body is in charge of where and what order you lose body fat). 4. If you burn more than you consume, you will lose fat (lower body fat percentage) 5. If you exercise and strength train, you can burn more calories and replace fat with muscle which will allow you to burn calories even when you rest. Squat, stand, and repeat with the other arm. For the last punch, extend your arm as if punching someone on the side of the jaw with your knuckles (shown). Squat, stand, and repeat with the other arm. Squat, stand, and repeat with the other arm. For the last punch, extend your arm as if punching someone on the side of the jaw with your knuckles (shown). Squat, stand, and repeat with the other arm.", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR00XNPL": "okay fine I don't hate you.. ?", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMR8UF": "oh yea u can take classes on line for anything, go to uscareerinstitute.com, or phoenix.edu, they have some classes to get certificates and uofphoenix has certificate and bachelor and master courses. good luck.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K5X7C": "Yes. I experience breast tenderness along with some cramping TWO weeks before my period that lasts for about a week. Then the tenderness and cramping goes away.. the next week I start my cycle. So, this is totally normal.", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5N71R": "He wont change. I was with my boyfriend for 10 months, he started treating me bad like the 4 month, i though he was going to change but he never did, he insulted me several times, and he tried hitting me, then one day he hit me. i really hope this doesnt happend to you, leave him, they dont change. i gave him several oportunities and he never did. Good luck and you deserve someone better.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06Q962": "Aren't hip replacements Granny Land?' Not anymore. I found out I'm riding a predicted wave of active baby boomers who will need hip replacements much younger than Grandma and Grandpa did.", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MTLUH": "If the dog meets cats and children while it is still young, it usually will not have a problem with them. The Chinese Shar-Pei is easy-going, calm, independent and devoted. It makes a delightful companion and a good watchdog. The Shar-Pei needs a confident handler. If you are uncertain, inconsistent, too soft or mild in the dog's eyes, it will take over as the boss. The Shar-Pei needs a firm, but gentle, extremely consistent authority figure. The dog must be taught all humans are above him in the pecking order. Those who see themselves as above humans will be stubborn and bold. This breed needs firm obedience training to establish your leadership . They may refuse commands from family members who have not established leadership over them. They need an owner who has the ability to be ' Top Dog 'The Shar-Pei is generally not fond of water and often tries to avoid it. This breed is very clean and one of the easier breeds to housebreak . Mixing other dogs can sometimes be a problem if one", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT42MFJ": "You can actually nurse both of them (at different times,) though the main problem is that your toddler is very jealous right now. Maybe you can snuggle with her for a few minutes before nursing the baby and let her know you love her and that you're so glad she big enough to drink from her sippy cup. If you have a big enough couch or chair that would let her snuggle beside you while nursing the baby, see if she'd like to drink from her cup beside you. If you decide to start nursing her again, let her know that the baby wants to share with her, but that the baby will need to eat first and then she can have her turn. If you plan to pump and bottle feed at all, maybe let her help feed the baby while you hold the baby and she holds the bottle. If she has a job to do to help the baby, it should help her bond with the baby better. Maybe she can bring you a blanket for the baby, or the burp rag, a new diaper, etc. I have to say that when my sister had her second child, even though her toddl...", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61H89O": "Other treatments include repositioning the child's head throughout the day so that the rounded side of the head is placed dependent against the mattress, repositioning cribs and other areas that infants spend time in so that they will have to look in a different direction to see their parents, or others in the room, repositioning mobiles and other toys for similar reasons, and avoiding extended time sleeping in car-seats (when not in a vehicle), bouncy seats, or other supine seating which is thought to exacerbate the problem. Just make sure you get in to see your pediatrician as soon as possible and get a referral to a specialist if need be.", "3WJGKMRWVI7KPSTC1889HBGQNDIDCH": "Auditions Auditions When are the auditions for Matilda and her classmates? We will be auditioning regularly and will always post details of forthcoming auditions on the website but to be sure you hear of them register your details for an email update. Where will the auditions be? As well as in London we will sometimes visit other cities to look for Matildas. Keep checking the auditions page on the website! How old do I have to be to audition? We will audition children for Matilda who are aged 8 to 12 and under 4ft 3. Her classmates need to be aged 8 to 13 and under 5ft with brilliant dancing and singing skills! What will I have to do in the audition? You will be asked to bring a short poem or monologue to perform, to sing something and you will be taught a dance from the show. What if I live outside of London? We need to cast all the roles, apart from Matilda, from within travelling distance of the theatre. You need to live within one hour of the theatre so we say within the M25. Matil", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PW743": "If it feels like a sharp catching pain, it might be a bone spur. Sometimes those develop due to overuse or injury (my dad has one in a shoulder from an old high school football injury and my best friend had surgery on a shoulder spur after tripping and falling during a track hurdles practice). They are common and don't always require surgery, but often can be fixed arthroscopically.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSU1EA": "Is he new to the aquarium at all? If so give him a few days to adjust usually new fish will be pretty stressed and won't eat and if he still doesn't eat call and ask the store what they've fed him. Or is your temperature too low? Fish are cold blooded so their metabolism depends on the temperature of the aquarium.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GSJ5S": "Narrator can assist a blind person in installing a full-function screen reader, assisting the user until his/her screen reader of choice is up and running. Narrator for Windows Phones currently only works if the phone's language is set to 'English (United States)'. Any blind or low-vision person with a touch-tone phone can now read the paper,'' said Brummond, who estimates that only about 5 percent to 10 percent of the blind people in his area use the Internet. Many blind people use screen readers to surf the Web, but the graphics elements are hard for such programs to digest. Curtis Chong, director of technology for the National Federation of the Blind, said he sees the product as an important step for the blind because it is made by the computer giant IBM. EMF from computer speakers, lamps or other appliances can cause your screen to act funny. If it's an LCD screen.. And the obvious... don't leave your cell phone next to your computer screen.. that too will cause your screen to...", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5ACHO": "Fluoride bonds with the calcium in your teeth to strengthen them Fluoride is a chemical compound that includes the element Fluoride, which is highly reactive, and bonds strongly with Calcium. Calcium is one of the main components of the teeth - which is why you always hear how good drinking milk is to build strong teeth and bones. Milk is high in calcium, so drinking it gives your body the calcium you need to build the teeth. Over the course of your life, the calcium on your teeth is reacting with the acid in foods and created by plaque, and being attacked by all manner of chemical and physical assault. The fluoride makes a very strong bond with the calcium in your teeth, so it is difficult for other chemicals to get in there and break that bond, which would weaken your teeth. The conspiracy theories and scare tactics about fluoride are basically quackery.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MOXNV5": "He must have been the dominant male in his group. Extensive training, discipline and maintance will cure that problem. Establish your Alpha status. He needs to learn sit and down right away. When he miss behaves tell him down. Down is him submitting to you! When you feed him, don't allow him to eat till YOU tell him it's okay. He's not allowed on the furniture until you ask him to join you. Make sure you establish bounderies and keep those bounderies constant. Grabbing and holding his mouth tends to rile the dogs up and sometimes irritate them so it doesn't always work. Purchase a bottle of green apple. When grabbing him by his collar, if he bites spray his mouth with the bitter apple. You should have the bottle handy anticipating you grabbing his collar. It's not harmful to the dog nor toxic in anyway. It's used for dogs who chew so it's designed to go into the mouth and be 'ingested'  It just has REAL nasty taste.", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134MF61": "Fight Diabetes with Sweet Laughter A Japanese study finds a chuckle after a meal may help lower your blood sugar. A chuckle may help the body process blood sugar, according to research from Japan. A study of type 2 diabetesthe most common form of the diseasefound that laughter was linked to lower blood sugar levels after a meal. Over two days, participants were given identical meals. On one day, they watched a humorless lecture, and on the next they watched a Japanese comedy show. The group of 19 people with diabetes and five without had their blood sugar monitored during the study. Afterward both diabetics and non-diabetics alike had lower glucose levels after laughing through the comedy show than they did when they listened to the monotonous 40-minute lecture. The study was published in Diabetes Care. Keiko Hayashi, of the University of Tsukuba, Japan, who led the study says that he cannot yet explain the laughter-glucose connection. It could be that laughter affects the neuroendoc", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTP2SK4": "You cant target arm flab, the only help is general weight loss or surgery.", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXNJUC": "by chance are you on any sort of medications, such as anti depresents or anything else of that nature? heart meds? those can often affect peoples abilty to orgasim properly or normally.", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZAFL8": "You may be able to do this on-line in the first instance, but for a realistic valuation, the appraiser will need to see the paintings in person.Good luck.Amanda Severn4 years ago from UK Hub Author Hi Joe Giannino, I don't know whether you have been back to this hub to read my response, but this is to let you know that I have now deleted your comment to protect your privacy, as you have included a phone number.", "3JY0Q5X05J40IOJ85K50DN42YXPGG3": "You are not crazy. You are simply under enough stress that your bodymind is reacting in a way that is difficult to understand. As our ancestors evolved in a frequently dangerous environment, they developed a way to react almost immediately to a threat. So they, and now we have what is called a fight or flight response. See http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fight-or-fl... It is really useful when extra adrenalin helps us run away from a predator or when we can fight to defend ourselves or someone else. But when we are stressed generally and get an adrenalin rush, we interpret it as fear and frustration and anger. We do not have something physical to run from or something we can legitimately attack. So we have no immediate way to burn off the adrenalin. The mental reaction to this physical rush may be called either a panic attack or an anxiety attack. (It's a bit more complicated, but this is pretty close.) There are lots of good sites on line that explain fight or flight response or anxiety", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0G263": "(H1c, E1) Who explored Georgia and where was the first settlement? Published in: , Full Name Comment goes here. 12 hours ago Are you sure you want to Your message goes here Be the first to comment No Downloads Views Total Views 89,053 On Slideshare 0 From Embeds 0 Number of Embeds 4 Actions Shares 0 Downloads 403 Comments 0 Likes 4 Embeds 0 No embeds No notes for slide Lesson plan for August 14, 2007: warm-up questions, mental mapping of European exploration, notes via ppt 4 4 4 04/06/98 4 Linguistic differences amp. societies based on kinship. egalitarian methods of resolving differences (impressed Europeans with democratic styles of diplomacy) 4 4 4 04/06/98 4 17 17 17 04/06/98 16 7 7 7 04/06/98 7 18 18 18 04/06/98 17 19 19 19 04/06/98 18 Spanish, French, and English Colonies 1.", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DU9SOL": "The average penis size in Canada is larger than the average penis size in the U.S. LOL", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T630144": "Blocks Recording Club Blocks Recording Club is a Canadian co-operative of musicians, which serves as both a collaborative artist community and a record label for its member artists. The label's name may also be cited graphically as ?????? rather than the word 'Blocks'. Owen Pallett, the artist behind the Final Fantasy project, announced that he would donate a significant portion of his prize money to the label to help other artists. Knowles, rapper 50 Cent, rapper P. Diddy, and dancehall artist Sean Paul each had two entries in 2003, either as lead artist or featured guest. With the combined chart run of 'Get Busy' and 'Baby Boy', the latter in which he is featured, dancehall artist Sean Paul became the most successful Jamaican-born artist in terms of chart performance in the 'Billboard' Hot 100. 'Exxon holds a 50 working interest in four ... blocks. Units owned by Petrobras and Eni SPA hold a 25 interest in three of the blocks. Petrobras also owns 50 of one of the bl...", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OEU0D": "Yo, I don't like the genre you write so pls write a different genre. Thanks!", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1LLBZ": " tags: Marxism, Feminism, Society :: 9 Works Cited 2431 words (6.9 pages) Research Papers preview Your search returned over 400 essays for 'puritan society' 1 2 3 4 5 Next  Search Our Free Directory: Please enter the title keyword: Sort By: Most RelevantColor RatingEssay Length Popular Essays  Excellent Essays  Free Essays A-F  Free Essays G-L  Free Essays M-Q  Free Essays R-Z  Essay Topics  Plagiarism  Privacy  Donate a Paper Copyright  2000-2015 123HelpMe.com.All rights reserved.Terms of Service", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH03D3H": "I'll try to help.I am thinking about something right now.See if you can read my thoughts.", "3SR6AEG6W5RE4BZJJW9O5NN7ITTYHJ": "Everyone is different. My advice to anyone interested in running, is to take is slow, and gradually build up. People who do it the fast and hard way (yes, I was one of them at one point in my life too), almost never stick to it (too much pain). So here's the plan:Start by just walking a brisk pace for a half hour. When you're comfortable with that, then do 4 minutes of brisk walking with 1 minute of slow jogging, repeating for the full 30 minutes. Once again, wait until you're comfortable with that before you change to 3 minutes walking with 2 minutes of slow jogging. Continue adding a minute more of jogging, only after you can comfortably do a weeks workout at the previous level. Finally, you'll be jogging the whole 30 minutes. From there, it's up to you as to what you want to do. You'll have good days and bad days, but make sure you listen to your body, and change your workout to how you feel. If you don't and hurt yourself, you'll end up being out much longer.Once ...", "3QQUBC64ZECHE2VKHYIZRTDU2Z9XNM": "Since Nov 2013 , I 've lost 30lbs with diet and consistently training 4-5x a week . The past 3 months I 've hit a plateau and ca n't seem to lose anymore . I go from 125 to 120 , and then back to 125 and I ca n't seem to get under that 120 mark .", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EMLHB": "DONT do lots of cardio, that will slow down results dramatacly. To speed up your weight loss, you should do more of sprinting oriented cardio opposed to boring cardio. (Running for 30min). Also, do workouts the day you do not have cardio. You can check this great fat loss program called Turbulence Training, which will get you results in no time. He explains everything you need to know about your diet, and he gives you the top fat loss programs. While lossing weight as well, never eat less then you should. (If you are hungry dont avoid eating) this will only slow down your metabolism. It also helps to have a cheat meal in one day of the week, which is eating whatever you want (within a good portion) for that one meal of the day. Remember, eat healthy workout with weights the day you dont do cardio, and dont just run for 30min straight same speed, sprint for a minute, then jogg for 2, and keep doing that, and after three rounds then do your speed at whatever pace you want for 5mi", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR0RFB": "Please don't confuse the above Phillipa to me, she even spells her name different to me. I would never type anything like that.", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN05YGCU": "Poop is good . Grow-a-Frog Eco-system Your tadpole feeds by filtering the water it lives in. It does not eat 'meals' such as your frog (and you). It eats all the time. Every time your Growafrog tadpole opens its mouth, it is filtering dissolved microscopic particles out of the water. This is why it is so important to establish the tadpole Eco-system. Stage One tadpole food is made of two parts. One part dissolves instantly for immediate consumption . The other part ( the one that sinks ) in combination with Nutri Sand forms a growth media for live food . This way you can feed your tadpole once a day but food is growing ( and your tadpole is eating ) 24/7. Environmental Cues Your tadpole responds to environmental cues such as the beginning of 'rainy season. ' You can mimic the onset of rainy season in your home by changing about an inch of water in your tadpole's habitat daily. This is very easy to do.", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOF7T1": "The fact that Don had killed Kamini was known only to D'silva, apart from Don himself. The reason is the other bad guys did'nt know Ramesh's fiancee's name. At that time, only I understood that Vijay, the fake Don, is in reality the original Don.", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63SA9U6": "maybe u should check it out just to be safe but check out this site  Brown discharge is just old blood from your uterus. The brown discharge is old blood that your body hasn't gotten rid of yet.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EDYFI": "ANABOLIC STEROIDS DO NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. LONG TERM USE CAN LEAD TO TEMPORARY SHRINKAGE OF THE TESTICLES AND POSSIBLE ERECTILE PROBLEMS BUT THEY WILL NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. Penis Shrinkage the two letters are 'CW' they stand for Cold Water.....The word is penis......Can we say shrinkage boys and girls?", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F1JZ0": "The statement is correct--as far as it goes. but it is incomplete. To usnderstand the attacks oof 'extra-legal' groups from the Muslim world against th eUS (and someother Western countries) you have to go back about 80-100 years. The origins of these groups--and their reliance on terrorism as a strategy, dates to the colonial era. Anti-Western nationalism first emerged as a major force in British-held South Asia prior to WW2, and was directly responsible for the partition of the sub-cntinent into Muslim (Pakistan and Bangladesh) and Hindu (India) countries. The initial modern use of terrorist tacs occured n Algeria in the early 1950s. Freedom fighters attempting to dislodge the French colonial regime, turned to terrorism after other measures failed. That might have been the end of it, except for two things. The first was the abysmally inept handling of the creation of the state of Israel. I think the idea was valid (and still is). but instead of working out a method that in", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF3IAK": "as long as your healthy, your at a perfect weight. The tougher part of weight-gain is how to do it in a healthy manner. If you need to gain weight, it is possible to do so in a healthy manner with the right foods and exercise.", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP78S0": "Yourpet should be seen quicklyby a veterinarian. It is a sure bet that the dog didn't always drag his tail, shake his head, move slowly, and reject fluids (water) as you state in your question. Something is very wrong and needs the emergencyinterventionof an expert.The situationhas gone past the point of just being able topersuade the dog into taking in more fluids. The rejection of waterisa symptomrooted ina more serious problem. The vet has the medical training to properly diagnosis illness, the equipment necessary to conduct a proper exam, and the ability to appropriately treat the animal. Without seeing the vet shortly to receive I.V. fluids, your dog's vital organs and systems will shut down resulting initsdeath. Dying due to chronic dehydration is said to be very painful. If money is an issue, then see if the vet will bill you in installments.", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV69A83A": "When I shaved down there (all my hair) I kinda got the same thing I got these red bumps and they where really itchy but they went away after a while but yours sound more serious you should go see a dick doctor or something", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13K7RQ": "Minor sunburns are 1st degree burns. 1st degree burns are indicated by redness, swelling, and pain. 2nd degree burns redness, blistering, peeling of the skin, and severe pain.", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GCH0Z": "Yes, you can pre-order and purchase books at Amazon.co.uk.You shouldn't have any problem pre-ordering or purchasing books at Amazon.co.uk. Many people do that to take advantage of early release dates or simply to buy the British or international version of a book. I see Dark Days (Skulduggery Pleasant - book 4) (Hardcover) currently listed at Amazon.co.uk for a pre-order price of 8.44  shipping. http://www.amazon.co.uk/Dark-Days-Skulduggery-Pleasant-book/dp/0007325940 8.44  12.79 as of 3 p.m. EST March 5, 2010 You can check exchange rates here: http://www.xe.com/ Alternatively you can sign-up at http://www.amazon.com/Skulduggery-Pleasant-Dark-Days-Tpb/dp/0007325967 to be notified when this book is ready for ordering at the US Amazon site Amazon.com.", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG62J2S": "Here's two excellent pages for you to read - First of all, what to do if you see baby rabbits - from http://www.bio.miami.edu/hare/orphan.html - Unless the mother rabbit is known to be dead, there is a good chance that she is feeding her babies, even if she seems to be ignoring them. A mother rabbit does not constantly tend to her babies the way a mother carnivore does. The House Rabbit Society says this : What If the Baby Bunny Is Injured?", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI66YIA": "If she is getting cut why? also bring her indoors if you suspect other cats are doing this to her. I would use small amounts of original neosporin. But only on areas she cant lick. and have her checked for mange or allergic reactions", "3X4Q1O9UBHK5H8P500EECJ0BQGY7OF": "have them run a liver panel and if that proves to be okay, insist they do a hepatitis c antibody test. chances are there is some sort of virus affecting the chemical balance in the brain. Sounds like you're in a really stressful time at he moment, so that's why it's happening.", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFS3B1": "I'm happy I saw this question, because I recently started using it on my face/body as well. Not all remedies work for everyone. Coconut oil has, fortunately for me, made my skin look amazing in the past 3 weeks I've been using it. Even though it's oil, it won't clog your pores. I'm 23, with terrible acne and years of acne scars. I wash my face twice a day with Burt's Beeswax Peach and Willow Bark Deep Pore Scrub, then follow with coconut oil. Just a little bit, because it does go a long way. I usually wake up almost every day with a new pimple or blemish. My skin has not only significantly cleared up, (I'm talking zero breakouts since I started using it) but the scars have actually faded a little and the pH levels in my skin have balanced, making my very oily skin become normal. I did a ton of research before I used it, and I read that it is possible for the oil to open your pores to force out the bacteria that's in there, and then it will go back to normal.", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRI01L": "There are OBVIOUS differences between Hitler  Franklin Delano Roosevelt. Hitler is considered the most cynical, evil villain of all time. FDR is considered, by most, one of the top ten U.S. Presidents. Do a internet search, using search terms as 'Differences between Hitler  FDR' or 'Fundamentals between WWII leaders'. I don't know what you'll find, but I'm sure you'll find something to help NO, Hitler had a vision and was a wonderful leader who abused his power to become the most evil leader of our time!!!! bush has a vision but is not a good leader... and he has also abused his power!!!! To begin, he wanted one, anybody to think that he was a great leader. Little did everybody realize that Hitler was creating a magnificent plan for complete world power. When it came time for Hitler to rise to the position of Chancellor of Germany, he let out his fury and thus the rage began. One should always remember, eventually bad leaders fall, and good triumphs over evil.", "3LVTFB9DE5GRVDDM8GAC71844KYQG8": "It's hard to get a history for most rescue animals, there are breed pacific rescues. so you can look into those if you have a certian breed in mind.and these are more likely to have a history for the animal. and contary to what some people think it is impossible to tell the breeds of an animal or mixes by looking at them. ther can be a major difference of sibling in the same litter of mix breeds , as well as many breeds that are to simular in type  form. It can take alot of time and work with rescue animals i have several but i got them before they were taken to facility. one is german shepard/ american eskimo mix it took over a year before he would let anyone but me near him. His owner left him chained out side all the time and never did any thing with him, we were both lucky that he happend to take to me. so be prepared for any change in personality could happen just form the shelter to your house good or bad so be patiant and loving if you get rescue animal", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6TBRQ7": "Visual Arts: Educator and conceptual artist Luis Camnitzer, performance artist Coco Fusco, artist and curator Theaster Gates, planning consultant David Hartt, visual artist Edgar Heap of Birds, multimedia artist William Leavitt (artist), sculptor and installation and multimedia artist Allison Saar, and film, video and installation artist Kerry Tribe. Architecture and Design: Architect, engineer, fashion designer, and educator Elena Manferdini, conceptual artist J. Morgan Puett, architectural designer, artist, and educator Jenny E. Sabin, architects and educators Ada Tolla and Giuseppe Lignano, and architect, scholar, and educator Mabel O. Wilson. Crafts and Traditional Arts: Multimedia artist and educator Sonya Clark, artist, designer and blacksmith Tom Joyce, glass artist Beth Lipman, textile artist Jon Eric Riis, ceramist and educator Akio Takamori, and basketmaker Aaron Yakim.", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6V6QM": "Hi, just read a couple of other answers. Another possibility is she may be developing a sensitivity to fleas. Do you give her a good flea med? It is expensive, but Frontline Plus is the best if you can do it. Ask your vet about this. I have a 10 yo neutered male that is beginning to have some problems I haven't totally figured out yet. A vet I consulted said he had allergies. One thing he said would be OK to do is to put Aloe Vera gel on the skin. Get an aloe vera cactus (not expensive-worth it) and break off a little piece of leaf, cut it length-wise to expose the inside gel and you can gently wipe this on the skin. It won't hurt the cat. Might provide some relief. Good Luck. P.S. In response to the answer about arthritis...I think you are probably right that this kitty is irritated and sensitive when touched, but arthritis is caused by a degeneration of the cartilage in the joints. It would not effect the skin on the kitty's back and would not cause dandruff. Always be careful with a", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3B8WZ6": "Not sure if you mean his back near the tail, or his actual 'butt'. Many cats like to be patted/scratched near the base of the tail. If it's his butt that is sensitive, he might have a medical condition and should see a vet. Edit: Since it is the base of the tail, I would say he just likes being scratched there. Both my cats love getting scratched and patted there. My former cat (RIP Penelope) loved it too. However, sometimes cats get 'overstimulated' by too much of a good thing and they start meowing (or even scratching and kicking!). The meowing should be your cue to stop for a little while. As for the dandruff, he likely has it all over, but you only see it in that area since it has been roughed up a little. Regular brushing helps take care of excess dandruff. His skin may also be a little dry and uncomfortable for him. Try switching to a higher quality of food, or put some supplements in his existing food to stimulate oil production in his skin. Ask the clerk at your local pet su...", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SKBDA": "Most dogs need some physical activity to stimulate their bowels to move. So letting her out is not enough. You need to take her for a walk. If you put her on a feeding and toileting schedule, you will know when she needs to poop and if she doesn't then you'll know what's in store if you let her loose in the house. Most dogs need to toilet when they first wake in the morning, during or immediately after play or exercise, and about half an hour after meals. So if you feed and play at the same times each day, then record when she toilets, you'll start to see a pattern of when she needs to go. For example, I know my dogs poop first thing in the morning. They always do, so if someone doesn't and I need to take them out (I train service dogs that must go into stores and such) then I know they can't go until they 'go.' At home it's not an issue for me because I supervise all my dogs. I know if someone is about to toilet inside. I interrupt them and rush them outside to go. There are two criti", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZPQV0": "An initial interim settlement of compensation was approved by Mr Justice John Quirke , who adjourned the case for three years to allow time for legislation to pass which would allow for a more suitable structured settlement . Unfortunately such legislation has not yet been introduced and , at the High Court in Dublin , Ms Justice Mary Irvine was critical of former Ministers of Justice for failing to deliver on their promises of periodic payments for victims of catastrophic medical negligence .", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR76DI": "Santiago: 'Means 'Saint James', derived from Spanish santo 'saint' combined with Iago, an old Spanish form of JAMES, the patron saint of Spain. Cities in Chile and Spain bear this name.' Guenther Mader, Austria, 1:40.55 (51.62  48.93) Alan Deyermond Alan Deyermond FBA (24 February 1932  19 September 2009) was a British professor of Medieval Spanish Literature and Hispanist. His obituary cited him as 'the English-speaking world's leading scholar of medieval Hispanic literature.' He recognised that a comprehensive study of Medieval literature would require several tooks which exist for studies in English but which were lacking for Spanish. His last major book addressed English Literature: he edited A Century of British Medieval Studies for the British Academy (2007). Deyermond founded the Medieval Hispanic Research Seminar (1968) at Westfield, which has come to attract scholars from around the world. He was elected a Corresponding Fellow of the Medieval Academy of America in 1979.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOCY3D": "Hi Yes your right, women can orgasm in many different ways, clitoral, vaginal, nipples, and many different other parts of there body's. Have a read on www,dodsonandross.com Dr Betty Dodson is a guru of female orgasm, your find lots of help on there. Do hope this helps you. Good Luck", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSUE1N": "... He doesn't bark or whine to go out side, we just have to watch for when he is sniffing around. .... My lab puppy is 10 weeks old and she is peeing in her crate fairly often ?? sometimes 20 .... ... 10) ability to hand feed newborn and orphan pups when necessary, ability to .... They may bark occasionally but should not bark incessantly or whine .... Think of your eight week old puppy as a two year old toddler being potty ... .... Really? Who doesn't have pictures of a French bulldog they have had for 3 years. I could .... Week 6: I'm old enough to get my 1st round of puppy shots. My 10 week old Labradoodle puppy is a biting machine. .... Hello, We have a young frenchbulldog, he is a great dog and he loves playtime etc, as soon as we ?... My Bulldog Won't Sit and Stop Jumping on People! ..... Scold her if she does it again and maybe even discipline her with 10 minutes in the kennel.", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACGJBV": "At that time, under the scientific assumptions which turned out to be correct, the summer of 1945 was named as the most likely date when sufficient production would have been achieved to make it possible actually to construct and utilize an atomic bomb.", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1T4R2": "I can only say that I sympathize with you. I broke my back two years ago and in addition to not being able to walk I have this searing, almost constant pain in my left leg that none of my doctors have even bothered to diagnos, let alone treat. At first I was just so angry that doctors could be so heartless, but then I realized that I would just have to be assertive and demand care. So now of course all of my medical records read 'patient was rude and difficult' but that's what you've got to do. I went through 4 different doctors who never did anything to help me, but I finally found one who just today actually said he is going to try some things to get rid of the pain. So, I suggest just being more assertive. And yes, do research so you know exactly what you want the doctor to do, and then ask him to please do it. Of course, most doctors hate it when their patients do reasearch because it forced the doctors to then actually do their jobs, but its the only way you're going to get treated.Switch d", "3W31J70BASUS3YZMTPUWLOBG7MDKCZ": "I read that entire thing, and you didn't blame BUSH??!!! Uh-oh - you will be banished! EVERYTHING is GWB's fault.", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYHSXT": "Light up the TILT its really 20th century socialism. That's when it actually went down in production", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LBSIR": "I never worry about diets. The only carrots that interest me are the number you get in a diamond.", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUCNFK": "It is important for your cat to get used to its surroundings first before introducing it to new cats. Keep the cats separate for a while, maybe keeping your cat in your room - at least a week or so (making sure he has access to food/water/litter/playtime, etc..., of course). Then swap them for a few minutes - let your cat have free reign of the apartment and put your roommate's cats in your bedroom - this is so they can smell each other's scents. Do this a couple more times over the next couple of days. Then it is time to meet in the same room, but only let them meet under supervision from both you and your roommate. If the meeting goes well, do it again for a longer period, and if things continue, it is probably safe to let them all roam free. There might be some hissing here and there, but as long as it doesn't escalate into full fighting or as long as one of the cats doesn't go into hiding because of fear, things should eventually settle down. Good luck.", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPJAB3": "If it feels like a sharp catching pain, it might be a bone spur. They are common and don't always require surgery, but often can be fixed arthroscopically. Maximum pitch counts for various age groups, or for an individual pitchers normal strength and stamina, are effective in preventing overload. Coaches and trainers should be aware that each individual pitcher varies in arm strength, arm fatigue, arm tightness and soreness and require different recovery time needs. Pitchers throw too much and too hard, too early. In a competitive situation, most pitchers will not admit they are fatigued, experiencing minor pain or have a minor injury. My pain level is almost none. While serving, he was sent to pitch for an Army team and felt pain in his arm, but ordered by his commanding officer to pitch through the pain, Beazley severely hurt his arm. Coming out of the service in 1946, he tried in vain to regain his form but was never the same, winning only nine games for the rest of his career...", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52PRY7": "That's ridiculous. Some people just DO N'T LIKE RATS, it doesn't matter what color their skin is. i had two rats.", "3ZCC2DXSD720Q6P8TWDCRNIA8P7YYJ": "Broad Breasted White The Broad Breasted White is commercially the most widely used breed of domesticated turkey. These birds have shorter breast bones and larger breasts, sometimes rendering them unable to breed without human assistance (typically via artificial insemination). They produce more breast meat and their pin feathers are less visible when the carcass is dressed due to their white color.", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63Y415": "spirit shorts Biggie! Haha but looks like athletic shorts by waistband", "3RQVKZ7ZRKHRA100D2GH56X8PB0727": "Your best bet is to see a DR.http://www.clevelandclinic.org/health/health-info/docs/2300/2374.asp?index9127http://menshealth.about.com/cs/menonly/a/cancerpenis.htmhttp://cms.clevelandclinic.org/urology/body.cfm?id66", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q1ZYD9": "The penalty reaches 25 five months after the failure to file happens. Since there are 6 ways that can happen, we add them up, P(two of one, one of other)  6/8 3/4 It is possible, but unlikely. At today's tax rates, that's a near impossibility, but if tax rates rise by the time you retire, it could happen.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV6L2V": "For this reason I am very glad that my children have been given the proper information that they may some day need in deciding whether this is an activity that they want to participate in. Why do teenagers think they know more than adults? Another important difference is that adults frequently must apply their knowledge in some practical fashion in order to learn effectively there must be a goal and a reasonable expectation that the new knowledge will help them further that goal. Why aren't flat heads seen in adults? The current adult population is from an era when the incidence in plagiocephaly was only 1 in 300 infants. This lower rate?... The skin has to be cleansed properly with a branded face wash and should be moisturized regularly to prevent cracks in the skin. Acne treatments for adults are different from treatments for teens.", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVRSQT": "I don't think you are over wait. Probably all the weight is coming from all the muscle you have. Muscle weighs more then fat does. So i don't think so. As long as you eat right and excercise then i think you are in great shape.", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QZY7J": "I am so sorry , accidents do happen , I hope your daughter isnt taking this to hard . My prayers go out to you and your family . They are a Guinea pig medical board and you will find VERY good advice there . Everyone has the right to make an ass out of themselves . You ca n't let the world judge you too much .", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y6IWV": "Jul 17, 2015 ... ?aby Tears?? is one of the most popular aquarium plants available and is ... things that you feel you have to do before you die to make your life complete. ... K... I purchased the book you recommended (The Complete Aquarium by Peter Scott ) ... I have heard that plants that are rooted do not do as well in sand because it is ... including sna... Nov 9, 2011 ... I love a green aquarium? ?ot green in the algae-covered, pea soup kind ... We all know that there are many types of aquarium plants, from slow growing Anubias to .... I am wondering which plants are okay for betta fish. ... Should I try the Malechite green? ..... We could not agree more about keeping Bettas in larger aquariums, ... How Does Megashares Work? Select the file or files you wish to upload. Choose the options best suited for your upload (password protect, description, email notification)", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE01SJ4": "Hi, not only should you eat dinner, but you need to eat a little bit more in your day than what you have listed here. Or at least eat some actualy healthy foods, I am not sure if you are trying to lose weight or just eat heathy or both, but you have alot of sugar on your plate with that cerealAnd you need more water than just 2 water bottle filled per day. And if you eat a sub every single day, that isn't heathy nor will it make you lose weight. And if you are trying to lose weight, then you also need to workout and also you might want to have a variety of meals because this would get boring if you eat it everyday. Add some more water and some veggies and fruit. Yes, you need to eat dinner, Hope this will help you, GL", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVB915": "Testing for weed http://www.marijuana.org/BeatDrugTesting.htm  what drugs have u done lately maybe a drug u have done 8 months ago was laced with some pcp maybe not enough for u to have the effects of it but maybe just enough for a positive test, have u been on any medications some medications may make u test positive for illegal drugs. If you only took a few hits, and you have never done it before - you should have no problems passing the test since it is more than a month later.", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF5YWEZ": "3 people found this useful Edit Share to: Answered In Slugs and Snails How many times a day do you feed a snail?you do not nescarrrilary feed your snail more than once a day because you are supposed to stcik lettuce, cucumbers, kiwi, strawberries, etc in its habitat, and leave it there. always replace food the next day with new food.good luck.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MO0VNG": "Well of course, however I paint them Pink and put fluffy hair on the end, they look FAB", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXML0B": "Health, Medicine and Natural Healing 05 Not recommended on shared computers Sign In Sign Up what about adult with plagiocephaly? Here you will find a collection of articles on Health, Ayurveda, Yoga, and Natural Healing. Please read through the articles, and if you have any questions visit our discussion forums to post your queries for others to answer. ...Thank you for visiting. what about adult with plagiocephaly? Started by guest, 4 posts in this topic guest  I just recently realized that my facial and head asymmetry was caused by positional plagiocephaly (mainly back sleeping, and I recall my mom mentioned that she let me spent extensive time on the bed in the first three months of my life because she was too busy then). Its sad that at that time few people were aware of this problem so its never treated. So now I am adult living with this distress caused mainly by facial asymmetry. (the head asymmetry is less noticeable and easier to hide with longer hair). So my question is", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9TJEV": "This is all based on the formula: Distance  Rate x Time. You are trying to find time, but only have one known--Rate. So we need to solve for D, then substitute D to get Time. They both run for the same amount of time, so we need to rewrite the DRT formula to express it in time: T  D/R Amy's rate is 10 y/s. Josh's Rate is 7 y/s. D/10  (D-15)/7 Multiply both sides by 70 to clear fractions. Place green beans in ice water to stop cooking process drain well and set aside. Especially when the referee stopped the game and the dutch didnt give the ball back to Portugal. It would have been the perfect time for him to come in. But, Im glad he didnt. One more word as far as the referee is concerned: he sucked!! In Decos red card, when he stopped the game when Portugal was attacking (because of a player who was injured - he should have waited until the attack was over), and so on...", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAZKYB": "What To Do On Vacations: When you go on vacations without your guinea pig be sure your guinea pig has plenty of water, food, hay, and a clean cage. Make sure your guinea pig's cage is closed before you leave. If you go on a long vacation without your guinea pig you should ask someone to watch your guinea pig until you get back.", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618YSH0": "It might be a solution if there is this type of facility in your area.You also could rest easy knowing someone is always there since you can't be.I hope this helps.", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LATBX9": "ur in a gym bathroom keep that shit to yourself. Learn some etiquette, m8.", "3WJGKMRWVI7KPSTC1889HBGQNDKCDI": "J-lo or Apple Bottoms are made for girls with a more fuller bottom.", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EK36J": "I honestly dont remember. And I honestly dont even remember what specific events led up to my swallowing so many pills in the first place. I dont remember the specific moment when a suicidal notion became a suicidal action. Like many folks, I live on an Im OK/Im not OK emotional spectrum. But even my best Im OK days bring some thought (or more than one thought) about how I might end my life. So consider this tally: There were approximately 8,030 days between the time my 15-year-old self held a steak knife to her wrist, and the time my 37-year-old self swallowed handfuls of Tylenol. Exactly 8,030 days, and I probably contemplated suicide on every single one of them. Im almost 40 years old and Ive spent more than half of my life not actually wanting to be alive. To Live Or Not To Live? That Is The Question The language of suicide is tricky.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559UMZ5": "Without any doubt whatsoever, the most important person in US history is George Washington due to the fact that Washington, as leader of the Continental Army was the only reason there was still a Continental Army at the end of the war. Had Washington not accepted the position of Commander of the Continental Army, the Continental Congress would have chosen someone much less qualified and much less charismatic, and the army would have undoubted disintegrated, but only after many lost battles. Thus the United States would have been crushed by the british army, and would not exist today. Basically, without Washington, there would be no U.S. history to speak of.", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RHMUI": "Hi I think one has a hemorroid, you should get to your doctor, let him/her have a look see what they say. Do hope this helps. Good Luck", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2AEFL": "Hound you to death.", "35NNO802AVUKO76PICIYOJQFEM4NIB": "Statute law is written law enacted by a person or a body empowered by the Constitution or other legislation to do so. The Interpretation Act defines it as 'any law, proclamation, ordinance, Act of Parliament or other enactment having the force of law.' The Constitution of South Africa, which has the force of supreme law, and as such sets the standards and requirements for the construction and construal of statutes, also provides a definition of statute law, distinguishing between national and provincial legislation: There are a large number and variety of statutes in South Africaincluding Acts, ordinances, proclamations, by-laws, rules and regulations.", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJ6P37": "I'm a Senegal Parrot. I was on daddy's shoulder  he went outside  I got spooked for some unknown reason.", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9AQAUK": " Otto I or Frederick Barbarossa? :This process obeys rules that depend on the astrologer's sensitivity and experience but it also has precise and steady bases: thus, we can take into account the parameters of a planet's activity (the number of active aspects a planet forms, the importance of each aspect according to its nature and its exactness), angularity parameters (proximity to the four angles, Ascendant, Midheaven, Descendant and Imum Coeli or Nadir, all of them being evaluated numerically, according to the kind of angle and the planet-angle distance) and quality parameters (rulership, exaltation, exile and fall).Finally, other criteria such as the rulership of the Ascendant and the Midheaven etc.are important.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWNTAG": "If you haven't had any sexual contact, then I do not believe you could have genital warts. However, there are conditions that could be responsible for these, and you really won't know for sure unless a doctor checks them, and I know at age 14 that is the last thing you want to have done! But, I did find this on the internet, there is a condition called mollusca and maybe it will be of some help:   Mollusca usually do have some distinguishing characteristics that allow dermatologists and other health care professionals to diagnose them on sight. They are typically small (about 2 to 5 millimeters across), skin-colored bumps that appear either singly or in groups on the face, neck, chest, stomach, and groin area. Mollusca are harmless, painless, and itch-free bumps that are caused by a pox virus. Mollusca can be spread to other areas on one's self, or to others, by direct contact with the infected skin. These bumps are most often seen on children, especially those who have asthma or e", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GR5JD": "Try to be a rainbow in someone's cloud.", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1E0NA8": "Maybe you are a hypocondriacfrom the looks of all your previous questions( 60 about health). Stop waisting my time as I have no time for timewaisters like you. See I told you you have a small mind. I have now more time for creeps like yourself, so go jump in the ocean. No I did not end up haveing hogkins disease. I had to rule it out as my Auntie had breast cancer, and cancer does not discriminate, not does death. And yes I do know where I am going, do you? Yes if I die, I will be in teh arms of my loving Father, and also I have 3 kids up there. At least when I go and see my children I make sure that I am in a positvie mood. And most of the time I am. I admitt that. You have your interests and I have mi ne. So I will have one of my kids back in a few years. I will work on my hate, you have to work of yours. If I am raptured you will now know expecially if am am not. I am willing to stop insulting you, but it sounds like you have a lot of hatred in your heart. THIS WOMAN HAS LOST THE PLOT!!", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0T3C9": "most places any where from 45.00 to 90.00 but if you live in the tri citys take it to bluntville at doc jones he only charges 35.00 for cats and i think 45.00 for dogs", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE03JSX": "'About 6- a year ago my step mother gave away my cat on craigs list without permission. During the divorce with my father at this tie' What does 'about 6- a year ago' and 'with my father at this tie' mean? It is never fun to show up for your dream chair, only to discover that the back is shredded and it smells like cat pee. ... I mean, yes by itself it is not a good idea, but what if someone is looking for .... Annette 05.03.2014 at 06:55... The cat will die sooner or later, and at that point the demon will have to exit the cat anyway. But if you really feel the need to liberate the cat from the oppression of the demon, then just kill the cat and speed the process along. I assume you already checked your local pound. Other wise there isn't much you can do. Collars and tags are pretty cheap, just the cat name and a phone  is advised even if you don't plan on letting the cat outside.", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JRORWGTB": "If part of the blood clot in the leg breaks off, it will float up to the heart and then get stuck ..... Depending on other issues, some patients must stay on the blood thinner. ..... Can you please help me to understand what that is? Please, if anyone out there knows anything about this condition, pass the information along to me. ... One Dr. refused to treat me at all after finding drugs in my U.A. I ... Then, they won't have any stones to throw when I come up with a?... Dec 16, 2003 ... As stated, the nerves which supply feeling to your legs come from the ... your activities at home for 24 to 48 hours to allow the medicine a chance to do its work. It is just amazing when you read the comments from other people, and it is like ... The first sign of nerve damage may be in numbness or tingling in the hands, legs and feet. ...", "3MZ3TAMYTLL535YHBJZFX3VPFJUIRV": "Wow them b I tches are stupid because I have a cousin who is black/white his mom is white and he looks complety black with bader hair than me and I'm black and I've seen black mothers with half white children and they look like panamas indians and some look straight up white it depends who's genes are strongeras for black/asian black/indian almost the same I have jet black family members with blonde/brown hair and blue eyes green even grey eyes kinda like my own I had a debate with blk girls because my boyfriend is mexican typical indian ones and they said my baby will never look black because the dads genes are always stronger which is not true in this case as for mixed looking peeps mariah carey kimora lee vanessa williams sean paul (well his parents already mixed black/chinese black/portuguese ) and I can add tiger woods which parent is the asian I think his mom is daddy I guess is black", "3O71U79SRBN303OLBNXCF672IUXMS3": "Without an urgent bone marrow transfusion, McFall would soon die. McFall's first cousin, a 42-year-old crane worker named David Shimp, was the only available bone marrow match for McFall at the time, but Shimp refused to donate his bone marrow, which would have dramatically increased the odds of saving McFall's life (with Shimp's bone marrow donation, doctors estimated that McFall would have had a 50 to 60 chance of surviving). McFall then sued Shimp in order to force him to donate his bone marrow, but when the case ended up in court, Judge John P. Flaherty Jr. stated that Shimp's position was 'morally indefensible,' but simultaneously refused to force Shimp to donate his bone marrow.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMES7EB": "Sarah Swann is a teacher of English at . She worked as a research fellow at the University of Leeds on a three year project examining prospects for urban youth across Europe, funded by the . She is the author of and co-author of . This content is brought to you by . Looking for your next role? Take a look at for thousands of the latest teaching, leadership and support jobs.", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVDB1G": "average but thick penis Nothing. He was cute here There was NOTHING wrong with this http://t", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9AUUA8": "Here in this prison made of ocean and sea - Is the last regrets , of Lapis Lazuli . ) Evelyn Evelyn -  Have You Seen My Sister , Evelyn ? '' - Oberon , Cambridge MA Evelyn Evelyn -  Have You Seen My Sister , Evelyn ? '' - Oberon , Cambridge MA Have You Seen My Sister , Evelyn ? Performed by conjoined twin sisters Evelyn Evelyn Neville at Oberon Theater in Cambridge , MA Presented by The Great Sxiphi ...   Evelyn Evelyn -  You Only Want Me 'Cause You Want My Sister '' - Oberon , Cambridge MA Evelyn Evelyn -  You Only Want Me 'Cause You Want My Sister '' - Oberon , Cambridge MA You Only Want Me 'Cause You Want My Sister Performed by conjoined twin sisters Evelyn Evelyn Neville at Oberon Theater in Cambridge , MA Presented by The Gr ...", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAJIGZ": "all puppies nip...wash your hands but some antibiotic oitment on it and you will be just fine.....then give her to a home that knows about GSD's because she needs love and attention and especially training...wake up! Maybe have a fun toy in your hand when she goes for your ankles. And get just as excited as she it about biting your ankles. Let her know that she can nip and bite at this new toy and not your ankles and just how much fun it is! Something like a stuffed animal? Especially by the person you love and adore. The treatment he was on combined with the cancer caused him to totally stop eating. It did help some, especially the cat nip, but i've found that with both of my kitties (Rocky, the 11 yr old who passed away from cancer four years ago and Cheska my 15 yr old that i have now) i can always get them eating again when they lose their appetite by putting some warm/hot water in a shallow bowl and sprinkling some dry food in the water, making a kind of a broth.", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFNTWO": "they wore metal armors and protected the castles from other freaks that tried attacking and taking it over.go watch black knight  What may be relevant to you, may not be to others since we all have differences in so many areas. I'm not sure they were ever that relevent.", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC2E4Y": "Hello,, you should have put antibiotic salve around your earrings and twisted them as often as you could think of it, right after you got them pierced. It helps the hole heal faster and keeps your ears from getting infected. I hated the stuff they gave me to use when I got my ears pierced. This may sound silly,, but since your ear is swollen,, have you tried putting the earring in,, going in from the back first?? Sometimes if I've had my earrings off for a month or so , I have to do this to get the back of my earring hole to open up. I've had my ears pierced for years so mine don't grow back together. And putting ice on your ear to numb it is a really good idea, if it's causing that much pain. Thats how we used to numb our ears to pierce them way back when I got mine pierced. Once you get it back in,, be sure to put antibiotics around the back and front of your ear, and. Then, I'd get some gold earrings. If I wear anything else it causes my ears to get sore and swell. Hope this helped and gl", "3TKXBROM5T8O5HF43EQ6VC9Y52WJI0": "For a moment I thought it was nail polish Jammed my finger in the door! Unbelievable pain. http://t.co/ZE9k3Q4ln6", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQBDFT": "If you suffer from extreme migraine pain, the best thing to do to get rid of the pain fast is to go to theE. D of your nearest hospital and ask for a drug called Toradol. It is an injection given in the third stage of pain killers that will get rid of the pain, 100 guaranteed. You will need someone to drive you home. Toradol is a strong pain reliever. After that make an appointment with a neurologist. There are medications available to help reduce the intensity and frequency of migraines. Also make sure you have a prescription for one of the medications in the 'Triptan' family. It would also help to have a migraine journal. Document what you were doing, eating, weather, where you were, etc. This can help to pinpoint migraine triggers. If you can avoid your triggers you can avoid the migraine.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHT1VLF": "Please go to your Gyno. They would know best. Plus if its something harmful then it can be taken care of. But if its just your anatomy it can be explained to you at your benefit. Good luck!", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV1ON5": "tough choice between Genghis Khan, Alexander the Great, Napolean, and Hitler. Genghis Khan intervened in the campaign and appointed gedei as the commander of the operation. To settle the matter, Genghis Khan called the political and military council called a 'kurultai'. These meetings were key to Genghis Khan legitimacy. At that meeting, Genghis Khan made it clear that Jochi was his legitimate first-born son. By early 1223 Genghis Khan had selected gedei, his third son, as his successor. During the autumn of 1223 Genghis Khan started for Mongolia after completing the Khwarezm campaign. When Genghis Khan returned home he sent for Jochi. Following the Mongol custom, Genghis Khan bequeathed only four thousand original Mongol troops to each of his three elder sons and 101,000 to Tolui, his youngest son. Genghis Khan had made Jochi responsible for the supervision and conduct of the community hunt. Genghis Khan brushed aside this argument and had the captive executed.", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65VPKL": "HELL YEAH. BE HAVING CRYING LIKE WHY LORD WHY", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6JTVC": "You already have some good answers here, so I'll just add a little bit. Prior to Augustus, Rome was in chaos from civil war and a republican government that was so prone to infighting, greed and class warfare that it simply could no longer deal with the problems of the day. Augustus ended the Republic and replaced it with the Empire, concentrating supreme power in the emperor, thereby ending all sources of infighting. He then when on to institute a series of reforms to deal with the other problems. His rule was long and successful, and it started the Pax Romana which, which brought almost two centuries of peace and prosperity to Rome.", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7LP0B": "My face gets all hot and flushed. Faces in lumpy red or greenish gold. The exhibit ''Dancing Demons: Ceremonial Masks of Mongolia'' displays the fabulous - and rare - dance masks in all their splendor at the Asia Society starting Wednesday. Later, one of the most striking masks appears. With the cartoonish face of an old Mongolian man, the character known as the White Old Man has a wrinkled face and a bushy white beard made of horse hair and cotton. Later there's a mask with three bulging eyeballs, a lumpy red face made of coral and a five-skull tiara. Then there's a relatively harmless-looking deer mask with a leopard-spot face and a wagging tongue made of red silk filled with millet grains. Yama finally shows his wonderfully scary face as the dramatic finale of the Tsam - and of the exhibit. --- On the Net: www.asiasociety.org Red blood cells when combined with Oxygen turns bright red, un oxygenated blood is a deeper red almost purple, hence the feeling it is called blue.", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOGBW3B": "Right doenst matter if you can weight bear or not you can still have a fracture off the metatarsals (foot) ,swelling is sometimes a sign off a fracture but not always,it could be the muscles and ligaments in the foot you have badly bruised.To find out what injury you have part from a cut you need to get yourself to your gp or A/E for an x-ray,the dr will then decide what further treatment you will need.Also when was the last time you had a tetnus jab,as you may have to have one off these too.Good Luck And they still x ray toes  in my hospital they dont just send you hame and tell you to rest.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUOWRC": "I don't twitch when I'm with other people..", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW6106O8L": "Historical context can influence the style and structure of the text (where the author is responding to contemporary fashions or ideas), as well as the themes and settings of the books. Examples demonstrating this include:  (1) STYLE: the style of literary works often follow the particular style of the times. Different literary styles are typical of different times: sensational styles in novels (such as Wilkie Collins's 'Woman in White') were popular in the 1860s and 1870s. So, this popular way of writing in the particular historical period gave rise to particular literary works. (2) STRUCTURE/FORM: modes of production tied to historical context have also influenced the form which literature takes. In the second half of the 18th century the novel became a popular and accepted literary form. Production such as serial releases of novels supported the rise of this form of literature. (3) THEMES AND SETTINGS: themes are frequently influenced by the historical context in which the author", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPICE8": "Being touted as 'your chance to re-live your high school days,' Brooktown High places the gamer in the shoes of either a male or female high school student. This character is customizable, to some extent - hair style and color, eye color, height and weight are editable. Questions at the beginning of the game categorize the player into one of the social cliques.", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR4I8H": "Timmy and Lester can wait....", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606R7NY": "there is no scope for electronics its the category which is not consider as a very good category.try some engineering or something", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK1Z79": "11hrs or one of your work weeks.", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V0Z4DT": "Yes, they can be spayed while in heat. Because of the swelling in the blood vessels, it is more time consuming and a slightly higher risk, but they do it all the time. Oh, they do charge more if it's in heat.", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZV1PU": "Who as Pope depends on the year:  1. St. Peter (32-67) 2. St. Linus (67-76) 3. St. Anacletus (Cletus) (76-88) 4. St. Clement I (88-97) 5. St. Evaristus (97-105) 6. St. Alexander I (105-115) 7. St. Sixtus I (115-125) 8. St. Telesphorus (125-136) 9. St. Hyginus (136-140) 10. St. Pius I (140-155) 11. St. Anicetus (155-166) 12. St. Soter (166-175) 13. St. Eleutherius (175-189) 14. St. Victor I (189-199) 15. St. Zephyrinus (199-217) 16. St. Callistus I (217-22) 17. St. Urban I (222-30) 18. St. Pontain (230-35) 19. St. Anterus (235-36) 20. St. Fabian (236-50) 21. St. Cornelius (251-53) 22. St. Lucius I (253-54) 23. St. Stephen I (254-257) 24. St. Sixtus II (257-258) 25. St. Dionysius (260-268) 26. St. Felix I (269-274) 27. St. Eutychian (275-283) 28. St. Caius (283-296) 29. St. Marcellinus (296-304) 30. St. Marcellus I (308-309) 31. St. Eusebius (309 or 310) 32. St. Miltiades (311-14) 33. St. Sylvester I (314-35) 34. St. Marcus (336) 35. St. Julius I (337-52) 36. Liberius (352-66) 37. St.", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W9IOL": "That really helped make labor easy for me, and when it comes to pushing the baby out, it's not as bad as you may think, especially if you get pain meds b/c you won't feel anything but the pressure of the baby coming out.Good luck! !You will be just fine.", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E6AMB1": "Yo I sprained my foot and ankle 3, almost 4 weeks ago and this jawn still isn't fully healed. I still somehow have swelling and slight pain", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54KEB5": "My husband and I registered over 8 years ago and still haven't been contacted. It takes much more than just a blood type to become a match though.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4JQER": "went from having a cold to having an ear infection in my left ear to having a ear infection in my right ear to having an eye infection ?", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2DM0F": "Google likes new content and puts it high at the ranking pages but after that this spike of traffic will drop . I 'm here for six weeks and I have made a little bit of money but I am assuming you mean a steady flow of money . That can indeed take months . it varies for everyone here . sometimes your most unlikely hubs will be money makers .", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUANFI": "Hawke Scope XB1 Crossbow Scope 1.5-5x32 Crossbow MAP Reticle Scope HK3257 These crossbow scopes are high... http://t.co/qhgFiLjVee", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZO8Y39": "you are now in your third trimester of pregnancy . it must be advisable to take diet like low salt /sodium . , regular exercise is also advise like walking or pelvic rock exercises , go to your obsterician for safer medicine for your macular edema. The most common systemic diseases that are associated with edema involve the heart, liver, and kidneys. In these diseases, edema occurs primarily because of the body's retention of too much salt (which is the chemical compound sodium chloride). The lifetime risk for diabetics to develop macular edema is about 10. The condition is closely associated with the degree of diabetic retinopathy (retinal disease). So your chances are around 10 that you will get it. If you've got macular edema but your vision isn't affected, it's probably not anything to be tremendously worried about yet. Are you being referred to a specialist for further evaluation or treatment?", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQMERH": "nullAs I look ahead of myself on the list and see the massive number of coins that the big three have I doubt that I will ever catch them unless they just quit answering questions. This is especially so since some people have started to reach level four where the bonus coin payout gets pretty impressive. On the other hand it must be said that maintaining a high ranking is hard work and requires a lot of time so I have no doubt that some of the top ten will eventually burn out and disappear. For example I havent noticed Chief on here in ages so eventually he will be pushed out of the top ten unless he comes back soon. The bottom of the list does change on occasion and just recently Joe C. moved into the tenth spot. I expect that you should keep an eye on him as I expect him to continue to climb in the rankings. One more factor to keep in mind is the fact that superpowers have only been introduced for levels one and two.", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1E1ANW": "Pubic Hair Removal - Shaving Pubic Hair For pubic hair removal, shaving is most utilized. Whether you're a male or female, get a fresh razor and follow these steps to avoid in-grown hairs and infections which feel itchy and appear as painful bumps. Sit in a chair with your feet up above your waist and legs spread apart.", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF0XJE": "So to find out that I am between 5-8  black was a bit of a shock in a good way honestly-all the things they said I was for they could shut up about as their supposedly arguments that were wrong for all humanity reasons were wrong on their own point of views However , back to this argument- what if you research in an academic class- and I am not demeaning personal research as they both have their positives but I am a history major for African history and was previously for African American is that many African Americans that were light skinned enough to pass but not quite as white would say that they had native american ancestors but were white . so many of the white families that have the stories are going to find out that they really have a beautiful African queen .", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U461S": "none of your problems sound related. I've had TMJ for years and never had chest/arm pain. Go see a doctor. Considering that you are obese you will want to make sure that you arent having mini strokes", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRRCOF": "Rapid heart beat may come from many causes, but because there are so many other symptoms along with it, a trip to the doctor is probably a good idea. At worst, you will find out that something is going wrong, and you will get it taken care of before it gets worse. At best, you will find out that you are perfectly all right, and the peace of mind will be worth the effort and time.", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZS156": "Ask Experts Articles Encyclopedia Blogs Tickers Search Register FAQ Log in Vaginal discharge The time now is 04/30/07 - 17:38 SteadyHealth.com - Health Topics Forum Index - Cancer - Do I Have Cancer? Search forums for: Did you find posts in this topic useful? Author Message pretty Newbie Joined: 10 Aug 2006 Posts: 4 Posted: 08/10/06 - 10:07 Post subject: Vaginal discharge --------------------------------------. Hi, I'm 35 years old and notice during the time I'm about to have a bowel movement as I push thick,clear discharge comes out of my vaginal area. whats wrong wit My 18 month old neice doesn't seem to have a vaginal opening increased clear vaginal discharge, pregnant? Gall Bladder / Vaginal Legions depo injection and brown vaginal discharge white bumps on vaginal area. Pink. confusion!! having discharges when i pee and have sex nipple discharge, the pill white discharge. Period 2 days late! Then brown discharge! White discharge from my vagina been tied 3 year ago now missed a m", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B076KY": "Tarantulas , like almost all other spiders , have their primary spinnerets at the end of the opisthosoma . Unlike most spider species in the suborder , which includes the majority of extant spider species , and most of which have six , tarantula species have two or four spinnerets . Spinnerets are flexible tubelike structures from which the spider exudes its silk . The tip of each spinneret is called the spinning field .", "3P7RGTLO6EB4AJ2O9BY5FTLS7JWAKR": "that sound like a good idea too lol but I got it", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDXWJN": "They will deduct Federal Taxes, Social Security Tax, Medicare, and depending on your state of residence, State Taxes. Depending on the number or exemptions you claim on your W-4, will determine how much Federal taxes are deducted. Also you will be paying a small amount for the Soldiers and Sailors Home, and your SGLI insurance. Opinion 2: Are you sure they pay 2.50?? I worked for them in high school which was about 5 yrs ago. I was paid 6.00/hr and would recieve additional tips. It was actually pretty great. Generally on busy days, I would go home with 100-200 and I would make anywhere from 20-60 on slow days.", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR78IA": "probably food allergies which is the biggest problem that causes skin problems in dogs. Get it off food with corn in it. give a bath in an oatmeal bath to help with the itching", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO5Y4V": "totally!! She looks like mine! ttp://t.co/plH2eWcIKx", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL45WL5V": "National Show Horse The National Show Horse, (NSH), originated as a part-Arabian cross between an American Saddlebred and an Arabian horse. It is now established as a separate breed, since the founding of a breed registry in August 1981. Registered animals today may be the offspring of registered NSH parents or may be a combination between an American Saddlebred, Arabian, and a National Show Horse.", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKRN1H": "Depends on how that person is. On average I would say 50-100 dollars for a combined gift. 100 Wilt Chamberlain 81 Kobe Bryant 78 Wilt Chamberlain (3OT) 73 David Thompson 73 Wilt Chamberlain 73 Wilt Chamberlain 72 Wilt Chamberlain 71 David Robinson 71 Elgin Baylor 70 Wilt Chamberlain This covers all 70 pt games in NBA history. Kobe's recent 81 pt explosion marked the 56th time a player has scored 60 pts in an NBA game...", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE5O49": "Were thugs/bullies and need help, I PRAY DAILY FOR US! If your not ashamed to be American go open some history books. Love the question though) Keep up the good work. It's very cool, but we need your help, too. Please try to answer as many questions as you can, because we can't possibly answer all of them by ourselves. has promised to donate 50,000 to the Natural History Museum here in NYC if we can answer and resolve 50,000 questions as a community. Scouting in Delaware Scouting in Delaware has a long history, from the 1910s to the present day, serving thousands of youth in programs that suit the environment in which they live. In the Boy Scouts of America, the state of Delaware is entirely within the Del-Mar-Va Council. The first troop in Delaware was established in 1915 at Mount Zion Lutheran Church in Wilmington, Delaware. The only Girl Scout council in Delaware, it serves not only the entire state of Delaware but also portions of Maryland and Virginia that make up the Delmarv...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PEOH8M": "Had it been possible to revise the whole book at one time , and if the pressure of other duties had permitted me to devote more time to the work , these blemishes might have been eliminated and a coherent story made out of what is little more than a collection of data and tags of comment . No one is more conscious than the writer of the inadequacy of this method of presenting an argument of such inherent complexity as the dragon story : but my obligation to the Rylands Library gave me no option in the matter : I had to attempt the difficult task in spite of all the unpropitious circumstances .", "3RKHNXPHGWUOPSGMFGFWFUXMEMJUKI": "Nope, won't do!!!! Tell her you are not happy by her taking your daughter to elocution lessons and say to her that if she really cared about her and loved her that she wouldn't want to change her accent if she was happy and healthy! 'If you want to change her when she's happy and healthy and her accent is fine as it is, then obviously you don't really care about her' Is what I'd tell her. Say what ever you can to stop her. I wouldn't change my child's accent when he/she was happy and healthy and their OWN was fine.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGMYB1": "Good luck.Reply Mariagrazia December 25th, 2013 I started using Almased but every time I drank the shake I got a headache and I got scared so I stopped it.You mention in your feedback about the possibility of getting a headache so I think I will give it another try.", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE02SJ5": "You should get a higher dose of your meds or have your doctor put you on something else. Your meds might not be effective enough or making your symptoms worse. Maybe your doc isn't doing a very good job, and you should switch doctors.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVAQMPN": "Bulalo... utilizes beef bone marrow.... If you wan the recipe, let me know by adding a comment to your question..", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF6OYW": "In historiography, the term Dark Ages or Dark Age most commonly refers to the European Early Middle Ages, the period encompassing (roughly) 476 to 1000. In Britain and the United States, the term Dark Ages has occasionally been used by professionals, with severe qualification, as a term of periodization. The age before their own, which Petrarch had labeled dark, had thus become a 'middle' age between the classic and the modern. edit The Dark Ages concept after the Renaissance Main article: Middle Ages in history Historians prior to the 20th century wrote about the Middle Ages with a mixture of positive and negative, but mostly negative sentiment. In spite of. To many users of the term, the scope of the Dark Ages was becoming divorced from this period, now denoting mainly the earlier centuries after the fall of Rome. It was not invented until the age was long past. The dwellers in the Middle Ages would not have recognized it. if it was dark, it was the darkness of the womb. '4  Lynn White", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LCSIS": "try  this ideal weight calculator, based on age, gender and height. It gives  you the per cent of people heavier than you, too. And shows you how you compare to others: http://www.halls.md/ideal-weight/body.htm", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZEAO4E": "The painting is called Rose.'' It is a miniature (3.5'' x 4.25'') oil on panel done in 2003. Awe, you get the picture.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGE1CE": "Through her, Train learns to love and care for other people as he too becomes a sweeper and travels with his partner Sven and the mysterious girl Eve. Katekyo Hitman Reborn! : Tsuna is a hapless youth with low test scores and lower self esteem. She will make me think that she is hungry, but all that's doing is making me follow her into my room to give her some attention. I know that you said that she will try something and then not eat any of it later. ( Have a fat cat?) Also, Most of the moisture a cat needs is suppose to be in the food but in Dry, 95 of it is zapped out of dry foods in the processing.", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VVCXJ": "Hi Was this test at your doctor or at an STD/GUM Clinic? , if it was not the second one, then get there, the staff are trained in this side of life. Good Luck The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. Choose as Best Answer", "3XUY87HIVPC028BGRQ1Q3X8WQ5DMMP": "She might just be pregnant with one fry. Or maybe she gave birth before you saw this one fry. Give her some time. Have as little stress as possible on her. Turn of the lights in the tank and room. Keep an eye on her and just check your tank for fry. If you have her in a breeders net, take her out. Breeders nets/breeding boxes are very stressful.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVAQPMQ": "I should n't scatach like that caz I have done the same thing for infinite times ... ...   sheepdin . Im not trying to should like an asshole or anything . Just curious ... are you a FOB ? : confused : u know i am so angry and type without think man hehe ... yeah i understand , it would piss me off too : p hehe i feel ur pain.. , i did the same thing in my old accord hehe..", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9A42K": "not exaclty sure but eBay? garfield.com? Amazon? buy.com?----possibilities are endless, really", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69P0474": "Honey, you're 14 so your cycles are likely not regulated yet...so don't fret too much about not having your period since December. The symptoms you've just described is exactly how I am about a week before I actually begin my period (1st day of bleeding.) Its hard to say how long it'll be until your body regulates its cycles. It could be mere months, or years. Heck, I'm 29 years old and I've still yet to have a regular period (though I have three beautiful children, one on the way....so it wont necessarily make you infertile lol.)", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5VF9D": "(get crazy with the cheese whiz) Soy un perdedor Im a loser baby, so why dont you kill me? (Im a driver, Im a winner things are gonna change I can feel it) Soy un perdedor Im a loser baby, so why dont you kill me? (I cant believe you) Soy un perdedor Im a loser baby, so why dont you kill me? Soy un perdedor Im a loser baby, so why dont you kill me? (schprechen sie deutches, baby) Soy un perdedor Im a loser baby, so why dont you kill me? also think about how many people it effects every time you do it.what if your mom and dad found out dont you think they would feel bad that their daughter cut herself rather than just talking to them about your promblems if it helps you stop, think of not cutting yourself as not being selfish or i really dont reccomend it cause my cousin has problems like this and medications helped but in the end she really had to want to stop but you could see a pyscights and get anti-depressants for it In order to do that ...", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP55P2V": "Katie a few seconds ago Hi there!! Just wondering if you have any problems with your school work. We've got plenty of people who can help you here :) Also, my last question was answered in less than 10 minutes :D Anyway, you can just go ahead and try for yourself.", "3ZCC2DXSD720Q6P8TWDCRNIA8P3YYF": "There is no connection between the two I see my TD merchant is still on half term.....................   Opinion 2: Releasing sperm(Masturbating) have affect on my height growth? Releasing sperm(Masturbating) have affect on my... Question: Releasing sperm(Masturbating) have affect on my height growth? Dear Ask The Doctor: Im 5'5 15 year old male I was wondering if releasing sperm(masturbating) would affect my height growth? I've been releasing sperm 5 times a week Youre in good hands, meet ATDs founding physicians. Dr. Suneel Sharman CMO ATD Health Network Inc. Adjunct Professor at U Of T Dr. Kunaal Jindal Director ATD Health Network Inc. Fellowship Training Atlanta, GA STD/STI instead of scarlet fever/strep throat About 2 months i got a fever, sore throat and rash. The rash started a week after my fever and sore throat, it started on my arms and on my thighs (it didn't really itch, maybe from time to time). I went to a small emergency location and they tol... Black Periods, No STD", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMXDLY": "ABSOLUTELY. It's not a network that reports your every move. :)   As for the medical records, you should be able to get them 'anonymously'. But, in truth... there is no reason to be ashamed about choosing to switch doctors. Trust me dear, he's lost patients before, and he'll be fine. I'll bet he's bright enough to figure out that you are looking to move on ahead of his probably 'someday' retirement. John Jones, M.D.", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S3SEH": "hey, no need to cry, you should get out there and meet some ladies and you will be happy. Try going to a nightclub or looking in a newspaper or magazine for places to go to find a loved one. you might turn out to have a beautiful girl that you will love, just go out and try. (this is from a intelligent 14 year olds point of view)", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMQT3F": "They are always willing to give an owner a pet. Also if you go to the shelter you can shop around. Choose the dog that best fits you.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PWEDC": "He needs to know what medication she is on, whether it be over the counter, herbs, those prescribed by other doctors, etc. The best test to know how the liver is doing, go pass the blood tests and CT and MRI...it is the liver biopsy. After many many years of this constant inflammation of the liver, liver cells will die and scar tissue will form. This scar tissue is called cirrhosis. Long term alcohol abuse is just one reason cirrhosis can form in the liver. What are the causes of the inflammation that leads to cirrhosis of the liver? Alcohol excess: the rate of cirrhosis in a country is directly related to the average alcohol consumption in that country. Hepatitis C, fatty liver, and alcohol abuse are the most common causes of cirrhosis of the liver in the U.S., but anything that damages the liver can cause cirrhosis, including: Fatty liver associated with obesity and diabetes.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F04VW7": "It is only possible if your school books publisher has its own site and provides the e-textbook for free! Chances are few. Get the pages scanned with a scanner! Go to an internet cafe amp get it scanned! Oops! I think there's no way then just write it out. Sorry :(", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2RAHM": "Feb 4, 2015 ... I've seen a lot of people on this sub say that not only is it fine to have ... if you're losing 1lb a week, this is a 500 calorie increase, and more than that ... process, should become more frequent up to once every 6 days. You need to find out where the salmon come from and whether they are from a fish farm or wild caught With no mention of size that is hard to say if they is too much or not, but it does sound as an expensive meal that someone has to pay for. some species of salamanders have a real issue with obecity (u havent said what species u have) the normal rule is young one feed every day as much as they will eat in 20-30min adults every other day as much as they will eat in 20-30 mins My doctor said it is normal at this point to not be eating as much. Don't worry, you are giving your baby enough. You have spent the last 38 week building up fat stores, your body will use that too.", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQ0NLR": "These are my top picks of the best stylus pens and brushes for drawing and painting on the iPad and other touch screen tablets. There is no shortage of choices when it comes to touch screen styli, but many of them are poor quality, or just not ideal for drawing, painting and other graphics editing tasks. The stylus options below are what I have found to the best choices for working with art and graphics apps on a touch screen. For more reviews and general information on choosing a stylus, see my Touch Screen Stylus Roundup. For information about pressure-sensitive stylus pens for the iPad, see Before You Buy an Electronic Stylus, and my Smart Stylus Roundup.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BLRAW": "--- Tips--- https://tr.im/1and4linkk", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF6YO6": "First, you were put on Lupron without a true diagnosis - that was the first mistake and disservice your dr. did to you. Lupron was never intended to be a diagnostic, nor is it even remotely curative (or for that matter, even helpful in many cases). You need a new doctor!!!!!! Endo is a serious disease that requires serious help - you likely have ligmament involvement. Do yourself a favor - because your current doctor never will - and see a true specialist. It will help tremendously to have the disease truly excised, not superficially vaporized or masked by temporary medication. See www.centerforendo.com, www.endometriosistreatment.com, www.endocenter.org for help and references and info. Good luck and you're not alone.", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN5C4I0": "Hi..Don't worry,Panic attacks is curable. Try these easy steps to overcome panic attacks in a few minutes 1) You need to try and calm yourself down to a state where you are more aware that you are just having a panic attack and nothing more. Take slow deep breaths. In through your nose and out through your mouth. Slow yourself right down. 2) Try and control those negative thoughts going through your head. The easiest way to do this is shout out the word 'STOP' in your head. Make it really, really loud inside your head. This can help to interrupt the flow of adrenaline for a second, but long enough for you to try and control your negative thinking. 3) Once you have shouted STOP in your head, you need to start sending your brain positive statements or coping statements. Replace all those negative messages you are sending your brain with positive ones. So instead of, 'Oh no, i'm about to have a heart attack and die! ', you should be saying to yourself, 'It's OK, i'm just having a panic ...", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVIIFZ": "Skipping Breakfast May Increase Risk for Heart Attack in Men re supposed to eat to stay healthy can already be overwhelming , but it turns out that you eat what can also be important for keeping your weight in control and for warding off chronic disease . It turns out Mom was right : you should eat breakfast .", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUBNFJ": "Usually around 30 minutes. For some people, it takes a couple of days for the ingredients to have an effect. Most male enhancement supplements (Vig Rx, Extenze, Enzyte, Spartan Blend, Expanzite, etc.) contain herbs that have been shown to have strong effects on libido and circulation. However, you should talk to your doctor before you take anything, in case of drug-interactions, side effects, or allergic reactions, etc.", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7F6WT": "Oh Cecilia (Poop My Heart), Move My Poop replacesongtitlewithpoop", "3VGET1QSZ0XDMHY7RM5OTDDXTIZ7WT": "When you are losing weight, you should exercise and diet together. If you exercise without dieting, you will get bigger appetite, which will lead to increase of weight, or muscle grow underneath the fat layer, and make you bulkier. If you diet without exercising, you will become flabby and will have excess skin. For diet, go wheat free. No pasta, pizza, bread and so on. And no food after 7 p.m. People achieve marvellous results with it. Depending on your initial weight, you can drop upwards from 20 pounds a month. If you don't eat wheat then you don't eat all those sticky, fatty goey cakes, you don't eat junk food, and you don't eat biscuits. But your diet is still balanced. It costs nothing, and you do not have to calculate points or to buy special meals or plans. For exercising, start with walking, and then switch to running/jogging. Running is the most efficient and calorie-burn exercise ever. If you are overweight a lot, walk first or you may have health complications (heart att...", "37YYO3NWHDOAK0NY1CDYX5Y82D4CCE": "Consult a neurologist. Sounds like a nervous system problem.", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BMPQC": "I got nauseous sometimes, had a hard time eating and had low blood sugar which caused me to be dizzy and sick for about a month Three weeks. Your period doesn't happen (most times), you start feeling nausea after eating or when you get off bed, and you feel dizzy for no reason at times. PS: If you're trying to hide from your mom, she's not going to wait until you got a belly, she's going to notice when you get sick (dizzy, nauseous). Yes, for the belly is like 3-4 months, but mom will see it in other things. If you think that you are pregnant have a blood pregnancy test done. I am in the same boat and have experienced that this month - I even felt nauseous and dizzy. Have you had a preconception checkup? Have patience and visit www.newbabyjubilee.com for more info on pregnancy tests and preconeption or get support from the community.", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBNBPO": "Vampire. No hypocrisy or crack involved.", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XM9IX": "vestibular is killing me softly", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYCZSU": "Take good care of your cat!", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYESZP": "Hmm ... this is quite a hard question to answer but ill try my best Your dog might have worms, or might feel abit ill, but your dog probably has worms, go to your local pet shop and get some worming tablets, or you can get stuff that you put in their food to get rid of worms. If this doesnt work, id reccommed visiting a vet, tho she/he would probably tell you the same as this. The worming thing should work. And dont listen to other people who are saying silly things they dont know what they are talking about ! Oh just outa curiousity has your dog been eating probably, or has your dog been getting skinnier by any chance ? I Hope I Helped ..xx", "3XQ4XW3OD9ADTZKS15ES0XT4CPDS2F": "without hair razor detox treatment , yes cocaine has a incorporation rate of 3400 times higher than anything else and travels in the swaet . within hours your fucked", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5V5KG": "then after the treatment i put contractubex gel on the spot (contractubex gel is indicated for scars) and to finnish it is a drop of vit. e on it. it takes time but it's the best thing that i've discovered so far.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082O7UU": "I'm assuming it's dry powder form. In that case it should last a long time, because bacteria and funguses need moisture to live. Is there an expiry date on the package? Anyway, if you're suspicious about whether it's spoiled, be careful. If it's spoiled it could give you a belly ache.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWMATW": "Tell her NICELY that it's none of her business and that its perfectly normal", "3FK4G712NXY6YY1QVKTYRF68AJCSSI": "Midline shift Midline shift is a shift of the brain past its center line. The sign may be evident on neuroimaging such as CT scanning. The sign is considered ominous because it is commonly associated with a distortion of the brain stem that can cause serious dysfunction evidenced by abnormal posturing and failure of the pupils to constrict in response to light.", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI68YIC": "Need a preschool in Rockridge in September When to start getting on ... She is a long-time family friend and has been watching our 20 month old daughter for over a year. We'd like to keep working with her as long as we can and then find a ... ... When I felt like my arms were going to start flaying I told him to stop and ..... I am in a very pathetic situation..pls tell me your opinion ASAP ... heart attack, Karachi, Pakistan, September 13, 2012?..... I am usually in so much pain, sometimes to the point of tears, that I ... I realized it was probably time to see a doctor when I couldn't even ... or after trying to unscrew the toothpaste cap and couldn't ... .... This high volume desk will teach you all you need to know and then some ... Please Email resume, cover letter and references ASAP to ..... currently looking for a PR Coordinator able to start in early-to-mid September.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E7BTS": "hunny, no boy is EVER as important as you are. you remember that. you don't need that type of attention...your a young girl, don't make the wrong decisions to screw up your life. i know being a teen is tough, you have a lot to deal with, and its all apart of growing up. now, youv'e got to grow out of what your in right know. do you understand? you need to tell yourself i am beautiful as i am,  beautys more than skin deep. its so sad seeing so many girls doing what your doing, you should be enjoying your life not worrying about nonsense! because thats what it is. when i was younger, i used to do the same. i was very fat as a kid, when i lost the baby fat people told me i looked good. i liked the attention. when i went through puberty, i started gaining the weight back. i was so scared, i didn't want to be fat again. so i would thorw up. it toke me a while, but eventually i realized that i am more than this.", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0CIXO": "Why bother? The last thing you wanna do is walk into school, while feeling like complete sht, and then make everyone else sick. Its bad for you, and everyone else. But if your absolutely sure you want to go, Sanitize those hands up, bring a pocket of tissues, take a nice warm shower, drink some cough medicine, stay AWAY from computers/electronics, don't let anyone touch your food, cover your mouth, and most importantly, do not hold another persons hand... But seriously, just fck it and don't go. Seriously :)", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU57GQ": "Anemic people have blood that's more brownish red than purplish red. This can be figured out with a simple blood test. 3 - you may be diabetic.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBWJOW": "In 1832, Thomas Hodgkin, a British physician and prominent pathologist, was the first to publish the discovery of Hodgkin's lymphoma (A.K.A. Hodgkin's Disease), a disease of the lymphatic tissues and lymph nodes.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKR1IK3": "If Amanda Bynes tweets anything about Demi I will shove my foot so far up her anus that it will bleed glitter.", "3W31J70BASUS3YZMTPUWLOBG7MHCKV": "In This Article Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) facts What causes irritable bowel syndrome (IBS)? What are irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) symptoms and signs? How is irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) diagnosed? What are irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) treatments? IBS medications Is there an irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) diet? What lifestyle changes may help IBS symptoms? Is irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) related to small intestinal bacterial overgrowth (SIBO)? What is the prognosis for irritable bowel syndrome (IBS)? Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) in children is a functional gastrointestinal disorder with symptoms of abdominal pain, bloating,. In This Article Irritable bowel syndrome in children facts What is irritable bowel syndrome (IBS)? What is the GI tract? How common is IBS in children? What are the symptoms of IBS in children? What causes IBS in children? How is IBS in children diagnosed? How is IBS in children treated?", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHKR1D": "But it makes it more fun i think. My family has a theory that they give each writer a charcter and set them in different rooms and tell them to write a story or plot about them and then they combine them all for the show. Its just a theory ) Writing is an art, and as any art must be practiced.", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z9KFE": "Rickets is a softening of bones in immature mammals due to deficiency or impaired metabolism of vitamin D,1 phosphorus or calcium,2 potentially leading to fractures and deformity. Rickets is among the most frequent childhood diseases in many developing countries. The predominant cause is a vitamin D deficiency, but lack of adequate calcium in the diet may also lead to rickets (cases of severe diarrhea and vomiting may be the cause of the deficiency). Although it can occur in adults, the majority of cases occur in children suffering from severe malnutrition, usually resulting from famine or starvation during the early stages of childhood.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0AIZL": "Look, missing school isn't a big deal if you keep up with your work. I kept a 4.0 in high school and played hookie whenever I felt like it. Sometimes you just need a break, and a day to chill. That's even more true if you legitimately don't feel well. Stay home. At least I'm assuming you're in high school since you're asking us what you should do. If it's college you should know what you usually cover in class to know if it's safe to skip a day, and my school usually posts everything online as well.", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4IOF1": "Good news: your body has an amazing ability to repair damage. Over time, your cells, organs, metabolism etc. will probably get over any short-term effects. Age and fitness are a plus factor. Bad news: Even one cigarette can cause permanent damage that can never be repaired. You'll have to take your chances in the lottery like the rest of us ex-smokers -- but smoking for a small period, getting healthy, and not going anywhere near another cigarette or cigarette smoke will improve the odds dramatically in your favour. Good luck.", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1Z3RI": "Before methadone we had sex every single day (as long as we weren't having withdraws). ... That hasnt even happened since i been on methadone. No morning wood, cant jack off, cant get it up for naked sexy women./ ..... Some day I wish to author a book like that, but for the time being I will ... You still wake up in the middle of the night with an erection and experience ? ?orning wood. ... At times you may lose the erection before the sexual act is completed. ... ... Now this is something I have never dealt with before in my life and I am ... I am really worried and stressed out that I am going to have erection problems forever. ... Also I have noticed that morning wood and random erections are?... 1 day ago ... Anyways I'm getting 50 - 60 morning wood... but when trying to resist watching porn ... I tried to not see it) either way my morning erection didn't seem to have dissapeared. ...", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0Q1JV": "Call you doctor, don't search online!", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6T9QR4": "To find your bra size, take these following measurements while wearing your best fitting bra. It doesn't have to fit perfectly but it cannot underwire and cannot be padded. Step 1: To determine your band size, wrap a cloth measuring tape 'tightly' around your rib cage right below your breasts around the band of the bra that you are currently wearing. If you come up with an even number measurement, add 4. If you come up with an odd number measurement, add 5. This determines your band size. 27' rib cage  5  32' band size 28' rib cage  4  32' band size 29' rib cage  5  34' band size 30' rib cage  4  34' band size 31' rib cage  5  36' band size 32' rib cage  4  36' band size 33' rib cage  5  38' band size Step 2: To find your cup size, measure 'loosely' around the fullest part of your breasts. Subtract your band size from this measurement. The difference determines your cup size. a difference of 0  AA cup a difference of 1  A cup a difference of 2  B cup a difference of 3", "3XWUWJ18TLO2SOLY9UJYLH6KGDLUUJ": "Gel from aloe plant or one from the store which is more convenient.. However, I recommend contractubex gel because i had nasty scars from self harming(cutting/burning/skin picking etc) i was trying to get rid of for 5 years they never went away until after i tried contractubex gel. Its a scar removal gel and probably has the same extracts as other scar removal creams you can try those too, however my personal experience is with contractubex gel :)", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC30OEG": "I was wondering if size truly matters and if so, what a good size is. ... She loves you for you, not for your penis! ... Feel free to PM me if you ever need to chat or have questions ... And you didnt know that before, now you do, lol. I would guess that most women would pick a fairly thick penis of about 5-6' around for full effect, or 4' if for just hitting the G-spot/cervix for great orgasms. Shape is very important! Actually your penis size is right on the average for your age. If penis size is of such great importance to your girl.......could be time to find another girlfriend. If she was with a 'monster penis' recently maybe it's time she went back to him. Personally, as long as they have one, I wouldn't mind what size. I was actually scared when I found out my boyfriend had 7 and a half inches. Sex hurt like hell for ages because of his large size.", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE5QTG": "It is wrongly believed that can you can lose weight only in certain parts of the body. Some areas bulge or appear more fat due to the lack of muscles. Common abdominal exercises like sit-ups, crunches and leg raises are of a very short duration (usually less than a minute) and do not burn many calories. Doing these exercises helps in the toning and firming of stomach muscles. More info at http://www.toloseweight.org/losestomachfat.html", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR5I8I": "Call you doctor, don't search online!", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W394SN": "Normal. Your age group keeps 'growing' their penis every day because they're still in puberty, as are you, so finish growing and ask us again about your 'age group.' PS. Your profile states that you're 20 years old. Might want to fix that or be labeled as a TROLL. edit: There is no useful function a soft penis has except that of urination therefor if you can urinate from it then what difference does it make how big it is or isn't? You're normal, as I previously stated.", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW25VZU": "Much as in other American colonies - - - people mostly awoke with the sun and worked at farming the soil till sunset he then slept till daylight and the process began anew  Deleware was more rural than neighboring Pennsylvania and with its coastline many of its citizens earned a wage by fishing  collecting mussles  oysters though as mentioned farming was a mainstay with grains  corn being the principal crops. Gonna throw links and snippets at you..  1st site gives you lots of daily life activities....  http://www.scgnet.us/orgMain.asp?storyid...  '''white settlement on the Upper Delaware River, called Cushetunk. Today?? Fort represents the development of the settlement over a thirty year period. The original settlers were farmers who came primarily from central Connecticut and were of English descent. They were searching for more land because it had become too crowded in Connecticut to suit colonial farming techniques. A group of Connecticut men formed ? ?he Delaware Company?? and", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHH7BD": "I'd recommend a Maltese for you. They're a toy breed, white, and have very long hair, like a Yorkie. With mix breeds, you can't pick out the cross breed mixture you want.", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B066KX": "This can include a late period, an early period or bleeding between periods. It can also appear as particularly heavy bleeding (menorrhagia) or scanty bleeding. Many women also experience irregular periods in the form of a missed period, continuous periods, or periods that occur twice in one cycle.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMX8D6": "Penne all'Arrabbiata Arrabbiata means angry, and if made right these penne are spicy. Though the versions offered by the really cheap eateries in Rome rely primarily on garlic and hot pepper for their punch, many of the versions printed in cookbooks also call for pancetta (cured, unsmoked salt pork) and onions. To serve 4 you'll need: Prep Time: 20 minutes Cook Time: 20 minutes Ingredients: 1 pound (450 g) penne (or spaghetti if you prefer) 2/3 pound (300 g) peeled, seeded, and chopped plum tomatoes or a drained 1-pound can of tomatoes 1 finely chopped medium sized onion 1 minced clove of garlic, or more, to taste 1/4 pound (100 g) pancetta or (if you can find it) quanciale, diced 1/4 cup (60 ml) olive oil 1/2 teaspoon crushed red pepper, or more, to taste Salt 1 1/4 cups grated pecorino Romano, or, if you find it too sharp, 2/3 cup each of grated Parmigiano and pecorino, mixed Preparation: Saut the onion and the garlic in half the oil, and when the mixture is lightly browned, add the", "3WRBLBQ2GR637K8NRIGXSVHMRGZG0Z": "Summer Tomato teaches you how to get healthy and lose weight without dieting . Because life should be awesome . How To Start Working Out When You Dont Like To Exercise How To Make Cauliflower Taste As Good As French Fries Focus More on Your Brain and Less on Your Diet if Youre Serious About Losing Weight 10 Reasons You Arent Losing Weight When You Think Youre Doing Everything Right ve even hired a personal trainer a few times , hoping the added expense and accountability would be enough motivation to turn you into a regular gym rat .", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHAB0TW": "It improves liver function, increases concentration, coordination, respiratory function, and endurance.", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK0J31": "when I was working with pottery a lot my tear ducts would often get infected or clogged. When mild it hurt when I blinked, felt bruised, tender around the lower eyelid where the tear duct is. but about blinking the eyes too many times a day, I would say so.", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIVXZUA": "Dental fracture or breaking of a tooth can be a result of trauma to the tooth and or cavities. Large cavities. (especially if it's linked to a cavity. Cavities that cause tooth loss/breakage are usually quite advanced and require the tooth to be 'extracted'). Quite scary!! Signs to look out for if it gets infected: (VERY important) - Soreness in the tooth. - Sore/enlarged lymph nodes in the neck. See your dentist! - - - - - - - - - - FILLINGS! - Depending on the tooth 'white' fillings may not be possible in high 'chewing' areas. 'white' fillings are 'ceramic' fillings which are usually used for 'front' teeth and teeth that are visable in the smile. Unfortunatley white fillings aren't usually strong enough for 'high chewing' areas, such as the molars. As. These fillings have very little chance of breaking, or comming out, and also contain flouride which helps prevent that tooth from gaining more cavities. Just make sure you go see a dentist! That's the best advice anyone here can offer you!", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G64W3": "I agree, you are not complaining of sharp pains so I think you were overly exuberant in fulfilling your new years resolution. There is a training principle called Gradual Progressive Overload, you see even if your muscles are strong enough to move the weight, being new to the gym, your ligaments are not plus your muscle can not recover nearly as fast as a trained individual so even though you can move the wieght you really must go light and slowly work your way up. At 5 months your child may not be able to understand all he is seeing.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6O9OV": "If overdose is suspected, contact a poison control center or emergency room immediately. US residents can call the US National Poison Hotline at 1-800-222-1222. Canada residents can call a provincial poison control center. Symptoms of overdose may include irregular heartbeat, muscle weakness, confusion. View Sources", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJEJTJ": "Nancy Zieman August 24, 2013 Yes, Barbra Ann, it works on any fabric.Good luck!Elisabeth July 10, 2013 This is genius!", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG622JB": "A shark cannot blink it's eye but sharks do have a nictitating membrane that will cover the eye in order to protect the shark's eyes from the struggles of prey attempting to escape  see related link below for additional information regarding nictitating membranes .", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE6QTH": "2000 feet is ...... 2000 feet.A block is not defined as a specific length, it like asking how tall is a tree. They come in many lengths.1/2 mile is 2640 feet.Now try asking the question so it can be understood.", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEAA65B": "Eventually, the time between cravings will grow longer and longer, and eventually stop  typically after about six months. The cravings themselves are like waves, Augustson explains. Cravings can be very intense, but they will crest and fade even if you dont have a cigarette. They will go away naturally on their own. Cravings wont last more than 10 to 15 minutes for most smokers. Finding a way to get through that 10- to 15-minute period is a very effective strategy for quitting. Augustson suggests saying to yourself: I know its unpleasant now, but if I wait 15 to 20 minutes, I can wait it out and I can be very proud of myself because I did. Other include: Find a distraction. Go for a walk, wash the dishes, or play a game with your kids. Find something that will distract you enough to get through those cravings, says Augustson. Remind yourself why you should quit.", "3S829FDFT2Z8SQ47S44WVO10OV3XD0": "I don't have perfectly smooth skin. I have a tenancy to break out on my shoulders because when I condition my hair, I leave the conditioner in for about 5 minutes and I think the conditioner clogs the pores on my shoulders (considering my hair is just past shoulder-length). t0mb0ygirlygurl 49 months ago nbsp. t0mb0ygirlygurl t0mb0ygirlygurl Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJYLA2": "'Depo Provera exacerbates glutamate excitotoxicity, which may render users more vulnerable to 'neurodegenerative insult'--a greater likelihood of such diseases as fibromyalgia.' wikipedia.org Hey :o) I feel so bad for both of you. I also found sites that say fibro can be caused by depo. I was on this shot and it was horrible. At first, I was so excited about the Depo Shot and I realized after too long it was just a horrible thing. Like I. It was so convenient and I didn't need to take pills every day - it was easy so I am sure that is why she likes it so much. I am sure she doesn't even realize that the shot may be and most likely is the source of all this new pain and that she is changing for the worse. That shot causes muscle and joint pain and I am pretty sure that is what she is suffering from. I would not be suprised at all if she didn't even have it and all the symptoms that she is having are coming from this shot instead. I was fatiugued on Depo and I had severe aches and pains. :o)", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ2AWK": "Guppies are warm-water fish but if your tank does not drop below 18 degrees Celsius (even at night in winter) then you can put them in, White Cloud Mountain minnows, Bronze shrubs, Shibunkins and Fantails (fancy goldfish). Piranhas will eat your fish. Neon Tetras require at least 20 degree water catfish suck on your goldfishes scales Clown fish are not only expensive but are salt water and goldfish are fresh water Angle fish are tropical I have 9 goldfish in my tank with 3 bronze Shrubs and 6 White Cloud Mountain Minnows, all are happy and healthy.", "3VEI3XUCZRVXKRLLOEPZ60W11XOPRD": "Because its been a month. Years ago, my fiance (at the time) cheated on me. It took at least 2 or 3 years to completely get over it - but trust me, it will happen.", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G6W4V": "Braces have been hurting. The pain is finally gone. That's how bad the power chain pain is. I want to get my braces off, but waiting 1 year", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXO5R8": "The Middle Chinese pronunciation of the name was 'Tsyang', the beginnings of what we now know to be the 'Zhang' surname. Double-barrelled name In English-speaking and some other Western countries, a double-barrelled name (or double surname) is a family name with two parts, which may or may not be joined with a hyphen. It may also be known as a hyphenated name.", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9B42L": "I have bigger teeth problems than grinding. This is death!!! ???", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL45Z8U": "Depending on which teeth are more affected in your night grinding, your dentist may advice crowns or veneers. Since teeth grinding is mainly stress (some times bite) related , there are no guarantees that night grinders will not do it at all during day time. So, in all situations porcelain crowns (Lava/Procera) are the safer choice at under 400 per tooth. Have your reasons for stress (psychology) identified and removed. Continue with your custom made mouth guard.", "391FPZIE4CKXN2FE9VCZ22HUM5IUHH": "I'm underweight. What now? I am 30 pounds underweight. I eat and workout the same amount as my friends, but while they gain weight, I don't. Why is this happening, and how can I start gaining weight? Youre right that its not good to be underweight. Being too thin can make you more likely to be sick or delay your period. But how do you know youre 30 pounds underweight? If youre trying to calculate how much you should weigh yourself, you might not end up with an accurate answer. Eeven if youre using a Body Mass Index chart, it doesnt account for your muscle mass. The first thing you should do is see a doctor to find out where your weight should be  you may be healthier than you think! The doctor will also have tips on the best way for you to gain weight. If youre working out with your friends, what types of exercises are you doing? Try switching up your routine to include more strength training and weight exercises . Building muscle will help you gain healthy weight. Changi", "3HUR21WDDUNBQ1ZYO0RA89B16JAYXA": "www.ranttv.com  And the only reason I'm always busy is because I don't want to be broke, because when you are broke you are no fun. You seem to have thought out your online business.", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXT38V7": "How can lifestyle products attract all types of pet owners? How can pet ... purposes, but also buy ... needs of pets and their owners. ...", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKDHQ0": "Popularity in the United States Rank (1990) 13650 Rank (2000) 8374 Change 5276 Popularity by State Lower rank indicates higher popularity.Ethnic Breakdown Name White Asian Hispanic Mixed Race ID Schuette 97.35 0.47 1.21 0.61 The pie chart to the left shows the ethnic breakdown of the surname 'Schuette' as reported by the US Census Bureau in 2000.It is heavily skewed towards the Caucasian population in the United States (97.35).", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618XHSO": "The question you need to ask yourself is if you are ready to stop cutting.", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT7F14": "Swollen lymph nodes combined with accompanying signs and symptoms are a common reason that people, particularly children, visit their doctors. Swollen lymph nodes A Lymph node is an organ consisting of many types of cells, and is a part of the lymphatic system. Lymph nodes also have clinical significance. Lymph nodes can also be diagnosed by biopsy whenever they are inflamed. Certain diseases affect lymph nodes with characteristic consistency and location. Of some 600 lymph nodes, the majority are located in your head and neck region. The lymph nodes that most frequently swell are in this area, as well as in your armpits and. Most often, lymph nodes swell and become inflamed as a result of an infection. However, there are many possible causes of swollen lymph nodes. Treatment for inflamed, swollen lymph nodes, also known as lymphadenitis, depends on the cause. For more serious cases, treatment of swollen lymph nodes involves treating the underlying cause. The cells are a combination of lymphoc", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQX8NM": "well when I have a low blood sugar, I want to fix it as soon as possible. However, it takes longer for your brain to feel the effects of a higher sugar. So after eating a candy bar, you blood sugar might be fine, but you still feel low, so you keep eating to feel better. That's what happens to me when mine is very low.", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT6RBR": "breaking up sucks.heres something that truly helps.1st.you need a whole two days of just crying.2nd.then you miss everything about him and wallow in it.3rd.get so fucken angry you wannapull his eyes balls(but not really).4th.you get up take a shower put your best clothes on,your best perfume and prepare for whats next.do you want him back is it worth it. do you want to go out and find a new guy?maybe you need to discover your self so you can become a stonger woman so an ex wont be the problem anymore.who am i kidding men will always be a problem! !good luck if you need more help hollar pookie.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY31XH": "When rabbits lose weight it either means: 1. It is aging and has lost it's large appetite 2. Summer is approaching or it is summer and your rabbit's appetite is changing. There is not a good balance of dry pellets and fresh greens in your rabbits diet. Carrots are very full of sugar and bad for your rabbit and large amounts of lettuce can give it diarrhea which may lead to death. Try feeding your rabbit mixed baby greens or fresh herbs. Another treat which my rabbits love are Vitakraft yogurt drops. They go crazy for those and that might pack a few pounds onto your bun.", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJBZYB": "Yes and no. It really depends on your metabolism. If you do not eat, then there are health risks to consider. With exercise, sensible eating, and determination, you can lose weight but not in a week. You can also boost your metabolism by eating foods that makes it so including vegetables, fruits, bran, whole wheat, oatmeal, and water.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLMA0H": "nullThis is the classic problem people have with abs work out. You need to spend your time on your diet and your cardio now so that all the hard work you have put into toning your abs will start to show through. To do this:  Diet - cut out all junk food and all refined carbs. So no more white bread, white rice and white pasta., only eat fresh and unprocessed foods. Lots of fruit and vegetables and drink plenty of water to fill you in between meals. Look at your portion size. Every meal should be able to fit into the palm of one hand. Are you possibly overeating? Exercise - Running, rowing machine and jump rope are the fastest way to burn the fat from all over and including your stomach. Do this for at least 25 mins 3/4 times a week and you will notice the difference very quickly I guarantee it.  ", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPK9AW": "This definition coupled with present definition of time makes our space-time to be Minkowski space and makes special relativity theory to be absolutely correct by definition. In classical physics, space is a three-dimensional Euclidean space where any position can be described using three coordinates. Special and general relativity uses spacetime rather than space spacetime is modeled as a four-dimensional space (with the time axis being imaginary in special relativity and real in general relativity, and currently there are many theories which use more than 4-dimensional spaces (both real and complex).", "37SQU136V7M6AU325IZUZDWQUJM11N": "(Culver, an antislavery lawyer who had served as a Whig member ofCongress from upstate New York during the 1840s, moved to Brooklyn in 1851 and quickly becameknown for defending the rights of blacks in court.) Tappan and Louis Napoleon presented an affidavitto the police that led to Coopers arrest for kidnapping.Janes father, Charles Trainer, soon arrivedfrom Cincinnati, and all appeared before a New York judge.The case devolved into a fight forcustody of the child.", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO21WLO": "The tiny 'pin hole' sized hole? That's for either a special tool or a paperclip to pop into to release the sim card tray.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12E7CH": "nullI can't address drug therapies, only natural ones. Most herbal compounds have a primary ingredient of hawthorn, and may also utilize garlic and cayenne, which have been shown to reduce blood pressure. A good commercial product is called Michael's Blood Pressure factors. When my husband began taking it along with other herbal supplements, his blood pressure was significantly reduced in three days, and has remained so for a period of several years. Other herbs which have been helpful include yarrow, which treats nosebleed, valerian, and cramp bark.", "3T5ZXGO9DEMRMU8RY8Y1S8OAFAVQZ0": "The tale of the last hot chocolate run before the blizzard was upon us. The bear cubs who wanted to stay awake, even when their mother reminded them it was way past November. Two sisters reading stories amid the howling winds. Opinion 2: mid-evil... a guy with an ax finds a wizard who is evil, and the axeman has to kill the evil wizard to stop the wizard from turning the sea into turnips his favorite food and cooking them all to eat. the axeman wants to stop this because his girlfriend is coming over to the 'new country' and is still on the ship over. after the epic battle the axeman enslaves the wizard. the only way for the wizard to live is to make all the land part of the sea, so the axeman and his girlfriend can sail around the world to get married quicker. ......well there is an idea.....", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLHBGEN": "Sprinkle salt in the water. It has revived my fish many times.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWXZRA": "I agree with the other about the blockage, that is a possiblity. I have 2 female geckos as well (4 years old and 1 year old) and the oldest went through a phase of not eating as well. I found out it was because it's tank was getting too small for it. I put her in a nice 20g long tank and she had more room to hunt and explore. Maybe your gecko is cramped, cold, or sick. Lastly, you know lep geckos are nocturnal, so try to offer food at a later time when it's dark.", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS8AZC": "Nori, Dori, Ori, Gloin, Oin, Dwalin, Balin, Bombur, Bifur, Bofur, Fili, Kili, and Thorin Oakenshield", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I2IDO": "Poll: Do You Eat Dinner Every Night?What time do you eat dinner?More questions What time do you eat dinner?", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7B6WP": "I agree, dry food is better for them, and adding anything to their dry food will 'spoil' them and create a picky eater. Wet food is fattier and can sometimes cause diarrhea because it's got more water in it. It's okay to give sometimes, as a special treat, mixed in with the wet food, but personally I wouldn't give wet food every day.", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX3A4Y": "I'm kind of worried lately about my height. I was always the tallest in my classes (even in my elementary school!) until the last 2 years. I would assume I went through my puberty earlier than most people. Thing is, I've always played basketball. Not so much since 15ish years old but I still do play here  there. I was actually taller than my brother when he was 17 years old (or at least the same height). I'm wondering if I can get at least to 6 feet. Since 2-3 months, I've been eating well (a lot of calcium and such)  been doing a lot of exercices. So will I grow taller? I'm only 17 years old. If you want to know about my genetics, my mom is 5.4 feet  my dad is 5.9 feet. My mom family average at least 6 feet (no idea why my mom had to be short!). Please answer!", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4IEQE": "Scratchy Skin with Red-colored Bumps  Find out about Psoriasis: The scratchy skin with red-colored bumps can fr... http://t.co/fLhsbyt0", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U661U": "Well one day, i handed in a piece of essay on Hippocrates and about his life. A week later my history teacher goes well done, you've researched well and found out that hippocrates was murdered, even i didn't know that'' you see he wouldn't have known that because i made it up. Smaller still - think what your history teacher like last week from other student presentations.", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811C9K9": "i felt that erection was not proper and when next time i tried i didnt ejaculate . i masturbate a lot that time my erection and ejaculate is proper . please suggest me whether over masturbating is creating problem For those of you having burning sensation in penis drink more than two liters of water daily plus empty bladder before and after sex cranberry juice is also helpful Hi I 'm 16 years old I stopped masturbating for a year and a half but recently did it cuz my hormones kinda took over lol but anyway when I masturbated I ejaculated under 3 seconds and I feel really depressed that I do n't know what to do please help I 'm to embarrassed to tell my parents for a appointment at the doctors please help also I 'm sorry about the punctuation lol I just had back surgery through my stomach .", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWOQAMV": "It's a recurrent headache that comes because blood vessels in your brain tighten up and prevent blood from getting to certain areas there. This is why with Migraine headaches, you can also have other symptoms like blurry vision and sensitivity to light.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUSRWB": "I have a severe case of tiredism. Tiredism - the act of being really tired.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK25Y9": "Facts about peripheral neuropathy Peripheral neuropathy has many different causes. Some people inherit the disorder from their parents, and others develop it because of an injury or another disorder. In many cases, a different type of medical problem, such as a kidney condition or a hormone imbalance, leads to peripheral neuropathy. One of the most common causes of peripheral neuropathy in the U. is diabetes. About 60 to 70 percent of Americans with diabetes have some form of nerve damage. Types of peripheral neuropathy There are more than 100 types of peripheral neuropathy, each with its own set of symptoms and prognosis. To help doctors classify them, they are often broken down into the following categories: Motor neuropathy. This is damage to the nerves that control muscles and movement in the body, such as moving your hands and arms or talking. Sensory neuropathy. Sensory nerves control what you feel, such as pain or a light touch. Sensory neuropathy affects these groups of nerves.", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ06RTH": "Have u checked a ...trying to think what to call it...maybe where u would buy a violin or other instruments. I got our sheet music for our wedding there. They sold instruments, batons, music, kinda like a music, etc store? It's in Anderson, IN. I don't even know if they are still in business.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9BPFG": "Good luck!A gym grab a friend of mine has given me dump any toxins your mail id order a cheeseburger and asked me it's always difficult to seek your help.I write this i am female, age 26years , weigh around 63 kgs in 10 days and am 5'3 tall,quite an experience i had over weight right!", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1GBKM": "God, I love EarthBounds dialogues.", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IF3Z8": "I am getting a molar with a filling extracted next week and I am scared because I have braces. Im not getting them off because my orthodontist just put the wire over the tooth and no bracket. The reason I am getting it pulled is because I got a baby tooth extracted and it's trying to cone down and there is no room for it to. All I really want to know is does it really hurt and do they damage the braces while extracting and if and also how long will it take my take my teeth to move round and close that gap?? Thanks", "3MZ3TAMYTLL535YHBJZFX3VPFJQRI0": "I named you after emperor Augustus, the first emperor of Rome, and its 'Imperator Gaius Julius Divi Filius Caesar Octavianus Augustus'", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V034DX": "Flowerhorn cichlids are very easy to feed and can be fed just like any other large South American cichlids from which Flowerhorn fish originates. An example of this is that cichlid pellets are an excellent stable food for Flowerhorn cichlids. Flowerhorn cichlid can be kept on a diet consisting only of pellets but will be healthier and will breed easier on a more varied diet. The fry can there after be trained to eat crushed pellets and flake food.Flowerhorn cichlids are not picky eaters so dont be afraid to use your imagination while deciding what to feed them. And oh yeah, a bit of common sense is good to ,-) they eat turtle pellets and/or cichlid pellets...when they get bigger and older they like lettuce for snacks.... Earthworms, crickets, mysis shrimp, feeder fish (grown by me)earthworm pellets, shrimp pellets, pelleted foods designed for south american cichlids.", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17M052": "Besides walmart being greedy and evil, those are my other reasons I don't give them my business walmartsucks", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13FR75": "Friday, August 14, 2015 Motivation of the most beautiful story Jerry was a manager of a restaurant in America. He was always in good spirits and always had positive things to say. If someone asks him about what he was doing, he would always reply, 'If I can be better, I'd rather be twins!' Many waiters at the restaurant out if Jerry changed jobs, so they can keep follow of a restaurant to another restaurant. The reason why the waiters followed Jerry was because of his attitude. Jerry was a natural motivator. If an employee was having a bad day, he was always there, telling the employee how to look on the positive side of a situation that was dialamai. Seeing this style really made me curious, so one day I went up to Jerry and asked him, 'I do not understand! Can not be a positive person all the time. How do you do? 'Jerry replied,' Each morning I wake up and say to myself, I have two choices today. I can choose to exist in a good atmosphere or to vote in a homely atmosphere. I choose t", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOGC3WJ": "It depends on how tall you are. 98 pounds is very small and you should see a nutritionist to make sure you are eating enough for you and the baby. If your body doesn't feel it can carry a baby at that weight than you might be at risk to miscarry. You need 2500 calories per day when you are pregnant. If you are underweight you should gain 40-50 pounds during a pregnancy. If you are a healthy weight 20-30 is average.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVARMPO": "Varying methods are used depending on what the moles look like. IF you have any very sharply defined, very pin-point-y spots that have appeared quickly. In a semi-short period of time, (hours) this will start to look like a pinpointed burn (which is exactly what it is. For suspicious-looking (they know what to look for) spots. He/she will remove a (very miniscule) bit of the spot to send to the lab for analysis. Darker spots that are not suspicious but bother you in an aesthetic-sort of way can be removed via electric needle (hurts slightly but really it's nothing) or via. These are 'suspicious-looking' spots that would cause a dermatologist to take a closer look, as well as investigate and biopsy: WebMD-slideshow-lesions and skin cancer: http://www.webmd.com/melanoma-skin-cancer/ss/slideshow-skin-lesions-and-cancer More images of suspicious-looking spots: http://www.aafp.org/afp/1998/0915/p873.html More spots: http://www.glamour.com/magazine/2009/04/the-two-minute-cancer-testslide1", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FAY6F": "The source of the following material is: www.expage.com Follow the food guide pyramid. what I am GOING to do, is tell you exactly how you can lose weight. Weight loss is simple, burn more calories then you consume. If this is the case, then feel free to go waste your money on the newest useless weight loss pill. Doing this will speed up your metabolism. Cardio is an important part of weight loss. So look for a 1 or 2 pound weight loss at the end of the week. Yes that's a lot of water, but it's that water that will give you energy and speed your weight loss. Looking to buy weight loss, diet, and nutrition related books? Looking. Because of this, you end up making countless attempts to lose weight to no avail. But first, you will have to let go of old weight loss and dieting myths. Which carbs will help or hurt you in your weight loss goals. Many weight loss programs don't make things any better. Why else would big diet companies not care if you ever lost weight? To keep you coming back for more!", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0M0E4": "The voice in my mind when I'm in pain: Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut. Cut Cut. Cut", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFRMYF": "I am so sorry for the loss of your son. How tragic. The dog will respond to you and your shared grief. Just love him, comfort him, let him comfort you. Dogs do grieve their owners when they die just as we do our family and friends when they pass ojn. The dog will take time to get over this, but like I said he will respond to you. Just be there for him.", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T755UGI": "As muscle is more metabolically active than fat , I believe this formula is much more accurate . s break down an example for someone who is 150lbs at 20  body fat . Someone at those stats has 30lbs of fat ( 150lbs  20  bf  30lbs ) . Subtract those 30lbs from their weight , and you get 150lbs Next , take that number and convert it to kg .", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP56P2W": "Dams (mother cats) hide their kittens to protect them from predators, which can include other cats, dogs, and even birds. She knows that she can not always be with them, and this keeps them safe while she's away finding food. But that is probably why cats have as many kittens in a litter and have as many litters as what they do.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VZ8LM": "Awkwardness is part of the drill, and is cute too.Confidence is built by facing your fear, not waiting for things to get easier.Good luck.", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP5LSY": "Many other exercises using weights and/or body weight, similar to CrossFit routines, are used to lose body fat, increase cardiovascular efficiency, increase strength, and help people get into a routine of regular exercise. Many programs offer nutrition advice as well. It is called 'boot camp' because it trains groups of people, may be outdoors, and may or may not be similar to military basic training.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F02WV6": "Try putting a little bit of cod liver oil into his food Don't use more than a spoonful or two over a bowl of dry or wet food once a day, but cod liver oil can work wonders to make a pet's coat more healthy and ease dry skin. And your cat will probably love the taste and smell of it, too. Sources: Experience Callisto 102 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. Callisto Callisto Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555AC6PY": "Could be better speakers if that were the case. Otherwise the IBM had a better sound card. Your sound card and your speakers will both affect how good your speakers sound although if you want louder, go with bigger speakers.Here are some good ones to choose from...", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA8568": "Canine influenza Canine influenza (dog flu) is influenza occurring in canine animals. Canine influenza is caused by varieties of influenzavirus A, such as equine influenza virus H3N8, which in 2004 was discovered to cause disease in dogs. Infectious canine hepatitis Infectious canine hepatitis is an acute liver infection in dogs caused by canine adenovirus type-1 (CAV-1). The incubation period is 4 to 7 days. Most combination vaccines for dogs contain a modified canine adenovirus type-2. Canine coronavirus Canine coronavirus is a virus of the family 'Coronaviridae' that causes a highly contagious intestinal disease worldwide in dogs. A more serious complication of canine coronavirus occurs when the dog is also infected with canine parvovirus. However, fatal intestinal disease associated with canine coronavirus without the presence of canine parvovirus is still occasionally reported. Recently, a second type of canine coronavirus (Group II) has been shown to cause respiratory disease ...", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EGYFL": "Get your animal to the vet right NOW. You are risking his life. I understand money issues, I also understand having a child but unless you want a repeat of the first time, then get him to a vet now instead of asking for help and idea's online. Would you do this to your child if he/she had an injury? No. Pets can not help themselves and you are responcible for helping them. If you do not have the money to have a vet clean out the wound and to pay for antibiotics then bring him or her in and have it put down. Most vets will allow you to do a payment plan, even if it's only 25 -50 a month so long as you have referances. Imagine the pain that bunny is in right now.", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5SOM6": "I am 18, 140 pounds and 5'5, which I'm sure sounds fat but I'm Italian and I have definite curves and am toned.. My new boyfriend is 6 foot and toned as well, he wrestles, plays soccer, and lacrosse. However, I am scared he won't be to pick me up. He's tried to in the heat of the moment when we're fooling around but I always stop him because I'm scared he doesn't realize how heavy I am.. Will he be able to comfortably pick me up or not?", "3YGE63DIN8VZ46YN6NKFEY3AL4R0WK": "Usually loose leaf tea has not been processed like tea bags. And loose leaf tea is usually a whole leaf. You can try it but make sure you use a filter or tea balls so the leaves have room to uncurl and release all the tea flavor.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWKTAD": "OMG! I get HORRIBLE cramps too! I've found a few remedies though. I got my period on the day I was supposed to go to my first football game, but I found some ways to ease the cramps. Take along a hot water bottle, and just hide it under a bulky sweatshirt if you don't want anyone to know. Green tea eases my cramps, but you should take along some medicine. Stay away from sodas, or anything like that. Bananas are good too, and for some reason apples help me. I'm not sure if they'll help you, but it's worth a shot! GL!!!!", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCR0YJ": "Many sports fans will probably instantly recognize this painting because it was commissioned by Seagram 's Seven for its well-known Seagram 's Seven Crowns of Sports promotion in the early 1990s . Ideally , it has been consigned directly by the original art director for that promotion , in whose sole possession it has remained since that time . Today , this particular image can most commonly be found on Seagram 's Seven promotional mirrors that were issued to bars and taverns at the time ( the mirrors themselves are now collectibles ) .", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481VB21": "Jun 26, 2013 ... How to Make Black Eyes, Bruises, Hickeys Fade Heal Faster in 5 Different Ways ... Now, I have seen my fair share of House episodes, but I should probably ... natural, here are some great home remedies to help get rid of that itch. There are a range of things that can create a compartment ... localized to a specific limb, it should be on our list of medical considerations. .... my left foot then all the way up my shin and one on my calf then on my right leg just ..... Oct 8, 2014 ... Some people are lucky enough to only get eczema in the summer ... But then we had a heatwave, and night after night my legs became ... eight months later, I still have a large patch of eczema on my left leg. Lipodema is a medical condition that is often confused with lymphedema. ... Increase in the occurrence of bruises (haematomas) in the affected parts of the body ... Skin color changes occur in the lower leg, indicative of secondary ...", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLNA0I": "SHAKSPEARE SAYS'It is not necesary to share everythng between true friends. But it is necesary that what you share must be true' Good Mrning", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV46N3A": "here are a few sites mentioning barlow shed, hope u can find something from them for your use:  http://jcp.fotopic.net/c151354.html  http://www.urban75.org/london/stpancras28.html  http://therailwaystationgallery.fotopic.net/c100226.html  http://www.greatbuildings.com/buildings/S.PancrasStation.html", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NHZVAU": "Any good Chihuahua breeders in the US? I'm looking for one that does NOT breed merles but is a show breeder. I'm in California. I haven't found any decent breeders in California yet. Please do not much a shelter dog, I'm looking to actively participate in agility and showing. Follow 4 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  just now  Because I happen to love the breed. They are very intelligent little dogs and in the right hands they can be very sweet, loving and loyal. People go on how the d Pitbull needs a second chance then why not the Chihuahua? Anonymous  I was sitting with a very nice Chi breeder at a dog show, don't know his name, though. He had a very nice little dog in his lap. I would suggest going to a dog show and talking to breeders there.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6M9OT": "this gives detail ttps://t.co/exWL5Gwjw2 note discharge does not equal no of bullets fired.", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZDLFH": "How much is often? Every five minutes? If so, you probably are lactose intolerant. If you're gassy even when avoiding dairy, then you've probably got celiac disease, a problem with digestion of gluten which is in pretty much everything. I've suspected for years that I've got celiac disease, but I'm too poor to shop for gluten-free foods at the fancy whole-foods market. Plus I'm a guy and I think farts are funny, so. yeah. The downside is that other side effects supposedly include a susceptibility to stomach and colon cancer. It might be worth a doctor's appointment. The other possibility, and I'm not joking here, is that maybe you're just dainty, girly, and overly sensitive. I mean, if you can count on less than three hands how many times you fart in one day, then there is nothing physically wrong with you. You know Janeane Garofalo? 'I'm gonna tell you the big secret about women, guys. We poop. We fart sometimes too.' I like her because she's not worried at all about appearing ladylike.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNPLRD": "Jake Wilberdy loved hiking. It helped clear his mind of the day's many troubles. Write for the fun of it and worry about the publishing or award winning details later.", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ82YV7": "United States vs Germany: World War I ? ?, World War II ? ?, Men's World Cup ? ?, Women's World Cup ??. United States takes series 3-1.", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPJA9W": "trust me it wont be healthy  why are people seriously giving you tips on losing weight? even if it is through healthy means, you don't need tips on losing weight.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879I6XJ": "Yes, Tay-Sachs Disease is almost always fatal. The baby diagnosed dies normally within the first 3-5 months. If you have late onset Tay-Sachs LOTS), normally found in young adults, it will usually not affect one's lifespan. Tay-Sachs Disease is found mostly in Jewish communities, but also in Easters European communities.", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR3FR2": "That is her personal, moral, difficult decision to make, not mine.", "3OLZC0DJ8JDXWCFYK34PY0KS0P5IVM": "RT brookenoeldyer: So I literally haven't worn my retainer in a month  it hurts so bad ?", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP8SL8": "Oh, exactly. We can be so much more and this utter dude proved that 60 years ago.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCCVG6": "Oblivion, Fallout 3, Counter Strike, Counterstrike: Source, COD 6(call of duty 6), Spore, Halflife, Battlefield:Badcompany 2, Battlefield 1942 (always fun to play). That's all I can remember.", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27YYZ19": "do cardio first, to get your heart rate up, then lift or tone with resistance. then just keep to a consistent plan! Yes, I have a good tip.", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRW0S6": "I was given a prescription for an Epipen and on Nov 13th I tested 3 positive on a skin prick test after an earlier ( 9-15-06) RAST test was negative.I am 36 but have had allergies since mid 1990's. I would seriously make an appointment with an allergist and get tested asap, the next time could be fatal.Avoid ALL NUTS and NUT containing foods until you know for sureand READ every label. Do all size '' shoes fit your feet? As you are a first time wearer, they should teach you how to insert and remove the lenses, how to clean them, how to store them, and proper hygene (washing hands, etc. Yes, very important.) You don't need to buy them at this appointment. My eyes have changed shape over months even, and have needed a different fit. try to start a nice  sweet conversation. if can try to date her out for a movie and pls plan ur date before u date her.. some time don talk too much be cool a bit . u know lik we in a sea fishing.. some time pull some time release if not the string will...", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTPZKST": "They usually live for about 12 years if you take good care of them and they don't get into an accident. Hope this helps .", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK43JP": "SA's Zuma 'showered to avoid HIV' Mr Zuma is a veteran of the struggle against apartheid South African ex-Deputy President Jacob Zuma said he showered after sex with an HIV-positive woman, thinking this would reduce his risk of being infected. This emerged as he was cross-questioned during his trial for rape. He denies rape but admits to consensual sex, and said he was ready to marry his accuser. Remarks about HIV made by Mr Zuma in court earlier this week have angered Aids educators. More than 5m South Africans have HIV - the highest number in the world. Mr Zuma - previously seen as a possible future president - retains considerable popularity. His supporters see the charge as a political conspiracy. Mr Zuma said in court on Wednesday he had left his bedroom after having sex with the woman and taken a shower because this 'would minimise the risk of contracting the disease HIV'. He also said that he was prepared to marry the woman who accused him of rape, and that her aunts were disc", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PY745": "By crash dieting but it is dangerous for your health. Wait loss always should be minimum may be 1 or 2 pounds per week otherwise there are consequences.", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3ES3R": "Treating Acne Scars http://acnenomoreguaranteed.blogspot.com Despite the fact that most of us will suffer from acne at some point in our lives, in most cases, acne can be very effectively treated and will clear up in time without any lasting effects. However, if you have deep, steep sided scrars (often referred to as icepick scars) then dermabrasion or laser resurfacing will not work. Surgery is an option for those people with significant scarring, such as the deep, steep sided scars which are often referred to as icepick scars. In some cases a technique known as punching will be used in which the scar is cut out down to the level of the skin's subcutaneous fat and the resulting hole is repaired either with sutures or with a small skin graft. Drug treatments are used when scarring will not normally. My neigbhour got her ance cured within three days through the information she got from this two sites http://acnenomoreguaranteed.blogspot.com http://www.acneproductratings.blogspot.com", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ4WA8": "Is it true every american is fat?.. how stupid do i sound asking that.. think about it", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA5OP4": "When the previous King died in 1952, he had no sons. First in line was his eldest daughter, Princess Elizabeth, so she became Queen Elizabeth II. Because sons have priority over daughters, there have been more Kings as monarch than Queens.", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8I1HM": "Your nail will soon crack into about 10 - 15 pieces but will stay on your finger. They may then fall off and regrow badly and repeat the process, but it could also heal instantly. Just keep a band-aid on the finger and some ice every once in a while. Here is a little description of the Stem Cell Process I will be undertaking: ... It is then time for the blood draw and off to the MRI in which I believe I am the first ..... I will be getting another SPECT before I leave to show the improvement. Straighten out a paperclip, and then heat the end until it's almost glowing. Push the tip through the nail where the largest accumulation of blood is located. It won't hurt, honestly, at least in comparison to what you're feeling now. And yes it will fall completely off, but IT DEFINITELY GROW BACK! it will be tender and it may look really bad, because the nail is not there to protect the soft (usually sorta wrinkly) tissue of the finger.", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6ZX0C": "Eyebrow restoration Eyebrow restoration is a surgical procedure intended to permanently restore and/or customize the appearance of the eyebrows. it was originally intended for burn victims and patients of illnesses that prevent hair from growing in the eyebrow region. Eyebrow restoration surgeries - or transplants - have since evolved into a cosmetic procedure favored by people wishing to have perfect eyebrows.", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LT7PV": "About once a week add some fish oil or give her fish 1-3 times a week. This has oils in that can help her coat. Other people use olive oil but I do not know how successful that is for dogs. I have a spitz breed of dog too, a norwegian buhund. He's sheds tons all year round. In the summer we got dog clippers and cut his fur short (or take your dog to a groomer) and I can tell you it really does help. We noticed a improvement instantly. We also got two brushed, a normal brush and a shedding brush. We use the normal brush every week and same for the shed brush. If shes bad use it more. Stop bathing her if you do it a lot. This will make her fur dry and rough to the touch as it strips the oils from their coat. Bath her no more than once a month max.", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC14EN": "Chip: Good luck to me?I don't need luck, Tom.You need the luck.", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJ1LA5": "I have PCOS too. The best thing I've found that works for me is exercise, and limiting your intake of fatty and sugary foods. I also limit my intake of complex carbohydrates such as rice, pasta, potatoes and bread. In other words, eat sensibly and EXERCISE!", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V96N0": "Basalo responded to an ad where the girls were asked for the work on hot line  to read erotic stories  reportedly with desire to write them. After seven years writing the story was mature enough for the novel. Basalo attracted attention with her first novel, 'Woman with Error'.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGI1CI": "That is , practicing on a variety of tasks will enhance and quicken the learning process as compared to practicing in the same category or class . This helps the learners to become accustomed to using their newly acquired knowledge and skills in novel situations , thus encouraging transfer of learning to the job . Transfer of learning is a phenomenon of learning more quickly and developing a deeper understanding of the task if we bring some knowledge or skills from previous learning to a new learning situation .", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PTDE8": "If she is a female, having a white cere means she is not in breeding 'mode'. Female parakeets are usually only in condition to breed when their cere starts turning brown. Parakeets usually only breed when they are supplied with a nest box though some females may still lay eggs but often these are not fertile. Even if eggs are laid and are fertile, as there is no nest box they (the eggs) are unlikely to hatch as it is difficult for the hen to keep the eggs warm. At 9 years old, a female parakeet is very unlikely to lay an egg because they are too old (older than 50 in human years).", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SK4G8": "If you read Perricone, South Beach Diet, Atkins and many other studies - refined carbs like most flour should be extremely limited. I read those diet/health book and combined the knowledge to create super health diet. I start my day with a low carb shake, KetoSlim to which I add Greens powder, blueberries, Total EFA oil blend, CoQ10, CLA (oil), aloe vera gel, and I lost 50 pounds.", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBMQ5S": "What kind?Do you want your kid believing that?Why nottell the truth  I dont know ?", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC5WPP": "Dont drink so much alcohol at night!!! Hope you feel better soon", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M190K31": "Doctors are there for a reason, there is absolutely no shame in consulting with him on this matter.", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE95X4": "Who knows... 'History is just a set of lies agreed upon.' Napoleon Bonaparte", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FTQ30": "camerondallas I know you don't like acne, no one does. But even if you have acne sometimes doesn't matter, your perfect the way you are?", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXEJC0": "Hey   There are some specific methods that can help you to grow tall. here are some tips that were helpful for me to grow taller faster:   Have a good sleep   Getting a full night's sleep every night is one of the best natural ways to grow taller..  Get at least 7 hours of sleep each night and take whatever steps you need to ensure that your sleep is uninterrupted as much as you can. Actually, the first 2 hours of sleep are when the most growth hormone is released into your system from your pituitary gland. Sleeping just a few hours can lower the amount of growth hormone your body produces, which is very bad for you. You need to eat the right foods   It's very important to eat foods that are rich in proteins. for instance:  milk, fish, eggs, and lean meat are all forms of good protein. Try also eating foods that have plenty of amino acids and vitamins. Be aware that the biggest threats to your growth are caffeine, junk food and refined sugar. Leg lengthening, spine lengthen", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGWUSZ": "1 med potatoe  2 points", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PHJH7": "People help animals by: 1). they care for them. they get them what they need. they make sure they are loved and are safe and healthy.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBZOJ4": "Simply ask your doctor.", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J2P4S": "i was looking at the birds ... Hi I'm Nikki a 10 year old with a Sun Conure named Sunny. .... When I brought the bird she was as sweet as can be to her owner, however when I got ..... Billy is a 9 year old Gold Capped Conure . As I'm reading it, you have a Hoffmans Conure (not common within captivity, ... a Gold Capped Conure, and a Cinnamon Green Cheek Conure. ... I found all of them a good home but there will be no hybrid babies for Maggie and Mack. ... and posted on an Eclectus list that I was looking for an older male ... than the average grey, he is a wonderful and sweet companion. ... He had a good heart but had never owned a bird before, and hung in?... I think I chuckle out of relief that I'm. ... Blue and gold macaw ... Another friend watch with amusement as her black capped caique carried her pellets ... Birds are able to see lightwave patterns that we mere humans cannot.", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PX744": "But it also depends on whether or not you have sensitive teeth. If it were a crown or root canal, you may have some soreness....if you've had a tooth extracted, again you will have some soreness. If you've had a cavity restored, it may be that all the decay wasn't taken out, there might be an infection or maybe the cavity wasn't fully put in. If you did have a cavity...composite fillings are made hard with an ultraviolet light and you should be fine. Sometimes ice helps, try holding an ice cube next to the sore tooth. And yes, you can get a cavity in a tooth that already has a filling in it, either a new cavity in a 'clean' bit of tooth, or more decay around and underneath the filling that's already there. Yes, you can have a cavity even if you can't see it. If you do have a cavity, and you need a filling, the procedure is not that bad. I've had so many fillings, and nothing traumatic happened. First the dentist will give you an injection to numb the area where he needs to work.", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK3J34": "Over half of all Millennials desire to start their own company or work at a startup. If youre searching for a theory to explain this cultural movement, Im guessing most of you wouldnt look to the Puritans to find answers. But these two movements are more closely connected than you might think. The Puritans were the first Nonconformists , rejecting the influence of Rome over the Church of England. They were disruptors of the church order that had supplanted the power of scripture in favor of the power of men. And for these Reformation tendencies  and a failed revolution  they faced persistent persecution and were driven from England to the New World. To become better acquainted with the theology of Puritanism, J.I. Packers A Quest for Godliness is simply the best resource for the common reader. What you might not expect is just how much their present living was governed by their future hope. Far from a pejorative puritanical mindset, they had an intense desire to build and creat", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6XQ68": "well if you like him or just want to go out, say yes. however if u feel that it might harm his and your brothers friendship..or u just dont want to..then say no.", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXDFVS": "It is a record-breaking third time that Roberts has been the issue's cover girl. 'Now that she has her babies, she has reached the peak of beauty,' the magazine quotes Roberts' friend and makeup artist Genevieve. 'She is satisfied and content.", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCYTFR": "yeah that's what I was just watching", "3MZ3TAMYTLL535YHBJZFX3VPFJSRI2": "Proemial relation Gotthard Gunther introduced the term proemial relation in his 1970 paper 'Cognition and Volition'. Meaning 'to preface', it specifically refers to the intercoherence (prerequisite relation) of subject and object. Subject and object arise together.", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU97GU": "i beleive they are all from the plant kingdom. from most simplist form and oldest is algae, moss, ferns, conifers, and angiograms (I thought they were angiosperms) Angiosperms contain palms and flowering plants I have just googled plant kingdom and found some websites that may help. some were a bit complicated though. try the link below, it is just one of many good luck", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDJ07J": "Try not to buy contacts from web. it'll be more expensive but safer to buy at a regular specs shop. If you're already wearing specs I guess they will ask you for a quick check up for your degrees. Uh on tips on not to damage your iris maybe be careful of your fingernails when you insert or take out? You can buy eye drops meant for contacts too, if you're scared your contacts are too dry.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZJ2F6": "They normally only shed in summer and spring months, but shed occasionally in the autumn. The coat comes in black or liver (dark brown) with white markings or predominantly white with black or liver markings Tricolour: black and white or liver and white with tan markings, usually found on eyebrows, cheeks, inside of ears and under the tail. Any white portion of the coat may be flecked with ticking.", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ85VY7": "Mbps, MBps, kbps, Gbps what does all of this mean? These are the abbreviations for the amount of data that is being sent per second. Here is what each of them mean. Below that Ive outlined a basic conversion guide and a rough idea as to how big each piece of data you consume is. kbps  Kilobits per second. This is used when talking about dialup (56k for example) and low speed DSL. Mbps or mbps  Megabits per second. Some people confuse this with megabytes. The difference between the two is how the b is written in the abbreviation Mbps  megabits and MBps  megabytes. This is the most common unit of speed used. MBps  Megabytes per second. Megabytes arent usually used in (residential) internet plans. gbps  Gigabits per second. Gigabits are hardly used for internet plans, and the costs make them unpractical for families and small businesses. Converting Units of Internet Bandwidth", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRMOCM": "O.K between your friend and the first answerer, we almost have it right.", "3U74KRR67MJAXLM0COH22QSOP3MNTU": "MSN Health and Fitness has fitness, nutrition and medical information for men and women that will help you get active, eat right and improve your overall wellbeing", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U416N": "it's okay if you cry. :)    it's not that bad. yes, you will only be able to eat soup for maybe 2 weeks max. it's not really a horrible pain, it's just a lot of pressure. after it stops hurting you can pretty much eat anything besides stuff that will make your brackets come off (nuts, and foods like starburst)   just don't CHEW the candies. :)   I've had my braces for three years. I think most people are mostly afraid of how they will look. before my braces, my teeth were horrible! the upper two front teeth formed a gap in between that looked like an upside down v. the teeth next to the two front teeth couldn't even be seen! my canine teeth were on my gums, and covering the other teeth. I had one of my molars growing on my gums. :( my bottom teeth weren't as bad but they were angled wrong. NONE of my teeth grew where they should have been. before I got my braces, I had 10 teeth pulled out. 6 baby teeth, 4 permanent. now my teeth are soooo much better. now i'm wearing rubber", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2CFEO": "As others have stated, you MUST go see your doctor. You also have a way to protect your job. If you have worked there for at least 1 year, you are entitled BY LAW to take FMLA, and your company MUST hold your position for you. This is a federal law. Under FMLA, you can take up to 90 days off per year either all at once or intermitently. I wish you much luck and sincerely hope that you do not let your fears stop you from getting medical attention. The longer you wait, the worse it will be for you.", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPRUE2": "I suggest you take your daughter to her pediatrician as a starting point. Her symptoms should not be ignored. If the symptoms seem to come and go with her menstrual cycle, the problem could be anemia from blood loss. Drinking extra water and eating iron-rich foods (red meat, fortified grains) might help the problem. However, many things could be causing these dizzy spells and it's important you find out what's going on. If there's an underlying illness or condition, the sooner you can treat it, the better. Wishing you well!", "3QHITW7OYO7QLM0JMGI2BFX16PNAQI": "There are many different treatments for migraines. Often doctors recommend trying a nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) first, such as aspirin or ibuprofen. NSAIDs have fewer side effects than migraine drugs. You may also try to reduce the number of migraines you experience by identifying and avoiding triggers that lead to migraines.If NSAIDs do not effectively treat your migraines, your doctor may suggest prescription drugs that treat or prevent migraines:Certain headache drugs known as triptans (such as Imitrex, Amerge, and Axert) are often used to treat a migraine as it is starting. Preventive headache drugs such as propranolol (for example, Inderal), divalproex (Depakote), or tricyclic antidepressants (amitriptyline or nortriptyline) are used to prevent migraines in some people who get them regularly. Nontraditional treatments, such as acupuncture or the herb feverfew, may be added to drug treatment to help reduce headache pain or the number of migraines you exper...", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGVJPG": "' A little pregame snack. StanleyCup ttp://t.co/hRgGnL7FNZ isthisyoutwo sharingaweiner wheresjonesy", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVSZC2": "There are roughly 2000 hrs in a working year (50weeks x40hrs)   So divide the salary by 2000 to get the hourly rate. 36,000 / 2000  19 an hour. How many hours do you work per week? You say 4 days but you dont say how many hours per day. If you work 8 hrs a day, 4 days a week, that would be 32 x 19 thats 608 a week on top. Times 4 thats 2400 on top (before tax etc). No one knows how much tax or other deductions you pay, so its impossible to say. Just find out your monthly deductions and subtract from 2400 to get your monthly take home pay. All figures approximate. By the way, thats quite a decent salary.", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVSK8T": "well im a fan of the spanish artist joan miro...", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1M8QB": "a piano programmed to mix and dispense drinks", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKUVU9": "After upgrade 2 latest version jenkins wouldn't restart. Continuous integration not so continuous anymore! Manual restart 2 the rescue CI", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR00YPNO": "Sentimental Lady Bob Welch (Fleetwood Mac) You are here and warm, But I could look away and you'd be gone. Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. And all of the things that I said that I wanted Come rushing by in my head when I'm with you Fourteen joys and a will to be married All of the things that you say are very... Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. Sentimental gentle wind, blowin' through my life again, Sentimental lady, gentle one. Things that are priceless have a high sentimental value, among other things. It should read: You know, this is worthless, but the sentimental value is sky high.", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBL01II": "Pulling Dana upright by her hair , Sela slammed a savage right uppercut to the redhead 's chin , snapping her head . ?But not for long . I want to bust those boobs of yours open , you fucking bitch ! '' Spitting a glob of bloody saliva in Sela 's face , Dana said defiantly , Wiping the bloody spittle off of her left cheek with her hand , Sela Ward whispered , Sela stared at Dana 's larger breasts with envy . She hated those tits with a passion , but they did make splendid targets ! She smashed punch after punch into Dana 's orbs , smashing them , flattening them , spreading the large breasts across her chest as Dana cried and moaned aloud in pain .", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EFRUA": "I love seeing my friends genuinely happy. Actually just anyone genuinely happy. What's more beautiful?", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJYA84": "not clear. looking for html webpage layout template?. good luck, though the best way to do that is by buying a database of artist and painters.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGD1CD": "Vespasian (ruled 69-79AD) perhaps? He founded a new dynasty like Augustus had, had the support of both army and senate like Augustus did, respected the legal 'form' like Augustus and remodeled and built Rome up with public building projects like Augustus.", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPA0RF": "I am usually not a supporter of weight loss pills, but TwinLab's Extreme Fat Burn supplements work wonders. For workout, weight training every other day increases speed of weight loss, and do cardio on an elyptical for about 30 minutes on days you aren't weight training. Trust me. the best way to speed weight loss, is by exercising at least five times a week and strength training. you need to speed up the metabolism and increase muscle tone. CHICAGO (AP) -- Combining weight loss and exercise lowers blood pressure more effectively than exercise alone, according to a new study. The study of 133 overweight men and women with untreated hypertension found that about an hour of exercise three to four times weekly for six months reduced blood pressure, and weight loss lowered it even more. One group did aerobic exercise including jogging, resulting in an average weight loss of less than 4 pounds the other combined the exercise with dieting, attaining an average weight loss of about 17 pou...", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFTYWD7": "I get it my way all the time.. i dont know what youre talking about", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K9H9E": "Sep 3, 2013 ... The Code of Hammurabi refers to a set of rules or laws enacted by the ... of them written on tablets, which were copied as late as the 5th century B.C., more .... about new research and is always looking for a new historical tale. The Code of Hammurabi is a collection of Babylonian customary laws, written down during the reign of Hammurabi (1792-1750 BC) of the 1st dynasty of Babylon. It consists of customary norms that were collected toward the end of his reign?... May 8, 2013 ... Part of the History Commons, and the Law Commons. This Article is brought to you for .... documents, judicial proceedings similarly were recorded on clay tablets. While specific .... original cultural context. The Code of Hammurabi is a well-preserved Babylonian law code of ancient .... of what is sometimes cited as the first example of a legal code in recorded history. ... The laws were based with scaled...", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP273K": "I passed College Math with a high score, using a very similar course. It wasn't this exact one, but I like SpeedyPrep better than the old site I used to use. This course ought to help you learn those areas you are having trouble with. Most universities have programs where you can rent the books--if not, surf the web. There are a ton of websites where you can get books cheap (you just have to look around). The easier route would be to buy an older edition of the book. I have several students who are overseas for work or the military, who are taking online classes from my US university while they are overseas. What college are you going to now? If they offer online classes, then talk to them about taking them. As for your question about whether the previous owner failed the course- if the person actually read the textbook and highlighted it and made notes in the margins I'm inclined to say that the student has a low probability of having failed the course.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXTJD3": "It 's easy to get what I need . Most of all the sales staff is always friendly and helpful . Ordering online is easy and quick . I brought the Sharpie Markers for my daughter 's guestbook that was used at her wedding last week . She used a photo guestbook and guests were allowed to write in the margins .", "3KLL7H3EGDZX0H4EELM4YOJD0CPVH5": "You're right to want to lose the excess fat on your belly. It's the unhealthiest place to have it. As for weight loss, to lose weight you must consume fewer calories than you burn no matter how much exercise you do. Even if you run a marathon every day you will not lose weight if you consume more calories than you burn. So if you're not losing then you are consuming more calories than you burn, even if you think you're not. In fact, research shows that people can underestimate their calorie intake by as much as 40 to 50. As for ab exercises, they tone the muscle under the excess fat, but don't burn away fat. That is, you can't spot reduce. ...", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSRE1K": "Phrase of the day 28/01/2013 To lead someone up the garden path If someone leads you up the garden path they are trying to trick you", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NIKR7": "What works for me might not work for you. but I can lose weight easily anytime I like by doing one thing - don't eat dinner. I make sure I eat healthy, but I also eat exactly what I want - so, if I feel like pizza, I will have it, AFTER I've had a salad. in this way, I am eating healthy, but not denying myself anything. At 5pm, I am not hungry. but really, because I ate well in the day, and ENJOYED what I ate, I don't feel one bit deprived, and I think that is the key. this works for me, because I can't stand eating 3 small meals - always thinking 'I better not eat anymore' etc. so now I just make sure to eat something I really like at lunch. now, that I have reached my goal weight, I eat very tiny dinners, if I want. and if we go out with friends, I eat dinner. there is one down-side though to this - if you don't regularly eat dinner, your body gets used to this - and then when you do eat it, you will feel like you swallowed an. :-) So, don't go crazy on dinner, if you haven't been eating it..", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO2ZLWB": "His full and official title was 'Imperator Caesar Divi Filius Augustus'. Augustus' religious reforms extended or affirmed 'augusti' as a near ubiquitous title or honour for various minor local deities, including the 'Lares Augusti' of local communities, and obscure provincial deities such as the North African 'Marazgu Augustus'. This extension of an Imperial honorific to major and minor deities of Rome and her provinces is considered a ground-level feature of Imperial cult.", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN05WGCS": "eggplant because bruises are purplish and black. not red.", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNOYTT": "clothes pins jk. sorry but there's no way to tighten up skin through exercise, it's like a plastic shopping bag, once it's stretched out it won't rebound into it's original state, although it does have a limited ammount of elasticity. Sorry to break it to you, but skin tightening products are NOT the most useful things to firm you face. It all comes from your lifestyle and habits. Take a look at the link below in the 'What's your source?' ... I know - it sounds odd, coming from a Fox correspondent, but Dr. Sanjay ... Inside it said, something about the ??oo-bees?? and how of course I .... flown all the way from Singapore to help me for the past 3 weeks. ... He reveals the dangers, and he leaves it up to the individual to find an ... careful, and can describe in minute detail how I can self- adjust my body ... Black has now recovered from the spinal fusion surgery that ......", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE739BP": "advil or tylenol is what i was recommended. didn't completely relieve the pain, but it helped to ease it. As the injury was only a week ago, I would use the braces for a few weeks and see how it feels.", "3RZS0FBRWK8TEPW26HZ4H5XF1WNCPW": "What is a rapid heartbeat? A rapid heartbeat, also called tachycardia, is a condition in which the heart is beating fast, generally more than 100 beats per minute for an adult. The number of times the heart beats per minute is called the heart rate. The rate at which your heart beats varies continuously, rising and falling in response to many conditions and situations. The average adult resting heart rate falls within the range of 60 to 80 beats per minute. A rapid heartbeat can also be caused by many diseases, disorders and conditions, such as heart disease, congenital heart defects, and hyperthyroidism. There are a variety of types of rapid cardiac arrhythmias: Atrial fibrillation (AF) is caused by an. Sinus tachycardia is a rapid, regular heartbeat that is over 100 beats per minute in adults. Supraventricular tachycardia (SVT)is an extremely rapid heart rhythm that can compromise blood flow to the body if it is not treated rapidly. Sometimes a rapid heartbeat occurs for no known reason", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0EIZP": "it was extortion not consent. That's when the country can be a criminal", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB5ZP80": "Those pains are usually from tight back muscles that end up pressing onto the nerves going to the other organs as they leave the spine to make those organs act up or go into pain. That leaves every organ in your body as a possible problem but only as the result of the tight back muscles. To get rid of the pain you have to free up the muscles in your back and here's how to do that: Back: (do from a sitting position) Place your left hand on your left leg next to your body. Place your right hand over your left shoulder, fingers over the back and the palm in the front and firmly pull down on them and hold. After 30 seconds slowly lower your body forward and to the outside of your left leg, keeping your left arm fairly straight as you do. When you reach your lap remain there for another 10 seconds, release the pressure but rest there for another 30 seconds. Then reverse your hand positions and do your right side. For best results relax your body first by taking a deep breath and exhaling...", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCRY0H": "Izzy has had some bumps in the road - took awhile to be ok with little dogs, used to be a little skittish, and would only be hand fed. We broke off the hand feeding slowly, and for a few months she ate out of a bowl. Izzy then stayed at my parents house for a weekend with their 125 lb. black lab and her bff and while she was there - she refused to eat out of a bowl. My parents ended up feeding her on a plate. When we brought her home, she still refused to eat out of a bowl and then refused to eat off a plate and now will only eat off the floor. During all of this she always drank water out of a bowl. Two weeks ago, we (including Izzy) went away to a lake with friends. In total their were 5 dogs. All the dogs were fed separately because one dog had history of being food agressive, this dog was older and bigger and kept to itself unless it was feeding time.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MO0NV8": "LOL ... how Y! sorts the questions I'll never know )", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PJJH9": "periods//// food etc/// is this what period cramping feels like. my period is over what the fuck im probably not eating enough", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWORAMW": "Here is how you evaluate body symptoms. In fact, this is what medical practitioners do:  Typical Causes: 1) Infection due to a cut or bacteria from nail? 2) Broken bone? How to Evalute/Inspection for infection: 1) Is the area painful to touch? (Infection) 2) Is the area abnormally warm to the touch (Infection) 3) Is the swollen area soft or hard (Infection Absess)  Serious Symptoms to watch: 1) Is the core body temperature rising? How to Evaluate/Inspect for Broken Bone 1) Is the area painful and swollen but no obvious infection symptoms? 2) Nature of the injury? How to treat typical Infections: - If source of the infection can be found, such as with an infected nail do to bacteria, then you need to open the area. Most of the time this can be done by simply gently pulling back the skin. If you notice a white substance (white blood cells) coming from the area, then this is normally enough to allow the area to drain.", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACFBJM": "You might have gingivitis, or gum disease. Mild cases will clear up with proper brushing and flossing. I would recommend rinsing with Listerine or something similar. As for your tooth pain, you may be developing a cavity or infection near the gumline. Try rinsing with salt water and take ibuprofen for the pain. It's good that you're starting to practise proper dental hygiene again, but remember that the damage done while you were ignoring your teeth won't repair itself automatically. Brush at least twice a day, floss, rinse with mouthwash, and look into getting a Butler Gum stimulator - it's like that rubbery pick that they used to put on toothbrush handles, and when used properly can help to prevent gum disease.", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUL7HS": "Thanks for the heads up - we spotted that one this morning too. The tech team are onto it an will have it sorted ASAP. JP", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA7FJ8": "If you're a girl, about 130-150 and if you are a guy then about 140-160.", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU6G70": "I feel like I'm crazy sometimes. I am snappy like all the time (especially with mom). I am irritable and moody. I get upset easily at times. It seems like mood stabilizers doesn't really help much. And anti-depressants especially don't. Dad passed in August of 2008( I was 1 month from 20). They say the anger and stress from that might affect me. But anyway, it seems my mood and personality will NOT change. Thanks...", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGNY9V": "Why buy a Cintiq? Astropad enables you to use your iPad as a graphics tablet for your Mac. If you've always fancied getting hands-on with your design, but found that a is just a little too far out of your price range, there's a new solution that promises to turn your iPad into a professional graphics tablet for your Mac. , created by ex-Apple engineers Matt Ronge and Giovanni Donelli, consists of a pair of apps  one for your iPad and one for your Mac  that enables you use your iPad with a pressure-sensitive stylus (or your finger if you prefer) and draw directly onto Photoshop  or any other app you might prefer  on your Mac. Astropad enables you to put your iPad to work as a fully-fledged graphics tablet With Astropad you can connect your iPad to your Mac either over your wi-fi network or via USB and use it as a second, touch-sensitive display.", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYGSXS": "Well lets see I hate be a racist (I'm Not BTW) How long was apartheid in affect, how long was south Africa raped of all its resources, how long did the black population suffer while others prospered. Think about it did you complain when apartheid was in affect, I'm sure you said it really must be terrible for those people, as went on with life reaping the benefits. A LOT OF PEOPL wnt admit this,coz they hate her.sum peopl are evn jealous of her-they cnt stand d fact dat she lives 2party,but leads a luxurous lifestyle! thats my fav  out of the peopl i surveyed, it other peopl's 2", "3NFWQRSHVECU4ONDU0ZIV24QXISGF7": "0 cm (5 ft 8 1?2 in) f:160. 5 cm (5 ft 3 in), SD m:5. 16 cm (2 in) f:5. 26 cm (2 in))Students at ,1837 (N m:178 f:107, SD m:7. 06 cm (3 in) f:5. 27 cm (2 in))Non-Hispanic White Americans, 2039 (N m:797 f:824, Median m:178. 2 cm (5 ft 10 in) f:164. 8 cm (5 ft 5 in))Price, Beth et al. Australia: . Lapham, Robert and Agar, Heather (2009). Ganong, William F. (2001) Review of Medical Physiology, Lange Medical, pp. 392397, . Hermanussen, Michael (ed) (2013) Auxology  Studying Human Growth and Development, Schweizerbart, . Bolton-Smith, C. Accuracy of the estimated prevalence of obesity from self reported height and weight in an adult Scottish population . Journal of Epidemiology Community Health 54 (2): 143148. Komlos, J. Baur, M. From the tallest to (one of) the fattest: The enigmatic fate of the American population in the 20th century . Economics Human Biology 2 (1): 5774. De Onis, M. Bl ssner, M. Borghi, E.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BNARH": "nullThis is indeed a very serious situation. I have often wondered why cats dont smile. Mine just looks at me with huge eyes. Obviously you forgot to smile, the wind changed direction and you stayed that way. You may try parting your lips slightly first, practice for a few days. With your lips parted and without talking move both cheeks left and right, practice this for 8 3/4 weeks. By then you should have moved your muscles enough you widen your mouth enough to grimace. Think of something naughty to get a twinkle in your eye and your grimace may turn into a smile.", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10KMKM": "the various unions negociate contracts with bare minimum terms on a regular basis. In recent times they came to a ready agreement somewhat easily. This time there is a dispute over internet royalties and advertising dollars. this fee covers the first two. Look at it this way YOU sell a script for 20,000 but don't make another sale for 2 years now if you have no other income then you have to get a day job of be supported by a spouse if, on the other hand, you have been writing for 10 years and yu command a 35,000 fee and only sell one script in two years your residual check of 28,000 a year keeps you alive It would be nice to get a small raise to 28,500 this is called bread and butter work and 80 of the unions is about this Jim Carey is covered for the internet in his 20 million dollar per movie fee You don't get 20 million a movie you get 600 a day as a supporting actor plus residuals. Getting another 500 or 1,000 in residuals from the internet is important to you, not Jim Carey", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IKYBGI": "Dont worry buddy, just adapt a helathy lifestyle daily basis Best is stay active, dance, use only stairs (no lift), walk to nearest shop, get good sleep and stay happy Eat Yogurt, raw paneer, drink hot milk bedtime, drink lots of water, eat fruits and salads, drink green tea morning first thingand eat little salad before lunch and Dinner. u shud do 15 mins jog daily, sit-ups, climbing stairs (very effective), lunges (very effective), crunches, leg raises, dance workout for flat tummy and toned legs and butt. Cycling, swimming, dance and skipping rope is also helpful You can follow following diet and fitness tips for better results: - A good tip is turn vegetarian, have 5 time meals rather. Eat yogurt, curd in mrng and evening. You can have seafood also. breakfast of cereals, milk and egg only, with bread lunch u can have beans on bread, dal rice, bread with baked/ boiled vegetables have light dinner, again u can have bread and salad with gravy, pulses avoid chicken, beef, pork, chee...", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXOIBF": "You may have to step on the brake pedal. Most modern cars have a safety interlock that won't let them come out of park unless the brakes are applied", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP58P2Y": "Edgar Allan Poe . Related subjects: Edgar Allan Poe This daguerreotype of Poe was taken less than a year before his death at the age of 40. Born: January 19, 1809 Died: October 7, 1849 : Poet, short story writer, literary critic Genre(s): Horror fiction, Crime fiction, Detective fiction Literary movement: Influences: George Gordon Byron, 6th Baron Byron, , Ann Radcliffe, Nathaniel Hawthorne Influenced: Charles Baudelaire, Oscar Wilde, , Robert Louis Stevenson, Arthur Conan Doyle, Clark Ashton Smith, Jules Verne, H. Lovecraft, , Ray Bradbury, Lemony Snicket Edgar Allan Poe ( January 19, 1809  October 7, 1849) was an poet, short story writer, editor, critic and one of the leaders of the American . Best known for his tales of the macabre, Poe was one of the early American practitioners of the short story and a progenitor of detective fiction and crime fiction. He is also credited with contributing to the emergent science fiction genre. Poe died at the age of 40.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879HX69": "Bounty Dryer Sheets. They take the static out and leave them shiney and smelling good", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQ08NP": "This Magazine provides careers guidance 4 14-19 year olds. Follow 4 careers info, Apprenticeships, ceiag, events .co.uk", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0O4CU": "It can lead you towards gogo bars and prostitution and sex tourism. It can make you spend all day in front of the computer searching for better examples of what you like. Orgasm creates a euphoric feeling in our brains. Some of us use that euphoric feeling to make up for or to try to override other sources of pain. Some people are addicted to conquests -- getting a new person to have sex with them -- picking up new sex partners on a regular basis. Some people are addicted to the intrigue necessary to get away with being an orgasm addict without anyone else finding out. In my experience, which is with a lot of people who have decided they want to try to stop sex or love addiction, they find that porn is the door to all the other ways they try to achieve an orgasm over and over, obsessively. They usually feel a great deal of shame about these activities, especially if a spouse or employer or roommate has caught them doing it.", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0PMLP": "I'm going through the same thing with my husband. He just came home Tuesday night and I have hospice helping out. What is it used for?", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q963LO": "Other birds Cockatoos, Greys Ringnecks. Email: . Scottsdale, AZ. Small Family Breeder In Arizona We are a small breeding family in Mesa, AZ. Babies are handled from day one. I have 3 standing males for breeding with Whiteface, Lutino, Cinnamon, Pied and Pearl genes. Also budgies. You wont find better pets or breeders at reasonable prices. E-mail for more info and pictures. Email: . - ships Exotic Bird Breeders and sitters Bring your bird to camp Rocking available. Call or E-mail for a list or camp information at 480-361-9426 (fax) 480-354-2679. We accept Visa and Mastercard. Email: . Gilbert, AZ. Small scale breeder that concentrates on maintaining happy healthy birds Proven pair of Greenwing Macaws. Young, healthy, and in perfect feather. Double clutch three eggs per clutch. 2, 500. Will not ship Email: . Glendale, AZ. Snuggle Inn Cockatiels In Arizona Hand Fed/Hand Tamed. Sweet Baby Cockatiels. Assorted Colors Email: . Glendale, AZ.", "3OQQD2WO8I4DK3DF0TYJF5S995D3IB": "Yeah he can pick you up. Don't ever believe your fat though, if he can't pick you up he should start working on his strength training. Opinion 2: lmao gazpacho.lol. It is great. your hubby is in shape. be proud and just enjoy yourself. Hold on and tell him to giddyup.", "3KG2UQJ0MJMX55U8VKN7XLH15WKNQD": "Put your cell phone in the freezer.Then chip off the pieces of gum. Paint thinner might also remove the gum, but the solvent could mess up the circuitry, as well. ", "3ABAOCJ4R82RNN98JJ87K6S106BMQD": "Yet he was not unaware  how could he be? that in it there are . and thence follows the accounting. This came about because had allegedly made himself . Cornelius was emphasizing the perceived need for recognition of one bishop, one head of the Church. The first bishop to claim primacy in writing was (254-257). The timing of the claim is significant, for it was made during the worst of the tumults of the 3rd century. There were several persecutions during this century, and they hit the Church of Rome hard. In the 2nd century (AD 189), the assertion of the primacy of the Church of Rome may be indicated in St. of Lyon's (3:3:2): With the Church of Rome, because of its superior origin, all the churches must agree. and it is in her that the faithful everywhere have maintained the apostolic tradition. compiled a list of succession of the bishops of Rome, including the immediate successors of Peter and Paul: , , , , , and .", "3ZC62PVYDH8MQW9OJ458PV4S4DIXX5": "Make the audience aware of something that endangers the characters but the characters don't know about it. For example, two characters are walking together at night. Some degree of darkness will give the movie a mysterious atmosphere. Filming a person from a low angle will make that person look imposing. Filming a person from a high angle will make that person look vulnerable. Here's my opinion: Because it's more atmospheric, more mysterious, shadows look better in black-and-white, it's more stylized (because everyday life is already in color). He makes the movie a bit dark and mysterious like it should be. Let me give you some tips: - Just because your Goth doesn't mean you have to hate everyone, or even act depressed/sad. Be who you are, because Goth is just a way to dress/look. It will only put down the stereotyping that Goths are sad/depressed people. Although because a lot of teenagers are into the 'dark' and 'mysterious' scenes, a lot of people are going to call you a poseur -...", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE3T9Z": "BREAKING NEWS! The Pity Train has just de-railed at the intersection of 'Suck it up'  'Move On,' and crashed into 'We All Have Problems'before coming to a complete stop  'Get the Heck Over It.' Any complaints about how we operate can be forwarded to 1-800-waa-waaa. Life is what YOU make it - not wishing or dreaming - or fantasizing. If you don't like what's going on in your life - then - it's. The way you cope with it is what makes the difference. It will not matter what you owned or what you were owed. What will matter is not your success, but your significance. What will matter is not what you learned, but what you taught. What will matter is not your competence, but your character. What will matter is not your memories, but the memories that live in those who loved you. What will matter is how long you will be remembered, by whom and for what. For do I now persuade men, or God? or do I seek to please men? for if I yet pleased men, I should not be the servant of Christ. - Galatians 1:10", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX3A0QG": "i told my friends that i liked my space and they completely understood, most of them were the same too. it does help talking to someone though, even if its a teacher you get on with well, they will understand and help you out. x It could be with your job, your boss, your partner, or your child, whatever it might be by then you will look back and think, how nice it was when you were a teen because your worries were lighter and easier to cope with. He calls me names and says terrible things to me when I can't understand his ... large contributor to abusive behavior finding nighttime assistance may help a lot. ... ?o stage of my progression turned out to be the total nightmare I was dreading . .... I'm determined to schedule some 'me' time this year, to help me and help .... Now he has had dementia for 2 years and he is in the stage of not wanting ...", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT71FQ": "It takes aproximately 28 days for the guppy to give birth. If she has not given birth before then she shouldn't have very many fry (5-10.) Once she has given birth to all her fry, you should take her out because most fish are known to eat their fry.", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK0Y50": "Chihuahuas What's good about 'em What's bad about 'em  There are energetic Chihuahuas, and placid Chihuahuas. Hard-headed Chihuahuas, and sweet-natured Chihuahuas. Serious Chihuahuas, and good-natured goofballs.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMS3TR": "May 29, 2013 ... I was on vacation in Ithaca with my boyfriend at the time. ... Do all that camping stuff like cooking hot dogs on a stick over the fire and ... sure enough her bike is missing and one of my car's doors is open. i had a dream that my cousin brother died (all i cam remember is dat it was a bad ... I dream frequently about my very close auntie/god mother(my mam's twin). ... fell and I cracked my head open, then my spirit was watching over my dead body. when i was 9 i was trying to go to sleep at my mom's house.all night i was hearing things like foot steps. my mom had a 2 cats and a dog ... I awoke after a nightmare where my mothrr brother n myself werein a car accident my mother n brother .... After trying to do some quick research, I cannot find an answer, but there may well be some reports somewhere that explains it a bit better. Was your boyfriends cat in good health before he ran off? Sometimes, cats do just run off.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559UZMI": "Vietnam once had a king, as did such countries as Burma and Thailand (which still does). The royalty was famous for their prized orange or pink pearls that usually came from snails. The French took control, for a time, then regained Vietnam after WWII when the Axis powers controlled both Vietnam and France. The French lost the independence fight, but the freedom fighters were, as in Korea, divided among those who wanted communism and those who did not. Americans sent 'advisors' to help the Republic of South Vietnam, but it was a very corrupt government and did not really have the strong support of the people--most of which were more interested in simply being and living as Vietnamese. In the North, however, the famous liberator Ho Chi Minh was a communist who wanted to do for Vietnam what Mao did for China. Of course, both China and the USSR were happy to help him. Eisenhower sent a few advisors, Kennedy quite a few more. After Kennedy was assassinated, Johnson escalated th", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJ1ALU": "If you have a sharp pain and numbness in the legs, you need to get that checked right away. It could be nerve damage, and you need to find out how to stop the damage from progressing.", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR58I8": "Time...some cats will be buddies right off. Some take time. My male cat is friends with anyone new.", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01MQLG": "Optional: You can keep this on the patio in the sun to steep. ... When applying make sure to get underneath the leaves as well as ... Benefits: Repels cabbage worms ..... to keep spraying the plants after it rains and such or they will still eat?... In other words, doesn't 'repel' but rather kill after a bite and also ... I also use front line on my dog but they still get on him they just dont ... Thanks for the info! The only suggestion I can make is not to put your tick collar, or any other collar, on tight. A) How you like something tight around your neck that you cannot remove? B) The insecticide in the collar can irritate your dog's skin. For instance, if you only use a tick collar, you may see ticks attached and feeding on the dog, even directly under the tick collar. This has to happen for the tick to take in the insecticide and die.", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9384S": "if you want a scary one, well, i don't know. I dont really like scary movies. good movie Women are a crazy breed, it's like asking them 'is anything wrong?' and they say 'no.' Later they're screaming and shouting at you because something is wrong, yet again you ask 'is something wrong?' and they still say 'nothing is wrong'... i think it's a test that women have perfected over the years and we men are marked on how well we do with the situation, plus it lets them know we still care if we can be arsed. Most men however are just as bad as they virtually never say what they feel til it's too late and when they do say it they have a tendency not to say it very well. All in all, women are crazy bastards, men are crazy bastards and we all love each other because we're all crazy bastards. If you start feeling crazy crazy crazy (as in, more than you've ever felt in your entire life combined) hungry to the point where it makes you feel nauseous, coupled with breast tenderness - - THEN be con...", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1TR4P": "Footballer's ankle Footballer's Ankle is a pinching or impingement of the ligaments or tendons of the ankle between the bones, particularly the talus and tibia. This results in pain, inflammation and swelling. A common cause of anterior impingement is a bone spur on anklebone (talus) or the shinbone (tibia).", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WSIM4": "medulla oblongata controls heart beat and breathing.", "3ZRKL6Z1E8138TSZ0KZH21N5M8MGSQ": "Well, gee whiz!! I never was afraid of going in there, in the dark BEFORE I read this but, from now on, I'm going to start checking to see if someone might be hiding in the shower just behind the door!!! I'm scared now!!! VERY SCARED!", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBKMJN": "try this it will make you look good and feel good   1. You allow yourself to heal from any toxins that have been held inside your body,   2. You allow your Mind to release any harsh feelings or Sad emotions,   3. You allow your Spirit to become open and free. Once you ahve Detoxified and Rejuvenated your Mind Body and Spirit,   4. You can finally Allow yourself to enjoy real Homeostasis. (Homeostasis: Optimal Well being, Optimal Health, At a point in your life when all is ok, and righht with you Physically, Mentally, Emotionall, and Spiritually.) Stress can make any disorder worse. May it be Mental Emotional or physical. Stress is when you worry way too much about things that can be fix with a little effort on your own personal part. Stress has been proven to cause serious health risks, such as heart disease, Endurance Problems, Fatigue, Emotional Imbalances, etc. There are options to dealing stress and weight loss. Such as Detox plans and rejuvenation Plans, as the one I have", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNEJRDZ": "So you're gonna get sloshed while the turkey cooks? OH my, how fun! I would go with a white (looks pink) zinfandel or lambrusco(red). Or you might even try a Sangria. Here is a link to the food network with some recipes that would be fun and tasty and make a big batch so you can get really snockered! LOL http://web.foodnetwork.com/food/web/cachedSearchResults/0,7822,sangriaRecipe,00.html?searchStringsangriaampsitefoodampgosearch.x20ampgosearch.y12ampsearchTypeRecipe", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SY6RO": "Your baby is feeling very insecure and scared. You need to cuddle with him and show him this is his new home. You probably got the food they've been feeding him at the shelter and he will eat when he gets hungry so don't force it. Right now he just needs some TLC to help him get over this big event. Be glad he's not hiding somewhere which is what a lot of kittens do. I'd say he's healthy if he was neutered (spay for boy cats). He would have seen a vet. The SPCA should have given you a vet record and told when he needs to go back. If not call and ask for it.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1NB84": "Niggas hurt and ruin girls everyday and the new niggas gotta get the aftermath..", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8M9W6": "Sounds like you are having some adjustment issues. The last week is so you can have your period. However the first month or two is hard for your body to adjust. Eventually it well adjust. The thick clear discharge usually means ovulation has occurred. Remember to use a back up birth control during the first month of use. I think your body will adjust as for these problems you are having are common. However if this continues and you have break threw bleeding or no period you will need to change pills.", "3VLL1PIENQMO1IVBJV6X33TA09CZO0": "Protein powders are in no way superior to protein from food. Your body doesn't care one bit where you get your protein from and in fact protein from food can be better, because food comes with other nutrients as well.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1N8B1": "Some people have naturally round faces, which actually attracts most men. I kind of have a round face. Good luck and quit scratching.", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QVNKO": "You most likely have a bladder infection but any bleeding from the body is a sign of a serious problem, so immediately go to the doctor, don't pa-nick because it is most likely like i said a bladder infection, They are very painful and if left untreated can spread to your kidney's and that is also extremely painful. If you have any cranberry juice drink that, or really just any fluids to ease the pain until making in to your doctor for antibiotics. Also if you cant get to your doctor in the next day or so, there are over the counter medications for bladder infections called AZO, found by the pharmacy in most stores close to the femine products. Bladder infections can be caused by a number of things so don't think it is your fault or be embarrassed. Good luck. God Bless", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIIT56": "Zagros Mountains mouse-like hamster The Zagros Mountains mouse-like hamster ('Calomyscus bailwardi') is a relatively little-known rodent which was the first species of mouse-like hamster to be described. It is also known as the Iranian Mouse-like Hamster, though there are several species of mouse-like hamster found in different parts of Iran. This is the largest species of mouse-like hamster. They are dark grey on top and white underneath. They are known to feed on herbs and grass seed. 504 50 pages X 10 words  500  4 (How to Feed Hamsters)504 I wouldn't be feeding hamsters any kind of meat to begin with. Feed them hamster food and vegetables. I don't ever remember giving my hamsters any kind of meat, they ate the hamster food from the pet store and we had the hamster treats (pellet things) and the occasional vegetable. I guess it is okay for them to eat meat, I just never fed it to mine.", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8L1HP": "Try rubbing ice on it.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2HT1S": "Yes it is shedding - keep your tank moist to help with the process", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9ONHH": "Salon Leader Bethlehem, Pennsylvania: As a Salon Leader with Hair Cuttery, you will manage the http://t.co/zIDVC96Gn2 tweetmyjobs jobs", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO9C0N": "Whatever you do, do NOT get a new pet right away. Peopel say it helps heal, but you're going to hate it for not being exactly like your old dog. You'll never love it as much. I know when my dog died (I was 15, and he was about 11. We got him when I was 4) I was upset for a long time. You have to just cry it out, deal with the pain, and move on, but never try to forget. The memories help you get over him. I promise. I still smile whenever I think of him as a puppy, picking up a big furry hat, it was bowl-shaped and stiff, and it flopped over his eyes and he walked into a table leg because he couldn't see.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKCHQZ": "You need to tell an adult immediately! Whether it's her mother, a counselor, a therapist, doctor, your parents, whomever, you need to notify an adult. Even though she might end up in a mental hospital, trust me, that will all be for the best in the end. Being in a place like that may be the thing that helps her get through all of this stuff that's happening to her. She could also do regular counseling sessions or see a therapist, because those can work too. I know it may be scary at first, but I recently had the same problem. I told someone, and my friend did end up staying at a hospital for a week, but I was able to visit her, and after she got out she was REALLY thankful to me that I had told someone. It did her a lot of good, and she was happy that she had gotten help. Now she's actually better, so I suggest that you please tell an adult. You can try talking to her about it if you want, but the best thing in this situation is to tell an adult because there is always the risk that...", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G676S": "Really, it's part of a anxiety/depression issue. Were you made fun of when you were younger? Or do you have low self esteem? It's funny how depression  anxiety can mess with people's minds. You might want to go to the doctor, they might prescribe you a medication for it, so you can go out and have fun without worrying about if someone's talking about you or whatever. Opinion 2: I have the same problem. I didn't think it would but it is getting better. You really need to try hard to ignore it. If you don't already, try to hang out with more people more often. Other people told me it is simply low self-esteem. When I was really bad at walking I found that I only thought I was walking funny when there was other people around me, which lead me to think it was actually low self esteem.", "3KG2UQJ0MJMX55U8VKN7XLH15WLNQE": "Besides the esophagus, does the pH of foods really have an effect on the body? I learned in Human Physiology course that the stomach is highly acidic and any food or liquid entering the stomach is quickly neutralized by the buffers, enzymes secreted by a couple organs (pancreas, gall bladder, etc.) Is there truth to my mother's claim? Could the organs be overrun with food pH and thereby excreting buffers often enough to cause the body to be out of homeostasis?", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA70TS": "I had a white upright freezer that got some mold on the outside...I just took a 50/50 mixture of Clorox bleach and water..dipped an old wash cloth in and wiped down the entire outide of the freezer. I didn't rinse it off...just left the mixture on the freezer...to keep the mold or mildew from coming back. I did rinse off the rubber gasket around the door, though. I wasn't sure if the bleach would make it deteriorate. That should make your freezer look like new.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879IX6A": "http://t.co/MGatfDo5H4 : Peripheral Neuropathy  Neuropathic Pain: Into the Light Peripheral Neuropathy  Neur... http://t.co/gFxmYhzc8U", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRYD6VJ": "Hello On this page you'll get the requested information. http://www.webqc.org/balance.php?reactionNaCl2BAgNO33DNaNO32BAgCl", "3SR6AEG6W5RE4BZJJW9O5NN7ITVHY4": "If you are interested and would like to join the class, kindly contact myself Nahla (nahlabel) or Sister Mariam (mariam101a) for class invites. (Quran 47 :4), in his learned discussion of jihad. This ritual execution is also mentioned in other Muslim legal texts and in narratives of Christian and prominent Muslim historians. Allah hath chosen the Faith for you then die not except in the Faith of Islam) or 3:67 (Abraham was not a Jew nor yet a Christian but he was true in Faith, and bowed his will to Allah (which is Islam), and he joined not gods with Allah), he understands what so many imams tell him: that the true Jews and Christians of today are the Muslims, and the people who go by those names are renegades and rebels against God. This argument does not rest on any idea that Abraham or Moses observed specifically Islamic rituals, but on the idea that they were prophets of the True Faith which was restored by Mohammed after it was corrupted by Jews and Christ...", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE75Z1": " Worldwide, the average flaccid penis is 3.61 inches in length, while the average erect penis is 5.16 inches. Nope", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IKXGBM": "It would not be advisable, since the Indonesian box turtle, better know as Malayan Box turtle, (Cuora aboinensis) prefers a humid, watery habitat. It should have a shallow tank full of water about half the height of the turtle's shell. Lily leaves are relished so do not put expensive ones in with turtles.", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605NHDU": " just now  try sparknotes, maybe..if ur lucky borred223  9 years ago 0 Thumbs up 0 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Add your answer Where can i read Bridge to Terabithia online for free? I have been searching everywhere, but all the free online ebook sites dont have this book and i really want to read it again before i go see the movie. Please, if you give me a website, be sure it has the book. (oh, and my local library doesnt have it in an ebook either. unfortunatly) Add your answer Source Submit Cancel  I think that this question violates the Community Guidelines Chat or rant, adult content, spam, insulting other members, show more I think that this question violates the Terms of Service Harm to minors, violence or threats, harassment or privacy invasion, impersonation or misrepresentation, fraud or phishing, show more Additional Details", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMXAE4": "I'm willing to bet you get as many different answers to this question as there are people who answer it. My personal favourites are currently While You Were Sleeping and Everafter. Casablanca wins this one.", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT42FMC": "Honey,defective/deformed/'bad' trachs can be congenital  genetic. It is NOT age related.", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX3NWJ": "You should ask a specialist, not on Yahoo answers!", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP6SL6": "Kavita Kumari , 15 , had been swallowing hair for the past year would not just eat her own hair , but strands she found lying around Addiction meant she had lost interest in eating food and would vomit Surgeons in India have removed a five-foot long hairball from the stomach of a teenager who was so ill she could barely swallow water .", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9NHNA": "Other studies show that the benefits of depression medication have been exaggerated , with some researchers concluding that Medication may be right for you if depression is interfering with your ability to function in an important part of your lifework , school , or in your relationships , for exampleand you think it s worth the common side effects of antidepressants , such as weight gain and loss of sex drive . Therapy , exercise and other lifestyle changes can work just as well or better than antidepressantsminus the side effectsbut often depression can rob you of the energy and motivation to pursue these avenues .", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VTXC2": "usually you can feel swollen sore lymph nodes just by lightly running the flat of your fingers over the side of your neck/ throat area. It will feel like a firm marble. Either way the treatment is the same. Don't under estimate the simple warm salt water gargle. It removes a lot of the bacteria and prevents worsening of the symptoms. Do this at least morning and night and more often if possible. Listerine mouth wash is a good antiseptic to use as well or Dr. Tichnors antiseptic must be diluted found in some Walmarts. Looks like listerine and usually found near mouthwashes. It is excellent for any thing that is sore or infected. It burns scratches but will kill bacteria. Kills warts as well. It does not replace antibiotics if you have a very sore throat you should always be concerned about strep which should always be treated with antibiotics to prevent possible serious complications. Remember when we didn't have all these high priced drugs. People used simple things that works wel...", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXGCJV": "It provides travel products, hard and soft-sided luggage, bags, backpacks, duffels, shoulder bags, waist pouches, sling bags, duffel trolleys, vanity cases, office bags and satchels, suitcases, and briefcases. The company offers its products primarily under the VIP, Carlton, Footloose, Alfa, Aristocrat, Skybags, and Buddy brands. It also manufactures moulded furniture under the Moderna brand.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHB0JO0": "Try this if you want an Aquarium: http://www.shops-flower.com/recommends/YesPleaseAquarium.html", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JIC4ZV": "No, if it was cancerous, it would be really dark black or have some other strange coloration. Even if you wear sunscreen you are still going to get some sun exposure, there's nothing you can do about it. Don't worry. If you're really worried look up some pictures of skin cancer online and you'll see that you're ok.", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014VY1I": "This is one of the most commonly asked question on yahoo answers, Please read this, at the bottom it has info on penis enlargement Just about every guy wonders how he measures up in the down-there department at one time or another. In addition to size, guys also wonder about other aspects of how their penises look, such as whether the skin covering the penis is normal or if its OK for a guys penis to hang to the left or right (it is!). Penis size is an obvious example. This applies to height and weight, size of hands and feet, and, yes, also to penis size. So what is normal? Surprisingly, perhaps, given how common concerns about penis size seem to be, there are very little good data based on large samples. But not all woman can take the same size of penis. I wonder if something like that could give me an extra inch or two.' Penis-enlargement products aren't difficult to find. Average penis size is the same in both gay and straight men. http://www.mayoclinic.com/health/penis/MC00026", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV697382": "Abstractions are themselves not actual entities. They are the only entities that can be real but are not actual entities. An abstraction is a conceptual entity that involves more than one single actual entity.", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QSKNI": "Johnny Dougherty John J. 'Johnny Doc' Dougherty is a prominent labor leader in Philadelphia. He is the Business Manager of Local 98 of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers. As a leader within the Philadelphia organized labor scene, Dougherty is a prominent political figure, who has helped many Democratic candidates get donations and volunteers.", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W3C4SQ": "Holocaust Remembrance event tonight with guest speaker Rolf Schtte, 7 pm, Rivier's Dion Center, Clement St, Nashua http://t.co/KHmfW0Gkpl", "3TUOHPJXYHV71W4Y9Z9MNCQLVB9WX8": "I don't know how kids get so out of control... I know almost everyone says that 'hitting' kids is always wrong, but it's not always. What I mean is this... My daughter bit me once, she was just under 2 when it happened, I simply replied with a quick smack of her cheek, not hard enough to consider it abuse or anything, rather just enough to let her realize that what she did was wrong (didn't even leave a red mark). Personally I think that time outs don't work. When 'punishing' our kids, we must do what makes them realize that what they did was wrong. It's hard to say what to do when they actually get to the point of where your child is at now... I think that the 'fear factor' is key. I've watched my sisters kids for her a few times... they scream all the time, I made them stop simply by smacking a piece of wood on the kitchen table, was a loud slap, but they wouldn't stop, asked them twice to chill out, but didn't listen. Simply the slapping of wood was to get their attention, f", "3EQVJH0T40JINP0P9QMPX6VS3RBTHP": "Questions to Ask During an EVP Session http://t.co/3Mq3LAsHXI paranormal ghosthunting evp ghosts hubpages demons", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8I0JP": "It is well known among physicians that home pregnancy tests can show a ... If I had cancer again, I'd do it for as long ... first before I start the receipe do you ...", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HPEHL": "' With a block block here, And a block block there, Here block, There block, EVERYWHERE BLOCK BLOCK'", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGQ1DE": "Description logic provides an extension of frame languages, without going so far as to take the leap to first-order logic and support for arbitrary predicates. Gellish is an example of a combined ontology language and ontology that is description logic based. It distinguishes between the semantic differences among others of: It also contains constructs to express queries and communicative intent.", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIWIUX": "No, you wont depending on how big it is.", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWMC5A": "Absolutly, its a the best way to clear up acne. I know because when i was in highschool i had bad acne and tried it, it worked. One thing that also helped was to crack open about 18-30 eggs and beat them as your where gettting them ready for an omlette, then gently stick your face into the bowl and submerge it hold it there for about 10 seconds then open your eyes and hold them open for 10 seconds. That will really help.", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10HMKJ": "Therefore, fantasy has its own rules, and in order to write the stuff I had to figure out what some of those rules are. I'm still working on the details of this, you understand, but after a few years in the field I think I've hit on most of the basic points, and here they are: Watt-Evans' First Law of Fantasy: Stories are about people. A good story is a good story, and the genre doesn't change that. a pointless, rambling bunch of events is not a story. A story is not just events, it's events that affect someone. Stories are about people. Being people ourselves, we're just fascinated with people. Oh, in science fiction and fantasy the people don't have to be human, necessarily, but they still have to be people. They don't even need to actually appear in the story, but the story needs to be about people somehow. In Ray Bradbury's classic SF short story There Will Come Soft Rains , for example, no human beings ever appear.", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWOPMA6": "Slight swelling, bruising, and tenderness around skin that has been injured is normal. A puncture wound may also break small blood vessels under the skin and cause more swelling and bruising than you would expect. Rapid swelling and bruising that begins immediately after a puncture injury often means there is a large amount of bleeding or that damage to deeper tissues is present. Puncture wounds caused by the injection of a substance under high pressure into the skin may cause rapid swelling and need immediate medical treatment. Swelling in a joint may indicate injury to the joint structures or an infection. If a puncture wound was near a joint, the swelling may limit the joint's range of motion, and the joint may feel tight or stiff. 'It is a massive blow and comes just at the moment when I was in top shape and very fit. 'I hate it because I know I am probably out of the game for weeks and weeks. Even now, I feel that one of the bones in my foot is broken again.'", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJA3PP": "already registered as a blood donor and bone marrow donor", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1LQ8S": "You can still treat her like a friend and hang out with her, unless she's doing something really rotten to you. But in the meantime, you should find hobbies and things that you're interested in where you can meet new people as well and expand your horizons.", "3OYHVNTV5TWTCNWPJU3NGO5XW0YKOY": "How much should I weigh for my height and age ? This is a question I hear quite often . Do I weigh too much ?", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ52ND": "Pocket Dragon Adventures Pocket Dragon Adventures was a short-lived 1996 syndicated cartoon series, based on the Pocket Dragon character created by artist Real Musgrave, best known from Pocket Dragons figurines also based on his work. The cartoon was about the Pocket Dragons (a group of very small dragons) who live with a kindly old wizard, and their many adventures. The Girl Who Heard Dragons The Girl Who Heard Dragons is a 1994 collection of short fantasy and science fiction by the American-Irish author Anne McCaffrey. 'The Girl Who Heard Dragons' does not include bibliographic data on previous publication of the collected stories and provides any annotation for only one of them, 'The Greatest Love' ('written in 1956'). Alternatively, the player may import characters from 'The Bard's Tale trilogy' into 'Dragon Wars'. These design improvements came in this next game, 'Dragon Wars'. Since to this point the game didn't feature any dragons, the new title meant that Heineman had to add...", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYYE85": "It's tough introducing new cats. I have done it 3 times now. It gets easier everytime. My oldest cat was very wary of our 2nd cat when we brought her home. They kept their distance for the most part, but if they got to close they hissed and swatted the air. This went on for about 2 days. The 3rd day my husband and I came home to them snuggling on the couch! Cute right?! Your cat sounds like she would prefer a one cat home. Sometimes that is the case. My husband and I wanted to adopt a certain kitty a while back, but the lady at the shelter advised against it b/c the cat was not well suited for a multi cat home. What I would suggest trying though:  Bring home the new kitty and let her have free roam of a room that has a door. Set up everything she could need in that room . You want your new kitty to feel safe and secure. Do not lock them in a room together, that will get ugly, and it will establish fear in the new cat. The cats will sniff eachother out under the door.", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKU9G5": "Hi, your first stop, google depo shot side effects, you should find your answer there, once you do you may decide its your last shot. Good Luck", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT5R9J": "Lower left abdomen Pain here most often suggests a problem in the lower colon, where food waste is expelled. Possible causes include inflammatory bowel disease or an infection in the colon known as diverticulitis. Some causes of left lower quadrant abdominal pain: Bowel cancer Irritable bowel syndrome Colitis Crohn's disease Infectious diarrhea Shingles Spinal disc disease Kidney stones Ectopic pregnancy Pelvic inflammatory disease Ovarian cyst Ovarian cancer Endometriosis See also left lower quadrant abdominal pain Crohn's disease Diverticulitis Rovsing's sign Rovsing's sign, named after the Danish surgeon Niels Thorkild Rovsing, is a sign of appendicitis.", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGW7WS0": "A life-long sleep disorder marked by four symptoms : sudden brief sleep attacks , cataplexy , temporary paralysis , and hallucinations . The hallucinations are associated with falling asleep or the transition from sleeping to waking . A disorder in which the patient is awakened repeatedly during the night by cramps or twitches in the calf muscles . Nocturnal myoclonus is sometimes called periodic limb movement disorder ( PLMD ) . A type of sleep that differs from rapid eye movement ( REM ) sleep .", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSTROZ": "I have a large labia and its never been a problem until now because it keeps rubbing and causing rashes 'down there' and rubs on my knickers and gives me chaffing. it stings when I put moisturizer on it too. Shes a nurse so she could be a little understanding but she will be like 'your not having plastic surgery at age 14!!!' so how can i convice her? and how do i bring the subject up!! its so embarrasing!!", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW85G12": "'one direction are the richest boyband in british history' we made them rich and they made us poor heatOneDirection", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWR8MC6": "These premium  essential oils are imported directly from the manufacturer in France. I am a massage therapist and have been using Tropical Traditions for about 5 years now. The quality of the oil  improves the glide that I need for a good massage, it also nourishes the skin as I massage my client. I recommend these products to family members and friends. I have had very good luck ordering from this company and hope to expand into using  other products soon. Ayla - Troy, VA I love Tropical Traditions! Their  lotions and massage oils are the only skin products I ever use. I know they are made with ingredients I trust on my skin. Everywhere I go, I turn other folks on to their products. It is so nice to have found a company you can trust for your  health. Their customer service is excellent. Thank you, Tropical Traditions! June - Mountain Iron, MN     Original Varieties Lavender Virgin Coconut Oil Massage Oil 8 oz. Massage thoroughly into skin using slow strokes.", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZDFLB": "ok holy hell this is painful!", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH06D3K": "Puritan Society - The modern use of the word puritan is commonly used to describe someone who may have ... group of puritans ... due to their persecution ...", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBX30H": "Filling Fell Out? Why You Should Get a Lost Filling Replaced I got an email earlier this week from a reader named Trish. She asked the following: What will happen if the filling comes out of your tooth, and you dont have it replaced, other than pain trying to eat? Lost Filling from Tooth Before I answer that question, lets take a look at why fillings fall out. If it was an old filling and it just came out, you may have a cavity under the filling. When you have a hole in your tooth and you chew, you push the food down into the hole. Since teeth with lost fillings are more difficult to clean (see 3), that food could be sitting in there for quite some time and cause your breath to be less than pleasant to those around you! Even if you do have bad breath, people probably arent going to tell you. If the reason that you lost the filling was because you had a cavity under it, the cavity will probably get bigger the longer treatment is put off. That. The new dentist did not cause the problem!", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BNQPE": "no its not. as long as you want to pursue something, its never too late.", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUASOM": "10 Foot Pole!I wouldn't touch this with a 10 foot pole! Sex offender but no sex involved. Spare me! Four children involved? Oh, My! 2 plus 2 still make a 4! Dee9", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBS87B": "Leave the lights on for up to 8 hours a day so they can get the benefits fo the lights off and darkness. Also algae buildup will occur with too much light. If it is a heated tank then remove the fish in some of its old water.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHYNDB": "Do you know if anyone who has been released from their job because they did not get the flu vaccine ? American Association of Family Practitioners . ( 2011 ) . AAFP supports mandatory flu vaccinations for healthcare personnel . Retrieved from : ATrain . ( 2014 ) . To accept or refuse the flu vaccine .", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OI0UN": "this mornings NYT magazine.", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QTKNJ": "It really depends on how well you take care of your teeth after you realize you have it. To speed up healing time, floss 1-2 times everyday, brush 2-3 times everyday, and use Listerine. And once it goes away, follow these habits so it will not return. ANd always remember to see your dentist every 6 months.", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTAUZBX": "Weight gain has a huge effect on your body. Although you said that was two years ago, so you'd think your body would equalize after so long. If I were you, I'd go to a different doc for a second opinion.", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NHZG9": "Simply stating a fact, any pet, especially a dog, needs companionship and owner attention, as I am sure most dog owners are able to give.19 hours ago   7 Ros BaneI would try and see if a kind neighbour would pop in throughout the day.19 hours ago   1 Jane Lewisseparation anxiety for 10 hours at a time is like torture for the poor dog.Fact not snarky!! !19 hours ago   12 Kay GlenAre you able to come home (during a lunch break?) to come home and let him out?Or ask a friendly neighbour to let him out?", "3SX4X51T807N0AN373QYMA21RO2OAL": "What type of light? The watts is the power consumption not the output. Some lights are more efficient than others. The algae is brush algae and a terror. Some fish like plecos and platy/molly/guppies, cherry shrimp, etc, will help remove it from the live plants. Sometimes with proper fertilization, lighting and CO2, you can get the other plants to out compete with the brush algae for food, but in my experience a nice algae eater will do all sorts of wonders on keeping plants clear of the stuff. It often comes in on some driftwood or as a contaminant on some live plants. Once introduces, it can be an issue.", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SZ3HJ": "Tears in Heaven. Eric Clapton I guess because it's about the death of his young son, which addresses one of my greatest fears--losing the true love of my life, my daughter. I imagine the pain he went through dealing with his son's death, and admire that he is able to deal with it by writing this song. I can't even write about the darn song without crying. These are definitely sad tears. It's even worse for me right now, I suppose, knowing that a good friend of mine just last week lost her daughter and son in law in an tragic car accident--and then today my daughters boyfriend totaled his car (he is ok, and she wasn't with him, thank God. You just never know when things might happen. ok, this is TOO depressing. But it's a beautiful song, anyway. Tears In Heaven by Eric Clapton and Will Jennings Would you know my name If I saw you in heaven? Would it be the same If I saw you in heaven? I must be strong And carry on, 'Cause I know I don't belong Here in heaven.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0J62A": "just masturbate if it cannot erect.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EEFY0": "http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Macro  I tyhink that this link will b helpful", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG612JA": "I don't have the channel cuz I'm irish!! Ahhh", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ5SP2": "Well, in my opinion, I have had sex with a guy that had a large penis and I got no enjoyment out of it what so ever. In fact it was mostly painful. On the other hand I have had sex with a guy that had a very small penis (like the size of my finger) and got no enjoyment out of it.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EGFY2": "lavanya22 Sep 2012 hi, I am 31 height 5.6'' weight 90 i want to reduce weight as early as possible kindly advice me to reduce my weight Ravindra Arabole22 Sep 2012 Hello sir i am 26 yrs old my height is 5.6' inch  my weight is 68 kg so pl guidline to me to reduce the weight. neha mishra22 Sep 2012 hii... i am 21 year old my weight is 58 and height is 5.4'' plz help me how i reduse my weight ......... pllzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz............ priyadharshini.B21 Sep 2012 im 21 yr old ,my height 5.4  weight 61.how to reduce my weight? priyadharshini21 Sep 2012 im 21yrs old my  height 5.4  weight is 60.how to reduce my weight? priyadharshini21 Sep 2012 im 21yrs old my  height 5.4  weight is 60.how to reduce my weight? pranshu21 Sep 2012 i am 16 yrs old.....ht'5ft 10 inch.....wt 88.5......how i reduce my wt...plzzz help me.... sathya.p21 Sep 2012 HELLO ,I AM 22 YEARS WORLD .MY WEIGHT IS 62.SO PLEASE REDUCE MY FAT.PLS HELP ME. PLEASEEEEEEE", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX9A3F": "KiK KiK Textilien und Non-Food GmbH is a textile discounter based in Bnen, Germany, founded in 1994 by Stefan Heinig and the holding company Tengelmann Group. KiK is the largest textile discounter chain in Germany and operates about 3,200 stores in Germany, Austria (since 1998), Slovenia and Czech Republic (since 2007), Hungary and Slovakia (since 2008), Croatia (since 2011) and Poland (since March 2012). 'KiK' is an acronym for ().", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WPUPJ": "The stress could be making your blood pressure go up also. I know thats how it happens to me ocassionally. The red face is nothing to be ashamed of.", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8XPEZ": "Santiago: 'Means 'Saint James', derived from Spanish santo 'saint' combined with Iago, an old Spanish form of JAMES, the patron saint of Spain. Cities in Chile and Spain bear this name.' MADRID, February 20 (Xinhua) -- Following are the results of the men's slalom race of world combined title with downhill to come in Sierra Nevada, Spain: 1.", "3Q2T3FD0ON6ZGM36L8WB7YZQQEYM3B": "They say sneezing is like 1/8th of an orgasim but legit after 35 sneezes it doesn't feel like an orgasim at all! orgasim", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE02JSW": "Not sure when season 3 comes out but the books are great I highly recommend them they have a little of everything for everyone the way I see it. The show stays fairly true to the books but they do make some changes along the way... Some that I think will bite them in the butt in the end(like making Dany fireproof) I believe it was only a temporary state brought on by bloodmagic... Not to mention GRRMartin even stated that she wasn't always fireproof... But anyway besides a few discrepancies the show follows the book pretty well.", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV1XUD": "I've been taking Topamax for migraine prophylaxis for about seven months but have been at 200mg/day for about three or four. Truth be told, it is a powerful drug with many reported side effects. That doesn't neccesarily mean you'll be affected by every single one, though. The most common SEs seem to be decreased appetite and subsequent weight loss, tingling in some extremities that goes away over time (a couple months), and the inability to taste carbonation correctly (no more soda). The only one that could possibly be scary from that list is the weight loss I you are already underweight, but most people welcome it according to my neurologist. I have had nightmares that I relate to topamax but only when the first couple nights after I change my dose. I've never experience blurry vision, but know that acute glaucoma is a rare side effect of taking it...I would be aware, but wouldn't worry too much. Overall, while I have experienced some side effects, none of them have ruined my life or", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q973LP": "John Wang Collection/Photographer's Choice RF/Getty Images Updated January 07, 2015. What are Menstrual Cramps? One of the most common symptoms of premenstrual syndrome, menstrual cramps are thought to be caused by excess levels of prostaglandins (hormone-like substances linked to pain and inflammation). Menstrual cramps typically affect the lower abdomen but may also radiate to the lower back and thighs. For many females, cramps are a normal consequence of premenstrual syndrome. But if you're experiencing severe cramping, consult your doctor to see if you're suffering from an underlying health issue (such as endometriosis, pelvic inflammatory disease, or uterine fibroids). Herbal Remedies for Menstrual Cramps So far, scientific support for the claim that any remedy can treat menstrual cramps is limited.", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYKJR9": "Crabtree  EvelynIt depends on which country you live in. Try going to the website, sometimes you can get really good offers on there or try instore. You could also try T.K MAXX if you live in the U.K., they sometimes stock the odd product. I hope my answer helps. ...happy hunting :)", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT40FMA": "i would say in a secure cage, you can leave them no longer then 24 hours. with there diverse eating, they need new food daily and clean water. There are Chinese Water Dragon-Physignathus cocincinus - Green Water Dragon-Physignathus lesueurii, but I have never heard of a Chile water dragon.", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63S99U5": "Well, there can be no worse thing than losing a child so I'm not surprised that your mother can't get past that. When my sister was killed in a car accident, that was end of any good relationship with my mother too up until the day she died. You're still a minor though and you can't take care of yourself - you're not even old enough to get a job. Keep focused on school and friends and activities you enjoy. I hope you find someone you can talk to about your concerns such as an adult you admire and trust.", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZHDTZ": "Boy does this sound familiar. 6yrs ago my granddaughter came over with her prize from the carnival, no bigger than a minnow. White cloud Mountain Minnow These little plain and fancy fish are often recommended for goldfish.", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDW1AF": "The GYN did start me on a progesterone cream , but I think it would be too soon for that to be working , as I have only used it for about 4 days ! hi java -- -- yes , i agree it is scary -- -i always think the worst and the only thing i ever come up with is Brain Tumor ! -- -but i looked up the symptoms of that and although they do say dizziness , there are so many other terrible symptoms i assume for now it 's to do with menopause -- -- i really hate it though , cause even now as i type my head almost feels like its swaying ! -- -- i ca n't imagine progesterone cream working , but if it does , i must get me some ! there is a theory that the problem is related to fluctuating hormones -- -i am so glad i found this thread -- -i feel a little better hearing others discuss this , but it is still creepy ! I think the worst , too , but I do n't think brain tumor .", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734QTII": "Are these questions to ask the children or to ask the educators?? Open questions for the children. 'Tell me about what you are making / painting / building / creating'  'Tell me about how you created / made / built this'  'What is your favourite part of what you have made'   Check out this website  http://hubpages.com/hub/HowtoUseOpenE...", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6MO98": "hey,,,,its rele hard in knw cus i deal wid it too.anyways i haven't got dat much guts to say to my fren but i wish i could cus ppl say bad things bout it and its rele bad,,,,so b a gud girl and tell ur fren cus dats atrue fren....and dot feel guilty cus u r doing da rite thing Well, I'm not too sure about history or other humanities, but here's a few things from when I applied to grad school for physics. The key things I talked about in my personal statement were 1) why I wanted to go to grad school, 2) the subjects I was interested in pursuing if I got in, and 3) pointing out a few things about my academic record (for me, I had a really bad semester which I tried to explain). In the sciences at least, grad school is a kind of apprenticeship.", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA7658": "Having stress will actually slow down your bone growth. So find something that make you stressful (sleep less or take more stressful classes) and do less exercise like jumping and don't hang on a pole or a monkey bar. But if I was you, I will want to keep growing. Make life a lot easier. It's something you should be proud of.", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VTSBK": "The Greed-ler is having some troubles and The Lorax shows up to help. Lorax/Greed-ler scat poop fanfiction.", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KZVDZ": "You can try www.southbeach.com It'll help you lose some weight around your stomack. Really effective. To especially target your stomach by exercise you can try out Pilates.", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811D9KA": "well your body does change, and you seem to have really long periods are you on some special birth control that you have your period for that long, and if you want to find if your pregnant take a test they have the ones that let you know before you get your period", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MSLUG": "You cant spot reduce. Cardio, cardio, cardio. Also, the fat in your arms is probably on the underside, in the area of the triceps.", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAKGIY": "RT MrTandaha: This dog, is dog, a dog, good dog, way dog, to dog, keep dog, an dog, idiot dog, busy dog, for dog, 20 dog, seconds dog!", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ2A88": "Tom Sizemore was also busted using this device . He didn t use the heat packs and handed over cold urine . His probation office asked him to strip that The original Whizzinator for sale was created by Puck Technology . Its been used for years and still is . Recently it has seen some competition with alternative products like the Urinator and the Pissinator .", "3S8APUMBJXHYD7F2EE74URDTH5XBFI": "Difficult question, depends on what age group of blind people you are talking about. A lot of blind people have relatives who help them, most blind people can bath and shower themselves. Some blind people, more the younger ones, (before retirement age) and maybe a few old ones know how to use a computer, they can get expensive software that will magnify the screen on the computer and also have a screen. Some blind people know how to touch type so they don't have to look at a keyboard when they are using a computer. Mobile phones aren't that good for the blind as there aren't that many talking ones around and they tend to have small buttons on them. As for land line phones, there are big button phones that has about 3 speed dial buttons that a blind person can use if they wanted too. There is a little gadget that can go on the side of a cup, so when the cup is filled up with a drink, this little gadget, called a level indicator will then vibrate to the blind person know the cup is full up.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOA3YG": "Stay positive. a friend of mine went through the same thing and was told by his physician it was probably Lymphoma. guess what, quot. he was wrongquot. It turned out to absolutely nothing. Im not saying your symptoms are not real but you may be psychologically triggering them to happen. Sometimes when people get traumatized the stress can be too much to bare. Find a way to take your mind off of it and wait until you've had all the tests and they have been confirmed.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EXH2K": "My name is Tom , I live in Inverness , Scotland and I have worked in IT for over 25 years . Three years ago I started to experience nausea/headaches/dizziness when looking at my computer screen and when driving in a car . Like a lot of you , I thought I was going to have to give up my job but after a long time searching on the Internet , I eventually read about SEE Sick Syndrome ( SSS ) in the post below by MotionDoctor1 on 12/30/2012 .", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQCDFU": "If its a bruise, the only way to heal it is give it time. Bruises are basically dead and broken blood vessels beneath the surface of the skin that have dried which in turn give off a dark appearance. Since this is beneath the skin, the only thing you can do is to let it heal on its own. No cream, pill, vitamin is going to help one bit. Hope this helps, stay healthy. Pharmacist James", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO7C0L": "The only thing you really need to know is that guy's come in all different shapes and sizes. What is 'small' versus 'big' is all relative to who ever is asking. Besides, its not like most women can tell the difference between a penis that is 6' or 7' - unless they have a ruler. As far as statistics go, average is 6' long and 4 1/2' around. Which if you know anything about stats is that average is just a middle point between a set of numbers. In the case of penis sizes that means that roughly you're larger than 50 of other guys. Plus, while you're probably stuck with what you've already got, it can continue to grow to a lesser extent up into your early 20's. Most importantly, don't let the size of your penis be a measure of character as a man or your value as a lover. Neither of which have anything to do with penis size.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMO7JW": "Hare games are similar to Bear games and hunt games. One side has more pieces than the other with the larger side attempting to hem in the smaller side. The smaller side though is usually compensated with more powers.", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0UC3J": "Method is the way which conducts you do every part of work. You should put what the target mean, so what is its aim to reach? You will discover a theoretical point, and then you have to prove them with some related proof. In this process, it need to construct the real concepts and and developing its relationship... Also need some textbook, the rest is what you discover and develop.", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV696381": "clean, wrap gifts then smoke in my opinion ?", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ0S1Z": "She may have moved them because she felt that they were in danger. If too many people touch them or know of there whereabouts she will hide them in a dark place to keep them safe. Also one important question is Ask the local animal shelter if there has been any cats or kittens brought in in the past few days that the kitten has been missing.", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS6ZAZ": "Well, you don't want to be told the truth because I think deep inside you know cutting won't solve any of your problems. Instead of cutting, take a breath, and face your problems head on. I've self harmed for two years and my parents wanted to toss me out of the window when they found out. but because of them and my friends I recovered within six months. I seriously don't want to be the one who bugs you especially since you warned me not to, but I can't help it. As somebody who recovered, I tend to push this on people when I see them having the problems I once suffered with. I just want to get across that cutting does not help and I have scars all over my  body and I have to live with them every  day because I thought a stupid razor would solve my problems. They only created a problem that I have to face everyday. And yes, it will ruin your life and make your self-esteem float to the bottom of the ocean. And to start cutting?", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV696836": "'It sounds like you have everything in order for your hamsters to have a perfect life, I think the getting two siblings idea is good since most dwarf like to live in colonies, by the way shredded paper will work for your dwarfs and It'll be even better than regular wood shavings as dwarfs are very sensitive to some kinds of wood shavings so paper like toilet paper, paper towel or tissues is great just avoid cotton. Oh and also scattering food is even better than feeding with a bowl since they'll just tip the bowl over and hide the food away anyways plus it will be more challenging and fun for them to search for their food. As for your questions:  You can give your hamsters a spoon full of fruits or veggies two or three times a week. Fruits and veggies:  ?", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NJKR8": "A Scorpio man would be your perfect fit! (You would go well with Pisces too)    Here is a good site that will tell you more about your compatible signs:  http://www.compatible-astrology.com/canc...", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WWIM8": "DO NOT give her normal cow milk or soy milk. These are way tow hard on her system. don't give her water as a normal fluid until she is eating something on a regular basis.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCBGVQ": "Tough to tellWith out really knowing him it is tough to say. However just judging from what you have told me i would say yes he likes you. he may just be a caring man but my guess is that he likes you. It sounds like he is trying to not let it interfere with work. Taking the trash for you since you were both headed the same way is what i would assume the gentlemanly thing to do. Now days it is truly difficult to find someone or even a woman who won't take that as an insult. This is obviously just an outside opinion and i think the only true way for you to find out is ask him. Hope this helps.", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE70I7W": "Migraine is a neurologic disease, of which the most common symptom is an intense and disabling headache. Migraine is the most common type of vascular headache. Not all Migraineur's go through all the phases with each Migraine so there it's likely that your Migraines may be different than someone else's.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKAHQX": "first of all.. wtf is a Chinese water dragon? It's the second time he loses Maxi. I have two kitties ?", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO24WLR": "You need to see a psychiatrist or psychologist, there are medicines that can help stop the dizziness.", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLQRV1": "Can I bring fruit across the border from the USA?You may bring fruit with you (i.e. snacks for the trip) into Canada. However, citrus fruit (e.g. oranges, lemons, grapefruit) may not be brought into the United States, and will be confiscated along with any other fruit in the same bag. Fruit which is marked as having been grown in the USA should be...", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDI70P": "i like skinny with abs", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S5CQJ": "Wellbutrin is the best anti-depressant when weight loss is also a focus. There's been research into whether it could be used as a weight loss medication. One of it's side effects is a reduction in appetite. It helped me lose 30 pounds. You want to avoid many of the commonly prescribed SSRI's, as they present a risk of weight gain. (Most specifically, Paxil). Talk to your doctor or psychiatrist about your goal to lose weight and Wellbutrin. It may not be the right medication for you but it offers the best chance of weight loss.", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIVUI8": "Working At A Dental Assistant Temp Agency http://t.co/GLUwrpEm2c: Working At A Dental Assistant Temp Agency http://t.co/GLUwrpEm2c", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LRHW1": "A few people did survive the ice cold waters without a life boat, but this is a VERY few group of people. Some people perished within a minute of hitting those icy waters. Some people 'survived' the waters by hopping into nearby lifeboats, but as for the people who never were in a lifeboat and were pulled out of the water alive, there weren't many of THOSE sorts of survivors at all.", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CR1DOE": "At some DIY and 'Iron-mongers' you can get 'spirits of salt'. This will remove ANY and ALL limescale. It is corrosive and gives off choking fumes. So open the windows, and wear rubber gloves. It must not be used on enamel or metal surfaces. It should be diluted about 10 times with water. Apply with a paint brush and you'll see the limescale fizz and dissolve in seconds. If you spill any use a LARGE amount of water to wash it off.When diluted 20 times it can be used to descale a kettle which should be thoroughly rinsed afterwards.", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ689MF": "3 Choose a way to write.Will you write everything down by hand or use a laptop?As with finding a place to write, finding your way to write will develop over time.", "3UEDKCTP9VOMRH4Q28ML52J26BMK76": "The first volume appeared in 1729, and the last volume was published in 1769. This work is considered to be a very important source of information on 17th-century artists of the Netherlands, specifically those artists who worked in The Hague and in London. The engravings are followed by the artists listed in order of appearance in the text. Volume IV is split into two parts. After a long introduction mentioning several artists and ending with Francisque Millet, a list of painters follows beginning with Adriaen Hanneman, who took lessons at the Hague Academy and were members of the Confrerie Pictura. It was a daring move for a mere maid, but in the movie the artist heartily approved. Contemporary artist George Deem goes much further than Griete. He especially likes to play with the phrase 'School of ...,' which art historians use when they don't know an individual artist's name but identify the style with that of a known master. Would Vermeer or Mme. Whistler laugh at this artist's c...", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPJBA4": "Well , it all came into pieces when I read the requirements for publishing in the iBookStore . Among other common sense things you need in order to publish your book , like an Apple account , there was something new : an ITN number ( or , if you re an individual , a Social Security Number ) .", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATZ5AZ": "look at you posting all these good lyrics and I'm just sitting here whining over my damn apple", "3P458N04Q1FLPG6RVFKFZ5AWR4IX2V": "Actor Tom Sizemore has also brought the Whizzinator into the public eye after having been caught with one attempting to evade drug tests. In 2006, a Pittsburgh-area woman and her friend were charged with disorderly conduct and criminal mischief after they asked a convenience store clerk to microwave one of the devices so the woman could pass a drug test. The clerk, thinking it was a real penis, called police.", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUJ7HQ": "Can I add more than six 'headings' to my table of contents?", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8HTLT": "Update. Dad suggested the Hagley Museum. History of Dupont and industry. ttp://t.co/W9w53d0iKU", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ1A87": "I lost 25 lbs in 2 weeks by not eating but once a day (very little) and drank lots and lots of water, when you get hunger pangs, drink water instead of eating. Your stomach will shrink and you will want to eat less.", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACDBJK": "So creased my face mask made my face bright red and when I went to ambers door to share the news she also put one on and was bright red", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G2SDO": "My history be like: Hot sexy Porn Hot sexy porn masturbate Hot sexy porn masturbate cock Hot sexy porn masturbate cock bdsm", "3XDJY5RK5SJ3BQRJUOSG8D8QH0Y4U7": "Windows open. AC off!! It's currently 72 deg in Central Park with mostly cloudy skies. Overnight low 66...", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSGUQF": "I'll try to acquire a purple one!! I know one thing, I don't want to be a barrister!", "3QHITW7OYO7QLM0JMGI2BFX16PKQAV": "Through Stipple Network, the photos are open to use by website publishers, who are paid by companies with products in the photos. Consumers can then click on the products tagged and buy them. As of May 2011, Stipple had contracts with nine photo agencies, 50 brands, and 1,300 publishers.", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPSL1E": "it treats itself usually by 2 years old...but there are other measures too...but no..not that late in life...not sure though..", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVUZC4": "Heavy head feeling and eye focusing problem  Back to Community About This Community: A community of people with Anxiety offering support through your health journey. Ask a question, join a conversation, share experiences: sleeping, mood swings, panic attacks, and disorders. 188 Comments Heavy head feeling and eye focusing problem Hie, for the past 2 weeks i have had this heavy headed feeling, sometimes at the back of my head, sometimes it feels like the whole head. The feeling will be there constantly. Throughout the day, sometimes i feel throbbing pain at both sides of my temple. Apart from that, my eyes focus seems to be getting weird - don't really know how to explain the feeling, but it feels like my focus expands and then shrinks. My eyes also feels tired easily since this whole episode started. Before this happens, i've had a few other worries regarding my health, and hav been getting up several hours before i am suppose to be up. I have done a renal blood test (the doctor thoug", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JROR0GTF": "Norovirus, or the 'stomach flu' is contagious for about 72 hours after the vomiting and diarrhea end.", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J64PB": "breaking up sucks.heres something that truly helps.1st.you need a whole two days of just crying.2nd.then you miss everything about him and wallow in it.3rd.get so fucken angry you wannapull his eyes balls(but not really).4th.you get up take a shower put your best clothes on,your best perfume and prepare for whats next.do you want him back is it worth it. do you want to go out and find a new guy?maybe you need to discover your self so you can become a stonger woman so an ex wont be the problem anymore.who am i kidding men will always be a problem! !good luck if you need more help hollar pookie.", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN3409S": "'I like the dreams of the future better than the history of the past. 'Thomas Jefferson", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA6FJ7": "Why can i smell a scent on people that are getting sick before anyone else knows? This makes me think of an autonomic neuropathy - the cause of most commons health problems. The sense of smell is such a function. That condition of too many electrical signals is what's known as an autonomic neuropathy. The sense of smell is an automatic body function. You've described what sounds like a neuropathy that has triggered an excessive sense of smell for some specific body substance unique to illness, hence a process taking place during illness, If you've not always had this, then it suggests that you have a relatively recent injury or degrading of one or more neurons. That's one of my neuropathies (ADD) rearing it's head. What are the odds of this happening I wonder?? I wonder if you have this exaggerated sense of smell in other ways too. My son's. I wonder if you can smell illness on yourself. This Dr helped me learn to manage my very debilitating neuropathies. What does that mean, I wonder?", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61J98R": "Yes, it is cause of Nair. I also had a bad reaction to it. There is nothing you can do but wait it out. Opinion 2: Definitely sounds like it!! I would contact Nair's company and then call your doctor. Try some Benadryl to Counteract the reaction. :)   Opinion 3: yes it could it could take a few uses for your skin to develop an allergy you probably have sensitive skin like i do   Opinion 4: Hi try using some clear Caladryl and see if that helps. There is also Benadryl cream that will help also. I'm afraid it will just take some time to clear it up. Your skin probably received a burn from the Nair. Good Luck.", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W8IOK": "Lead down the garden path - Idioms by The Free Dictionary http://idioms.thefreedictionary.com/leaddownthegardenpath lead someone down the garden path and lead someone up the garden path to deceive someone. Now, be honest with me. Don't lead me down the garden path. That cheater really led her up the garden path. See also: down , garden , lead , path , the lead down the garden path Also, lead up the garden path. Deceive someone. For example, Bill had quite different ideas from Tom about their new investment strategy he was leading him down the garden path . This expression presumably alludes to the garden path as an intentional detour. Early 1900s Also see lead on . lead somebody down the garden path also lead somebody up the garden path to deceive someone Our country has been led down the garden path by the politicians in office. Etymology: based on the idea that a path in a garden is very pleasant, so someone who is brought along it can be deceived without noticing it Want to", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR38I6": "Breitman: Hitler and Genghis Khan was of Mongolian stock, though there were still some Slavic types and a few other racial groups, Hitler added.", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6DWFH": "however if too much of amino acid (if i m not mistaken) will cause kidney failure and arthritis. so these disease  mostly relate to rich people. ss  They are also converted to fat, if more protein is ingested than is needed for synthesis and energy expenditure Ronald  Urine, you're out! ZooKid6  6 years ago 0 Thumbs up 0 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Add your answer What happens to excess amino acids in the human body? amino acids in the body Add your answer Source Submit Cancel  I think this question violates the Community Guidelines Chat or rant, adult content, spam, insulting other members, show more I think this question violates the Terms of Service Harm to minors, violence or threats, harassment or privacy invasion, impersonation or misrepresentation, fraud or phishing, show more", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1Q92N": "If you have children, your local county prosecutor's office may be able to help you get a child support order.Generally, you can get a child support order before you have filed for divorce.You can call your local county prosecutor's office, child support division to ask for help getting a child support order.", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVPMNR": "I'm going through the same thing with my husband. He just came home Tuesday night and I have hospice helping out. He is already getting to where he can't walk hardly. People keep talking about a liver transplant but my doc. said my husband wasn't a candidate because he has cancer. But my husband drank alot when he was younger. He has been on alot of pain medicines. Along with meds for blood pressure and cholesterol. I think the cholesterol drugs caused this cirrohsis. He was taking to much at one time but thats what the doctor told him and it started scarring his liver. And later they changed it and he started getting jaundice and thats how they found the cancer. He also has blood clots from his heart to his liver. His liver isn't functioning right along with his kidneys. I wish you luck with your friend.", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC3ZOEF": "It seems pretty important, at least the directions say so.Good luck!! !These are so fun!", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO54Y1": "If you are kinda slender I think it  would be normal. I can hear the cartilage in my neck popping whenever I haven't eaten a lot of beef. Unless you have really bad posture I wouldn't worry about the spine.", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB39B0F": "Following this diet for a long period of time can also cause Vitamin B12 deficiency. There is no scientific evidence that it kills cancer cells, slows disease progression, or provides any other medical benefit to cancer patients. However, a diet high in fiber and vegetables and low in alcohol, tobacco and processed foods may prevent cancer from forming in healthy people.", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO24LWG": "With its own stores in Berlin, Aarhus and Copenhagen as well as an on-line store, Wood Wood is directed by co-founders Karl-Oskar Olsen and Brian SS Jensen fyfytfyfj. Best described as Contemporary Streetwear, Wood Wood has looked beyond just fashion and is making its mark with a strong sports component, combined with the brands ability to move up and down the fashion spectrum. Wood Wood is much more than a brand. Wood Woods collections are built upon new takes on iconic silhouettes with a sports-fashion approach, staying true to the sub-cultural heritage of the brand. Wood Wood mixes high fashion, sports and streetwear with youth culture, art and music. St John's Wood Road Baptist Church St John's Wood Road Baptist Church is an evangelical Baptist church in St John's Wood, London. St. Johns Wood Road Baptist Church began meeting in the mid-1820s. Today, the church is a small congregation of just over 50 people who attend the Sunday morning meeting each week.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCCJ9K": "I don't agree with the 1st answer and the judgement that you are an addict - a word used for people with chronic pain way to often. The 2nd person certainly knows more. My39 yr old daughter who was under the care of a legitimate pain mgmt. doctor died on Christmas, 2012. She had to be drug tested at every appointment and didn't get any pain pills from another source. She was doing the right thing. But, since the EMTs (majority are wonderful) saw her medication by her bed where she was so ill, immediately assumed she was an addict and had overdosed and treated her with that in mind. Her husband was there and couldn't convinced them otherwise. An autopsy was performed and cause of death was becauseofviolent vomiting,her colon twisted and thenher bowel perforated.You have people who do understand your anger. It is time that not everyone with chronic painis considered an addict because it isn't true. No one should be humilated and made to feel they have done something wrong.", "3R16PJFTS3PP8UM70AOE2QZSF9YK4O": "Jul 12, 2012?? Nora Brennan, the casting agent for Broadway's version of the British super hit 'Matilda, The Musical,' is thin and graceful, with the narrow face of a deer. Matilda The Musical the multi-award-winning show at the Cambridge Theatre in London. ... We don't add any fees, the price you see is the price you pay. Find out more about Matilda The Musical auditions on our website. ... As well as in London we will sometimes visit other cities to look for Matildas. Keep checking ?... Apr 11, 2013?? After winning a record seven Olivier Awards in London, the musical adaptation of Roald Dahl's beloved children's novel reaches Broadway with all of its ... audition for United Fall/ Emma Martin (IRL) United Fall/ Emma Martin (IRL) Male, Closes: Tuesday 11th August 2015 United Fall/ Emma Martin is seeking 2 male dancers ... For the first time in X Factor history, viewers can vote via hashtag on Twitter to determine which of the Judges is allocated each of the four categories ?? the ...", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NH1AVB": "when I got pregnant with my first, I was 128 lbs at 5 feet 8 inches tall. I didn't show until 7 months into it. I got sick from month 1. I puked throughout and it sucked. With my second, I was 5'8' and 128 lbs and I started showing at 6 months. I only got sick 3 times throughout with him. It varies with every woman.", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLIGW5": "Okay the first thing is that currently the brid flu is onyl contagoius from bird to human, not human to human. until the flu can be spread human to human we are okay. But that is what scientists fear.", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3450YNQ": "Writing Real / Dark fantasy novel in spare time. This should be fun. Writing Novel Fantasy", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH4WYF": "That day arrived in the spring of 1972, when the North Vietnamese launched a large-scale conventional offensive in South Vietnam's northern provinces. The U.S., claiming that this was an 'invasion of South Vietnam' and a 'flagrant violation' of the 1968 bombing halt agreement, resumed bombing of North Vietnam and then, when the offensive continued and Hanoi did not agree to U.S. demands, escalated further the bombing and mined the country's principal port. Haiphong Harbor was where the Soviet Union and Red Chinese, and other communist countries supporting North Vietnam, were unloading their SAM missiles, radar equipment, tanks, ammunition, and other war supplies. Previous presidents were reluctant to kill/wound Soviet/Communist Chinese merchant seaman or technicians (for fear of the Soviet/Chinese entrance into the Vietnam War), but President Nixon was hard core (tough  angry), and at this STAGE OF THE WAR wanted to end it, and MOST PROBABLY made some hints to both the Soviets  Red", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5925R": "Do, do, do the flop ! Do, do, do the flop ! Everybody do the flop ! Do, do, do the flop ! Do, do, do the flop ! Everybody do the floooop", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1FQKB": "What is asserted and proposed in this ad is not only ludicrous, but definitely outside the realm of acceptable conditions for pre employment screening. This would fall under the laws of disability discrimination as well as other pertinent laws applicable in the jurisdiction wherein this ridiculous ad was placed. This is assuming that it is a real and bonafide ad placed by a prospective employer. Provided this ad was placed or authorized to be placed by a legitimate hiring authority, it is a severely misguided attempt by this employer to employ a person or persons who has or will soon have first hand knowledge of the main thrust of their employment. This being the sale and commission of a certain medical procedure, and other subsequent operations or attentions inherent to such treatments and procedures. One could easily imagine a cardiovascular surgeon setting prerequisite requirements for a surgical nurse of having previously had angioplasty or open heart surgery performed prior", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1UQ2Q": "Assume Oinker weighs 60 pounds then Squeaker would have to weigh 50 pounds (because they weigh 110 together). Then Curly would have to weigh 53 pounds (because he and Squeaker weigh 103 together) and finally Porker would have to weigh 55 because he and Squeaker weigh 108 together. So Oinker and Porker would both weigh 115 (60 55) No matter what weight you start with, if you make sure it satisfies all the conditions of the problem, you will get 115.", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVMMNO": "none of your problems sound related. I've had TMJ for years and never had chest/arm pain. Go see a doctor. Considering that you are obese you will want to make sure that you arent having mini strokes", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63S7U9O": "HBO Asia will be premiering 'This Is Us' tonight at 7pm on HBO and HBO HD. RAK", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDKZY5Z": "There 's more information on feeding puppies in general and specific food recommendations on these pages ...   Hope this helps somewhat . Best of luck with your pup she sounds perfect : o ) I have a rottie puppy and not sure what to feed her and and she keep crying . I 'm not sure how old your pup is , but if she 's over 4 weeks old she should be able to eat dry puppy food soaked in warm water for about 10 mins .", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHSRSS": "Absolutely not. First, that would cost more. Second, there are often legal and insurance issues. Third, pay TV (HBO/Cinemax  Showtime/The Movie Channel in this instance) does not license cut-down versions of hardcore movies, and actual sex would make it hardcore movie, technically speaking. Now, some perfomers are less shy and/or squeamish, or more comfortable with closer, err, proximity to their and others' private parts, and occasionally a liberty may be taken, accidentally or not, but I would frown upon it and have only seen it happen on one occasion. In that instance, none of that footage was used. I produced and directed Call Girl Wives, and while I can say that the performers were generous with their willingness to get in close and personal, and fairly liberal in terms of kissing, licking, etc..., it was all done professionally and largely in support or furtherance of the great cause of finishing on time!", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J9535": "No, that's why there is that white liner in the shorts.....just like any other swimsuit...", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I3DIK": "If your dog somehow got a bone then there is a good change that it may have a small bone shard lodged in its throat. The best thing to do is to take it to the vet right away since this could become inflamed and cause even more damage in the long run. We had to change the way we threw out bones from our meals because we used to have a dog that would steal them too. Hope this helps.", "3ZVPAMTJWN1R7ESMLVZCCRI9062RGC": "From author to author -- 1) Nothing is just a chapter book. Find your audience -- right now the teenage audience is HUGE. because you can answer 5 stupid questions and get a best answer also therefor giving you 20 points.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FF6YS": "Do these exercises three to four times a week and within a month you'll start to see ripples you never knew you had. Warm-Up: Do three minutes of cardio before your arm routine to increase your heart rate, loosen your muscles, and help avoid injury. Jumping rope, climbing stairs, and walking on a treadmill are great options. Once your torso begins generating a little heat, do two sets of 24 small (about five inches in diameter) arm circles to warm up your biceps, triceps, and shoulder muscles. Move your arms forward for the first set, backward for the second set. Tip: If you don't have hand weights, use cans of food or water bottles filled with sand or uncooked rice. Push-Pull Kickback How to Do It: Stand in a squat position, legs shoulder-width apart, knees bent at about 45 degrees, and chest leaning slightly forward. Hold a light dumbbell (three to five pounds is a good starting point for all these exercises) in each hand, palms facing your thighs. Bending your arms, bring your fists", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP173J": "at my dentist office, Its 150 for a small cavity and 350 for deep ones, I have two that are  super painful , At first they were not at all, just hurt when I drink cold  stuff but as they got deeper more pain came,", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O28VXY": "What the hell is 'smol'?", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF50WE1": "Well money is money. Btw maybe you can help me aswell, I want some preteen erotic texts written, I like it to be about a young girls first experience, in has to be a great detail, especially with focus on the young girl. I'll pay 30, send me a PM if your interested.", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0AO2E": "I've had many hamsters in my life.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR3U6H": "I only have the statistics for college-age men. Here they are, but keep in mind that you are still growing. Percent means the percent of men who have that length of peins. Here are the statistics on erect penis lengths for white college men, in quarter-inch lengths measured by The Alfred C. Kinsey Institute for Sex Research (from the point where the penis meets the body along the top to its tip):percent length 0.2 percent  3.75 inches  0.3 percent  4 inches  0.2 percent  4.25 inches  1.7 percent  4.5 inches  0.8 percent  4.75 inches  4.2 percent  5 inches  4.4 percent  5.25 inches  10.7 percent  5.5 inches  8 percent  5.75 inches  23.9 percent  6 inches  8.8 percent  6.25 inches  14.3 percent  6.5 inches  5.7 percent  6.75 inches  9.5 percent  7 inches  1.8 percent  7.25 inches  2.9 percent  7.5 inches  1 percent  7.75 inches  1 percent  8 inches  0.3 percent  8.25 inches  0.3 percent  8.5 inches  0.1 percent  8.75 inches  0.1 percent  9 inches   So the average penis length is 6.16 inches.The a", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12EC7M": "Depends on your structure, but you seem to be underweight. How do you think you look is the important question. If you like the way you look and you are healthy then don't worry about it. Opinion 2: To make sure you are getting all the necessary nutrients for proper growth you should work on eating a little better  a little more. Anything under around 90-95 is underweight for your height/age. Ideally, you should work on getting your weight over 100  closer to 110 lbs. Opinion 3: slightly underwieght, you should be at least 94 pounds to be normal weight", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGYSUZ": "I think that your 'soul mate' stuff is all crap.... you work out the relationship the way you want and it becomes what you want it to be.", "35NNO802AVUKO76PICIYOJQFEM2NI9": "What is the average size of a mans penis?More questions Do you exaggerate to average sized men about their penis size?Average penis size?", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC1WPL": "Its very nice....Cool blank one....LOL....", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TRI0T": "duuude i just love ur imagination hehehe. How on earth will that happen? The richest man of all time!", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XN80C": "1) D- this is common sense not history 2) Probably B but I'm not sure 3) C- Primary sources are quotations form people 4) D- again common sense 5) A- England defeated Spain so pick the only thing that's good for English colonists 6) Probably A I'm not sure 7) A- New England had bad soil so they were industry people instead of farmers and the most necessary industries at that time were ocean trade related and there was also good seports 8) D- Why would the south have slaves if they weren't large scale farming 9) Probably D but it's hard to generalize all thirteen colonies from 1607-1783 like that 10) C- You gotta memorize this one you should look up who all these people were 11) None of these seem right to me. I. If I had to guess I'd say C 12) C- You gotta memorize who all these people were 13) A- He wasn't really that important to history overall but good to know this 14) D- especially religious freedom and for this she was banished for Mass. 18) I think it's C but I'm not quite sure", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY11XF": "I lost over 10 lbs in 3 weeks by sticking to this diet:  Breakfast:  One can 100 calorie peaches by Del Monte OR One container of Yoplait yogurt (100 calories) OR  On packet of low fat instant oatmeal (157 calories)  Lunch:  Progresso canned soup (with 45 less sodium) (90 Calories per serving, 2 servings  1 can)  Dinner: Small lettus and tomato salad with fat free Itallian dressing (33 calories) and a lean pocket (280- 320 calories). Snack (Whenever you get hungry try this):  Celery with fat free ranch (20 calories)  Plus I worked out every other day ?", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSKDQN": "Foods I recommend you to start and stop eating - Ins- Spinach Mushrooms Lettuce Sweet potatoes Tomatoes Carrots Olives Broccoli/Cauliflower Celery Fruit Oatmeal Chicken breast Minced Beef King prawns Salmon Eggs Beef rump steak Tuna Walnuts Coconut Milk Outs - Alcohol Crisps Sweets Chocolate Jams Soda High-sugar foods/drinks Deep-fried foods Takeaways Rice White Pasta Bread Ice-Cream Add/Remove the above to and from your diet as well as doing weighted ab exercises such as weighted crunches/weighted leg pull ups and you'll begin to see results.", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0U3CA": "Find out why your period might be late or find out when it Hi , I had a tubal ligation during my 3rd c-section may 2011 I had my last period August 3-8 my cycle varies from 18-22 days i have not started my period yet , today I bought a first signal home pregnancy test which was negative but in the last 3 weeks I have had a weak abdomen sore breast frequent urinating and nausea vomiting at around same time every morning what should I do My age is 32.I had period on 30 june and next period on 23 july and this month period on 19 august .", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605LDHO": "Yes, I'm quite sure someone can. Try your doctor's office. The key to fat loss is not exercise, it's diet. Any exercise will burn calories but no exercise will burn fat unless your diet allows it. You can burn fat in your sleep or you can run all day and never burn any fat. It all depends on your diet. Fat loss is determined by calorie control, not by exercise. Good exercises for burning calories are speed walking, biking, swimming, dancing, etc. and ANY other physical activity which makes you move a lot of weight for a long time. But NO exercise is good for burning fat if you eat too many calories because you can always eat more calories than you can burn but you can't always burn as many as you take in. Too many people waste energy and time because they do not understand this one simple point. The result is too often giving up in frustration, abandoning gym memberships they continue to pay for, and many other unnecessary problems not the least of which is a lack of success", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S4228WE": "yes because they are fish and they can go anywhere in th ocean as long as long as there are no sharks", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0R4CX": "when i was in high school i was a power lifter and i squatted 215 in a meet. it got me 4th place nationally in my weight class of 111 lbs. But you will need to do a lot of squats each day to notice the increase.", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N6VSQ": "... I use coconut on my entire body, which leaves it soft and smooth. .... hi i had used coconut oil for massaging my face and i got clogged pores all over ..... oil on my face and broke out in a heat like bumps all over my face, everywhere! I just massage a small amount onto damp skin, then rinse with water, and then rub off gently with a clean dry washcloth. ... I started using it because my favorite product ever LaLicious body oil ..... Basically, you should slather it everywhere. Jan 29, 2013 ... Basically it's just blending COCONUT OIL and OLIVE OIL to form a wonderful ?? mash?? of sorts that you can use on pretty much anywhere on your body in need of a ..... Searched everywhere for the body cream that you added Lavender to. While I love the idea of using coconut oil (or any oil really) on my body, I can't ... rather than putting oil on after a bath or shower, put it on (massage it in, don't just ?...", "37YYO3NWHDOAK0NY1CDYX5Y82D7CCH": "binge eating will cause your body to want to make those calories last and when you do binge, after a little while even an apple will cause you to gain weight because your body is trying to retain as much as it can. A healthy diet is 2000-2500 calories and any less than that can cause you to gain weight rather than lose it! Healthy eating and exercise daily will keep you at your weight and if you meet those 200 calories by eating natural and simple sugar foods, you will lose weight will still feeling good. :) I hope this helps!!!", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI69IYX": "Many people think arachnids are only spiders and scorpions, but Arachnida includes mites, ticks, spiders, harvestmen (daddy long-legs) and scorpions. Mites and ticks belong to the order Acarina. Spiders are Arachnids and not insects.", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVPNMS": "Please don't worry, worrying will not help, it will be okay most likely. It sounds like a boil or a fatty cyst that is hard, keep an eye on it. I would give it a few days if you can wait. Kids get the craziest things, I mean if you are uncomfortable or if he is then go right away. Check for fever. If it gets bigger or does not go away definitely go to the doc.", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBV30F": "It is TRUE that STRESS can contribute to missed periods. And Hormone imbalances can also contribute to missed periods. It will take time for your periods to regulate back to normal after 'stopping' oral contraceptives perhaps a month or two, maybe 3 months. 'Fibroids' can also contribute to Menstral problems, which leaves me to this simple conclusion.... DISCUSS your concerns with your GYN doctor. This way all the necessary tests can be done to rule out what needs to be ruled out  a solution/reason can be discovered, as to why you aren't seeing your periods regularly.", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI2FH2": "Our vet expert says you shouldn't hesitate to visit the vet right away.Good luck.george3/Ceasar  pine bluff, AR 9/5/2011 1:35:44 PM SA ME THING IN ANYTHING OR ANYONE!! !Give me a break.Dont play your Readers.", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDRUDA": "Cognition is the ability of your brain to think, to process and store information, to solve problems. Cognition is a high level of behaviour unique to humans. This behaviour is disrupted by an illness such as Alzheimer's Disease.", "3W31J70BASUS3YZMTPUWLOBG7MGCKU": "My skin is OILY!I tries EVERYTHING possible.Nothing works!", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QTNKM": "I'm not sure of the actual details, but it went something like this. At birth you would officially be racially classified- I don't know all the different levelsof classification but there were several different types. According to which racial type you were you would have had different kinds of access to housing, employment, business and health and education opportunities- with the whites obviously having all the best ones. Even travel was restricted, some blacks were not allowed to travel outside the 'homelands' for example- it was an appalling system and thank god has gone hopefully never to return.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDQTOE": "Try to increase your one max rep instead of sticking at one weight and increasing your reps. This is the most effective way to become a more dynamic and athletic player. If you're always benching 135 your body will get used to the weight and you won't gain any more muscle. You need to vary your sets vs reps and the amount of weight you do.", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2ZWKO": "Learning relaxation techniques such as breathing and progressive muscle relaxation, visualization, perhaps meditation..and yoga. Exercise is an excellent way to handle stress in any form. Life causes stress...but if there is some way to identify what is most stressful and eliminate it, that can be the wisest choice of all. Even one small change can make a world of difference.", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW944N4X": "I had a marvelous time with our children.We chased each other around and rolled in the fall leaves.Later I went to my meeting.", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBHMJK": "Cockatails are nice birds if trained right, other wise a parakeet. Any bird can be trained if you take your time. Sweet birds.", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZRZRFA": "NRASolutions When somebody shoots up a dentist's office, they'll be advocating for armed dental hygienists.", "3W0XM68YZPT8GVPODS5C4SSP3PR1KV": "I didn't get my period until my second born was 20 months, when all ..... I had my daughter 8 months ago i have had a regular period since then but now havnt ... was 12 weeks I have a period this month but 1 day and it was light pink I've been... Since I've started I've had some headaches but I've been losing my hair ..... I would usually start my period on the thursday and stop on that Sunday but last month i .... week to achieve this and am going to be a bridesmaid in Aug 20... I've been on the pill since I was 12 or 13 (for acne at that time). .... and haven't had a period since August (I spotted for about a month .... I felt normal for all of about a week out of the month. Stop waiting anxiously and be proactive by taking our am I pregnant quiz. ... next day I took the plan b pill but few moments later I threw up I've been spotting since a week now but I ..... My ovulation days were the 12-17 of may.", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPGA9T": "The Titanic was described in the popular press as 'practically unsinkable'. This was not unusual  for decades, ships had watertight compartments to limit flooding in case of an accident, and the press used this phrase as a matter of routine for many years. After the Titanic sank, the story of her loss was turned into a modern fable and the original description 'practically unsinkable' became just 'unsinkable' in order to sharpen the moral of the story. No educated person in 1912 believed that the Titanic was truly unsinkable, but it was difficult to imagine an accident severe enough to send her to the bottom.As for the life boat,... the laws at the time did not fathom a ship ever being that large. The titanic used and exceed  the the stander set for the largest ship under that law, about 40 tones. I m not say it was right, and their were people at the time who  felt more boat should be aboard, but the white star line felt it would hinder the enjoyment of the first class pass...", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V01D44": "Neuropathy is a painful condition related to damaged peripheral nerves. Overview Peripheral neuropathy is a general term referring to disorders of peripheral nerves. The peripheral nervous system is made up of the nerves that branch out of the spinal cord to all parts of the body.", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC32OEI": "Labor takes as long as it takes. If it is a first litter, then it may take longer. Once the first kitten appears it shouldn't take long for all of them to be born. If the momma cat strains for more than an hour without results, then call the vet for advice. Most momma cats are perfectly able to take care of everything. We had one momma we knew was pregnant but weren't sure when she was due and woke one morning to the sounds of little kittens mewing. Momma had cleaned up all the mess and all the kittens and seemed very proud of herself. So don't hover. Check on her occasionally but don't interfere. Sometimes if you interfere too much the momma cat gets too nervous and the process will take longer. F.Y.I. you should get a cat care book to use as a reference in case you have questions later on. Things to watch for:  Make sure momma doesn't lay on the kittens. She should be cleaning them up and keeping them warm.", "3TTPFEFXCTICLRPDDDEWMW3EJJ2H64": "Breast and Nipple Thrush (BNT Breast and Nipple Candidiasis Mammary Candidiasis): Breast and nipple thrush (... http://t.co/ELOHIBKt2D", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZSP1F": "As a puppy or kitten ages it tends to develop a natural immunity to the effects of coccidia. As an adult it may carry coccidia in its intestines, shed the cyst in the feces, but experience no ill effects. How are coccidia transmitted?", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WYXRA": "go to the doctor", "3N7PQ0KLI5N14YBT4A8SUQUHHC43E0": "HELLO DONNA,  THE ANSWER IS MOTRIN 800mg TABLETS EVERY 4-6 HOURS AS NEEDED FOR PAIN. THE SAME EFFECT CAN BE OBTAINED BY TAKING 4 (FOUR) 200mg IBUPROFEN (ADVIL) TABS. THIS IS AN NSAID OR NON-NARCOTIC NON-STEROIDAL ANTI-INFLAMMATORY PAIN MEDICINE FOUND TO BE BETTER THAN CODEINE FOR PAIN RELIEF.", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOG93WG": "If you want a flatter stomach focus on your core not your abs. Exercises like plank (all variations) work wonderfully. For your thighs, first understand that only a small percentage of the population can actually get thigh gap. It is all a matter of how your body is structured. Unfortunately you can spot reduce but you can tone your thighs. Lunges are a girls best friend. If you will be doing weight/resistance training (best for what you want) find a circuit type program that focuses on core, legs  butt (but still includes all other body parts) do this 3-4x per week with one day off in between where you find some other way to be lightly active. You need this rest time for you to get any results. Focus on eating lots of veggies, lean protein  healthy fats.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q1YYD8": "Anything above 120 and you might have a problem.", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL48Z8X": "Nah, don't worry, there's nothing like that, you can wear anything you want as long as you feel comfortable with it and you'ver got a sweat towel. Afterall gyms are for your own comfort, there shouldn't be any rules other than the fact that you need to think about others too so you'll need a sweat towel that you can sweat in because if you sweat on the machines and stuff people are going to get exposed to your sweat and that's not very nice but there aren't any rules on what to wear, you can were an old baggy t-shirt if you want or even an upside-down pants as long as it suits you. So don't worry on what to wear, you're free, the country is free, there aren't any rules.", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHA971": "Short of painful surgery there is nothing you can do. Obviously you are not of African or Latin decent because then you would be prideful of your hips and marvelous curves. You can do things to lessen the effect of your curves by dressing differently. What ever you do don't try to cover them up by wrapping something around your waist or pulling your sweatshirt over them. Wear loose flowing clothes not baggy. And try colors or patterns that make you look longer.", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LVHW5": "My fellow teenage girls have said that you stop growing about two years after getting your period, but I'm not sure how true this is as it hasn't applied to me. Based on your parents' ages I'd say you'll be between 5'2quot. and 5'8quot. , but it's tough to be very specific. Other factors affect height as well, primarily nutrition and sleep. Eat healthy and sleep 7-10 hours a night (too much sleep can have negative effects as well) to grow your tallest.", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR7D6P": "my brother had the same symptoms and he had some kind of infection the Dr treated it with antibiotics and he is fine now", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSH9DY": "that's my main thing. people throw me their max and then give me shitty form", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSQROW": "makes me grateful that I don't need any of it....and annoyed that some Tort lawyers are going to make a ton of  w/ lawsuits", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0XM2Z": "How to Fix Premature Ejaculation for Men? Fast Acting Solutions to Help You Make Sex Last Longer", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTVNE0": "Read the biography and military history of Frederick I Barbarossa, who reigned as Holy Roman Emperor ... several of the German clergy ... Emperor Frederick Barbarossa", "3XD2A6FGFNSOTJ5RMET7AK1IIVP9SQ": "Well, first you must finish high school unless you're a gifted child. However, I wouldn't worry about it until it's time for you to apply for college during your senior year of high school.", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GFH02": "Whole Foods didnt have it and I wasnt about to pay as much as the cost of the flour just to ship it!Good Luck!Elena August 31, 2011 at 6:53 am There is no a way to persecute those who attack your child?", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF3XJH": "not xur the US dropped the bomb on the Y-bridge that connect 2 cities Why Didn't We Atom Bomb Tokyo? One reason is that the Truman administration was thinking ahead to the inevitable surrender of Japan and the post war reconstruction. The simplest answer is that we didn't want to kill The Emperor. The reasons The Bomb was used in the first place was 1 we had the weapon, and 2 we wanted to avoid having to invade the Japanese Home Islands because we already had a pretty good idea what it was going to cost in lives. The Japanese in 1945 refused to quit no matter how much we firebombed them. They were preparing a defense of the Home Islands that, by one estimate at least, would cost a million American Dead and Ten Million Japanese dead  because they had already demonstrated over and over that they would kill themselves rather than suffer the dishonor of surrender.", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9QHND": "hi i'm Mimi i have the same problem my parents don't understand i think i'm a drop out now i cut classes so bad the principal even acts too strict with me and nice to everyone else I've gone from therapist to psychiatrist but its no use its Sunday i have school tomorrow and i feel so helpless i guess my normal routine of hiding in the bathroom is what awaits me but this message u wrote is old and i'm afraid ill just be some weird girl for the rest of my life cus no one likes me 'talks to me and i don't even have one friend so my question is is life better after high school or is anxiety a shadow forever", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XN9IY": "Losing a pet is never easy on the heart, and I'm sure you can look back at things you could have done differently to have avoided this loss. But it doesn't change the fact that Biscuit is gone. For many people, the loss of a pet is just as devastating as the loss of a family member.", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGW9WS2": "You're a man, 6 feet tall and 125 lbs. Your Body Mass Index is 17. an Index of 18.5 to 25 is considered the healthy range. That would mean, you should weigh at least 135 lbs. But even if the Body Mass Index isn't always right, the U.S. Army and Navy body weight standards are actually a pretty accurate estimate of healthy weight range -- and those standards also suggest a man of 6 feet tall should weigh 140 lbs minimum. So before working out, I would start fattening up. My experience is, you can't put fresh sinew on a plucked chicken. Working out on a malnourished frame probably won't result in much development. Mashed potatoes and gravy, home made hot biscuits and beef stew, or a fine occasional steak dinner, fish, beans, nuts, and healthy non processed fats -- all should help you gain that initial 10 to 15 lbs. After you reach your goal weight of 135 or 140 something, you can start out with stretching exercises to build real and discernible abdominal muscles. Just my suggestion.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKRXKI1": "If neither of you have an std in your mouth or down stairs, then you shouldn't get an std from oral sex. The only thing you could have with out being sexually active is oral herpes, what causes cold sores on the mouth. Virgins can have cold sores, they are often passed during child hood by being innocently kissed by some one that has cold sores. Cold sores are very contagious during an out break, they can be passed to the genitals while there is any sign of a cold sore. Keep an eye out for cold sores if you or your partner happens to have a cold sore, don't have oral sex until it's completely gone.", "3VO4XFFP15K82K2LFD6I1OVB5HE7QL": "You're 11. STOP WORRYING ABOUT YOUR WEIGHT. Also, you're just barely on the healthy weight level for your height. Ideally, at 5 feet tall, you should weigh 110-115 pounds. Besides that, you're a growing girl! You need to make sure that you have enough calories ingested everyday to maintain a healthy weight to help you grow. Your body will be changing a lot in the next few years and you need all the energy your body can get. So don't stress about your weight. It's so sad to me that girls as young as you are freaking out about their weight. Just focus on eating healthy with lean meats, plenty of vegetables and whole grains, and get regular exercise. You body will decide what a good weight for you should be, provided that you treat it right.", "3QHITW7OYO7QLM0JMGI2BFX16PLAQG": "William Penn, John Dickinson, Thomas Mifflin, Thomas McKean, Albert Gallatin and Benjamin Franklin who was the first US Governor of Pennsylvania.", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E9GK9": "Yes, a man's best friend they say  but i like these especially:  http://www.google.com/imgres?qhuskydog...", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K2PYE": "In our experience, children and adults with Plagiocephaly are concerned that there may be practical and psycho-social implications. For example, a child may have to wear an adults safety helmet to ride a bike because the childs size doesnt fit. Adults may find it difficult to enter certain professions when they cant wear standard head protection. Socially, it is known that symmetric faces are more appealing and more desirable in society. We had one Mum who was concerned that her little girl could not wear an Alice band as it kept slipping around and falling off. What does the word Brachycephaly mean? This is another medical term for a type of flat head syndrome. A Brachy baby has a wider than normal head with the flattening across the back of the skull. Many babies will have a combination of both Plagiocephaly and with a wide head shape that is more flattened to one side. What causes Plagiocephaly? Is it my fault? No, its not your fault.", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OAA6K": "I would have to help it is in my nature.", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R386EB": "nullBelieve it or not you don't have to keep your corporate, non-profit or small business income tax records and supporting documents for seven years. Did your office decide that seven years sounds like a great number? Where's the proof? There are many reasons why companies need to be concerned about proper record keeping. Mainly, we are now under an administration that believes in transparency. Translation: more Bernie Madoff's, GM  Fannie Mae type business practices are falling under the ever watchful eye of the US Government. There are over 20,000 laws that could potentially affect your records. Before I drone on and on about laws first let me tell you that a good records management program goes way beyond how long you should keep records.", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMV2CZ": "I do not believe you necessarily need expert intervention services.My belief is that you just need to call up local rehabs, get organized yourself, and have a bed lined up and waiting for him if he decides to go.Good luck.", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYXELR": "I have seen the movie and do I believe that our government would do this?,Yes I do. and I believe that the answer is GREED", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6QJKG": "How long has it been since you had the baby? Your body sounds like its getting back on track after having the baby.. With all the stress and hormones from having a baby your body is trying to adjust to the way it was..   Opinion 2: well since it's your frist month on the pill i takes your body awhile to adjust to the hormones..and once you stop the 21 active pills it takes awhile for your hormones to drop in order for your period to come on. and the pill will throw off your period slightly..but you should get your period on the 2 or 3 pill. hope this helps but since this is your frist pack you have to give your body time to adjust and let your hormones drop for the period to come on.", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HQHEP": "You just need to get some inspiration going. You should take a walk outside, listen to music, read books, or if it's nighttime where you are, you can just stay up in bed and think. You can also take past situations you've had, and maybe dramatize it and change a few details. If none of those work, just think of one essential thing you need for a story (setting, characters, plot, resolution) and work it from there. I like to play story ideas in my head like movies over and over, so then other things will start coming. Always keep something to write with and on for when you get an idea. Good luck. Hope I helped.", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EG63I": "will give it a go, thanks.", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XKAHBM": "I get up at 6 to 6:30 every morning, but don't have to, necessarily. I go to bed around 9:30 or 10. I teach high school (9 years) and have been surprised time and time again to both the openness of today's youth and yet still, the ignorance of the facts''.", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4ND34X": "I hope this helps some of you identify your symptoms.Simply knowing the name of my condition has made me feel much better, knowing that I am not going crazy or inventing some disease :) I also feel more in control as I am now able to do more research into other treatment options.Good luck!", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ6CTZ": "Once you stop the diet, you'll gain the weight back and probably even more pounds :(. Use the Dr. Phil Weight Loss Program, and buy his book. I gained weight and the program worked very well to help me lose 20-30 lbs over the period of 4-5 months. Just working as a clerk there exposes you to personal trainers and other health experts who can give you great advice about how to most effectively lose weight. Born in Railey Station in Woodford County, Kentucky, he interrupted his studies at the University of Kentucky in 1917 to enlist in the Army. Most of the calories from weight gainers come from carbohydrates, which will be stored as fat. So, assuming the fat burners you're using actually work, you'll just be lessening the effects of the weight gainer. You best bet, if you're not currently doing so, is to combine the weight gainers with a weightlifting routine. That way you'll also be gaining muscle along with the fat you'll put on with the weight gainer.", "3RQVKZ7ZRKHRA100D2GH56X8PB4276": "The device received media coverage in May 2005 in the United States after Onterrio Smith, a former Minnesota Vikings running back, was caught with one at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport, which resulted in his suspension. Actor Tom Sizemore has also brought the Whizzinator into the public eye after having been caught with one attempting to evade drug tests. In April 2010, Willis was sentenced to six months of prison and Catalano was sentenced to three years of probation. She worked at K-Mart and she allowed her family to go shopping and only charged them like 10. Well she was naturally caught and arrested for the crime. She was placed on probation for 2 years and ordered to pay a fine. During her probation period she went to another store and was caught stealing once again. She was arrested and her probation was revoked. However when she went back to court the judge extended her probation and warned her that if she was caught stealing again he would lock her up for go...", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G6DSD": "Give people time to grow, stop giving up on people when you see they are not finished growing yet because you're not done growing either.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1SQ2O": "Go to the emergency room NOW There is a possibility that you have had a stroke or a number of other life-threatening conditions. It could be something totally benign. But numbness of your entire leg for an entire day is nothing to mess with. See a doctor as quickly as possible. constance2u 96 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. constance2u constance2u Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU67GR": "It sounds to me like your pregnant. The white fliud is material build up to close the cervix, its an survival vestige of our animal background. The nausea and feeling hot is a tell-tale sign you have morning-sickness. I would get yourself a home pregnancy kit and check it out...Next go to a doctor...  Good luck and take care of yourself.", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4G2ZX": "theres still a 50/50 chance even if she had her period. Not every woman stops having her period. I would have a blood and urine test done by a doctor to find out for sure i stopped the pill in june (combined pill) and i first had my with drawal bleed then after 30 days got my proper period! oh ur tender breasts may be a sign ur period is coming or if u are trying for a baby could be a sign of early pregnancy! Instead, the Coyotes rallied for a 3-2 win on Keith Tkachuk's goal 6:07 into the third period. The Audette-Murray-Smolinski contingent has provided that, helping set up the first goal and combining for the one that put the Kings ahead 2-1 early in the second period. He stopped Travis Green, Phoenix's leading scorer, from point-blank range late in the first period and kept Los Angeles in the lead momentarily when he stopped Jeremy Roenick from the seat of his hockey pants. Storr stopped J.J. Daigneault's shot from the left point through traffic, but the rebound bounded into the ...", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3LMEZ": "Ontology languages are usually declarative languages, are almost always generalizations of frame languages, and are commonly based on either first-order logic or on description logic. Three languages are completely or partially frame-based languages. Description logic provides an extension of frame languages, without going so far as to take the leap to first-order logic and support for arbitrary predicates. In 'The Trivium: The Liberal Arts of Logic, Grammar, and Rhetoric' (2002), Sister Miriam Joseph thus described the Trivium: Grammar is the art of inventing symbols and combining them to express thought logic is the art of thinking and rhetoric is the art of communicating thought from one mind to another the adaptation of language to circumstance. European Summer School in Logic, Language and Information The European Summer School in Logic, Language and Information (ESSLLI) is an annual academic conference organized by the European Association for Logic, Language and Informatio...", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZVP1I": "The Sunday liquor law seems to violate the spirit of the First Amendment, at least, but, because it doesn't directly address religion, would be a tough one to challenge on those grounds. As to the Ten Commandments, the courts have drawn a careful line. Displays in the context of legal history (the Ten Commandments being an important historical example of written law as opposed to royal whim) are allowable. The U.S. Supreme Court building, in fact, has such a display, in which Moses is shown along with Hammurabi and others as historical lawgivers. However, the same rulings make clear that the display of the Ten Commandments in a stand-alone context implies religious intent, and many of those seeking to erect Ten Commandments monuments have obviously done so with religious intent. That clearly violates the First Amendment, which guarantees, in part,'no law respecting an establishment of religion.' There are those who seek to create what would in effect be an official national religi", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMVC29": "Apparently, this brown nose coworker of mine thinks she's gonna find her pride at the bottom of a penis shaft.", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTXZNWF": "No food! Try exercise first just try to eat health that will help you the best,But I must say why are you trying to loss the bits I like! :-)", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVFB1I": "most places any where from 45.00 to 90.00 but if you live in the tri citys take it to bluntville at doc jones he only charges 35.00 for cats and i think 45.00 for dogs  leave their tube. Don't remove the tube!", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ845KX5": "Even if you could (you could try the Desktop Connect app), there's not much point - an ipad doesn't have pressure sensitivity like a proper graphics tablet. And that is the whole point of getting a graphics tablet. I don't see any reason why it would need to be compatible with GIMP - if something like the Desktop Connect app can be used to run a PC just like you were using a mouse, it should be compatible with any program you run on your computer. http://itunes.apple.com/gb/app/desktop-connect/id364907570?mt8", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0EZI6": "I eat a lot of Raw Organic fruits and vegetables, seeds, and nuts. ... I occasionally eat Organic Sprouted Grain Breads like Ezekiel 4:9 Bread and ... Sprouted Grain breads are slow burning carbs (low-glycemic) and the healthiest bread you can eat. Ezekiel proclaimed the Words of God to the children of God, the Israelites. Ezekiel was both a prophet and a priest. Ezekiel went into exile with the Israelites as decreed by King Nebuchadnezzar to the city of Babylon. From their website: 'Sprouted grains are very healthy for the body and can have a probiotic impact on your healthy flora, which can make it more likely for your healthy flora to overpower the unhealthy Candida bacteria.' The key to eating any bread is to eat whole grains and avoid sugar. Ezekiel bread solves both of those issues, so yes compared to normal bread it will help.", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNWV19": "Your chances of getting pregnant are very slim with one ovary along with endo and pcos. Being on Depo Provera should reduce your chances even further. I know it is one cause for polycystic ovaries.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12DC7L": "As for the story: the butterfly dragon, a symbol of imagination, enables the little deer creature to express his creativity by teaching him? how to paint. The mask, representing the deers imagination, is blessed by the dragon and transforms him into a creature similar to the butterfly dragon. Essentially its about unlocking the god inside us all. :)  comment by the artist", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL0076LW": "nullPages and pages, you can sort by publication date to narrow it down: http://www.allbookstores.com/JuvenileFiction/Animals/Birds/Owls-Fiction.html I also highly recommend this site for help: Have you forgotten the title of your favorite children's book? This is a service to help solve your book mysteries. Submit your memory here, and see if anyone else remembers your book memory, or better yet, knows the title and author! After all, it's easier to find the book when you know what it's called. I'll post copies for sale when I have them, and am always glad to search for copies not currently in stock. Loganberry Books is a used bookshop after all, and this page is only a small sideline offered as a service to my customers. http://www.rob.com/loganberry/stump.html", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF77FT": "If I were you, I'd attack the second question first by listing three of Bernard's inadequacies and using specific quotations to support your choices. Just focus on the qualities you have chosen and give strong evidence for your selections. By using this strategy, you'll have the ammunition that you need to answer the third question. As for the first one, reread passages about the games and make the call--the dystopian society reduced life to cliches by  and sex to a game by ", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AO5MJ": "Force Evict Loisa and Nichole!! Use of codename is a big violation!!! PBB Jane Edition", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0LE0H": "Acne or no acne sings you're perfect to me if u love him no matter what because looks really don't matter http:", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC0WPK": "yes. Sleeping naked beside your cousin could lead to you having sex which is incest so no you should not sleep with your cousin when she is naked.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV5L2U": "I talked to an energy healer who told me he had more benefit form this than decades of counseling especially for past traumas, I say give it a try I like this video go here http://www.youtube.com/watch?vGSpITM08X3I combine with eft tapping I wrote the words down in the past in case you want them to follow along with the guy when he taps this out I am grateful (img) that my immune system detoxifies me so easily every night while I sleep img that my body knows how to keep me healthy and happy img that I am full of energy and confidence img that I find every challenge easy and enjoyable img that I am in control and I love feeling abundant in every way img that I love and accept myself just the way I am img that I am loved and supported by all around me img that I am a good person and I deserve my health, happiness and my wealthy present and future img that my body is feeling stronger and healthier every day img that my back is stronger, and straighter and more flexible everyday img", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M33PV8": "4 Reasons I Hate Doggy Doors and the 1 Reason I Like Them Want A Dog Who Listens?Click Here  TheDogTrainingSecret.com 2015 - Login Top Thank you!Please check your inbox to confirm your subscription.", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ6PS0": "Embattled Congressman Tom DeLay decided Saturday to give up his post as House majority leader  the leader of Republicans in the House of Representatives  clearing the way for new leadership elections among House Republicans eager to shed the taint of scandal, two officials said. These officials said DeLay, of Texas, was preparing a letter informing fellow House Republicans of his decision. These officials spoke on condition of anonymity, saying they did not want to pre-empt the formal announcement.", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014Z1YP": "Sounds like you you might want to take some magnesium - maybe potassium too. That might really help. NOW Foods has a pretty good magnesium pill - Reverse Ratio 2:1 - it has more magnesium than calcium. Take three of those before bed. Extra potassium you can get out of 'No-Salt' which they sell at the store - shake that on your food. These are really important minerals. Also.... something to think about is sleep apnea. It's being discovered all over the place, and it's pretty deadly. When you're asleep you're choking all night (snoring often times). And over time this will tear your heart to pieces. By morning, your heart could be in a panic for oxygen. But of course you don't think that because when you wake up, you breathe normally and think everything is OK. It's something to think about anyway because it will damage the heart pretty severely.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM5D28": "However, there's a limited preview of the book on this site: http://books.google.com/books?vidISBN0141181222ampidR1avIGuqvuMCamppgPP1amplpgPA3ampdqOneFlewOvertheCuckoo27sNestampsign9rr-AlrUiXDJQhThzaYwjebzTw Unfortunately, I think that it is only the first chapter.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMST3H": "Yeah he can pick you up. Don't ever believe your fat though, if he can't pick you up he should start working on his strength training.", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1Y3RH": "You don't. If you don't have a copy of your prior year return, call 1-800-829-1040 and ask the IRS to mail you a copy of your transcript from last year's return. It will show your AGI from 2004.", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0BO2F": "Yes, It's totally normal. But unhealthy. I had the depo shot, two years ago. I also had five miscarriages from it. Depo is VERY dangerous, and their starting to find it out too late, it stays in your system for up to 15 months, or longer. The best thing you can do to regulate your hormones to the best you can, is drink a lot of V8 Juices, Use a sauna/steamroom if you have to, drink a LOT of water, and eat a lot of vegetables, and reaaaaaaaaally detoxify cause it will cause other things later on like depression, fatigue, weight gain, it is not fun.", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J5531": "They're might be a little jealousy from your older cat, but if you bring this kitten in young, they will learn to get along.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K4PYG": "The Vikings, were the first known to cross the atlantic ocean and enter the new world. 14. contributions of copernicus, galileo, and newton to the age of exploration.? Their study of the stars led to their use in navigation by sailing ships. If you went to the new world and founded a colony, you may have religious freedom from England, though not always from that colony (I.e., Salem) Spain was Catholic and was very successful in converting the natives to the faith. Peter the Great. 16. Choose the French writer from the Enlightenment period who wrote The Social Contract in which he said government should work for the people and the people should work for the good of the society. 2.All of the new world went toSPAINwith the expception of the future country ofBRAZILbecause it juts out fromthe rest of south America. 3.Which of these would most likely NOT be something exported from new world to england?", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U1IEF": "I don't know :(", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPIECA": "I used 'sweet oil' to keep the ear drum soft til I could get an appointment but I rarely have ear infections. But I can tell you this...You need to see a ear, nose,and throat specialist if you've had this infection this long. They are right you can lose your hearing from ear infections.", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6TARQ6": "x is already defined as y  50 so substitue it in the first equation. (y  50)  2y  200 combine y -- y  2y  3y 3y  50  200 isolate y subtract 50 from both sides 3y  150 divide both sides by 3 y  50 A punnet scare helps us understand an offspring's phenotype  genotype by combining the resessive and/or dominant genes of it's parents to provide information of it's genetics (phenotype  genotype). I hope This is taken from Wikipedia, hope it helps: Women are more susceptible to acquiring genital HSV-2 than men. Supressive antiviral therapy reduces these risks by 50. It is important to note that these figures reflect experiences with subjects having frequently recurring genital herpes (6 recurrences per year), subjects with low recurrence rates and those with no clinical manifestations were excluded from these studies. Let your boyfriend know about this immediately. Not telling him was very irresponsible thing to do, just make a better decision next time.", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S421W81": "It means your a cat whisperer. You have the power to communicate with cats on a spectacular level. Don't worry about it, my cousin is the same way.", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAUYKK": "Implants are a great option for replacing missing teeth. A titanium 'screw' is placed in your bone by an oral surgeon. The surgeon covers the screw with your gum tissue to let it heal. This screw heals for 3-6 months, depending which tooth is being replaced. The bone integrates around the screw. After it is healed, the screw is uncovered. A dentist then bonds a 'tooth' on the screw. Once it is complete, the implant functions and looks like a normal tooth. You can eat and floss like normal. Most patients say the implant does not hurt being placed.", "3QI9WAYOGQ91B03TO7QVQAAGSUJ6SE": "No, just prayer. When your breasts grow rapidly, they can ache. Sorry honey there is no magic formula out there to make your breasts grow.", "3VI0PC2ZAYIZWNVWIDIC6IDZS9EOXS": "I need to write an essay in an hour!If you have short deadline then you can avail our urgent writing offer.Our expert writers are able to write essays within 2 to 24 hours.", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJZALS": "I changed my mind teddylafred replied July 22nd, 2011 I am not sure wht my problem is,When I go to bed my heart beats real hard and I feel like it is going to jump out of me. I do have high blood pressure that I take meds for but I have been having uncontrolled speed up of the heart as soon as I lay down to go to sleep. I am not sure if it is anxiety or if I have a heart problem. Did you find this post helpful? You marked this post as helpful! I changed my mind teddylafred replied July 22nd, 2011 I am not sure wht my problem is,When I go to bed my heart beats real hard and I feel like it is going to jump out of me. I do have high blood pressure that I take meds for but I have been having uncontrolled speed up of the heart as soon as I lay down to go to sleep. I am not sure if it is anxiety or if I have a heart problem. Did you find this post helpful? You marked this post as helpful! I changed my mind Saving Ask a doctor Type your medical question here Featured Experts", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWBWS4": "When you say blank them do you mean you don't say anything at all? If so, just be assured that there are times when people are very caught up in their task or concentrating on work and don't look at the person they are passing. I have severe acne scarring as well, for the past 10 years now, and in all .... together with friends or when im in the street i get anxious and for a while i didnt go?... Autistic people are not more prone to any of these things than people who don't have autism. I have Asperger's syndrome, which is a form of autism, and I don't like to annoy or hurt people and I don't have mental retardation. So I think what you have is similar, but I can't say for sure. You probably think that when you walk past someone, they are judging you poorly. I hope this helps. Nobody care how fast you walk. If you walk to slow then the just go past you. Trust me if people don't like you it's not because you walk to slow in the hall.", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZDTUQ": "I Keep 6 In Mine ... With No Other Fish", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NST4H3": "It feels like my body is lifted with its clean spirit and faith. It feels warmer inside your body, and have a sense of tranquility.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX3HG4": "What do you want to know, any treatment?", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAXYKN": "I don't think a vet would use that terminology, but cats can indeed suffer from a host of genetic defects.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K3YPO": "-- I've seen TV commercials for a 'best way to learn a language' company called Rosetta Stone, but I don't know anything about it, the expense, or anybody who has used it. They claim to be the best, of course. See their website? If the b", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE7Z5V": "normal sized legs  thick legs", "3PGQRAZX02I3UKDZUQLN91U9R47SYV": "this is great news!", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L5ADGR": "Stay active by doing either outdoor activities, putting in a workout cd/vhs tape, joining a gym or just doing basic workouts at home on your own or with a friend. Also, watch what you eat and drink plenty of water!", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW75EZA": "The temporomandibular joint, often referred to as TMJ, is located between the ear and the cheekbone. When this joint becomes strained, the result is often facial pain and discomfort. Fortunately, once TMJ symptoms have been diagnosed at our Kansas City, Oklahoma City or Tulsa offices, we can easily provide TMJ treatment. TMJ Disorder Symptoms TMJ Disorder Treatment TMJ Disorder Symptoms Most patients with TMJ symptoms do not realize they suffer from temporomandibular joint disorder (TMD). This is often because the symptoms of TMJ disorder could easily be caused by a variety of factors, making it tricky to diagnose. Patients with TMJ disorder typically experience frequent headaches for instance however, such symptoms may simply be dismissed, without ever determining a cause. TMJ disorders typically result from a misaligned bite a head, neck, or jaw injury or excessive pressure on the jaw muscles or joints. Symptoms of TMJ disorder may include: Frequent headaches Facial pain Ear pain", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V02D45": "A MAN SAID THIS TO YOU?", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB380B3": "50 days is a long time I would go to the doctor and have them do a blood test for you. You might also being stressing out so much which is causing your late period. It causes an immunodeficiency of cell-mediated immunity. Failure to thrive and cachexia are late signs of a T-cell defect. Archaeological sites in North Haven, Maine The town of North Haven, Maine is an island community located principally on North Fox Island in southern Penobscot Bay, separated from its mouth by Vinalhaven. During the Moorehead period, the site was most intensively used during the late fall and winter, with the major subsistence activity consisting of fishing, which was supplemented by hunting land-based mammals. In the Susquehanna period the occupancy period was longer, and the major food sources were land mammals such as bear, moose, and seals taken from rookeries. In the Ceramic period there was a period of year-round occupation, and food sources were diverse, a probable indication of growing human p...", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLH9EGJ": "All dogs shed, but I would consider English Cocker Spaniels to be light to medium shedders. I grew up with the breed as my parents were English Cocker Spaniel breeders and I've had a few of my own as an adult. Individual dogs may vary, but if you're feeding your dog a quality diet and regularly brush it, you're going to see minimal shedding out of this breed. I currently own Springers and a Field Spaniel and they have the same coat type of an English Cocker. My dogs are allowed on all my furniture and I love to rough house and snuggle with my dogs. Even with all the contact with my clothes and furniture I hardly ever see a stray hair. I currently have three spaniels in my home and I may sweep and vacuum once a week. Even then hardly any hair is picked up. Generally the rule is that the longer and silkier the coat, the less the dog will shed. Many short-coated breeds on the other hand like Labs and smooth coated Jack Russell terriers are extreme heavy shedders.", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VH1QL": "Jan 31, 2013 ... Mulan ?? Where is Zach and what did you do to him? ... but I have more Byzantine history to tell, so we're telling it or I'll have my .... Mulan ?? I'd cut off Mutilin's head too! Sep 25, 2011 ... Find, create, and access History, World History, Standardized Tests, ... of military skills that were essential to the rise of the Mongol Empire. ... Greek god of wine, also known as Bacchus Greek plays were performed in his honor. As Bishop, Nicholas ultimately helped convene the Council of Nicaea in 325, which managed ... grew unto reverence, among both Roman Catholic and Orthodox Christians. ... Churches were named in his honor, as were towns and villages. Rome's history spans more than two and a half thousand years. ... After the fall of the Western Empire, which marked the beginning of the Middle Ages, Rome .... The Bishop of Rome, called the Po...", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB51P82": "Excess alcohol is only one of many causes for cirrhosis of the liver. MayoClinicRadio I'm not even lying!", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDQOT9": "The average woman can have up to 50 orgasims in a single night...... so Honey you need to either find another man or maybe get you a good sex toy..and some good porn video's maybe it will show him some new moves! listen to her sounds feel her body move the more she starts squirmin the more she is likin the motion....now sometimes we like to just lie there and enjoy the pleasure u are giving to us so we might be very relaxed....this is very good thing....cause next come the motion to reach a climax.... u know she is really getting stimulated and hot by how hot she is inside and during a climax she will contract her vagina. very gently and her legs might even shake as well...now during this if u have a finger or (toy) or urself inside her, she will have two types of orgasims, one is a clitoral orgasim from exterior thouching, and that must happen for me (i can only speak for myself)in order to have a uteral orgasim, which is the inner shaft and the big OMG orgasim.... it is possible t...", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MOULL": "I have been through this with my grand daughter. Most of the time they die. I hope yours will not. Good Luck!", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6LTVE": "A Kentucky county clerk's refusal to issue marriage licenses is being sued. A federal judge delayed hearing the case Monday. By Steve Bittenbender, Reuters View Caption of Louisville, Ky. and Nashville, Tenn.  On Monday, a federal judge is expected to hear a case involving aneastern Kentucky county clerk who refused to issue any marriage licenses. Eight people, including two same-sex couples, on Thursday sued the clerk who refused to issue marriage licenses following the U.S. Supreme Court ruling legalizing gay marriage, the Kentucky chapter of the American Civil Liberties Union said. The lawsuit, filed in federal court in Ashland with the legal support of the ACLU, claims Rowan County Clerk Kim Davis has purposefully violated the plaintiffs' rights. The lawsuit also named the county. Photos of the Day Photos of the weekend The plaintiffs seek to create a class action suit to force Davis to issue licenses to all eligible couples. 'When our laws are updated or changed, government off", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0WM2Y": "In fact, some have stopped using the word fan altogether.In this article, Im going to share some ways you can start developing your own community.Its a simple shift in mindset, but it can have a huge impact on your career.", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EDURB": "But ever since I moved out to rural Texas and started raising free range chickens, I have noticed how American dogs have an almost uncontrollable desire to chase chickens. It is very confusing to me because, of the many dogs I owned in South America that ran free along side my huge flock of over 100 chickens, I never saw them ever show a desire to chase chickens, even though my dogs were hunting dogs. But every dog that I have owned in the US has chased my chickens and killed them forcing me to get rid of them. I just don't understand it. What is wrong with American dogs? Are they just dumber then the mutts in south america or something? My wife loves dogs and is always getting new ones, even though she knows that I have a rock solid law about dogs that kill chickens, and I am going to get rid of them if they do. So to save my marriage, I built a pen to keep the dogs in.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26SZ06": "After that my growth slowed down. I'm in grade 9 and just above 6' and 160lbs. 85 of your height is based on your parents.", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYEXSV": "- assistance for viewing your purchases on a tablet device . - Click here for information about how you can get money by referring people to Flames Rising PDF Store ! This title was added to our catalog on July 23 , 2015 .", "3A3KKYU7P3FW7K5UVS7DCVANO7PWMO": "a state similar to that of denial...", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMJCLV": "I see nothing wrong with a random blood test of 132. The proper test is a fasting blood glucose test. This means nothing by mouth except water until you test. No coffee or breakfast. Also to get the number even lower until you go back to the doctor limit the amount of carbohydrates you eat, it will not hurt to cut back for two weeks. Try limiting breakfast to 10 grams, lunch to 30-45 grams, dinner to 45-60 grams and 2 15 gram snacks. This means cutting out potatoes, rice, cereal, milk, juice, sugared drinks, pasta, bread and anything from a bakery. Also walk 30 minutes a day, 2 15 minute walks are ok.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BR04X": "please follow me cam", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M3ZVPA": "304: A person born in Alaska on or after March 30th, 1867, except non-citizen Indian is a US citizen at birth. A non-citizen Indian born in Alaska on or after March 30, 1867 but before June 2, 1924 is a US citizen as of June 2, 1924. Unfortunately, most people see the process of arrest in a simplified and childish light. There is a risk in arresting anyone, anytime, even when you do have the lawful authority to do so. I have seen this same question come up several times before. So how do you get back in legally once you leave? You must apply for a visa that you can qualify for. You cannot come back as an immigrant eligible for a green card unless you are petitioned by a US citizen. they should be able to become a citizen of that country through 'Naturalization'. They don't have to leave the UK to do this, and adopting the nationality of another EU country, will give them stronger family rights.", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOP5HA": "I have a dad and I am thankful for that. Not everybody is fortunate enough to have a dad. For me, I can tell my dad anything.", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN13I5F": "http://www.life.umd.edu/classroom/bsci424/pathogendescriptions/Corynebacterium.htm http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Corynebacterium Some common bacteria: Bacillus anthracis none anthrax Bacillus cereus (environment) food poisoning / food-borne enteritis Bacteroides sp. large bowel? food-borne enteritis Staphylococcus aureus nasopharynx, skin skin  soft tissue (eg abscess / cellulitis / fascitis), food poisoning  other toxin-mediated disease, endocarditis, osteomyelitis Staphylococcus epidermidis skin, nasopharynx 'line' colonisation / infection ( other prostheses) Streptococcus agalactiae (Group B -haemolytic) vagina neonatal septicaemia / meningitis Streptococcus pneumoniae nasopharynx respiratory tract (including lobar pneumonia, exacerbation COAD, middle ear), meningitis Streptococcus pyogenes (Group A -haemolytic) nasopharynx skin  soft tissue (eg abscess / cellulitis / fascitis), pharyngitis (rheumatic fever, glomerulonephritis) Streptococcus viridans skin / mouth / nasopharynx", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHTZVLD": "I had braces for 5 years, I had to have 1 tooth pulled, and 8 molars that were impacted. It did not hurt, but I remember hearing and feeling tugging. But that was only for the one tooth, the other 8 I was put to sleep for... and I was very scared.", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYX8EY": "Let me 1st share to you a bit more knowledge about acne and pimples. Acne occurs when hair follicles are clogged by dead skin cells. Hair follicles produce an oil called sebum.", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TOBC0P": "yes women are jealous, the breasts are one of the nicest, sexiest thing in a women's body and guys in general love nice sized breasts, and it catches their attention if the woman does not look good because, if you make a survey between guys asking whats the nicest body part in a woman u like, you will get above average 50 for sure is for breasts, so all other woman know that guys are attracted that's why they r jealous and to prove it in another way girls in the age of puberty one of the main concern is the bra, and the size of the breast is it growing big enough for her, and shes always constantly thinking of when they will grow plus to all that its the new fashion trend to have plastic surgery to have breast implants and its increasing by the day, that's another proof why woman are jealous of other woman when they have nice breasts and she wants to be like them. O.K. now don't be scared................it's just part of how God created you. There is nothing to worry about.", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGH7MY": "Just like people Assuming health (soundness) and equal training (technique) and equal jockey (rider) It comes down athletic ability, stamina, speed and agility and relationship with its jockey Look at any athletic event Stamina, athletic ability, and fast speed and agility Hickstead (RIP) was my favorite jumper of all time, not a huge horse but wow, did he have speed and agility like a sprinter that just leaped over hurdles, that lil horse was awesome", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYRKET": "I need a little more time with them I'm looking forward to upping my daily ... and remember there'll always be more romances to write about, ... Before you head back out to the rest of your day ?? and enjoy your ... So please join here, won't you ? I hope readers love Georgia and the duke enough to follow them beyond ... On the second or third or fourth draft, if I realize a character is acting, well, out of ... Kate: I have the first six books plotted out, and the first three written. .... Return to sender, address unknown? ?.38 eI letter column, by Earl Kemp ... in this issue of eI beneath my byline is part of my in-progress rough-draft memoirs. ... These books may not have been the best written, and some may be ... While Leah could not answer all of my questions due to security ... Overall, I was completely shocked and very grateful that people were ... And as I write the second book in the series, I continue to utilize the ..... Cheese, please!", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKV1NZ": "I am sorry about your dog not feeling well. I'm sure he's uncomfortable right now. Massaging his abdomen is good. Keep doing it. Also, give your dog canned pumpkin. It is the best natural laxative for dogs, and they love to eat it. Give him a few tablespoons of it. Keep massaging your dog's stomach area. Try walking him around too. Activity gets the bowels moving. It may take a couple of tries giving him the pumpkin, since he's got an entire baby blanket. If he is not wanting to eat, you have to, put it on his tongue so he will swallow it. If he does start to pass the blanket, he may have trouble passing it. If any of the blanket comes out, you may have to help by pulling it out slowly. I know it's gross, but it will help your dog. What worries me is that he will not drink much water. Try to get him to drink water. You don't want your dog to get dehydrated. If your dog gets any more lethargic or seems in a lot of pain, I would take him back to the vet tomorrow.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0I629": "--- Tips--- https://tr.im/2and3linkk", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9448P": "I 've successfully raised many baby guppies to adulthood using baby dried fish food , however , you are likely to get better growth of your guppy fry if you feed them live food as well as the dried food . Do n't try to feed them adult flakes because these will be too large for their tiny mouths .", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9DFP8": "Less than an hour. I worked for thirty minutes at Buffalo Wild Wings in Massillon, Ohio. The shift manager yelled at me on my first day, having not even clocked an hour into the job because I wasn't saucing the wings properly. I told him to go F himself and walked out.", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RHUMQ": "I had a copper iud inserted a year ago, and over the last few months have had numerous body issues. .... On top of the week long period, it is really heavy periods! ...... After some blood tests and some time, it went back down to normal levels. so everything your experiencing is normal, i would just watch the bleeding and cramping and get an appointment with obgyn asap to get it checked on. get a planner and record your bleeding. the days it happens, how long it lasts, how heavy it is. ... two days when I'm on my period that it is very heavy, blood clots and all. ... Again, this stopped when I was on birth control, as my period was very light. ... yup sure did normal, just what your body normally does. I have been on birth control pills for like 7 years and I missed all but the first pill .... I indeed had implantation bleeding(pink/brown discharge) on december 12th .... I am 23 weeks pregnant due to my last period which started november 18th?...", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3DS3Q": "Alice, I was at a party nine days ago, when my friends all started smoking pot. I didn't give in to the peer pressure. I didn't smoke any.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUPWRD": "No time is good,a pregnant woman is the worst thing in the world,they are the biggest b!tches and it is all your fault,so I say leave the b!tch infertile and leave it at that,oh and use precautions safe sex is best,you dont need to make the world worse with more stupid kids on this planet,it is polluted enough. Have a nice day. Btches love me cause they know that I can rock Btches love me cause they know that I can rhyme Btches love me cause they know that I can fck Btches love me cause they know that I'm on time -Btches-Mindless Self Indulgence hormones play a big part of it and insecurities are the biggest.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY41XI": "The cask is the container the Amontillado wine is stored in. The protagonist tells the other person he has Amontillado in his cellar-ish thing (I haven't read it in a while) and he lures him down and kills him. Hope this helps!", "3W31J70BASUS3YZMTPUWLOBG7MEKC0": "well i will go out and have fun or go see a doctor about your depression because it could be serious and he can help you get a cure for it or hang out with friends and others just have fun. What it feels like is something that can only be experienced. Personally it would depend on where i was going and what I was doing.", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPKA9X": "around my wrist! so the initial hit caused a 2nd degree burn while the rest is 1st", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN155I4": "The very ink with which history is written is merely fluid prejudice.", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GN1UQ": "You are not 'entitled' to any kind of settlement. You are entitled to sue for damages. If you and the employer decide to avoid the expense of going before a judge, you can ask for anything you want, however, the employer can say 'screw you, sue me'. It just depends who blinks first. Practically speaking, though, it is usually based on the percentage of disability and what other, similar claims have settled for in your area.", "3L2OEKSTW98LB0YQGSFISAU8FA2Y83": "Also try:stomach cramps period pain,stomach cramps period remedy,severe stomach cramps period more....Ad related to Stomach cramps period Menstrual Cramps - Want to Know How to Relieve Period Cramps? Get Advice from Always. What Are The Causes Of Abdominal Cramping  Period Lateness?. - Cached More results from ehow.com  Abdominal Cramps  No Period  LIVESTRONG.COM Abdominal Cramps  No Period. - Cached Missed or late menstrual period and Stomach cramps: Common . An article on dysmenorrhea: a Dysmenorrhea profile that discusses common symptoms including painful periods, heavy menstruation and stomach cramps. - Cached Cramps During Period - Buzzle Back Cramps: Stomach. www.buzzle.com/articles/cramps-during-. Always.com/Period-Cramps End Leg Cramps in 1 Min. Ask.com/What Causes Leg Cramps More Sponsors:Stomach cramps period See your message here. Stomach cramps period related searches: stomach cramps period pain severe stomach cramps period stomach cramps period remedy Yahoo! Search Assist", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDL3FK": "I'm not sure it would help but you could try to listen to music as for your parents you could show them this (also their are some tips for sleeping): Garrett had a hard time waking up for school during his sophomore year. As people sleep, their brains pass through five stages of sleep. Stages 3 and 4 are deep sleep stages. This is the stage of sleep when a person has the most vivid dreams. Although it's common, delayed sleep phase. There are a number of other conditions that can disrupt sleep in teens. Sleepwalking It's rare for teens to walk in their sleep most sleepwalkers are children. (Sleepwalking often happens during the deeper sleep that takes place during stages 3 and 4 of the sleep cycle.) Sometimes, though, a sleepwalker will need help moving around obstacles and getting back to bed. Unfortunately, though, many teens don't get enough sleep. This can make it harder for teens to fall asleep early. So schedule 'sleep' as an item on your agenda to help you stay creative and healthy.", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJ63PL": "I hate that and hate not calling and one's if basket goes in. I get in shit for it every evaluation.", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9PHNC": "I have had tmj for years and years, I was told to have surgery and I opted not to and researched this extensively! A mouthguard can be made at the dentist to stop night grinding, it can be soft or hard. You can do jaw strengthening exercises to help the muscles because usually the muscles cause the joint problems unless you have degenerative bone loss problems. Alot of people tense their jaw and don't know it. One thing to do is to keep your teeth apart, then put your tongue to the roof of your mouth behind your front upper teeth, it's impossible to clench your jaw when your tongue is like that, also another good stop clenching thing to do is blow air out of your mouth like you were blowing bubbles. Also put your finger between upper and lower teeth in front of your mouth and rest your teeth gently on the finger. A strengthening one is to push your lower jaw out so your bottom front teeth are in a position to bite your upper lip. You can do moist heat on the jaw or ice. Ibupr...", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T631145": "The ability to farm enabled people to settle permanently. Before that, we were hunter/gatherers and had to follow the food.", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP0124": "historical societies. the , which is actively involved in surveying cemeteries. Delaware Public Archives 121 Duke of York Street Dover, DE 19901 (302) 744-5000 Are Cemeteries Eligible for Listing in the National Register of Historic Places? The National Park Service's (NPS) National Register of Historic Places is the official list of cultural resources worthy of preservation. Properties listed in the National Register include districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects that are significant in American history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture. To determine eligibility for listing, the National Park Service uses four basic Criteria for Evaluation.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWZW1L": "maybe they are second nipples. or are they under the skin?? well since they hurt, i think you shoul go to the doctor and have them checked out. are they the same on each side? not to freak you out, but men can also get breast cancer. The disease occurs. Many people do not realize that men have breast tissue and that they can develop breast cancer. Because women have many more breast cells than men do and perhaps because their breast cells are constantly exposed to the growth-promoting effects of female hormones, breast cancer is much more common in women. Many types of breast disorders can affect both men and women. This is why it is important to find out if breast cancer has spread to your axillary lymph nodes when you are choosing a treatment. This is because men do not usually have lobular tissue, the milk-producing glands. Because the male breast is much smaller than the female breast, all male breast cancers start relatively close to the nipple, so spread to the nipple is more likely.", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PKJHA": "no, i would never punish a puppy. i had a puppy who pee-ed in the house occationly, and if u punish dogz, they will make you feel bad. This did work for my puppy. I have a female Pitbull puppy right now that is about 18 weeks old (thats 41/2 months) who has parvo. From a puppy we got at the local shelter--the shelter failed to mention that Parvo was rampant there. I dont know who it is u are refering too, but you probably should report them, maybe enough bad reports will get their butts kicked off for good. You havent said its age but if its older sometimes they loose a little control, or if you have moved house recently and its older they can start to feel insecure for a while and will also have accidents, another is if you bring a new puppy into house some dogs feel they then need to mark there spots more to show the new puppy who is boss its a very dominant thing to do, and then like has already been mentioned there could be a high possibilty of your dog having a bladder infectio...", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6LVTG": "He was going to preach the gospel to Spain and other places. Romans 15:20 'Yea, so have I strived to preach the gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation:'", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01LQLF": "Depends on how tall you are. A good general measure is 5 pounds for every inch above 5 foot. So if you were 5'3' your weight should be from 110-120 depending on body type.See link below for a BMI calculator for teens, that will give you an accurate measure.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX3GH3": "Take some tylenol or ibuprofen. Yes, if u have wisdom teeth coming in u will have pain in ur jaw and possibly in ur sinuses maybe headaches too. For me, my wisdom teeth have been coming in slowly, over the last 5 years.", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRJMD5": "You are probably having what are called myoclonic jerks. What is happening is that as you fall asleep, your heart rate and blood pressure drops. Since your brain is still active, it is still using up oxygen at about the same rate. The drops in heart rate and blood pressure lower the oxygen level to the brain, and the brain interprets this as dangerous - 'We're dying.' The brain then sends a jolt through the body to wake it up. It can be rather frightening but not a serious condition. The best thing to do is to avoid alcohol, this can make it worse. Another thing is to lie in bed where your posture will maximize airflow to the lungs. Try breathing exercises before bed to help your body get used to lower oxygen. Give yourself some downtime after exercise or stimulating activity. This would be the simplest explanation, based on the information you gave.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61IPRNL": "Do you think this is something you should be asking here? Ask for qualified help! Not here!", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGQCS8": "Um... the Carpenters. 'Sing a Song'", "3J06WJ78HNI2IIZYJA38DPAM8R1VVW": "The Moors were in Andalusia for 700 years so it's very possible your grandmother had some Moorish ancestry. But 'how much' is pretty well meaningless after all those years. Also the 'Spaniards' expelled the 'Moors': probably both sides had some of the others genes after all that time.", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGU1DI": "Write, write, and write some more! Creativity is fun, fun, fun!", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZKVQ0": "Macular edema is treated with laser surgery. This procedure is called focal laser treatment. Your doctor places up to several hundred small laser burns in the areas of retinal leakage surrounding the macula. These burns slow the leakage of fluid and reduce the amount of fluid in the retina. The surgery is usually completed in one session. Further treatment may be needed. A patient may need focal laser surgery more than once to control the leaking fluid. If you have macular edema in both eyes and require laser surgery, generally only one eye will be treated at a time, usually several weeks apart. Focal laser treatment helps stabilizes vision. In fact, focal laser treatment reduces the risk of vision loss by 50. In a small number of cases, if vision is lost, it can be improved. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit.", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LAISG": "A glass (8oz) of whole milk is usually around 8g of protein, 12g of carbs, and 5g of saturated fat. The PBamp. J, you will have to look at the label for and add up how much you used, since there is no way of me knowing how much you used, or what kind of bread you used, or the type of peanut butter for that matter. Every gram of protein has 4 calories, every gram of fat has 9 calories, and every gram of carbohydrate has 4 calories.", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L58GDS": "Try going onto www.webmd.com, and click on 'check my symptoms', it's usually a very helpful site!Hope that helps!", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZEA4OU": "Larsson Instagrammed a photo of a condom stretched all the way over her leg like a knee sock just to prove that the whole But I'm just too big for them. argument your high school boyfriend tried to deploy was total BS. So, assuming whatever you're working with is smaller than a woman's leg  and sorry, dudes, it is  you should be just fine.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4KQES": "From experience, I can give an answer to the bed question. No matter what the dispute is about among my cats, under the bed is a total truce zone. And I have multiple cats, of a wide range of ages. But a correction. At two years, that cat is still very much a kitten. Transition into more adult behavior is not until around age three. And kittens do play rough, and they are trying to establish a pecking order. And young kittens tend to be fearless. But hissing and growling is to be expected, and time usually solves that as they work out a new order. Also, I wouldn't wash my hands after handing the kitten, since in petting the other cat, you are mixing scents. But you are correct, in that most introductions are for a kitten in the presence of a resident older cat, and not the other way around. But really, two years old is not really an older cat it is still a kitten.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PUEDA": "Drugs can be detected in your hair by up to 3 months. There's a catch to this though, if you smoked and got a hair test the next day it probably would not show up. That's because the hair with THC in its strand has yet to actually start growing. don't try golden seal or niacin or b3 or anything like that because they're detected. If you havn't smoked in 3 months thos two hit would have been out of your system in 3 days tops. Keep in mind though that second hand weed smoke can effect you too. Hair drug tests are not good at picking up low dose or infrequent use and drug test companies often times hate to admit that, but other hair drug test companies freely do admit that it is one of their weaknesses (and it's about their only weakness). Also by the way: taking laxatives and drinking wacky chemicals won't 'cheat' a drug test. It will just make you go to the bathroom! These drug tests are designed by experts who anticipate what the drug user might do.", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J7351": "Most of the calories from weight gainers come from carbohydrates, which will be stored as fat. So, assuming the fat burners you're using actually work, you'll just be lessening the effects of the weight gainer. You best bet, if you're not currently doing so, is to combine the weight gainers with a weightlifting routine.", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXT2V8T": "Dear, Menstruation - having periods - is part of the female reproductive cycle that starts when girls become sexually mature at the time of puberty. A woman's internal sex organs consist of two ovaries, the Fallopian tubes, the uterus (womb) and the vagina. The ovaries contain the eggs with which the woman is born and, during each period, a single egg will usually ripen and mature due to the action of hormones circulating in the bloodstream. When the egg is mature it bursts from the ovary and drifts through the Fallopian tube down into the uterus. If the egg is fertilized and the woman becomes pregnant, it will fasten itself onto the endometrium. If the egg is not fertilized, however, resultant hormonal. The average age is approximately 12. Women will continue to menstruate until the age of 45 to 55, when menopause begins. This is normal because they are not producing an egg every month. The most common cause of infrequent periods is a condition called polycystic ovaries. So get with it.....", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L5BGDV": "The Puritans, on the other hand, didnt share such a libertarian view of religious freedom. The Puritans, believing the English Crown to be drifting towards Catholic tradition,feared the Crown would someday embrace Catholocism as the state religion. Therefore, in the New World, the Puritans defined religious freedom as their mandate to preserve Puritan ideals, and saw an alliance between religion and government as a way to maintain this purity.", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51NCYN": "Limitations are necessary in life...... these draw boundaries which are essential to create and define our identity.... to the extent they are general (like can't fly or be without oxygen etc. ), our collective definition and identity as a distinct species is obtained and when they become unique individually (like I can't eat bittergourd or his brain works better after midnight etc. ), our unique individual definition and identity are obtained. In the absence of limitations, there would be no boundaries and everything would be so indefinite that we won't be able to recognize them distinctly..... in fact our faculty of cognizance itself would get nullified. Limitations are laws without which there can be no rule or order.", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0N4CT": "Twitching when you fall asleep is perfectly normal. Your mind is still working and making your body think that something is going on. I have done some weird things when I sleep.", "3T5ZXGO9DEMRMU8RY8Y1S8OAFARQZW": "I ws tempted to say 'it tastes gud too' but I overcame dt temptation", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2AW2Z": "Pomsky are amazing dogs. Everyone that I have seen have the temperament of a husky which is amazing. People discriminate against things they know nothing about. I have a German Shepard and two sibs and personally I prefer the temperament of a sib and how loyal they are. I do however know someone who has a pomsky and they love her. She is an amazingly great dog, very loyal and very sweet. Like the min pin, she really is like a miniature husky. Every aspect of her personality screams husky. Yes she is very vocal but then again most husks are as well as Pomeranians. Anyway my friend also knows others that own pomskys and none of them have ever had problems with them like some of these people are saying you do with mixed breeds. Every breed had to have come from somewhere so it's stupid to me that people are saying it isn't a breed. No not all cross breeding is a good idea, but the pomsky doesn't fall in the bad idea category, the breeders of these dogs got an amazingly loyal and fun dog w", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL00B6L0": "The elevated prgesterone levels in pregnancy cause a slight rise in the body temperature. This will make it seem like its cold out....or some pregnant woman complain if the chills. Very normal...not to be concerned....however, if you feel like you have a temperature or there are any other accompanying symptoms like cough, fatigue, rash....take your temperature and go see your MD. Hope this helps!", "3A3KKYU7P3FW7K5UVS7DCVANO7QMWF": "Try writing a play about a kid who has to write a play! He asks all his friends for suggestions and they do mini skits trying to find the perfect one. At the end he sighs turns to his laptop and types into yahoo answers 'does anyone have ideas for a one act play?' a few seconds later there is a 'ba-bing' noise from the computer and he reads 'how about a play about someone who needs ideas for what to write a one act play about?' the kid turns to the audience and says 'Hey, maybe I will!' Opinion 2: When in the 7th Grade..a one act play was actually a Comedy Stand-Up routine about the ALL Volunteer Army..I thought that was really unique..since I'm a huge FAN of comedy..and have to this day(like 40-years later)..haven't seen it repeated.. .. I might think that in my mind--I like horses..parts of horses..or the power of a horse..that might reveal a one act play//..the connection--the mind--the power--the part..(but not weird)..horses are like magic..I think you don't want them foolish..", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6ROQV": "Icon And The Black Roses  - Set Me On Fire  gets kinda krunk", "3TUOHPJXYHV71W4Y9Z9MNCQLVBAWX9": "During the strike, military targets within four miles of Haiphong were hit and enemy opposition was heavy. During the raid, the USS 'Hanson' entered Haiphong Harbor to suppress hostile shore batteries while enabling other United States Navy forces to mine the Haiphong Harbor entrance. This made the USS 'Hanson' the last American warship to enter Haiphong Harbor during the Vietnam War and the last one out. The helicopters swept the main shipping channel to Haiphong the same day. 'Washtenaw County' arrived at Haiphong from the Philippines on 6 April 1973, and made her first six check runs there on 14 April 1973, the first American ship to enter Haiphong harbor in over a decade. With all mines by now past their latest possible sterilization date, End Sweep resumed on 18 June 1973. On 20 June, Task Force 78 completed its check sweeps of Haiphong, and soon had also cleared Hon Gai and Cam Pha. On 17 October she got underway for Haiphong, arriving and joining task unit TU 74.4 on 22 Octob...", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555ABP6G": "What intermittent fasting really does is reset your insulin ... Its a back log of sugar. Just keep fasting and ... I learned that my fasting glucose is ...", "3TKXBROM5T8O5HF43EQ6VC9Y52XJI1": "GFMS is credited with producing the most authoritative surveys of the gold and silver markets, the annual GFMS Gold Survey and World Silver Survey, and GFMS gold and silver supply/demand data forms the global benchmark the international gold and silver markets are largely dependent on GFMS statistics. The GFMS team at Thomson Reuters also produce a range of other publications dealing with all aspects of the precious metals markets, and provide consultancy services in the form of tailor-made research into selected areas of the precious metals markets. Thomson Reuters is the world's leading source of intelligent information for businesses and professionals.", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M30PV5": "Sometimes we boys need to hang out with the boys. You shouldn't feel hurt.", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BKQPB": "Egypt to Vaccinate After Polio Found in Sewer: Egypt plans new vaccinations after polio virus, believed from Pak... http://t.co/g04eEjpD", "3W9XHF7WGKT9PF1XFBPMAYBKV8GTKU": "I have rarely come across a British person who has good clean teeth, even dentists. When I was younger I ate alot of sweets and later I was worried my teeth started moving and I harrassed every dentish in my county to give me a note to get my teeth fixed. Hardly any emphahsis is put on cleaning teeth when you are child in school and socially. One of the kids in Bart's class gets shown why he should be brushing his teeth: The Big Book of Bad British Teeth. By the way, many British people will vigourously deny their country has 'bad teeth', (much as Americans don't see themselves as fat) all the while rolling their lips back to reveal what poet Spike Milligan celebrated in his infamous poem 'Teeth': English Teeth, English Teeth! I think that it is because many British tourists are elderly people who have bad teeth and BO. I would not say this is true of the nation as a whole, or even elderly people as a whole, but enough of them exist to perpetuate this steriotype.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSL3GJ": "Please don't give up. Maybe they can help you out. I have some numbers you can try out and talk to somebody when you feel this way. I used to answer a teen suicide hotline and one of the things I always used to tell my teens that wanted to commit suicide is that your life is predestined and if it's not your time to leave this earth, you will just cause yourself more harm than good. You just need to get past this stage in your life. I know it helped me once when I felt like life was not worth living anymore. You are important to people, you just need to get past this stage. It is because of their developmental stages that continue even though the teen years. Being a teen sucks most of the time, but believe me it gets better. Now you need professional help, a therapist a family doctor a priest, but Please, Please, Please, Please, Please, Please get some help, is not worth dying, you are unique and there is no other person in the whole wild world that could replace you, so please don...", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK30Y3UH": "Flat Stomach Cardio Exercises - Secret Aerobic and Stomach Exercises For Flat Abs and Slim Waistline http://t.co/W0sr3EDbNP", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJ9P3A": "Hammurabi is best known for the promulgation of a new code of Babylonian law: the Code of Hammurabi.This Law was written before the Mosaic Code and was one of the first written laws in the world. The Code of Hammurabi was written on a stele, a large stone monument, and placed in a public place so that all could see it, although it is thought that few were literate. The code of Hammurabi contained 282 laws, written by scribes on 12 tablets. Unlike earlier laws, it was written in Akkadian, the daily language of Babylon, and could therefore be read by any literate person in the city. A carving at the top of the stele portrays Hammurabi receiving the laws from the god Shamash or possibly Marduk, and the preface states that Hammurabi was chosen by the gods of his people to bring the laws to them. Similar codes of law were created in several nearby civilizations, including the earlier Mesopotamian examples of Ur-Nammu's code, Laws of Eshnunna, and Code of. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hammurabi", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRKMD6": "theyre literally two inches apart its smol", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRI10M": "The puppy may have kennel cough, which is commonly caught by dogs in kennels or shelters. In fact, most kennels will require the kennel cough shot before boarding a dog. Take the dog to a veterinarian and he/she should be able to treat the dog accordingly.", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAVZXUB": "airborne spores. My problem was a little different. I had an algae tank and tadpoles began to appear. then frogs. loud frogs. then a Great Blue heron came. It got very quiet after that and the algae tank grew thick with happy, slimy green algae. One day the algae flew up into the air all at once. it was fall and the annual migration had begun. Boca Ratan is popular for its snowbirds and algae, frogs and Great Blues, I hear. Nature is very unnatural at times. Sources: my meds nbsp. dougiedognabit's Recommendations Junkie Nation : How Prescription Drug Addiction is Affecting Our Country. Amazon List Price: 4. 65 Kurt Vonnegut is my role model today. ) dougiedognabit 77 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. dougiedognabit dougiedognabit Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWR5UB": "There are separate articles for the overall history of the Earth and the history of life before humans. By definition, there are no written records from human prehistory, so dating of prehistoric materials is crucial. Clear techniques for dating were not well-developed until the 19th century.", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01KLQ9": "The link did not mention something on age requirement. But it gave a contact number though. Good luck. Fast Facts:   Workouts around the clock  What: Anytime Fitness  Where: 1850 Oak Grove Blvd. Owner: Robert White  Opened: May 18  Call: (813) 995-9308  Features: Pulley weight machines, free weights, cardio machines with individual TVs and DVD players, tanning beds, personal trainers, virtual reality bikes, massage therapy, aerobics and nutritional counseling. Memberships start at about 86 down and 38 per month. History lesson: The Anytime Fitness chain was started in late 2001 by two friends: Chuck Runyon and Jeff Klinger. The original gym was in St. Paul, Minn. The franchise, in which each location is independently owned, features 24-hour access for members to gym equipment and was ranked the 21st fasting-growing franchise by the Franchise Times' Fast 55. There are plans for at least four other Tampa Bay area locations to open within the next year. OTHER PLACES TO STAY F", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWIC56": "Goose bumps, also called goose pimples, goose flesh, chill bumps, chicken skin, or the medical term cutis anserina, are the bumps on a person's skin at the base of body hairs which involuntarily develop when a person is cold or experiences strong emotions such as fear or awe. The reflex of producing goose bumps is known as horripilation, piloerection, or the pilomotor reflex. It occurs not only in humans but also in many other mammals a prominent example are porcupines which raise their quills when threatened. Goose bumps are created when tiny muscles at the base of each hair, known as arrectores pilorum, contract and pull the hair erect. The reflex is started by the sympathetic nervous system, which is in general responsible for many fight-or-flight responses. Goose bumps are often a response to cold: in animals covered with fur or hair, the erect hairs trap air to create a layer of insulation. Goose bumps can also be a response to anger or fear: the erect hairs make the animal", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9A24I": "Trendy Monkeys in Brentwood , Essex , caters only for the under-13s . It offers to transform children with face masks , new hairstyles and lipgloss . The pole dancing lessons take place in a room decorated with pink feather boas and sparkling mirrors . They are advertised on a website which also promotes adult lessons , features pictures of lingerie-clad women and describes pole dances as sexy , relaxing and invigorating .", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63Z416": "I get headache, after headache, after headache.", "3RWSQDNYL9KOQORIJGT0DH4EW3SFF7": "Good luck!maclasch  are you talking about stretch marks?they're really hard to get rid of.", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD7AS6": "I took over the counter vitamin supplements and it really helped. Zinc 30 mg daily. Vitamin E 30 IU daily. Eat more fruits and veggies. Opinion 2: Ooooh, I am now 30, but had the same problems when I was a teen. Isn't it just the most annoying thing? Good for you to try and combat the problem. A lot of it is in your genes and has to do with hormones (arrrgh!) - but if you take good care of your skin and body now, you will see benefits later in life. 1. When I was a teen, I started using soap called 'SpectroGel'. I used the non-scented kind. You can get this in most drug stores / pharmacies in the US and Canada. 2. I would then apply a cream called Acnomel. It used to come in a skin tone - I only used it at night because you could totally see it - but the skin tone Acnomel cream worked better than the white Acnomel Cream. 3. I took Vitamin E and Evening Primrose Oil capsules daily. 4. Moisturize (even though your skin is oily) with Aloe Vera Gel. Either store bought or straight from t", "37AQKJ12TXM8SYRK9K3EBPYGEL3TTW": "On Caesar 's return to Italy in September 45 BC , he filed his will , naming his grandnephew ( Octavian , later known as Augustus Caesar ) as his principal heir , leaving his vast estate and property including his name . Caesar also wrote that if Octavian died before Caesar did , In his will , he also left a substantial gift to the citizens of Rome .", "3P6ENY9P79USEBKEFENLJZTJSAUIHW": "Your pet might be the only thing on earth that loves you more than you love yourself!", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1S2Q0": "You can just call it Dragon but in a different language, it would be interesting and make a reader wonder what it means. This site has dragon in almost every language: http://dragonsinn.net/say.htm I hope this helps. Opinion 2: Dragon Tales.", "3OYHVNTV5TWTCNWPJU3NGO5XW0ZKOZ": "I have no idea what size cage you have, but if it is the standard 1 foot long by 1/2 foot wide, I'd estimate it at at least four months, if not longer.I hope this helps!Top 50 Contributor answered 2 years, 9 months ago by bettaprotector 0points 2out of 4found this answer helpful.", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVU8KJ": "Please contact a specialist, that would be the best in your case", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZBUTP": "During the strike, military targets within four miles of Haiphong were hit and enemy opposition was heavy. The ships participating were the USS 'Hanson', USS 'Buchanan', USS 'Newport News', USS 'Providence' and USS 'Oklahoma City'. During the raid, the USS 'Hanson' entered Haiphong Harbor to suppress hostile shore batteries while enabling other United States Navy forces to mine the Haiphong Harbor entrance.", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXN0LR": "Sooyoung:I'm tall Siwon:I'm tall Sulli:I'm tall Chanyeol:I'm tall Kris:I'm tall Changmin:I'm tall Joy:I'm tall Suho:Oh pl", "3HUR21WDDUNBQ1ZYO0RA89B16JEYXE": "SanctusInsomnium said: 2 Sorry, I forgot to mention that the painting looks as if the little girl is looking into a Mirror (hence the Oval Frame). 64 months ago nbsp. SanctusInsomnium SanctusInsomnium Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3EQVJH0T40JINP0P9QMPX6VS3R9HTB": "Dec 7, 2010 ... I have been using one for 6 months now and my cough has gone ... Wonder if the research team was funded by a government grant or the ... What health risk is there with just propylene glycol? ... I've got to agree with everyone else. Aug 13, 2014 ... Just as blind people do not sense the color black, we do not sense anything ... If they did, they'd intuitively sense that they have a problem. ... my brain interpreted as a problem... because it knows I have two eyes. Here's how: If you don't find what you're looking for in your library's catalog, ask a .... on the dragon and landing in a lake (or some sort of body of water). two of the kids .... I wonder if you love reading as much as I do? .... Not all of these are new, they're just ones I've read recently: ..... The Girl with the Dragon Tatoo--Stieg Larsson ....", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NHZAV9": "No vet in the world would take the time like you did and give their own ... to find help with my Severe Macaws plucking problem, I was running out of ideas. ... My bird is a 6 year old green wing macaw and I have had him since he was 3 weeks old. Read this free information on caring for your Parakeet the right way before you rush out and buy one. ... While they don't live for 50 years, a fact many parakeet owners regret, they ... A cage for a parakeet should be NO LESS than 18?? x 18 ?? x 24??. They must have gotten in a fight. The one that didn't lay an egg might have been jealous so she attacked the other parakeet. You may want to take the bleeding parakeet to the vet and see if the vet has any tips or suggestions. Parrots are highly intelligent, similar to a 3 or 4 year old child. Parrots are ... And since I don't know where I am going, I have no idea how to get back. ....", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51OCYO": "There are OBVIOUS differences between Hitler  Franklin Delano Roosevelt. Hitler is considered the most cynical, evil villain of all time. FDR is considered, by most, one of the top ten U.S. Presidents.", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63X414": "I would suggest going to a Chiropractor. I have always had a hip that clicked, sometimes very uncomfortably. I was 17 when I started going because I have scoliosis. I was diagnosed with it at the doctors for a physical. They tell you to go to a Specialist, so we did. Well they said if it got much worse I needed to wear a brace and then have surgery if it got any worse. Instead, I went to a Chiropractor. Not only did he help me with the Scoliosis, but he also could see in my x-rays where my hips were weakened or where the bone was wearing thin due to my misaligned bones. I didn't really believe that this guy could really help me with all of these issues, but sure enough after going 3 times a week for 2 months, then 2 times a week for 2 months, eventually once a week...I  was in good shape :)  My scoliosis has not progressed in the past 10 years and the ball/socket joint that connects my leg and my pelvis has stopped wearing away. I see it in the x-rays, proof that it worked.", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXPIQR": "Portebello Mushroom Sandwich 1 cup butter 5 sun-dried tomatoes 1 red chili pepper 1 clove garlic 1 sprig thyme leaves 4 large portabello mushrooms, only caps sourdough bread 2 tablespoons spicy brown mustard 1 bunch watercress fresh ground black pepper fresh ground sea salt Preheat oven 400 degrees F. de-seed chile. chop up tomatoes, chile, garlic and thyme leaves. mix with butter.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EW2H4": "Size Main article: Human penis size As a general rule, an animal's penis is proportional to its body size, but this varies greatly between species  even between closely related species. For example, an adult gorilla's erect penis is about 4 cm (1.5 inches) in length an adult chimpanzee, significantly smaller (in body size) than a gorilla, has a penis size about double that of the gorilla. The common chimpanzee, or Pan troglodytes, has the third largest penis size among the great apes: in comparison, the human penis is larger than that of the common chimpanzee, both proportional to body size and in absolute terms.", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J6532": "I would definately try to see why you don't love him anymore, a good man is hard to find, divorce is a horrible road that brings out the worst in people and can make life very hard, I got divorced in 2003 and am still struggling financially because of what it did to my credit. Plus if you still get along there has to be something still there, it just needs a spark to ignite it again maybe...", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ6N2Z": "the Siberian huskies enemies are cats the absolutely ahte cats if they are not brought up with them . i have a husky and she seen a cat eating her food and she killed it. they snap their necks and suffoate them . its nature .", "3ABAOCJ4R82RNN98JJ87K6S1069QMF": "Alge grows for a couple of reasons and can be controlled in a number of ways.you may be getting too much light (sunlight or tank light) and too much nitrate in the water.too much nitrate be caused from overfeeding.1st. scrap the alge off the glass. (dont use chemicals, you already know they dont work well)2nd. do a water change at least once a week if your tank is less than 20 gallons (at this point i would do a 20 waterchange every three or 4 days for 2 weeks3rd cover the sides of the tank with dark colored paper if the tank is setting anywhere it can get sunlight through the glass.4th. Put some plants in the tank (real ones) they will use any nitrate in the water as fertilizer. (this is NOT mandatory)5th if your tank is not getting direct sunlight the excess light is coming from your display lights.don't run the lights longer than 3 1/2 hours at a time unless you are away longer than that. Alge requires 4 hours of light before it can begin photosynthesis and regular plants...", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLEWGH": "They just want to violate you lol  If you ever get pregnant it's possible your hips will get even wider slightly. If you have hip pain, some common causes include : Arthritis Arthritis is among the most frequent causes of hip pain, and there are many treatments available.", "3JAOYN9IHL0YU0VWFQRWBZQKQNI33D": "What is Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS) is a condition in which many cysts develop from ovarian follicles that fail to rupture and release eggs. In Polycystic ovary syndrome, there are many small cysts around the edge of the ovaries. What Causes Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Symptoms of Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? If your doctor suspects that you have polycystic ovary syndrome, he will perform blood tests and an ultrasound. How serious it Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS) is a condition in which many cysts develop from ovarian follicles that fail to rupture and release eggs. In Polycystic ovary syndrome, there are many small cysts around the edge of the ovaries. What Causes Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Symptoms of Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? How serious it Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Other tests used to diagnose the condition include:  A pelvic examination in order to determine if the ovaries are enlarged. An ultrasound scan of the ov...", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9BGNB": "The thing is, Depo shots are hormone shots and hormone things are often not too precise on getting back on track, so sometimes you may miss a period even after going off it. I was on the depo-prevera shot for almost 10 years on and off. Not having a period is NOT side effect. The shot is designed to stop ovulation, there fore designed to stop your periods..One of the side effects with depo is weight gain. Sometimes while on the depo you can spot a little (very little). You actually get a shot every 12 weeks. After you get off of the shot, it can take up to 6 months to have your period. I am 49 and need all the bone I can get .. I was on the depo shot for 2 years and I loved it. After the third shot I didn't have my period for the remaining time I was on depo. When I first got my period back almost a year later I went through a huge vomitting thing. Ever since my period has been really heavy and I get severe cramps. That's just my experience with the depo shot and that will differ am...", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0FIXR": "I was 23 when I got pregnant with my first child and I missed 3 periods before the darned stick said i was pregnant.", "31GECDVA9JKWO25WHUNSP5EOA5L66R": "Furthermore , night-waking smokers had a significantly shorter time before smoking their first cigarette after waking in the morning , with 72  of menthol smokers reporting smoking their first cigarette of the day within five minutes or less , compared to 28  of non-menthol smokers ( p .0001 ) . Taken together , these data indicate that menthol smokers have greater nicotine dependence . The number of cigarettes smoked per day ( CPD ) is also used as a measure of nicotine dependence . Whereas some research , including a tobacco-industry funded study , have reported that menthol cigarette smokers ( particularly Black/African American individuals ) smoke fewer CPD   .", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYWELQ": "So if you are struggling to determine when the appropriate time is to outsource your dental collections, just answer the questions above. If an account meets the typical criteria for third party debt collection, it may be time to suspend your internal efforts and leave it to the professionals. By keeping these industry norms and best practices in mind, your dental practice will be well on its way to maximizing recovery and minimizing delinquent patient debt! YOUR TURN: How long does your dental office typically wait before sending accounts out for third party collection? Have you found that the quicker you outsource accounts the higher the recovery rate? Let us know in the comments below! 1 Comment Great information for all web users. Thank you for sharing. Affordable dental care services Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked  Name  Email  Website Comment", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VWCXK": "If your just wearing them around, I'd say wear underwear. It will probably be more comfortable. If your swimming/surfing, etc. in them, don't wear underwear. Opinion 2: No guys I know wear underwear under their boardshorts unless they're going to the shop in them. I guess it just depends on what you're most comfortable doing. Opinion 3: Probably not underwear, maybe a bikini bottom or another tight fitting bottom. But, without any appendages down there, I doubt you really need anything. It would just be for the sake of modesty.", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L5BDGS": "Cigarettes are addictive because they contain Nicotine (a bi-product) of Tobacco. Once introduced into the body, the Nicotine attaches to the many neuro-receptors in your brain. When these receptors are exposed to Nicotine, especially after chronic exposure, they become dependent on it for your brain to function 'normally.' It is possible for your receptors to have developed a minor dependence on Nicotine. Cut out the smoking now and you shouldn't be in too deep. That shits bad for ya anyways. Hope this helps.", "3NCN4N1H1GFA1ZSJC2QH2WM2JWKBNQ": "Well you should have thought about this BEFORE you got her! Puppies are like babies. They need 24/7 attention, love and care. You need to start prioritizing your duties. Like this:   1- Come home right after school  2- As soon as you get home start training. Not for a long time. You can even work on it for 10-20 mins a day. But EVERYDAY. 3- Play play play with her. Take her into the yard and play fetch, tug a war, anything. 4- Feed her dinner. By this point she will be so tired from playing and training that now you will have time to do your homework, chores etc...   My pooch has  HIGH energy level and needs to be doing something all the time. When I need a little quiet time I pull out the Kong. It's a bit pricey (the bigger you go. I have the largest one and it costs me 20) but it is great. You can even get knock off Kongs for really cheap. I put peanut butter in it and stick it in the freezer. After it freezes I let my pooch play. He plays with it for quite a while. That's somet", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ3NZ5": "how liberating to smell no fear when you are in the presence of goals and dreams ! for anyone standing still thinking about pursuing a dream . And the photos you chose rock t do those yoga poses without both strength and commitment Hey Aileen , my dear sweet friend , so glad I passed on some of this contagious motivation your way and so happy you enjoyed the photos . We had heaps of fun making them ! Thank you for always being such a sweet support and from reading your recent high on motivation and productivity , I know you are doing wonderful things recently and I What a beautiful and motivational picture of you and your friend Christina .", "3X55NP42EOE51P0JDOO3O2TLVJ83PN": "1) Avoid dairy  caffeine as much as possible. 2) Drink camomile tea. It's proven to help reduce cramps ( migraines). Drink lots of water in general. 3) Apply a heating pad on your back. Taking a hot bath also works. 4) Eat really high fiber foods (veggies, high fiber cereals, whole grain breads...). Dark chocolate (85) works for me especially since I crave it :P   5) Try to distract yourself as much as possible.... Watch tv or rent a movie.... Give yourself time to get distracted and don't freak out because it isn't working right away. 6) Sitting in the back seat and going on a car ride really works for me.... I think it might have to do with the 'vibrations' of the car. 7) take tylenol or mitol to ease the pain.", "3Z56AA6EK4YYD5QO4AU9E1BA05X6MY": "Do you think it might be important to know where they are on your son? How old your son is? if your gynecologist is still not sure what the bumps are, find a dermatologist.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO09IZK": "I am just trying to keep my Christmas sanity by clean, wrap, cook, wrap, shop, wrap, sleep, wrap, bath, wrap, cook, wrap...etc whenisitover", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ11F01": "Well, sounds bad. Did you talk to your doctor already?", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0PJ1C": "i have the same problem! i try to do maybe 70 situps twice a day, but i also have to eat healthy in order to get to my goal. try some exercises that move your body and make you sweat and feel the BURN in those specific areas :)", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQJRER": "Dental Implant Costs. Southfield. Trust Levan Dental With Your Dental Implant Procedure  Dental Implants http://t.co/yEeojk52zF", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACCJBR": "HELLO DONNA, THE ANSWER IS MOTRIN 800mg TABLETS EVERY 4-6 HOURS AS NEEDED FOR PAIN. THE SAME EFFECT CAN BE OBTAINED BY TAKING 4 (FOUR) 200mg IBUPROFEN (ADVIL) TABS. THIS IS AN NSAID OR NON-NARCOTIC NON-STEROIDAL ANTI-INFLAMMATORY PAIN MEDICINE FOUND TO BE BETTER THAN CODEINE FOR PAIN RELIEF.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06Q69Z": "increased heart rate. at first your heart started beating faster and requires an increase of blood flow (pale face) and then continues to pump fast even when you stop to work out(red face) until you cool down and return to a normal heart rate.", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R36E6H": "Xy has been given stats twice (Rifts World Book 4: Africa and Palladium Fantasy: Dragons and Gods) however this is only at a fraction of his former power as Thoth. Xy's stats at full power have never been printed by Palladium. The other 7 Greatest Old Ones originally had their stats printed on the final (210th) page of Old Ones 1st Edition.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSM3GK": "Children with separation anxiety problems often have scary dreams about their fears. Common symptoms of separation anxiety disorder: refusals and sickness Separation anxiety disorder can get in the way of kids normal activities. Children with this disorder often: Refuse to go to school. A child with separation anxiety disorder may have an unreasonable fear of school, and will do almost anything to stay home. Display reluctance to go to sleep. Separation anxiety disorder may make these children insomniacs, either because of the fear of being alone or due to nightmares about separation. Complain of physical sickness like a headache or stomachache. At the time of separation, or before, children with separation disorder often complain they feel ill. Cling to the caregiver. Children with separation anxiety problems may shadow you around the house or cling to your arm or leg if you attempt to step out.", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBU30E": "I feed my dachshunds Royal Canin for Teckel Dachshund, It is a high quality food with specific supplements for Dachshunds including glucosamine condroition,,,,,,,,I kept them on the mini breed puppy blend until they were about five months old, then swithced to the adult feed/. Good luck with your baby, they are the most loving dogs! well I used to feed my mini dachshund pork rice and cabbage as a stable food source.", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE72B9Q": "Only two out of 100 women whose partners use condoms consistently and correctly for a year will become pregnant ,  says Dr. Vanessa Cullins , Vice President for Medical Affairs at Planned Parenthood Federation of America , who also explains that stress , illness , excessive exercise , and not enough food could throw off your menstrual cycle causing your period to come late or not at all . however , its possible for them to tear or slip off during intercourse . This is why . If youre worried that a condom isnt enough protection or just want to ease your mind , add an additional method of birth control to your sex regimen , like the Pill .", "3Z8UJEJOCZBK92KCWZS62CT6QFO93W": "Nasturtium floridanum Nasturtium floridanum, common name Florida watercress, is an aquatic plant species endemic to Florida, though widely distributed within that state. It is found in wet places at elevations less than 50 m. 'Nasturtium floridanum' can be distinguished from the more common 'N. officinale' by its much smaller seeds, less than 2 mm across. Nasturtium (horse) Nasturtium (1899  1916) was an American Thoroughbred racehorse that was the top two-year-old colt of 1901.", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B026KT": "Mighty dangerous to ask this question on the internet....the reason is that in order to become a Delta, you will need at least one letter from an active member. So, it follows that you should know someone who would be able to answer this question for you. Many sorors would be offended that you asked the question on the internet. However, I'm a little different than a lot of my sorors, and I'll help with what I have.If you are talking about Laurinburg, NC, that chapter would fall in the South Atlantic Region. On the South Atlantic Region webpage (under history, then chapters), they list the address for the Laurinburg chapter: P O Box 1200 Laurinburg , NC 28353. If you cannot find a web page for them (and I couldn't), I would suggest the following:1. Look in your local paper for possible events from the chapter. Also check the Fayetteville local paper. I saw something about the Ebony Fashion Fair being sponsored by Fayetteville Alumnae.2. Participate in your community (which is necessary),", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK05Y7": " Oh Josh, dude, youre just horny, Maher said. Id say the genie is out of the bottle but Im afraid youd bang the genie. And the bottle. Maher used the opportunity to issue a call for sexual freedom. Josh Duggar, like lots of people, just wasnt cut out to be married. Isnt it a bit weird that in a country which now celebrates every alternative gender and sexual choice, were still judging and micromanaging straight sex? Maher asked. Caitlyn Jenner gets up at the ESPYs in a dress with tits and a dick under it and theres not a dry eye in the house. Somehow with gay and transgender people, we celebrateas we shouldthe concept of I am who I am, I was born this way, this is my truth. Well, great. But can we get the same deal for the other 95 percent of us? Maher also sat down with Republican presidential candidate Rick Santorum and asked for his climate change game plan.", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SHDB9": "Ah ya, I would feel a little strange too :)  Just means you need to stop drinking before you become drunk. You didn't make love to the grandma, you got it on with the grandma ! Big difference. Lets just hope grandma doesn't remember ! If so, I suggest you change your identity and move. You have made it a family affair and were not talking Six Flags and fireworks for the day here !", "3RTFSSG7T84C12N9VG6YCIVYO22LWE": "Hasn't been retired long enough. I presume you are talking about the pro basketball hall of fame in Springfield MA. A person is eligible for enshrienment in their 6th full year of retirement.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PVEDB": "This crucial step will come off alone if you really are an individual who loves his own being. You don't start anything that doesn't need to be started, you don't yell/LOL and you don't get in anybody else's problems. The point is: you don't need attention. 3 , and of dark colors. Not always black though, but maroon, navy and gray are serious and formidable colors. Wear clothes that don't show too much but are comfortable. 4 4 Speak clearly. Never talk about irrelevant things (weather, tv shows) or about your issues or your life (trips, family problems), doing this is an attempt to build rapport with a person, which translates to a need of attention and/or approval. Just stick to what is needed to say and give your opinion only if somebody explicitly ask for it or you know it is relevant to speak up, otherwise keep your mouth shut.", "3OLZC0DJ8JDXWCFYK34PY0KS0P7IVO": "My favorite of the moment is Nokosee: Rise of the New Seminole by Micco Mann. It has the defiant voice of a 17 year old girl who manages to overcome everything thrown at her in the course of the novel which is a lot-- and she does it in a way that would make all girls proud-- not in a superhuman way or through the assistance of some heroic act of a man but via her own means. http://bit.ly/NokoseeKobo   Cherry by Mary Karr. A memoir about teens, sex and growing up in rural Texas as told through the gritty, beautiful prose of one of America's best authors. http://bit.ly/CherryKarr   The Liar's Club by Mary Karr. Another moving memoir recounting her earlier years (you should probably read this one first and then Cherry). http://bit.ly/LiarsClub   The Alchemist by Paulo Coelho. Pulitzer Prize winner re a teen on a quest. http://bit.ly/TheAlchemist   She's Come Undone by Wally Lamb. Begins with the life of a school girl with no friends and follows her through many wrong turns until s", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRLMD7": "You may be experiencing a visual illusion from out of your subconscious. In some fashion, part of your brain expects to see lines, and, when it doesn't, supplies the lines for you. An uncommon illusion, but not unheard-of. You might notice that if you focus on an area where you are confident you see lines, that the lines disappear when you try to concentrate upon the area. As an experiment, you might try sketching a portion of the sky while looking at it. In particular, try sketching some areas of the sky that you are a little less familiar with. For example, if you can have an astronomy-knowledgeable friend point out, say, Cepheus or Draco. Or even Cassiopiea. These are all circumpolar constellations - visible to most Northern hemisphere viewers above 25 degrees lat. throughout the year. Cassiopiea has a particularly distinct shape, readily visible to almost any astronomer - and almost always described as a 'W' or a lazy-W or some such. So''regular'' astronomers sort o", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDOUD7": "definitely would be cool to see haha!", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9444NE": "You could have an ectopic pregnancy which can be life threatening. It takes on the symptoms of early pregnancy. You need to go to an obgyn and have them check for it. It's not fun but it can save your life...or just give you definite answers. There are free clinics like planned parenthood that have well trained doctors if you don't have insurance.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6N9OU": "You can't :D", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV1UXA": "For Dedini, the drawing came easily. A plethora of early rejection slips convinced him that gags -- the idea and the caption that made people chuckle -- sold the cartoons. But he kept freelancing his own cartoons as well, and Esquire soon lured him away to its Chicago office by doubling what Disney paid him. In 1959, Dedini published his first Playboy cartoon. I like funny people better than funny drawings. And for cartoons they have South Park. Born in Cleveland, Ohio, Palnik introduced kabbalistic spiritual themes into his cartoons in the 1980s and 1990s. His cartoons combine graphic design, drawing, poetry and literature. The images are pen and ink drawings and often rendered in minute detail. The cartoons are like a one page book, dispensing wit, wisdom and spiritual advice. Many of Palnik's original drawings are in the collection of the Ohio State University libraries in Columbus, Ohio and his work is also represented in the National Cartoon Collection in New York City.", "3TLFH2L6Y9ME8ZX7Q5JIA2PQE8S2TF": "Most commonly , two canine teeth ( one deciduous and one permanent ) are present at the same time . The permanent maxillary canine tooth erupts mesial ( ) to the deciduous one , giving the appearance of a wider and more blunt canine tooth rostral to a narrower one with a sharper cusp .", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXT08V4": "Cockroach afraid of Rat'Rat afraid of Cat'Cat afraid of Dog'Dog afraid of Man'Man afraid of Girlfriend'Girlfriend afraid of Cockroach'T or f", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W9OIR": "Stiles tilted his head , thought about how that would work , and watched as they twined their fingers while Regina pet Jim with her bare foot . And right over there is Onyx , with their two pups , Rune and Paddie . Rune has the white collar , Paddie the black. Stiles stole a glance up at Onyx , who had the most beautiful dark complexion and striking dark eyes . They glowed , not like a werewolf , but like a human with complete confidence . Stiles nodded at them , then transferred his gaze to Rune , whose eyes glowed a golden yellow similar to her springy curls , and Paddie , who was nuzzling and nipping at Runes shoulder . Rune nudged him hard , and he whined at her softly . Now , for the rules. Stiles brought his attention back to the matters at hand .", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQVLNK": "read below https://tr.im/firstansbest green links for reference", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JRORZTGR": "As it is dead and is not the dead head of a protected alligator I would have thought it would be OK. They may check it for smuggling though as some people do try and smuggle stuff in strange pottery and stuff. Good luck. Just make sure you tell the front desk about it just in case. They may want to check it. It will definitely come up under the Xray and you will be asked about it. Forewarned is forearmed. I must say though - my opinion - that's GROSS.", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E7RCZ": "The mother cat offers her kittens' best chance for survival, so wait ... a condition that can be fatal for small kittens (not to mention a hassle for you to clean up after) . ... If you are a moderator please see our troubleshooting guide. Some kittens enjoy playing in the water and even tipping over the bowl, so you ... Young kittens need to eat every few hours, because their tummies are so small. .... As with the below formulas, please remember that any emergency formula?... If this handbook proves to be of use to you, please support Kitten Rescue by taking ... Keep the container covered with a towel or blanket a small towel or cloth inside .... Nursing bottles are marked with measurements so it's easy to keep track. In an older cat the intercostal muscles are so well developed, and the ribs rigid .... in the early development of a normal kitten), and a very small daily (or twice daily) .... a kitten with FCKS p...", "3S8APUMBJXHYD7F2EE74URDTH50FBP": "Cats because they are less demanding and needy. They are softer too and so cute. I seen some ugly dogs but never seen an ugly cat.", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V764VV": "It won't really 'TRICK' your metabolism - but one day of not dieting and resting your body will do you good in the long run. Some reasons are: it will help you not binge, it will help you take in calories to burn them off, it will help you be more mentally determined.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AJACA": "Plot point 'For the role-playing games concept see Plot point (role-playing games)' In television and film, a plot point is a significant event within a plot that spins the action around in another direction. Noted screenwriting teacher Syd Field in his 'paradigm' proposes that a well-structured movie has two plot points within a three-act structure. The first plot point ends Act I and propels the story into Act II likewise, the second plot point ends Act II and propels the story into Act III. Comedia (Spanish play) In the Spanish Golden Age (Siglo de Oro) tradition, a comedia is a three-act play combining dramatic and comic elements. Theatrix (role-playing game) Theatrix is a role playing game produced by the defunct Backstage Press and no longer in print. Descriptors can act as advantages, but in order to use them so, the player must spend plot points. They can also act as disadvantages, and when they do so, the player gains plot points.", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWOU5X": "It can be the food you are giving them.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLQ0AB": "If you can combine history with politics, pehaps there are government jobs such as the staffers on West Wing. There are such things as company historians. I will also be turning 50 on sept. 16....i would love to find individuals to help sponsor a 50 women turning 50 in atlanta...'m a high school history teacher and i know at least 4 other women turning 50 this year...i'm not much on celebrating birthdays but i believe this one is a milestone and should be treated as such! We were actually just talking about diseases being genetic in my biopsychology class last week. As my teacher was saying 'Conception is a crapshoot' meaning there are so many possibilities when combining a male and female's DNA. My teacher said yes, family history of a disease makes it more likely, but a very small percentage that's hardly worth worrying about. However, I'm not sure if this applies to deafness but maybe you will find it helpful. A giant company like GE probably has one , but only one. So what do yo...", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXQQI0": "The original guy that also went by the name 50 cent was shot multiple times, I say multiple times 'cause I don't know or I don't believe 'cause my sis told me he got shot 9 times also, but he passed away. He was the first and original 50 Cent. His story was similar but our recent 50 Cent did more st and got involved in more st than the original.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26T0Z8": "There are cases of two penises, or a penis and a vagina. But I have never heard nor seen of two vaginas, or 2 penises and a vagina. Could be a case of misidentification of organs.", "3YLTXLH3DF4KVX7IS9D5SWUVEOSHPA": "US man ordered to stop spreading HIV: A Seattle judge orders an HIV-positive man to stop spreading the disease... http://t.co/5Ejg0rD7LA", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GF0HL": "John K. of Ren and Stimpy'' fame runs a blog where he gives lots and lots of info on cartoon drawing and design. http://johnkstuff.blogspot.com  Keep in mind that drawing cartoons can be very different than drawing for realism.", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGYUS1": "Why not check your birth certificate, or ask your parents - they probably know. Rather than ask people who will only be guessing. Opinion 2: You can't. A judge can. Opinion 3: That's obviously a question for your parents, not random strangers here. Opinion 4: i dont know what country your from but i know that in australia u can revert back to ur maiden name without any charge an in ur case it would also depend on ur age as to whether u could do it ring ur local births deaths and marriages office an they will be able to give u the information u need", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6RQOX": "Origi - 19 - 6 career goals Lukaku - 20 - 56 career goals", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF7IAO": "most people think it's wrong... but I have no clue why. I've written a paper on this, and in surveying 50 people, most said the first thing they thought of when seeing an interratial relationship is 'what will the kids look like?' everyone gets paranoid even though we say we're past discrimination. The people problem is not exactly independent. If you are walking in the same direction, you won't pass the same people again. Since it is not, the probability is higher than 50, depending on how many people are in your school. most people who suffer from paranoid thoughts is caused by an organic illness, that usually responds well to medication. most people have paranoid thoughts from one time or another, that is normal. such as being paranoid walking down a dark alley, what is not normal is having unfounded thoughts of paranoia and when these thoughts make your life miserable,unfuntional, and is interfering with your life, then it becomes a problem.", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPHCE7": "Pink eye ( also called conjunctivitis ) is redness and swelling of the conjunctiva , the mucous membrane that lines the eyelid and eye surface . The lining of the eye is usually clear .", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBT78B": "woaaah, woaaaah, breath, sighs TROUBLE, TROUUUBLE, TROUUUUBLEEEE. lol", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K1PYD": "they have to create space by taking teeth out and since you have crooked teeth there is not enough space to realign teeth without extraction........", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ840XKD": "Mar 15, 2015 ... She meant to say those words to you, but apparently she can't m. ... It looks like there's another cat down there, cleaning their face with their paw. ... to humans right now, maybe she'll be able to ask them for help at least. ..... To put it another way: stable a horse alone for a few months. ..... witnessed Reciprocity from a cat to a dog ?? and cats are not usually .... In the Company of Dogs ... for a year or so, my (now) husband and I would laugh and say, well, w... Kittens are curious when young and will make any good friend. Same with Puppies. Some kittens may be afriad but maybe getting kittens from owners with dogs or puppies will help the kitten get more adjusted with the dog. I don't know what kind of danger your kitten could get into at your home. I left my kitten in my house when I went to class for a few hours and she was fine. It's a way for her to explore and get to know her new living environment.", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65UPKK": "13. Mental retardation, Psychological developments disorders, hyperactivity disorders, and other Psychotic disorders. Doit", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCZTFS": "Answers Relevance Rating Newest Oldest Best Answer: As it is dead and is not the dead head of a protected alligator I would have thought it would be OK.They may check it for smuggling though as some people do try and smuggle stuff in strange pottery and stuff.Good luck.", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2B2W6": "Some signs that suggest a neck mass may be due to cancer include pain, rock hard ... Such benign masses include cysts, inflamed lymph nodes, and .... d in first diagram ,but my parents say it is just a swollen lymph node. it has?... ... back of the neck On either side of the thyroid gland in the front of the neck ... I get painful, swollen lymph nodes that don't appear to be connected to immune problems. ... How to Tell the Difference Between Lumps and Lymph Nodes?... Adenopathy (swollen lymph nodes) occurs in approximately 75 of folks ... Feel free Read more ? ... Q for HIV people about swollen lymph nodes I would like to know if when you have swollen glands in the neck are they sore or painless? You need to see your doctor. A swollen lymph gland is indicative of an infection of some sort, probably from the cold sore. It is important to seek medical care for anything that is 'out of the ordinary' when a woman is pregnant.", "3KLL7H3EGDZX0H4EELM4YOJD0CSHVU": "The French had just gotten beat in the French and Indian War by England. This meant that they had to give up all their land claims in the New World. So, the French hated the British and wanted them to be beaten.", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ76OWX": "Many dogs that acquire Kennel Cough will cough every few minutes, all day long. Their general state of health and alertness will be unaffected, they usually have no rise in temperature, and do not lose their appetite. The signs of Canine Cough usually will last from 7 to 21 days and can be very annoying for the dog and the dog's owners.", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR68I9": "http://www.advantix.info/Questions-and-answers.1195.0.html that is a link to the advantix questions and answers page. now. calm down. it's just a tick. yes they are nasty, yes its icky, yes they can carry lyme disease. but you are surely not going to die. pull the tick off of your dog and burn it. if you are concerned about your house, the best thing you can do is get a bug bomb and bomb the house. then buy spray to spray the yard. make sure to read the label on the product you buy to see that it kills ticks. secondly, advantix is one of the least expensive flea/tick control you can buy. if your vet is charging a lot, call around to other vets and price it. never buy flea and tick control for your dog at a pet store, as those are not regulated. advantix from my vet is 12 a month. not bad. frontline is more expensive, and i dont feel that it works as well.", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9VV75": "The oral cavity is the mouth.", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0VM2X": "Chihuahuas What's good about 'em What's bad about 'em  There are energetic Chihuahuas, and placid Chihuahuas. Hard-headed Chihuahuas, and sweet-natured Chihuahuas. Serious Chihuahuas, and good-natured goofballs. Introverted Chihuahuas, and Chihuahuas who love everyone. Owning a toy breed means constant supervision and surveillance of what's going on around your tiny dog. As a breeder/owner, I would put the Chihuahua fairly high on the List of 'Hard Housebreak.' Chihuahuas are not Golden Retrievers. Is it really out of the question if the breeder is in the same state as you? I'd probably lean towards a breeder who also showed her animals as she would be breeding towards good type  possibly good temperment as there is no way that a snappy or irritable animal would do well in a show ring. Oh - these websites list a few breeders in New York State ... are none of them near? I've also given individual website addresses for breeders in NY as answer to your other question", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTKFSO": "Well it is the best thing to do since sometimes cats will pick on the new cat and never give up with the bullying. Or so that's what my cats did when I got my new kitten Demi.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54KBE2": "CyprusCyprus, the small island in the east Mediterranean sea. On the south side, in Nicosia.", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2060R": "Why don't you go to a local shelter and get one. You will save an animals life and give it a home. Usually all it costs you is the cost spaying or nutering", "3RIHDBQ1NEWEAUA50TLDBS009JHHME": "5: Pillow Pets Glow Pets - Unicorn 17: Pillow Pets Glow Pets - Unicorn 17 by Pillow Pets (16)Buy new: 29.99... http://t.co/YF7XPIGXiC", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP8JGC": "'I think another 50 cents might be good,' the mayor said at the time. 'There's a clear correlation: you raise your cigarette taxes, fewer children go and smoke.' hehe olefarte, I also smoked a pipe for about 6 months. I've smoked so many different things it's crazy. Those are the benefits of working at a smoke shop. I would NOT recommend trying canadian or french cigarettes. French cigarettes are very strong. If you're used to smoking Marlboro Reds or even filterless cigarettes a French cigarette still may knock you on your  :-). I've seen so many different styles of packs of cigarettes it's crazy. If you smoke and you haven't tryed Bidi's I suggest trying them out., but DO NOT buy the flavored Bidi's!!!!!! Those who sell cigarettes to people under the age of 16 face similar penalties. According to a national survey conducted in 1997, some 50 percent of Vietnamese men smoke while only 3.4 percent of women did. Vietnam strictly bans all advertising for cigarettes and tobacco prod...", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1U3RD": "You are going to be dedicated??? The answer is exercise, stop making excuses and start doing sit ups.", "3SA4EMRVJV09KX1MU16KM4VES7O0PP": "As a teenager myself, I have some ideas on what to do. Around 15 were all going through that rebellious stage, some more than others. I used to be like that push my parents to the edge sometimes. But you have to give her some discipline and let her know that your in charge, otherwise if not that rebellious stage will become permanent or even worse. My mum was very firm with me, but im grateful for that now because I respect myself and others, I also have a better realtionship with my mum and dad now.", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSPORS": "I'm sorry that you think that I see sex any differently than you as a man and that makes me have been abused in my past. Seriously men, wake up! women like sex just as much as men, they just aren't allowed to say so without being called a nympho or slut or whore or bitch and anything else you feel like dishing out.", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSM0NS": "Why are you asking girls? When I was 15 I didn't have a penis. I still don't.", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3GS3T": "Researchers Grow a Breast In a Dish - TIME - Researchers Grow a Breast In a Dish - TIME TIMEResearchers Grow a... http://t.co/wE1Y3ddstg", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2A2W5": "I think it can happen teens and there baby's just can have serious health problems.I'm 26 and my daughters was born premature and was in nicu for 3mths.most of the baby's in there were baby's from teen moms 2of which were 13 and 14 year old moms.There body's can produce baby's but there body's aren't full developed to have kids.that's what puberty is for for your body to mature so when its time your body can handle it. About 40 percent of teen mothers are under 18 years of age. MALAYSIA: Children born out of wedlock in the country have increased since 1998 with most mothers in their late teens.New Straits TimesManagement Times, April 1, 2002. More than 40 percent of these babies were born to teenagers.The Moscow Times, November 29, 2001. The Problem of Teen Pregnancy in the United States, 1997. At 11, you've yet to experience puberty and the rage of hormones that soon awaits you. The teen years are hard enough without giving yourself a label prematurely. You will k...", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9584U": "Mole? Or. I recently noticed a small lump under my left arm, in my armpit. The most prevalent cause of a lump in the armpit is infection. Or you may have a boil or abscess just under the skin. You may also get a lump under your arm as a reaction to a vaccination, such as smallpox, typhoid or, rarely, measles/mumps/rubella. But in general, a lump thats moveable and painful signifies an infection. And, while a painless lump thats hard and fixed in place is more likely to be cancer than one thats painful, softer, and moveable, such a lump doesnt automatically signify cancer. If the lump persists for a couple of weeks, see a. If its a painful, soft lump, and maybe the skin around it is red, and it seems to be growing, its probably from an infection. The only time you dont need to pursue diagnosis and treatment of a lump in your armpit is if it disappears entirely, and doesnt return. - See more at: http://www.healthcentral.com/breast-cancer/c/78/78738/armpit-lumps/sthash.zq2aZIIm.dpuf", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEBO3Q": "... and a bottom layer of sweetened cream cheese, ... a scoop of ice cream! When I see cream cheese and crescent rolls I always ... eating the apple ...", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZJ9VV": "She is currently at Queen Margaret College, Wellington, New Zealand and is taking the International Baccalaureate course offered there. In August 2014, Saili was granted a 4000 scholarship to study in Spain, and will pursue her passion for culture and languages for three months starting from December 2014. National Law College, Nepal National Law College (NaLC) is one of the undergraduate and graduate law school of Tribhuvan University in Lalitpur, Nepal.", "3VGET1QSZ0XDMHY7RM5OTDDXTIYW7H": "http://t.co/VjkuZE3YDa ebay Vintage Snow Globe Florida Souvenir Alligator Shaped , with Water, 4-3/4' tall http://t.co/dufRS7AJFq", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH0739Q0": "OOOO! well, im 13 and in the summer i go to bed at maybe 11 or 12. and wake up at 11 or 12 lol   Opinion 2: bad bad bad. and how do you do it, I'm 15 and my body forces me to sleep 10 hours, you need to get 8 hours of sleep! that is the best ammount of time for a 13 year old to slepp. Opinion 3: Around 9 or ten. I am 13 and I go to bed usually between 9 and ten and I wake up at 7. It really depends on what time they get up, and how much sleep they need. I need nine to ten hours so this works for me. But your daughter might be fine with 7 or 8. You might want to just let her decide when she goes to bed, after all she is 13.", "3KG2UQJ0MJMX55U8VKN7XLH15WMQNI": " Precisemen '' and  Precisians '' were other early derogatory terms for Puritans , who preferred to call themselves  the godly '' . The 17th century English Puritan preacher used  the godly '' to describe Puritans in the title of one of his more famous works , The term  Puritan '' can not strictly be used to describe any new religious group after the 17th century .", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACDJBS": "scrimshaw only developed as an art because the materials being used (ivory  whale teeth, mostly) were so abundant as to become valueless. The art itself naturally dwindles as the supplies for creating it become more scarce. The most likely place to find scrimshaw today is in a museum....looking for a new pipe, are we? :D", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGW8SWX": "Yeah...it's hard to be outgoing when people already assume you're going to be shy. I was voted Most Shy when I was a senior in high school, but I marched over to the yearbook room and told them flat out that I didn't want it and they could give it to the runner up. Because, despite what the snobby popular kids who decide these things thought, I was past my shy era by then. I'd grown out of it.I HAD always been shy. In middle school and early high school, I was just quiet and I didn't like being the center of attention. I din't know who I was yet, I guess, and I just never had the confidence. I didn't think I was interesting enough to have people like me.When I was about 15 or 16, I suddenly came to the realization of what I wanted to go to college for (to be a game warden...an outdoor cop) and that changed everything. I think having a really strong interest like that made me come out of my shell. Maybe it was the fact that I was interested in telling everyone about it that did it. And it might h", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSED9Z": "Malcolm X From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia (Redirected from Malcom X) Jump to : navigation, search This article is about the man. For the biographical movie of the same name, see Malcolm X (film). yes, people can change.", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M31VPC": "'I am launching a solemn public appeal to send funds to help the children (in Asia): 1.5 million children displaced, 50,000 orphaned, 40 schools destroyed,' Fillon said on French television. He said the health and education ministries would begin a campaign in cooperation with the UN's children's organization UNICEF and the Red Cross that would help build reception centers to house isolated children. Fillon said the campaign was not just about helping destitute children but also protecting them from human traffickers, something 'which has already begun.'", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9434ND": "Taking a painkiller can help. Also, remember to chew alot. You might not want to, but it's sorta  massaging that jaw muscle. It's kinda weird, but it helps ease the pain a little. yes, braces ARE stupid. lol ", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2VKW8": "However, if you already have a fat belly, the best option is to follow a healthy weight loss diet, combined with fitness exercises such as aerobics (to burn extra calories) and a stomach-toning workout to help tighten and strengthen abdominal muscles. That said, reducing a fat stomach takes time - especially if you are an apple-shape. Despite what commercials say, there is no diet-plan or type of exercise that can 'target' your fat stomach. So please don't get impatient. Your fat belly will disappear, I promise. Strength training (even minor strength training, like sit-ups) won't help you lose belly fat. Cardio, especially running, and a healthy diet are the only way to actually lose fat. Sit-ups/crunches will build muscle, but you'll still have a layer of fat over them and will actually make your stomach larger. However, combined with cardio, ab workouts are very beneficial to defining, not flattening, the stomach", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179CF5M": "At my job, we have a skate rink and when people return their skates they stand there waiting for someone to come see that they dropped them off. I Love You' and 'The Notebook' I hate most girls I hate guys' humor (sometimes) and how predictable they are I hate being stuck home every day I hate the hot weather I hate thunderstorms I hate my teeth I hate having to spend my own money when I buy things I hate the south I hate those typical Californians (tan, blonde, fake, rich, stupid, etc) I hate the Real Houswives of OC and NY I hate when snow melts I hate no snow for Christmas/New Years I hate that I'm really ungrateful and vain I hate the TV show 'Friends' and bad comedies/sitcoms like 'Two and a Half Men' and 'Yes, Dear' I hate my new haircut :( (not the video, my actual new haircut) I hate when there's SO many people at the gym I hate my legs/thighs/butt I hate my arms, they're really manly and muscular I hate how I screwed up and screwed myself over I hate Miss Natoli I hate Tori I", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EK63M": "i too am wanting to open a pet store.reptiles and they're respective dietary req's and i would not want to be bothered off hours. A vet that has an emerg. would be different", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0EO2I": "Please let me know . I have a female dwarf hamster who I love more than myself . A few days ago I noticed her bleeding in her vaginal area . I almost died when I saw this , so I made an appointment for her with a veterinarian for the next day .", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LAWBXC": "I would at least talk to a counseler. Some one that knows about the military life would be best. You may not need to be on any kind of meds, but you really ought to talk to someone about it. Good luck.", "3FW4EL5A3LMKO03U7QZM9FG0EVG22O": "george is home. ((I didnt' want to put it in caps here bc it might cause confusion. but you should bc it is very powerful to see it in all Caps :) Ahhh who am I kidding. When Muffett was missing nothing like that made me feel better. I can't make you feel better and you are hanging in there very well anyway. But when he gets home I will want to see pix of the giant cat party that will ensue. Catnip for everyone. To clarify. 10 days missing (while I was in hospital) PLUS the 2 weeks I looked for her. over 3 weeks missing and she's a very old girl. I know George has been gone longer but never lose hope. He's much younger too. Guess what. Muffett is still here and still the driveway diva 3Hello eicanfly, Thank you for your post, you really made me laugh. I'm glad to hear that Muffin made it back home, she's a tough old girl by the sound of things. There is definitely going to be a HUGE party when George comes home. I'll be sure to let you know when he does.", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LR576": "Most styes will drain on their own though this may be accelerated with a hot or warm compress. Medical professionals advise that patients not attempt to squeeze or apply excessive pressure to styes They are generally caused by a Staphylococcus bacteria infection  Generally, you get what you pay for.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2PO0T": "Loss of Penis Length After Surgery In addition to ED after prostate surgery one of the most common side effects of prostatectomy is the shrinkage of the penis, both in circumference and length. Penile shrinkage is common among men who have had prostate surgery and tends to worsen over time. However, VED therapy has been shown to help patients maintain peroperative penis size. In a clinical study, 63 of patients who didnt use a vacuum erection device after a prostatectomy suffered from penis shrinkage vs. shrinkage in only 23 of the patients who routinely used a vacuum erection device. Nighttime. A healthy male usually has anywhere from 2-5 nighttime erections that help to maintain healthy penis tissue and length. These items may expose the penis to pressures that are excessive and that can cause injury and damage. The erection also is cooler in temperature than one that is obtained normally, because the blood in the penis is mainly from the veins, not the arteries, which is warmer.", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWP5U9": "Out of 2,200 people on board only 700 survived in the only 20 lifeboats. Not even enough for half of the passengers", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXRQI1": "Try this: Cornish hens with a flavorful glaze. 4 Cornish hens salt and pepper 1/2 cup melted butter, divided 1 can (12 to 16 ounces) pineapple slices 1 cup chicken broth 1/2 teaspoon ground ginger 2 teaspoons cornstarch Directions for glazed Cornish hens Season cavity of Cornish hens with salt and pepper. Place hens in a large shallow roasting pan, breast side up.", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI67IYV": "nullThere is no one answer to your question. It's entirely dependent upon what game(s) you want to play on the Wii. Every game will show on its box what kind(s) of controllers are used in the game. IN GENERAL, you will need one Wiimote for each player who wants to play the game. Depending on the game, you may also need one nunchuck for each player. I do not believe any game REQUIRES the classic controlers - they are alternatives to the Wiimote/Nunchuck combination. Here are a few examples from the games that I currently own:  WiiSports - Tennis, Golf, and Baseball require 1 Wiimote per person. Bowling requires only 1 Wiimote (all players can share). Boxing requires 1 Wiimote and 1 Nunchuck per person Super Monkey Ball - requires 1 Wiimote per person. Some of the extra mini-games also require 1 Nunchuck per person Mario Party 8 - requires 1 Wiimote per person. One of the Extra minigames (that I've unlocked so far, anyway) requires 1 Nunchuck per person.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVAOMPL": "You smell and see things. :)", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD46X8U": "Is my penis size normal?More questions Is My Penis Size Normal?Is my penis size normal?", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOGCW3C": "Since you mom is a smoker though it should be easier I think.", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51QCYQ": "he's growing up too fast make it stop", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIVYUZ6": "I would suggest Lady Macbeth. Her part isn't huge but you can really see the change in her character as the play progresses. It is also easy to relate her feelings to the other events that are going on at that point in the play. The scene where she is talking to the doctor would be a really good reference, make a few quotes from there maybe. She is one of the most well-known female Shakespearean characters. Also connect her change in personality and sanity from the beginning of the play until the end. At the start she is very manipulative and is willing to do anything to make her husband the king. She is constantly challenging his 'manliness' and even talks about wishing that she could be a man so that she could commit the murder. However, as the play progresses she realizes the monster that she has helped to create in Macbeth and can't deal with the thought, so the 'commits suicide' She's definitely the character (other than Macbeth) that has the most major shift in character identi", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08KT89": "let's see. to fit comfortably in the official standard female us sizes: 5'---110 5'2---110 5'4--105 5'6--105 5'8---100 5'10---100 and so on...this is just a rough amount, everyone carries weight differently. the measurements are here: this is bust waist hips. Official Sizes-inches 00- 31 bust, 22-23 waist, 33 hips 0---31-31 bust, 23-23 waist, 33-34 hips 2---32-32 bust, 24-24 waist, 34-35 hips 4---33-33 bust, 25-25 waist, 35-36 hips 6---34-34 bust,26-26 waist, 36-37 hips 8--- 35-35 bust, 27-27 waist, 28-28 hips 10---36-36 bust, 29-30 waist, 37-38 hips 12---- 37-38 bust, 30-31 waist, 38-39 hips 14---38-39 bust, 32-33 waist, 39-40 hips and so on...rest should be plus sizes (yikes!) good luck with your weight loss...i am trying to be a 0 or 2. hope i helped!!!", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFR3B0": "After the War (novel) After the War is a novel written by author Carol Matas. The book was published by Simon and Schuster and released in 1997. Shortly after the end of World War II, Ruth Mendenberg is released from a death camp in Buchenwald, one of Hitlers concentration camps.", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SJG4J": "No you can't get HIV from sharing a drink or sandwich or even taking a bath or shower with an HIV positive person. No you can't get HIV from a public toilet (so for the love of god, ladies sit down and don't pee on the seat, you're disgusting!) If you don't feel you can speak to your mother, maybe a helper at your church, the mother of a friend or a school councilor - or an older sister? someone needs to check it out and make sure it's ok. If you do have an infection, it will need treating. If you are concerned speak with your supervisor from the nursing placement and tell them of your concerns. They can run a simple blood test to rule out the possibility if you had contact with infected blood. I hope everything works out for the best. External HIV virus is easily killed with just soap and water. a monogamous relationship with a person who does not have HIV will totally prevent the disease! HAve your partner tested, chose an HIV-negative partner, and STAY WITH THEM.", "33KMQD9OFJCYW2X6JEXC1XEG0RP77Q": "(Bird flu? ) Did you try the whiskey and hot tea? Feel better soon. I hope you are getting plenty of rest. Dont worry about us so much, worry about yourself. While we may enjoy reading about what those pesky chickens are doing now we are more concerned about you getting well. HAHAHA. GOOD one. You take care of yourself, Doug (one can only go so long without a daily cluck).", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB508PK": "Through symbolism, he was showing the differences between God's Torah and the laws of the Pharisees. People who drink the 'water' of the Pharisees will always thirst, since that 'water' can never satisfy. But people who drink of the waters of God's Torah would be satisfied and never thirst.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26W0ZB": "HubPages HubPages is a user generated content, revenue-sharing website. According to Quantcast, HubPages has become one of the 50 most-visited U.S. sites on the Internet. HubPages is a site that hosts internet content created by its members. However, as stated in HubPages Terms of Use, 'You may not remove your Author Content from the Service.' In 2013, Simone Smith (former HubPages' Director of Marketing) stated, 'We won't be sending 1099 forms.' Marina Lazarevic, HubPages' Product Manager, confirmed her statement adding: 'That's correct. The site reportedly consisted of 1.5 million 'hand-built lenses' . On August 15, 2014, Seth Godin announced that HubPages had acquired Squidoo. On August 15, 2014, Godin announced that Squidoo was acquired by HubPages, and stated that the aim is to relocate some of Squidoo's content to its new home at HubPages by October 1, 2014. Don't know where you're located but try http://www.cdw.com/shop/hubs/default.aspx?hubpage/hardware otebooks.html", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5TOM7": "Angels are territorial, and the inch per gallon ryleDOES NOT WORK for fish like these - this inch per gallon stuff is ignorant fish keeping, while smart people use research and common sense instead. At best you can fit one mated pair, If you try to do 6 of them I promise you only one or two will survive to adulthood anyway.", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW891GR": "You could catch STD's or HIV...If the man is a carrier. Meaning, he may not show signs of being affected, but he can pass them onto you. Iwould go to Planned Parenthood and ask for a test..and then they will educate you on many STD's (sexually transmitted diseases) and HIV precautions. Oral sex is a common way to get many diseases. I would seriously.. think about who you are kissing and where they have been. Life is too short. I have provided some sites for you for education purposes. http://www.cdc.gov/STD/ and http://www.plannedparenthood.org/ Good Luck! Remember to always wear a condom to prevent STD's. You should always wear them if you do not want to get pregnant. You are in charge of your own body... so, make sure you get a pap smear yearly, and get tested for STD's and HIV. If you have been exposed to bodily fluids... (sperm) than you could also become infected with HIV or contract a STD. Treat your body with respect!  ", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO77XEW": "!Writing could be defined as jotting down info relevant/irrelevant to whatever topic we have in mind. Like writing a new song, and we write more to keep it as a sort of habit. Imagine for favorite band. If they would have stopped writing, they would have never gained recognition. There are different reasons people write. Some write to get better at it, some write to get a message across, some write for pleasure, and others write because its an outlet. It would drive them nuts not too. It contributes in many ways. Your reading what I'm writing. hah If it helps you out. awesome! Try looking for more answers I left a couple of websites", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA5JFA": "Language, Proof, and Logic: 2ND Edition: Language Proof and Logic is available as a physical book with the sof... http://t.co/E9f0mk9iER", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6HFW4": "he does, all boys do, just ask there are no signs unless you see his jacking off", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDZJWC": "Hi! Worry not - these are all symptoms of premenstrual syndrome - but that does not make them normal as others have said. It is not normal to suffer symptoms just because you are a woman having periods! Something is out of balance amp this can be successfully treated - drug free - by a number of therapies. I am a regisitered Homoeopath amp treat lots of this very successfully. Many women decide to take the oral contraceptive pill but I do not believe this is the answer - to take a foreign substance every day of your life amp interfere with your bodys normal functioning - madness!! Contact The Society of Homeopaths to find a practitioner in your area who will be able to help you. Best wishes", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI2DW22": "Well, becoming a photographer, having an art background makes it much easier and the understanding more professional. Photography isn't all just about taking beautiful pictures it is Art a learned and talent that is require to best communicate visually. Ever wonder why the top photographers are well known, they don't just point and shoot it's all the reading the many tiresome conferences and tons of money spent for display and shows, it is a full time job. Also having a Portfolio of your work organized and what types of profession you've worked on or what for, it's also like any business and profession that requires the best in image, looks, and quality. Also know the technicals of using a camera and it's modes also programs in touch ups, and the basics of art. If anyone says you don't need to know much and need clients and a camera they obviously are wasting money on less percious portraits. It's about knowing the camera and composition. If you do want to become one, there are classes", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH0749Q1": "I had two miscarriages a little over a year ago, and they all started off with some brown spotting/discharge. I finally got pregnant again after a year of trying only to find brown discharge and spotting again, So I obviously went into panic mode! I am now 15 weeks pregnanct and its going perfectly so far ( knock on wood )   The brown your seeing could definatly be some implantation spotting ( what at had with this current pregnancy ) and it can be very normal around the 4-5 week mark as the baby is now latching on to your uterine wall. I bled again around ten weeks, again freaked out only to find out that it was a small bleed from my irritated cervix after an internal ultrasound! So if you've recently had a transvag. U/S that can be very normal as well! If you notice yours gets heavier, brighter in colour over night and your going through a pad, go to the hospital, as in some cases ( my first two ) the spotting was the first signs of the miscarriages starting. The last thing", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZFTDD": "Get happy with yourself, perhaps you'll find someone you can be happy with. the motivation will magical arrive... I just try to remember that no one can be perfect and I want to enjoy life.", "3RWSQDNYL9KOQORIJGT0DH4EW3PFF4": "Don't be embarrassed - it just means you are a woman now. I wonder if your cycle is just off - and is not consistent yet. Eleven days is a long time, tell her to take a test.", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9E32Y": "Get Rid of Love Handles Love handles are fat deposits. Getting rid of love handles is just a matter of reducing your total body fat. Here are some other pieces of advice about how to get rid of love handles:  I have found that using a cross trainer, also knows as an elliptical trainer, shifts mine. It really works because you have to do lots of twisting from the waist. The only way to get rid of love handles is to go on a diet combined with cardiovascular exercise. I still deal with the annoying problem of unattractive love handles. I tried exercising and came out with a toned stomach region/6-pack from. I was determined to get rid of love handles. Think about it: we are talking love handles here. For me to get rid of love handles I do not have to diet. The rest is all exercise! Over the summer, I trained for swimming so much that my love handles disappeared and in addition, I got that toned curve that happens when they disappear. I think I achieved love handles through years of abusive drinki", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFMTWN": "Lizzie  Your new cat is probably a different breed of cat.You should give her some time to grow and if she is still small then it is probably just her breed.Good luck!", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VEQ17": "Pain down one or both legs 3. Numbness or tingling of your legs or feet 4. Weakness in one or both legs or feet Your symptoms may include some or all of the above problems.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZL2F8": "Pl show some footage Beni Prasad Verma.", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFS4BR": "nono like lack-of-water and I-just-burned-off-the-little-food-I-ate-now-I'm-starving cramps", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDNOT6": "How to maintain normal blood sugar levels and Tips to maintain normal blood sugar levels http://t.co/LeC48sA9rF", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMYDLZ": "It has been establish that FSH secretion is controlled by Inhibin B and thus , Inhibin B measurement is a more direct way of assessing follicular functions rather than FSH alone . Whereas FSH is a response to ovarian function , Inhibin B is expressed as an ovarian function of the granulosa cells of the ovary . Normal Inhibin B is AMH is a protein hormone structurally related to inhibin . It too is expressed by the granulosa cells of the follicle in the reproductive age and controls the formation of primary follicles by inhibiting excessive follicular recruitment by FSH .", "3VI0PC2ZAYIZWNVWIDIC6IDZS9CXOZ": "People will tell you to load up on carbs, and you need to eat a healthy amount of them as well (they will give you energry),a nd they will make you gain weight, but overloading will not make you gain 'healthy' weight. Gaining weight muscle is a two step process: you have to eat more and lift weights or engage in some sort of strength training routine. The most important rule to remember if you want to gain weight is to eat more calories than you burn. If you want to put on weight, you should work out, to insure that you put on muscle and not fat. Healthy weight gain, just like healthy weight loss, takes time and requires a conscious effort to apply good habits. If you want to put on weight, you should work out, to insure that you put on muscle and not fat. Healthy weight gain, just like healthy weight loss, takes time and requires a conscious effort to apply good habits.", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PIHJ6": "Jul 30, 2013 ... More about nutrition than most MDs learn in med school. ..... Been feeling over trained so Ive been using carbs to promote a food coma ... Sorry Tim but in the a... Jan 31, 2014 ... Two years ago, at a small cabin in the San Juan Islands, I put a ... Dieters do lose weight while they are restricting their food intake. ... People who regain we... Because winning has become so important to us as a culture, because being ... put my kids down in the process of coaching, but I only do it strategically to get them ... Then the... I was at a family birthday party, we were all eating together at this long ..... Fat I hurts. this girl at my school says you need to lose weight cause you have a... ... ( 6623 but 6346 will 5916 they 5877 were 5624 their 5604 been ... 2972 out 2952 But 2936 In 2927 so 2887 ... 2162 now 2153 then 2149 very 2120 work 2060 ...", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618XSHZ": "At your age you need not worry so much about your weight. Just eat right and make sure you get exercise of some sort every day. When I was 12, I was 5' 3'' and I weighed 110lbs.", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNNYTS": "One type of muscle twitch is benign essential blepharospasm. Blepharospasm refers to the muscles of one or both eyelids twitching uncontrollably. This often occurs repeatedly over a sustained period of time. In extreme cases, which are rare, benign essential blepharospasm may also involve the eyebrows, mouth, and neck. While an eyelid twitch may mimic an eye-blinking tic, it is different because it cannot be controlled. It also occurs most often in adults, rather than in children. Your doctor may be able to determine whether you or your child is experiencing tics or an eyelid twitch based upon the symptoms. Experts believe that the eyelid twitching of blepharospasm is caused by the misfiring of certain cells in one area of the brain. Eyelid twitches may be aggravated by having dry eyes. They may also be worsened by stress, lack of sleep, caffeine, and harsh light conditions. This answer should not be considered medical advice.", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE75X2": "24 hour happy hour? i'm so in", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZPVQ5": "Leopard geckos are large for a gecko. Hatchlings tend to be 6.5 to 8.4 cm (2.6 to 3.3 inches) in length and weighing about 3 grams while the adult geckos are about 20.5 to 27.5 cm (8.1 to 11 inches) in length and weight about 45 to 65 grams. Those found in the wild typically have a darker, dull, and drab coloration than those kept in captivity as pets.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDNTOB": "I think that she may suffer from some nerve problems.You can have your eyes checked by an eye doctor immediately.Good luck!", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUORW7": "When you go on an interview always dress appropriately. Look the interviewer in the eyes and mind your manners.", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H7B3VA": "Chances are that after her hormones calm down and she's healed from the surgery, she'll be pretty much back to her old self.... she IS likely to be less noisy though -- females in heat yowl and chatter more. But if she was talkative when not in heat, she'll be talkative after she heals as well.... just not at the yowling in heat level. If she starts to show any signs of infection, then I'd worry, otherwise just give her time to heal.", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA0YLO": "biscuits?cats are TRUE carnivours - they need real meat protein - unfortuanately all foods sold in grocery stores and Wal Marts are crap loaded with cheap fillers like CORN...GO TO a pet supply store and pick up 2-3 samples of good quality CAT FOOD (check for chicken meal as 1 ingredient)beef isnt terribly good for cats and they can get wormschicken, turkey, or lamb are best.. and rice is one of the few non-meat things that cats can digest fairly well how do you Make him eat?? offer better food, dry can he put in mocrowave for 10 seconds to bring out the natural oils making it smell yummier...most cats will not turn their noses up at chicken and rice canned mush (few like the chunks)are his teeth hurting him?", "3P7RGTLO6EB4AJ2O9BY5FTLS7JUKAZ": "small bumps in vagina area: I have small bumps in vagina area and it hurts when i use the http://t.co/BSkbWYK8", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE9TQN": "are you asking how to take a small photo and turn it into a large painting??? well i assume that's what your asking and you need a ruler! your going to make a grid on your photo! if your photo is 6x4  then make each square 1/2 inch so you will have 12 boxes accross and 8 boxes down! now on the large paper you need to do the same how ever the 1/2 inch will be too small so change it to 1 full inch that will double it's size maybe you want it bigger! then make it 2 inches on your painting... that will triple the size! then all you have to do is paint each square it self instead of the hole thing !", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BEA5X5": "Mother darling , give me your hand , '' the response of his classmate is :  You 're nuts . ...   For Chrisake , grow up . '' Ackley can not know that Holden assumes Allie 's red hair when he puts on the red cap , that the simulated blindness is descriptive of Holden 's state , or that he uses the script as a ( futile ) means of asking for the maternal hand that he believes has been denied to him .", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXSIQU": "Since calves are involved a lot in walking and posture, they tend to consist mainly of slowly twitch fibers, which do not tend to react to weightlifting as well as fast twitch fibers. The guys with the big calves tend to have a higher percentage of fast twitch muscle fibers. The best bet for getting bigger calves is to vary the number of reps that you do. To target the fast twitch muscle fibers, do sets of 6-8 reps. To target the slow twitch, try setswith higher reps, sets of 15-20 reps and also very high reps like 50 with lower reps. Also, since there are two muscles that make up the calves, the gastroc and the soleus, you need to do exercises that target both muscles. I don't know what I would I lvoe more, me finally an exercise that actually makes have big calves, or a guy with calves. I love a guy wearing shorts with big calves even if they are fat, calves rock. I'm not that big as it is, but when I started running and working out my calves actually got bigger.", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXNR5T": "All children will line up toys at some stage. The difference is that non-autistic children will usually line them up for a reason (they might line up cars for a pretend car race or line up dolls as an audience for a concert etc) and autistic children usually line up toys (and other things) to create a sense of order which helps to relieve anxiety. A non autistic child usually lines up things as part of play but for an autistic child it usually replaces play. However lining up toys is only one red flag for autism and there is no way that a diagnosis could be made on this alone. Many people (children and adults) display one or more autistic feature with out actually having autism. Also, a person can have autism without having every feature of it (my daughter has high functioning autism and has never lined up toys in autistic way). A number of specific criteria must be met to get an autism diagnosis.", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605MDHP": "Rats can breed as early as 5 weeks of age. For the health of the rat though, it is best to wait until they are at least 7 months of age before breeding.", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RF2I1": "Just asked my mom if women grow chest hair when they get older and she said 'not really' so we are all OK.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZMF2M": "FreeCoupon Lose Weight: Lose 40-100 lbs of fat. Lose Weight For Good! : Lose weight, and... http://t.co/Pq6EAROAud UdemyCoupon course", "3UV0D2KX1MHES8UTZZXHMD7N7DIF4I": "Hello to you too! Congratulation on your lifestyle change. I always suspect them to want me to think that I need more calories that I really need, so in case I would want to lose weight, I would not be able to, then I would run back to them for help! I use a simple formula that works for me. I can spend two months losing fat reserves with aerobics and gaining muscle mass with weight training, not losing anything on the scale but getting much thinner and stronger. I can also stop exercising and know exactly where Ill end up, and how much body fat percentage I will gain. Then for every 3,500 calories of exercising, I will lose one pound of fat reserves. I lose one pound of fat reserves for every 3,500 calories of exercising and the slower. I dont think I would have the stomach for it! So my advice for you if just eat at least 1,380 calories (not 1,480 or 2,002!) and adjust that number as you lose weight. You could be 150lbs, after losing 30 pounds in 7 months (one pound/week), with a BMR", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNT1VC": "The men in their lives , whether their fathers or their husbands , had complete control over all constitutional matters of their lives . Women were definitely not free  ??free? meant to them  Renaissance scholars  enjoying the rights and privileges of a citizen and possessing an educated capacity for reason , neither of which was possible for women? ( Wiesner 1 ) . While married women had few rights within society , ?single women , whether widowed or unmarried , could , if they were of full age , inherit and administer land , make a will , sign a contract , possess property , sue and be sued , without a male guardian or proxy .", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606TN7G": "We just got done weaning our second litter of pups within a single year. I can tell you that she will get all the important stuff right on her own, for the most part. The only thing you really need to watch is her time with the pups. For the first couple of weeks, they are not able to generate their own body heat, so they need to be able to lay with her in a little cluster. The mother should only be away from them long enough to eat, drink and go outside. After the first couple of weeks the mother can start to have a little more time out of the puppies area, and can gradually less the amount of time that she spends with her pups, until they are weaned. Remember that the mother is going to need plenty of food and water available, especially after nursing.", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHSTZF": "Well, the past actually happened but history is only what someone wrote down. So no real answer...", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA9005NL": "I sometimes get extremely itchy on my arms and legs (as if there were bugs crawling on and biting me), and it actually has turned out to be tactile hallucinations. Go to a doctor because there are a million different things that could be causing itchy skin. An uncomfortable sensation in the skin that feels as if something is crawling on the skin or in the skin, and makes the person want to scratch the affected area.", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T752UGF": "My asian bro, I have talked to alot of white and black Americans and they swear by milk. Drink alot of it. I didn't drink alot of it when I was younger. I think would have been taller if I did.", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGJY9R": "Their is a tribal communtiy in Siberia of less than a few thousand.It is said that of this community 1 in 200 is a descendant of Genghis Khan.This would equate to - far less dramatically - about 15 people.", "3V8JSVE8YYO2K18HTV1IKKQUQD0EYI": "I am no doctor but I have pulled the muscles in my arm before. You just have to try not to use it often and let it rest.", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSVH4I": "You could join a critique group, and get hints on how to write better -- and you can help others write better too. Also, check out the Jennifer Crusie website, where she talks about using collages to help her write her stories. Here's her essay on it: http://www.jennycrusie.com/essays/picturethis.php 1st what kind of essays are you looking for?I could help you with your problem(I have alot of time on my hands and write alot)so contact me And I will try to help by working with you to write your essays. When you write a story or essay, you will combine many sentences into one paragraph before you move in to another alinea. Hey, once a month is not bad. Just be sure you finish it. She was an art teacher, and it's amazing the way she combines art and her books. I will try to describe it. Paragraph consist of more than one sentences. In a story, you will have many paragraphs which is combined into one.", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H77V3Y": "Process until smooth and creamy, scraping down the sides of bowl as necessary. Top with remaining 2 slices bread, peanut butter mixture side down. Brush the rolls with melted butter. Peanut butter was first paired with a diverse set of foods such as pimento, nasturtium, cheese, celery, watercress, and on toasted crackers. A peanut butter and jelly sandwich made from white bread, with two tablespoons each of peanut butter and grape jelly, provides 27 of a person's Recommended Daily Intake of fat and 22 of their calories. But there they were at Peanut Butter and Company, a new restaurant in the West Village that serves, with rare exception, peanut butter sandwiches  creative, innovative peanut butter sandwiches, but peanut butter sandwiches nonetheless. The truly intrepid can try a heart stopper aptly labeled Death by Peanut Butter,'' which includes peanut butter Cap'n Crunch, three scoops of ice cream, freshly ground peanut butter, peanut butter Reese's Pieces and peanut butter ...", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLHCGEO": "Redirect click here", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZELFI": "Take good care of your cat!", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6VX08": "Sep 15, 2003 ... On 9 May 1972, Operation Pocket Money, the mining campaign ... directed against the outer approaches to Haiphong Harbor. ..... a date, like that of the attack on Pearl Harbor, that will 'live in infamy,' had changed the country. She almost didn't get to go, as did they. The family that was scheduled to go wasn't there, so they got the spot. The girl was adopted and as they were short on room, she was the last one from the family onboard the chopper. April 15, 1972 - Hanoi and Haiphong harbor are bombed by the U.S. ... Linebacker I commences with U.S. jets laying mines in Haiphong harbor. ... Richard M. Nixon wins the presidential election in the biggest landslide to date in U.S. history. Overall some three-quarters of a million Northern people were evacuated by the US Navy and what remained of the French Air Force transports (under hire, indirectly, by the U.S.) Some 85 were Catholics, long at odds with the communists.", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW76EZB": "Some leaders act by amplifying survival anxiety instead of dampening learning anxiety.", "3SV8KD29L4Q5BRAWL3E4WMC1G43ZKH": "LOU IS A MEAN CAT . SHE WILL PROBABLY BITE AND SCRATCH YOU . SHE WILL PEE ON YOUR CARPET . SHE WILL NOT GO OUT OF HOUSE .", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK17ZH": "Random visit to 4chan... and im scarred for life, googled the word 'scarred' so i dont fuck this tweet up, and an image pops up and scars me", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VIQ1B": "2, Jai Taurima, Oceania, 8.32 (27 feet, 3 3/4 inches). 3, Hassin Mersal, Africa, 8.32 (27 feet, 3 3/4 inches). 4, Kiril Sosunov, Europe, 8.08 (26 feet, 6 1/4 inches).", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3REUMN": "why?because they know that you don,t know! -want to know more,don,t just ask but try to learn and understand it! p/s:that why she don,t care about her husband type!", "3XWUWJ18TLO2SOLY9UJYLH6KGDJUUH": "Divine Intervention 22 years ago someone I loved dearly exited my life. Despite the grief I went on with my life and now 22 years later I feel as if God is tugging on ... Receive prayers from thousands of fellow Christians. Submit your prayer requests for other Christians to pray for. Understanding and preparing for an MRI scan that uses contrast material", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0DIXP": "This assumes Hiedler was willing to marry Maria in this situation , and Adolf Hitler biographer thinks this is too contrived and unlikely to be true . Alois ' son Adolf Hitler , following the rumours that his paternal grandfather was a Jew , in 1931 ordered the SS ( ) to investigate the alleged rumours regarding his ancestry  they found no evidence of any Jewish ancestors .", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ08A4": "At 5'7, your healthy weight is between 120lbs and 155lbs. It's okay to weigh a little less if you're a teenager gaining weight and growing but not there yet! It's also okay to weight more if you have a lot of muscle mass, since muscle mass weigh 3 times more than fat reserves (that is why athletes are soooo heavy, it's all muscle). Edit: Boys, even if they are thinner, weigh more than girls because they are taller and have more muscles, which weigh 3 times more than fat reserves. Opinion 2: You are 5'3' tall so you should be between 45 kgs to 55 kgs to be a healthy girls. There is a method by which we can know that he person is healthy or not which is called BMI (Body Massed Index). You can get your BMI from this site: http://caloriecount.about.com/cc/bmi.php If your BMI is: Below 18.5 You are Underweight 18.5 -24.9 You are Normal 25 - 29.9 You are Overweight 30  Above You are Obese", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F03VW6": "It's an exercise for the correct pronunciation of those particular vowel sounds, not an observed truth about weather.The phrase comes from My Fair Lady, which is based on George Bernard Shaw's play Pygmalion, and the premise of the play is that Professor Henry Higgins can take the roughest of London women and teach her to speak and act like a proper lady. (It's predicated on the British class system, where your accent and usages are/were supposed to define your place in society - it's nothing like as strong as that in the USA, where accents are regional but don't indicate class). The young woman they choose - a flower-seller - has a strong Cockney accent and so she is given various exercises to make her talk proper. 'In Hampstead, Hereford, and Hertfordshire Hurricanes Hardly ever Happen,' is the exercise for not dropping one's aitches ... and so on.", "37SQU136V7M6AU325IZUZDWQUJN11O": "I had such a twitch when I was young, where I would do it to respond to a feeling that was almost an itch but not quite, a discomfort around my eyes. I had to see an optometrist about it and use this eye wash solution until it went away. Cheese depends how they lost their eye. Cheese If the eyelid is still intact, then the muscles operating it will still be likely to function, they would wink. Cheese If it was some hideous accident they lost the entire eye area then they would wink. Blink speed can be affected by elements such as fatigue, eye injury, medication, ... When an animal (usually human) chooses to blink only one eye as a signal to?... With voluntary blinks, one eyelid consistently began to close earlier and made a ... The most evident motor asymmetry is handedness, with people typically ... 29 ? 10) years of a...", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONXHZT": "The following is a possibilty....Chancroid is an infection that initially is seen in a sexually exposed area of the skin. The infection typically appears on the penis but also occasionally occurs in the anal or mouth area. Chancroid starts out as a tender bump that emerges 3 to 10 days (the incubation period) after the sexual exposure. The bump then erupts into an ulcer (an open sore), which is usually painful. OK, here is the definition of an STD called herpes genitalis: clusters of painful vesicles (blisters) on the penis, scrotum, or anal areas. It is contagious to others during the time periods there are bumps. A boil (furuncle) is a red, swollen, painful bump under the skin caused by an infected hair follicle. Bacteria from the infection forms a pocket of pus (abscess), which can become large and cause severe pain. Depending on their size and location, many boils can be treated at home with warm compresses and by keeping the skin over the boil clean when it opens and drains.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMERE7H": "ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM SO WHEN YOU WANT TO REFER TO THOSE MANIACS WHO CLAIM THAT THEY ARE MUSLIMS SAY EXTREMISTS BUT DONT SAY ISLAMIC OR MUSLIMS ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM UNDERSTOOD???? ONE MORE TIME ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM ISLAM ISNT TERRORISM There are either metal retainers or a rubber retainer holding the screen in. If you have metal retainers pry them off carefully as to not bend them too much. place screening material in opening and start replacing retainers, do one side, then pull screen tight and do other side until all 4 retainers are back on, then trim excess screen with razor.", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSDD9Y": "Alright dude usually I don't like to map out a diet for anyone because everyone is different. Macros-Protein/Carbohydrates/Fats/Calo. Morning: 9:00AM 6 egg whites 2 yolks 2 turkey sausage patties 2 slices of whole wheat bread or 1/2 cup of whole oats Macros-48.5g/25g/16.8g/630cal Snack:12:00PM 1 packet(2.6oz) Tuna 1 banana Macros-19g/28g/0.5g/185cal Lunch:2:30PM 1 cup spinach 1/2 cup surimi fish 1/4 cup feta cheese Macros-13.33g/12.5/8/176 OR 1 cup green beans 8 oz chicken breast Macros-46.36g/4g/8g/225cal Snack:5:30PM 20oz Gladiator Protein shake Macros-45g/2g/0g/185cal Dinner:7:00PM 8oz of chicken/fish/lean beef 1 cup of brown rice Macros-44g-55g/45g/2-6g/334cal Preworkout Meal:10:15PM 1 fuji Apple. I been getting help from bodybuilding forums and stuff and these guys have got it down to a science. They got alot of stuff on there that can help you out. I started to read their diet plans and they really helped me get on the right track for a clean diet and workout training.", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ1MGH": "Cycling shorts Cycling shorts (also known as bike shorts, bicycling shorts, chamois, or knicks) are short, skin-tight legwear designed to improve comfort and efficiency while cycling. They: Historically, cycling shorts were made of knit black wool, which hides oil and grease stains, with a chamois leather padding inside the shorts in the crotch area, which reduces chafing from the bicycle saddle. Modern cycling shorts are often made of spandex (Lycra) with a synthetic chamois which acts as an elastic interface between the cyclist's body and the saddle, and are produced in a variety of shapes and styles to suit the needs of different riders.On some cycling shorts different materials are often placed on different parts of the shorts to take advantage of each materials benefit providing a very efficicent cycling short.", "3XU9MCX6VOA1SKKFMGENANO8QNY2R5": "actually pretty accurate. big sunglasses check", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD5AS4": "there's no way to get rid of fat from specific areas like your belly. people may suggest crunches, but that will only increase your muscle strength in your core. That is a good thing! Core strength will improve your posture which may make you appear leaner. But general healthy exercise is the key, paired with a good diet. Eat lots of fruit, veges, and don't cut out carbs. You need them for energy. Maybe go for beach jogs, walk the dog every day or go for walks of an afternoon. Opinion 2: an excellent exercise, you can do it in front of your TV: sit on a stool, and put your toes under something (piece of heavy furniture, for example). In your hands hold a little dumbbell. Please, make sure that it is not very heavy, start with one kilo, for example, or you will damage your back and spine! Slowly move the upper part of your body back, until it's parallel with the ground. Stop for a second and move it back to the sitting position. Repeat ten times. Every week add to the number of repeti", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUBSON": "In a stable ecosystem (like a rain forest), there will usually be fewer predators/meat eaters than prey/plant eaters, because the higher up you are on the food chain, the fewer of you there will be. If there were fewer prey animals than predators, they would all be eaten quickly, and the predators would starve and the ecosystem would break down. But if there are more prey animals than predators, the prey animals will live long enough to reproduce and keep the population stable, the predators will still have food and the ecosystem will stabilize.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PUDE9": "I loved the whole aspect of twin Vikings , I mean who would n't right ? It takes place back in 900 A.D. , and it was definitely a witty yet sensual written story . In this story each chapter each trades off to each twins love story , which is neat yet can be a bit frustrating when the chapter leaves you hanging .", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKW9G7": "Good luck!Baby Beatnik  I have been suffering from premature ejaculation for most of my life, but I found the most amazing invention to tackle this issue and since then I never looked back, and it is so simple. ( http://prematurejaculation.kyma.info ) There are quite a few options to tackle this issue.", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VRBS1": "Send the dental office  the collection agency proof that you paid the invoice in full such as a copy of the cancelled check or paid in full receipt. Dental hygienists may be paid on an hourly, daily, salary, or commission basis. According to the American Dental Association (ADA), almost all full-time dental hygienists employed by private practitioners received paid vacation. The ADA also found that 9 out of 10 full-time and part-time dental hygienists received dental coverage. Dental hygienists who work for school systems, public health agencies, the Federal Government, or State agencies usually have substantial benefits. If the pain continues you might want to get a second opinion from another Dentist. There is an option for those without dental insurance like yourself. Dental Discount Plans have Dentists in most locations that will provide all types of dental procedures at a lower discounted rate. In some ares you can save on average 50 on restorative dental work.", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2PHAR": "your 11 year old should get exactly 8 hours of sleep. my kid is 10, and she goes to .... I am 13 and I have been choosing what time I go to bed for a while now, and it ... card yet, and I have been feeling more excited to go to school every day. Hi, I have a 13 year old daughter and she is in bed before 8:30 every night ... My almost 4 year old goes to school 5 days a week and takes a nap there everyday. .... i see the time that they should go to bed, but what time based on that do you?... In fact, I happen to have a 13 year old girl who follows this schedule. ... I don't recommend this or any sleep aid permanently, just for a short time ... guest teacher, Mrs. Roy, was stupid and had me go to bed that late every d... May 23, 2011 ... In one column, record lights-out time during the school week and on weekends ... According to the National Sleep Foundation, newborns should ... 14 hours for toddlers ages 1 to 3 11 to 13 hours for preschoolers 3 to 5 and (yes!)", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8NBWG": "The hardest thing for my husband and I was the birth of our twins. Our twins were born early at 32 weeks. Our little boy was stillborn and our little girl had to really fight for her life. We had such a wave of emotions. We were trying to grieve for our little boy, but still be strong for our daughter because she needed us as she fought for her life. We came so close to losing her so many times. It was/is such a hard thing dealing with the bitter/sweet of emotions. We grieve for our son, but celebrate our daughter all on the same day. We have made it through it all by being there for eachother, and just being understanding of eathother. Realizing that we each handle things differently. AND by just loving eachother. The lesson that we learned? That our love can survive anything. That at the end of the day, I know that I can turn to my husband and he will be there for me. I feel he knows the same.", "3QREJ3J433VL62TS62NVO7131VUKLI": "It depends. If you gets a lot of strikes about 15 minutes. If you have to always throw a second ball for spares about 25 minutes. If one or both of you are there socializing longer.", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVHFIV": "' You can taste what you eat by smelling because the sense of smell is very closely related to the sense of taste.'", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DEUC9": "Normally, a spine when viewed from rear should appear straight but if the spine is lateral or curved or sidewa... http://t.co/PErW3pp73K", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZT1PS": "That's terrible! Sounds like he's being a bit of a jerk at the moment, which is sort of understandable I guess. Just keep trying", "3T5ZXGO9DEMRMU8RY8Y1S8OAFASZQ6": "These links will help you:http://people.yahoo.com/http://www.freeprf.com/http://www.reunitetonight.com/index-brow...http://family.public-records.com/..........http://www.192.com/http://in.members.yahoo.com/http://www.b4usearch.com/http://www.peoplefinders.com/http://www.zabasearch.com/http://www.emailaddresses.com/http://in.members.yahoo.com osuchtc.htm...http://spaces.live.com/http://www.anywho.com/http://www.addresses.com/(White and yellow pages)http://www.theultimates.com/white/.........(this is the ultimate white pages)http://find.intelious.com/http://classmates.com/(This is brilliant for finding old school friends).http://in.members.yahoo.com/regional/cou...", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFNB4T": "the thing is some people want braces because they're unhappy with their teeth. be greatful you got them bruh.", "3RWSQDNYL9KOQORIJGT0DH4EW3RFF6": "may be bleaching is the answer", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSN0NT": "' At least that's my guess.The EngUsh have about three times as many men as we, and can, draw Hnes all around us.If they once coop us up here, 'twill be starvation and surrender, and what becomes of the United States, then, my boy?", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLED3O7": "everyone is beautiful in there own ways, dont change for nobody! just live your life, the way god created you(", "3RZS0FBRWK8TEPW26HZ4H5XF1WMCPV": "You have margrains, these are intense headaches that seem to last for hours. The typical migraine headache is one-sided and pulsating, lasting 4 to 72 hours1. Specific anti-migraine drugs can be used to treat migraine. Headache with the features of 'migraine without aura' usually follows the aura symptoms. Less commonly, the aura may occur without a. A non-familial form exists as well, 'sporadic hemiplegic migraine' (SHM). It is often difficult to make the diagnosis between basilar-type migraine and hemiplegic migraine. edit Acephalgic migraine Acephalgic migraine is a neurological syndrome. Acephalgic migraine is also referred to as amigrainous migraine, ocular migraine, or optical migraine. The prevention and treatment of acephalgic migraine is broadly the same as for classical migraine. Visual snow might be a form of acephalgic migraine. edit Menstrual migraine Menstrual migraine is distinct from other migraines. PMM is similar in every respect but only occurs around the time of", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV305V0": "Hi Dwayne,  Hounds and Jackals is the ancient game of the Pharaohs. You will be able to find the rules at the weblink below. I hope this helps you. Stop by and see us at the Game Closet Network too. http://www.donsgamecloset.com/GameCloset...  Don", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G276O": "Plot point 'For the role-playing games concept see Plot point (role-playing games)' In television and film, a plot point is a significant event within a plot that spins the action around in another direction. Noted screenwriting teacher Syd Field in his 'paradigm' proposes that a well-structured movie has two plot points within a three-act structure. The first plot point occurs 20 to 30 minutes into the film (assuming a standard 120-minute running time), and the second one occurs 80 to 90 minutes into the film.", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV3Z5VZ": "Long lasting- acts on the person over an extended period of time. Extended release- acts on the person over a shorter period of time, but may take a short period of time for it to have an effect. Controlled release- acts on the person when the person requires the effects of the drug, such a drug is hard to manufacture. VOTE FOR BIG LINH HE NEEDS POINTS :P NEW DELHI, February 2 (Xinhua) -- India and Sri Lanka agreed on Wednesday to bring into effect a free trade pact between the two countries in March this year, said an official release by the Indian Ministry of Commerce. If the free trade agreement takes effect, New Delhi needs to exempt 1,351 items from duty while Colombo will provide duty free access to 320 items, said sources with the Ministry of Commerce. On the other hand, Sri Lanka will extend a 50 percent duty rebate on 889 items and the duty will also be phased out in three years.", "3GMLHYZ0LEVJ9X53JVGNO2CXC1TUYE": "Anxiety attack. Anxiety cause pain in the chest and tachycardia (fast heartrate) I know from personal experience. But hun chest pain is nothing to fool around with please go see you doctor and if your pulse is well over 100 they will do an EKG on you to watch and see how regular or irregular it is. But please get it checked out. I am almost 100 percent notice I said almost not completly.", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88HZFA": "Why would you wan na do that? Other than surgery, there is no way to actually make them smaller. you can not make your bones smaller.", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9ENLHC": "it works just like google answers.earch engine is a great way to find information online. But sometimes even experienced users need help finding exactly the answer they want to a question. Google Answers is a way to get that help from Researchers with expertise in online searching. When you post a question to Google Answers, you specify how much you're willing to pay for an answer. A Researcher will search for the information you want. When they find it, they will post it to Google Answers, and you will be notified via email. You will only be charged for your question if and when an answer is posted to it. Your question will also be publicly viewable on the Google Answers website so other registered users can add their insights and share the benefit of the research. Users who provide comments will not be paid for their posts, but they may add interesting perspectives to the data gathered by the Researcher. Your identity and personal information will not be revealed to either the Researcher or th", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WVRX1": "A COCKROACH is afraid of RAT, RAT of CAT, CAT of DOG, DOG of MAN, MAN of GIRLFRIEND  again GIRLFRIEND is afraid of COCKROACH", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA9FJA": "To avoid stains you should put on panty liners in your panties while you wear tampons then once it gets full you can change them like you would a regular pad. You should never wear tampons when you are sleeping. You could forget you have it on in the morning or you could have more of a leakage while you're sleep with it on. Always wear pads while you are sleeping. It shouldn't be that bad when you go on your vacation just as long as you take control of your period and make sure that you are doing the right stuff and using the right stuff. Try the source below", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE13IP0": "'All good gifts around us Are sent from heaven above, Then thank the Lord, O thank the Lord...'", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH7YWK": "Life is awesome I'm depressed I'm happy I'm depressed I have so much to look forward to! I'm depressed I have fun I'm depressed I'm depresse", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2ANACE": "While in case of certain medical conditions , Protein powder is big business . If youve been to a health food store lately , youve probably been overwhelmed by the selection of protein powders available . Im not just talking flavors , but different types of protein . Because we use protein powder as a meal replacement , its important to know what were really getting .", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TA8Y2Y": "Macular edema is treated with laser surgery. This procedure is called focal laser treatment. Your doctor places up to several hundred small laser burns in the areas of retinal leakage surrounding the macula. These burns slow the leakage of fluid and reduce the amount of fluid in the retina. The surgery is usually completed in one session. Further treatment may be needed. A patient may need focal laser surgery more than once to control the leaking fluid. If you have macular edema in both eyes and require laser surgery, generally only one eye will be treated at a time, usually several weeks apart. Focal laser treatment helps stabilizes vision. In fact, focal laser treatment reduces the risk of vision loss by 50. In a small number of cases, if vision is lost, it can be improved.", "3ZVPAMTJWN1R7ESMLVZCCRI9063GR2": "Lymph node swelling means infection. Have you recently been sick? Because if you have, the swelling takes a LONG time to go down. If you haven't had an infection, you might be about to get sick, or your body is fighting something. Infections like UTI, yeast, strep throat. etc Cause them to swell. If you're really worried, then see a doctor.", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LAVXBX": "Because excessive neediness in cats is often a sign of anxiety and insecurity, it can be upsetting for you too -- it's natural to feel distressed if Kitty cries when you are going out to work. Fortunately, understanding your pet's neediness can help you to make her happier. Separation Anxiety Separation anxiety is the term used to describe over neediness caused by anxiety over an owners absence. Amy Marder, a clinical assistant professor at Tufts University School of Veterinary Medicine, notes the common signs of separation anxiety: urinating and/or defecating outside the litter box, vomiting, vocalization, excessive grooming and poor appetite, not to mention clingy and possessive behavior. Because kitties feel comfortable with a regular routine, a change in your regular schedule can trigger separation anxiety. This could happen if your partner is away on a business trip or you change your normal working hours. Temporary Anxiety Felines can feel anxious and insecure when temporarily s", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRV0S5": "An ex-boyfriend/husband or ex-girlfriend/wife can be friends with each other after the air has settled and if things were not left on horrible terms. It took three years for my ex-boyfriend and I to talk again he cheated on me. I now talk to he and his girlfriend/fiance, who is the same girl he cheated on me with. Sex will only come back into the picture if you let it.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F02VW5": "Help ! SOS !? Help ! ?Help me pleeeeeeez ! ?If you know any nice, cool web site(photos,smol programs,some funny stuf...)! can you give an advice i am getting boooring", "37YYO3NWHDOAK0NY1CDYX5Y82D8CCI": "Their contact info is on the homepage.I think it is www.mountainhorse.se.Good luck!", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EG36F": "Weight loss is generally something people expect to be easy but then they quickly learn that it has its challenges. Weight loss doesnt happen overnight for most people. The tips around the Internet are also confusing and often misleading to those that are trying to safely lose the pounds in a fast manner. These tips are designed to be easy, straightforward, and effective. Tip 1: Losing weight is science. Its also math. You dont need to be great at either, but it helps if you understand basic 7th grade mathematics. It takes 3,500 calories to lose one pound. Most people will exercise and cut back on their food intake to slash calories. A 500 calorie deficit per day will result in 1 pound of weight loss per week. A 1,000 calorie deficit will result in 2 pounds per week, and so on. The tricky part here is that a huge deficit will not result in more weight loss. Creating a 2,000 calorie deficit each day is almost impossible and its difficult to do without starving.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52ORY6": "You can try clondroitin, which my wife gives her Rottweiller (purebreds being more than most prone to joint trouble. But in looking, I found a site that discusses this very issue you bring up. http://www. 2ndchance. info/pain. htm And if you really think what works for dogs would work for cats, http://www. com/faq-arthritis. html danielpauldavis 62 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. danielpauldavis danielpauldavis Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI65IYT": "I have been eating very healthy and jogging for a week now (two days ago i started going in the morning and the afternoon) while also doing crunches every morning (and sometimes at night) and although I can feel myself becoming more muscle than fat, I would like to speed up the process, especially around my stomach area. Is there anything else I can do to speed up losing weight there? Im not looking for a miracle or anything but anything that would help is welcome!", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK2Z7A": "Golden Retrievers are great dogs-you already know that having one right? But I've always been partial to German Shepards! They are so smart! I've had many dogs but as hard as it is I've been able to keep it down to no more than 2 at a time-and I live alone in a 3 bedroom home with big yard but I don't feel you can give enough attention to more than that. I'm sure I could handle more than 2 but I tend to dote on my dogs and just think 2 is enough(large breed) at one time. I have 2 German Shepards one 75lbs one is 130lbs and they keep me busy between entertaining them/walking them/feeding them/cleaning up after them. I've had Goldens too and they are SO loving I would say one of the most loyal dedicated dogs around! Border collies tend to need a job to be happy they want to run alot! Huskies. You know if you got alot of acrage and got the time Borders are good farm type dogs they love to work but you got to train them cause they will mess with other animals if you have them on your land.", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W3BS4D": "Is philosophy a lost art in the modern era? Philosophy can break down why a person is like the way he is and show others his thoughts and feelings. Although it isn't similar in terms of art and paintings, philosophy can show others how a person was in their generation as well as unlock secrets about the times he/she lived in. It's a way of expressing the beliefs and rituals of how a modern man and woman portray their life and how the people around them lived their lives. Philosophy is done, please give way to science Philosophy used to be a great study that reveals the unknown and answers mankind's all sort of questions. This was especially true when math, statistics, and natural science were still in their infancy. However, with thousand years of development, science becomes the ultimate efficient and sophisticated tool to do what used to be done by philosophy.", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4IE9W": "Good luck.Publicip - Mon Apr 11, 2005 12:29 pm Share Just wanted to let you know I have the exact same problem.I've had it my whole life and it's off and on.", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5SMO4": "They are usually pregnant for around 28 days, it could be more or less depending on the water levels and if they are stressed or not. She is close to giving birth once the back part of her stomach, where the gravid spot is, starts to square off. I've never seen a guppy longer than 2 inches long!", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNUYO1Z": "It's hard to predict because the players are kept quite busy. You have to go when the press says your fave players are scheduled to be there and just stand in line and wait for the opportunity. The really don't post the times you're asking for in advance. Same thing's true of the boxing hall of fame over here in Canastotota. I mentioned to a couple officials there the one time I've visited that it'd be nice if they could publish hours for autographs a couple weeks ahead, but they didn't seem too enthusiastic.", "3W9XHF7WGKT9PF1XFBPMAYBKV8HKTM": "Need to pee but effort hLP", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN594IX": "Dont delay suicidal thoughts are nothing to play with.Good luck.Reply Mary December 5, 2012 at 8:16 am Thanks for responding Maureen and Valery.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OFU0E": "My patient was a 56-pound, 5 yr old male neutered lab mix who ate half a canister of raisins sometime between 7:30 AM and 4:30 PM on Tuesday. He started with vomiting, diarrhea and shaking about 1AM on Wednesday but the owner didn't call my emergency service until 7AM. I had heard somewhere about raisins AND grapes causing acute Renal failure but hadn't seen any formal paper on the subject.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMV8D4": "weight loss look this ttp://t.co/x5Ayv4zWFL", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LASIQ": "Take good care of your pet. That's what is important", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBLQ5R": "I go to a college in Canada for dental hygiene and its a 2 year program running from September to June. Most other places are switching to a 4 year program.at least in Canada. :-RRB- yes, you can practice dental hygiene in other countries.", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ841KX1": "I think you have really thought hard about this and come to the conclusion that at this time in your life you cannot cope with being a bird owner. Thats both grown up and sensible of you. Everyone has a limit of what they can cope with amongst other things going on in their lives. Since you have thought so clearly and carefully about this, make a plan to find them the best home you can, in the same way you presented your issues with the birds. Good luck..for you and the birds.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E7TBA": "OH, it happens sometimes. BUt imagine I had it once half a year! It was horrible!! !And it is funny, what helped me is:1) paint again an old work2) do not think about results, and do not evaluate. (I say to myslef if this one is not good, I will make an other one and an other one)3) accept to have a bad day, or period. usually it is something our mind needs to digest something. and after it, we usually make a great improvment, just over night.Hope this helps, good luck", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5QOM4": "Homemade Ice Cream Blueberry Yoghurt Ice Cream Recipe Ingredients: 1/2 pint (250ml) double (heavy) cream, 1lb (450-500g carton) of natural yoghurt, 1lb (450g) blueberries (rinsed clean), 9oz (250g) caster sugar, 4 tablespoons of cassis Place the caster sugar and blueberries together in a saucepan, stir in 250ml (8fl oz) of cold water and bring to the boil. Whip the double (heavy) cream and fold it into the bowl of blended mixture along with the yoghurt and berries which were placed to one side earlier. NUTRITION INFORMATION PER SERVING: 600 calories 36 grams fat 8 grams protein 60 grams carbohydrates 370 milligrams sodium 115 milligrams cholesterol. NUTRITION INFORMATION PER SERVING: 170 calories 9 grams fat 2 grams protein 19 grams carbohydrates 10 milligrams sodium 0 milligrams cholesterol.!end! Place in a small serving bowl. Pour into ice-filled glasses. In a small bowl, dissolve lemon gelatin in boiling water. In a large bowl, stir together cake mix, oil and eggs.", "3N2YPY1GI6WLG7DCOKEYDLM08W0VES": "Only oral examination by a qualified dental surgeon can reveal the nature of your hard lump. Please do get a dental check-up and dont delay. I was diagnosed with breast cancer at 25 and had been previously undiagnosed for two years prior because the doctors said that the lump wasn't hard enough and that they could move it so it was nothing.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6L9OS": "you should take it easy and not put a strain on your arm. it's your right arm as well, probably the one that you use the most. it's just a way of your body telling you to take it easy.", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGIY9Q": "Young-adult fiction (often abbreviated as YAdult fiction, or simply YA) is fiction written for, published for, or marketed to adolescents, roughly between the ages of 12 and 18. Young-adult fiction, whether in the form of novels or short stories, has distinct attributes. Themes in YA stories often focus on the challenges of youth, so much so that the entire age category is sometimes referred to as problem novels or coming of age novel. YA novels are often as short as 16000 words.1 Writing styles of YA stories range widely, from the richness of literary style to the clarity and speed of the unobtrusive. As publishers began to focus on the emerging adolescent market, booksellers and libraries, in turn, began creating YA sections distinct from either children's literature or novels written for adults. The 1970s to the mid-1980s have been described as the golden age of young-adult fiction - when challenging novels began speaking directly to the interests of the identified adolescent market.", "3QQUBC64ZECHE2VKHYIZRTDU2Z7XNK": "Either way, there is mental anguish at the core.Talk about it.Good luck.", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFPB4V": "It 's been 2 months since our breakup and it 's been quite a challenge trying not have any contact with him . I have focused on myself and my career , go to the gym everyday..yet I wake everyday feeling like something in my life is missing .", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBLMJO": "bio-oil and silicone gel my son had a nasty accident which left him with a deep, jagged 7 inch scar. i first used silicon gel gave to me by the surgeon. this lasted a couple of months. he said two months treatment was all that was needed, that the gel would have done its job. sure enough, the scar faded much quicker than if he had not applied the gel. i beleive this because his friend was also injured, and scarred, he did not use the gel, his scar was not healing as quick. it was also smaller and less deep. after a few months my son asked if i could get some more gel,to hopefully get rid of the scar completely. this i did. silicon gel is available from any pharmacy ( just ask. i applied it for six or seven months. no difference to the scar though. maybe the surgeon was right. its done its job. i then discovered bio oil. his scar went from pink to normal skin colour and diminished in width also. i do still recommend silicon gel, but you may benefit from bio oil also.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV8L2X": "Just so you know, since you put this question in this category...you can't get pregnant from masturbation. And I need to add this. NO WHERE in the bible does it say masturbation is a sin.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KVJ4L": "yes, it is a known fact that some drugs can cuase slight shrinkage of your penis. things that will do this is    1) excessive use of caffine pills (yellow jackets)  or  2) use of steriods, methamphetamines or any other illegal substance. just stay away form things that are considerably harmful to your body and im sure you'll be alright", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JO6GT": "Some would say, an artwork's meaning is what you make of it when you look at it. Others would say it doesn't matter if the viewer finds meaning in an artwork or not, because the meaning is in the artist all along. Do you mean art from the Modern period or Contemporary art?", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL44Z8T": "It will just take time. The mask has obviously irritated it. Just keep it rinsed with plenty of cold water and leave it be. It will calm down, just don't put anything frangranced on it until it is calmer :(", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V74V4K": "I don't know :(", "3NFWQRSHVECU4ONDU0ZIV24QXIQFG4": "San Miguel de Allende is a beautiful colonial city in the state of Guanajuato. It has very nice weather, there are many water-related attractions. Below is the official city link (only in Spanish tough) http://www.sanmiguelallende.gob.mx/ Engilsh: http://portalsanmiguel.com/ http://www.visitmexico.com/wb2/Visitmexico/VisiSMAGolf", "3T2EL38U0MI2HZ8CXQAGVN8Z7ATQXZ": "Genghis Khan, Nepoleon, and Hitler were afraid of cats. That's right. Beware.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2BFEN": "You can visit the following link. I hope it will help you solve all your queries.", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF97FV": "Sounds like you you might want to take some magnesium - maybe potassium too. That might really help. NOW Foods has a pretty good magnesium pill - Reverse Ratio 2:1 - it has more magnesium than calcium. Take three of those before bed. Extra potassium you can get out of 'No-Salt' which they sell at the store - shake that on your food. These are really important minerals. Also.... something to think about is sleep apnea. It's being discovered all over the place, and it's pretty deadly. When you're asleep you're choking all night (snoring often times). And over time this will tear your heart to pieces. By morning, your heart could be in a panic for oxygen. But of course you don't think that because when you wake up, you breathe normally and think everything is OK. It's something to think about anyway because it will damage the heart pretty severely.", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0C68E": "You will never stop playing because you grow old, rather you will grow old if you stop playing. Youv got over 50 of a lifespan if you live to the average age. I think that you can grow taller because I think that my teacher said that a male stops growing taller at 21.But I saw a tv show about a person that stopped growing at teenage .A surgery which makes the leg bones break at certain places and heal back makes the person taller. The healing process takes a very long time and the chances to walk again is 50-50 I think. How to Stop Taking Desyrel (trazodone): Your doctor should be recommending that you reduce your dosage by 50-100mg a day every 3-5 days if you need to stop taking it, if not more slowly than that. Also check out this web site titled ' How To Safely Stop Taking Psychiatric  Anti-Epileptic Medications': http://www.crazymeds.org/discontinue.htm So go on, enjoy yourself. Based on the combined 8-15 hour half-lives.", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N8VSS": "Try sparknotes.com. It's a good way to supplement the material you're reading in school. I used it quite a few times to help me understand my course material in high school. Do NOT, however, attempt to use sparknotes as a replacement for reading the actual text. You don't get the details that most teachers will test you on. The site's mainly for review for tests (there's mini quizzes you can take) and to help you understand the story better. There is also a section for the themes, motifs, genre, characters, etc. Good luck and happy reading!", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNKLR8": "Tuberous breasts Tuberous breasts (or tubular breasts) are a result of a congenital abnormality of the breasts which can occur in both men and women (also see Hypoplasia), one breast or both. This condition is also known as constricted breasts, tubular breasts, snoopy breasts, herniated areolar complexes, conical breast, domen nipple, lower pole hypoplasia and hypoplastic breasts. Tuberous breasts are not simply small or underdeveloped breasts. The effect of the condition on the appearance of the breast can range from mild to severe, and typical characteristics include: enlarged, puffy areola, unusually wide spacing between the breasts, minimal breast tissue, sagging, higher than normal breast fold, and narrow base at the chest wall. The procedure to change the appearance of tuberous breasts can be more complicated than a regular breast augmentation, and some plastic surgeons have specialist training in tuberous breast correction. 2- Boys will notcie you MORE if you are a 'late-bloo...", "3X52SWXE0X3JYYT3I3DZ9Z5BUTOWC9": "Don't hold back tears. Crying among friends shouldn't make you feel bad. Only your true friends will give you a shoulder to cry on. With that being said, you don't want cry among anybody too often unless very sad occasions call for it - death, a new baby (TEARS OF JOY), You lose a whole lot of money etc One technique of crying ( letting your feelings go) is at home alone. Movies  Music make me cry sometimes. I admire actors who can cry on cue. How then actually do we cry? Thus, we cry .The largest tear gland, the lacrimal gland produces the tears of emotion and reflex. There are many culturally acceptable reasons to cry in society .The first accepted reason to cry is probably death. Women have been allowed to cry more than men traditionally, but the benefits of crying seem to suggest that men need to cry more. Each culture defines where and when it is acceptable to cry. Some cultures consider crying to be undignified and infantile, casting aspersion on those who cry publicly.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDMTOA": "I've already had this injury for like a month but thanks", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FXP5X": "By 'created a novel', did you mean you already wrote it? If so, you'll have to start all over again if you didn't put any fantastical elements in it. According to the library at ThinkQuest, fantasy is 'any story of the impossible--a tale that has events happening that could never happen in our 'real' world'. The definition needed a little tweaking, but that's a pretty good definition right there. In order to create a fantasy story, you have to have at least some idea of the typical characteristics of a fantasy (you don't have to follow them all, of course, and clever deviations are always welcome, but almost everyone needs some place to start from). It's cheating using Wikipedia, but   The identifying traits of fantasy are the inclusion of fantastic elements in a self-coherent (internally consistent) setting. Within such a structure, any location of the fantastical element is possible: it may be hidden in, or leak into the apparently real world setting, it may draw the characte", "3XDJY5RK5SJ3BQRJUOSG8D8QH0U4U3": "Weight loss increases penis length increases by about 1 inch for every 35lbs lost. And sex helps u lose weight...win win", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2QHAS": "Without agriculture, the emergence of many of the traits popularly referred to as 'civilization' would not have been possible (e.g. cities, advanced technology, social hierarchies, organized warfare, etc.). Recently, Ian Hodder, who directed the excavations at atalhyk has suggested that the earliest settled communities, and the Neolithic revolution they represent, actually preceded the development of agriculture. He has been developing the ideas first expressed by Jacques Cauvin, the excavator of the Natufian settlement at Mureybet in northern Syria. Hodder believes that the Neolithic revolution was the result of a revolutionary change in the human psychology, a 'revolution of symbols' which led to new beliefs about the world and shared community rituals embodied in corpulent female figurines and the methodical assembly of aurochs horns.", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9TV73": "Consider whether you could do dual enrollment (which is FREE in the states of FL, NJ, GA, and NC!) where you get both high school and college credit for taking (community) college courses, making college cheaper and faster.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61IKRNG": "...without getting fired, you can't say much. So here's what I would do. Go to the hardware store and buy a tube of liquid nails.", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEK2G6": "10:00 your body needs at least 7 hours of sleep so if you go to bed at 10 you'll be fully rested and ready to be up by 7. Tips to go to sleep faster: Take a bath right before bed it make syou tired. Then put on lotion to sooth your body Drink something warm If you dont like reading read (my doctor recomends this) An hour before bed dont watch t.v. Or be near light because when your around light your body thinks its morning", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6W6BC": "Whats your stats? Age? Height? Weight? Body Fat? Alright I got a BMR of approx. 1858. Im gonna assume your moderately active. 3-5 days in the gym maybe? If so then your total caloric expenditure would be 2880. Thats the approx. amount of calories that you need for maintainence. Try and base a diet around that many calories. 40 from protein, 40 from carbs, 20 fats. Now that we got that...here's a thread on everything you need to know on how to cut properly. 'The Cutting Primer By rambo anabolicreview.com Its about time we had a decent full length post on cutting Lets get a few things straight 1. All of the insights Im about to provide are not person-specific. What that means is that it is a general guideline, not a bible. 2. I truly do believe that bodybuilding is 80 diet. You can lift your  off daily, and still look horrible if you arent eating right. 3. You are what you eat. Its just that simple. The BASICS- 1.Postworkout Nutrition- Im a firm believer that PWO nutr...", "3ABAOCJ4R82RNN98JJ87K6S106AMQC": "There is no life without sport and no sport without competition.", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMKLC5": "Well lets see I hate be a racist (I'm Not BTW) How long was apartheid in affect, how long was south Africa raped of all its resources, how long did the black population suffer while others prospered. Yes Affirmative Action sucks and if Apartheid didn't suck so bad there would be no need for reparations. Think about it did you complain when apartheid was in affect, I'm sure you said it really must be terrible for those people, as went on with life reaping the benefits.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS5BC7": "Under the new health reform law, consumers will see changes to how health insurance works starting in 2010 through 2014. How it will affect you depends on many factors, including your age, whether you have pre-existing conditions and whether you have insurance or not. Here are some of the bills key provisions: Coverage for young adults: Beginning in 2010, children up to age 26 willnbsp. be allowed to remain on their parents' health plan. Those in their 20s willnbsp. have the option to buy a lower-cost quot. catastrophicquot. health plan beginning in 2014. Coverage for pre-existing medical conditions:nbsp. Starting this year (2010), people would be eligible for a new federally funded quot. high-riskquot. insurance program. Health plans would also be prohibited from excluding pre-existing conditions from coverage for children. Beginning in 2014, adults and children with a pre-existing condition would no longer be denied coverage.", "3UUSLRKAUL1EDBYGAR0Y1POCM2TD7Q": "The Treaty of Versailles imposed restriction on Germany. These restrictiond included: 1. Germany blamed, demilitarized and forced to pay reparations totaling 38 billion dollars (1917 exchange rates) or approximately 250 billion in todays currency.", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8JTLV": "Cycling shorts Cycling shorts (also known as bike shorts, bicycling shorts, chamois, or knicks) are short, skin-tight legwear designed to improve comfort and efficiency while cycling. Bib shorts are cycling shorts that are held up by a bib (integral suspenders/braces) instead of an elastic waistband. Pro and serious riders tend to prefer bib shorts over non-bib shorts, due to the discomfort that often occurs with an elastic waistband, such as tightness (digging into skin) and chafing. Baggy shorts (or 'shy shorts') are cycling shorts that look like regular shorts on the outside, but that are designed for cycling. This lining ranges from polyester fabric to full eight-panel, form-fitting cycling shorts beneath the baggier outside shorts. It would be easier to just buy new shorts. Cut the waistband in two, and add a strip of material to the waistband to make it bigger. Jockstraps for athletic purposes are most commonly worn in North America.", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRXOU0": "you should be able to pick up an early dectetion pregnancy test, this can work before your period is even due. If your not pregnant get yourself off to see a doc and get on the pill...As romantic as it all sounds to not have sex again, temptation will be in your face every time your with him, and self control can only last so long...better to be safe than sorry...hope this helps", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH04D3I": "They are one of the more well off families that recently moved into the neighborhood. One day, Brady and his friends see the red kayak owned by the DiAngelos heading into the river. Brady is uneasy because he felt that it could be dangerous to be out on the river during that time because of the tides and the wind. Brady implores his friends to join him in yelling out a warning but his friends ignore him. Later that day, Brady is asked to join a search and rescue mission to find Mrs. DiAngelo and her three-year-old son Ben. Relying on his dogs instincts, Brady finally finds Ben. He desperately tries to revive him by giving him CPR and when he rows him ashore he is relieved to hear the paramedic say that he detected a pulse. For a while Brady enjoys his role as a hero but is soon overcome with sadness and guilt when he learns that Ben is dead. Brady is surprised that his best friends J. and Digger are avoiding him after the tragedy.", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01JQLD": "Rifts! RPG Conversion Book Two: Pantheons of the Megaverse by Palladium PAL810 http://t.co/TG1EGSxRaL http://t.co/2abOlRwYvR", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NB34V": "I had my firstborn when I just turned 16years old, Im now 50 years old and myfirst born is 34 years old, his son is 14 years old and we are all growing up together. I remarried and had another son who is now 17 years old. Life is good and things will happen according to your decisions with your soulmate and according to the situation you are in. unfortunately, our height is one of the few things we are stuck with and cannot change except that fact that we shrink in older ages..", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXO0LS": "All journeys have secret destinations of which the traveler is unaware.", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811CK9K": "good luck with that MH370 'New area is based on the refined data,' The search area may be readjusted as new data is analyzed.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12GC7O": "There are no documented drug interactions between Accutane and Topamax.", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WWRX2": "Talk to them.Try to be positive around your grieving pets.They may not understand the words but will pick up on your emotions.", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWASWZ": "Poverty affects people's lives in various ways including bad health. Poor nutrition, being hungry, lack of education, unemployment, and discrimination are other ways poverty affects people.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHTXTL": "use either glass cleaner (windex etc.) or all purpose wipes they come in a cylindrical container looks like baby wipes container, can be purchased at the dollar store for 1", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLN0A8": "Well premature babies tend to catch up to their contemporaries early on so no however everyone enters puberty and grows and develops in their own time and way. Most likely if you feel you have a delay its just genetic rather than due to premature birth. You will continue to grow and develop until your late teens to early twenties.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHSXTK": "Xy has been given stats twice (Rifts World Book 4: Africa and Palladium Fantasy: Dragons and Gods) however this is only at a fraction of his former power as Thoth. Some other beings are referred to as being possible 'lesser' (rather than 'greater') Old Ones, including Vampire Intelligences (in Rifts World Book 1: Vampire Kingdoms and Nightbane World Book 4: Shadows of Light), Nxla (in Rifts World Book 12 Psyscape), and Slyth (in Old Ones 2nd Edition). Palladium Fantasy series: Rifts: Easy there! RPG is still being used on current systems such as the IBM AS/400. RPG might seem 'ancient' because you don't see any web apps being developed with it, but it's alive and well. You don't hear much about RPG and COBOL because they're used behind doors at the world's largest companies. I am in Book Heaven! See below for a couple of sites or type in e book download free into your search box. www.diesel-ebooks.com/ Planet PDF - Free PDF eBooks Home of all our free PDF eBooks.", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9REJO": "Common dental causes of toothaches include dental cavities, dental abscess, gum disease, irritation of the tooth root, cracked tooth syndrome, temporomandibular joint (TMJ) disorders, impaction, and eruption. Dental cavities  dental abscess The most common cause of a toothache is a dental cavity. Dental cavities (caries) are holes in the two outer layers of a tooth called the enamel and the dentin. Certain bacteria in the mouth convert simple sugars into acid. The acid softens and (along with saliva) dissolves the enamel and dentin, creating cavities. Small, shallow cavities may not cause pain and may be unnoticed by the patient. The larger deeper cavities can be painful and collect food debris. The inner living pulp of the affected tooth can become irritated by bacterial toxins or by foods and liquids that are cold, hot, sour, or sweet, thereby causing toothaches. Severe injury to the pulp can lead to the death of pulp tissue, resulting in tooth infection (dental abscess).", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRYBV66": "I was the same way, and my mom was not very nice to me, so I was concerned she would either say something mean or embarrass me by talking to her friends. Then my best friend started menstruating and her crazy hippie mom started talking about how beautiful it was and singing and stuff, so that freaked me out even more. My friend's mom actually threw a party for her and announced it in front of all of us, because she was crazy. Whatever you do, don't watch the Stephen King movie Carrie before you tell her. Well, now you will, but you will probably laugh and feel much better about asking your mom:)  Here's what happened to me, and I had a really crazy mean mom, so it will probably be much better for you. When I asked her if I could shave my legs, she said, 'Okay, but make sure you use alot of soap and go slow.' If you can afford shaving balm, then use it instead of soap. If you cut yourself, don't worry, it will sting and you will need a bandaid (unless it's like filling up the bathtub or so", "3NCN4N1H1GFA1ZSJC2QH2WM2JWJNB1": "Every chick our own strain . All breeders U.   S.   Approved and Pullorum clean . Trapnesting , pedigree breeding and progeny testing an 8-point Balanced Breeding Program  have made Hubbard 's chicks outstanding for vigor , vitality and productiveness . Buy direct from the breeding source .", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y8IWX": "It is 'syphilis'It was 'a one night stand'It will be 'Lots of ointment, and a painful burning sensation'", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LAUXBW": "yeah.. do you.. douche with it down there? good lord. i think i'd rather hold off the sex than have vinegar poured in my vagina. patience is virtue, my friend.", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DR16UR": "sometimes it's the food. if you use a hairball formula, it can dry out their skin.", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBJ5BT": "It sounds to me like you cycle has changed. Keep a menstrual calendar and measure the time between the first day of your current menstrual period to the first day of your next menstrual period. This time is called your menstrual cycle. It is not unusual to have a cycle that is 19 days long or 35 days long. Obviously, the shorter your cycle the more likely you are to menstruate more than once each month. It can take years for your cycle to become regular. Since some girls never have 100 certain predictability with their period it is important to know the clues your body sends. Some girls will get some cramping, some will see some skin blemishes, others may get sore or tender breasts. Most girls only know that their period has arrived if they get a damp feeling in their underwear. Good luck, Your BEINGgirl Experts", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0OMLO": "Of course.I reject the nonsensical idea that Faith is the foundational intellectual virtue. quiavideruntoculi March 12, 2013 at 20:47 Re faith as the foundational intellectual virtue, I didnt mean faith exclusively in a religious sense (though religious faith is a type of this faith).Allow me to explain.", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4WAOIS": "The cigarette. Cigarette tobacco has chemicals and additives. So, with just 5 cigarettes a month, you can still develop lung cancer, but, for the most part you will have the overall health of a non-smoker.", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF5ZEWI": "I read somewhere that only about 4 of non-natives (white or black) have any real native ancestry- though millions more often claim it. ( The 'my great-grandma was a cherokee' story is soo ridiculously common it has become a cliche. Just google it) Real native americans (enrolled tribal citizens) make up about 1 of the total US population", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC32EO8": "Well, sounds bad. Did you talk to your doctor already?", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GNYQD": "I would have to help it is in my nature.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PT81F": "expanded the colony , but caused a decline in relations with the Pennsylvania continued to expand and settle in the areas to the West until the , which forbade all settlers from settling on the western side of the The 1750 possessions of Britain ( pink ) , France ( blue ) , and Spain ( orange ) . The French would lose their North American possessions to England after the The western portions of Pennsylvania were among disputed territory between the colonial British and French during the ) . The French had established numerous fortified sites in the Pennsylvania , including because of their long trading history and opposition to the expansion of the British colonies .", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U2IEG": "that's because patriotism is the only sentiment we can consider as selfless .Heroes are not those who perform marvelous acts in films .the real Heroes are those who fight for the pride of their nation even at the verge of death as they are not individuals but representation of a whole country.", "3XT3KXP24ZWCHM0XJVWHM84TJWE6IJ": "nullI can sympathize with your situation. I would never be able to dig up my pets remains so long after they have been buried. By now your beloved dog is not what you remember and the body has nothing to do with your memory. I think a good way to keep Cali with you forever is to purchase a plant or sapling that you can dedicate toCali andplant in your new home's yard. This way you can nurture it, love it, and watch it grow. If you ever have to move again you can dig it up carefully and transplant it where ever you go. Put a little grave stone or marker where ever you plant the tree and it will give you a place to visit Cali and talk to her. I really urge you to NOT dig her up! You dont want to remember her that way and she has left her body behind anyway! Keep her spirit with you because that was the part of her that made her so special in the first place!!! I hope this helps and I wish you all the best with your morning process!", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFU3B3": "RT TrueBloodHuka: wanna be n our site as toptruebie or top rp dm or kik us why? we feature 7 truebies and 15 roleplayer roles ends last da", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FK94H": "Intravenous urography: technique and interpretation. Radiographics. 2001 Jul-Aug. 21(4):799-821. discussion 822-4. Leyendecker J,Childs D. Kidneys and MR urography. Magn Reson Imaging Clin N Am. 15(3):373-382. Szopinski K, Szopinska M, Boroacute. wka A, Jakubowski W. Magnetic resonance urography: initial experience of a low-dose Gd-DTPA-enhanced technique. Eur Radiol. 10(7):1158-64. Nolte-Ernsting CC, Adam GB, G nther RW. MR urography: examination techniques and clinical applications. Eur Radiol. 11(3):355-72. Excretory urography imaging sequence: A plain KUB radiograph is first obtained to detect the presence of any calcifications. Excretory urography imaging sequence: At 1 minute, a cone down radiograph of the kidneys is obtained. Excretory urography imaging sequence: At 3 minutes, a plain radiograph of the abdomen is obtained. Excretory urography imaging sequence: The patient is placed prone and a coned down image of the kidneys is obtained.", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUH1MV": "Start running everyday and doing ab exercises. Eat healthy. Be careful with salads..too much meat,cheese and dressing and u might as well eat MCD's.", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9464NG": "I suggest running in place or doing jumping jacks on the trampoline. I am sure you may lose some pounds just by jumping, and you will probably gain muscle (so maybe you won't lose actually weight, but gain muscle)", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUWJA1": "The context has two elements (at least)  a) The temporal and spatial time of its writing. b) The large body of words/verses which define and are defined by it. In this case, the jews have suffered a humiliating, devasting loss. Part of their grief is expressed in highly charged, emotional curses. You see much of this in Mid-East funerals today where guns are fired and eternal vengeance is vowed. This not a prescriptive passage, but a descriptive one of sorrow/rage. You are right to ask about contest.", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZE8FI": "You are more likely to be killed by a champagne cork than by a poisonous spider. The name Wendy was made up for the book 'Peter Pan.' Did you know that Jimmy Carter was the first U.S. president to have been born in a hospital? The last name in the Toronto phone book is Zzyzzer. Speaking of Super Smoothies by Corpening twins, they also has a book named Smoothies. The partners have picked Wilhelm to be the chief executive of the combined book clubs. The logic was that online booksellers had been ignoring these groups to appeal to a broader following. The Book-of-the-Month Club, which is based in New York, was started in 1926 by Harry Scherman, who invented the first American book club with a gimmick that featured august literary judges who would gather around an oak table and a tray of sherry to anoint the monthly selections by a Quaker-style consensus process. The Book-of-the-Month Club was considered more literary and less commercial than the Literary Guild, which was started a year...", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC33EO9": "Other body cavities ? oral cavity ? nasal cavity ? orbital cavities ? middle ear cavities ? synovial cavities", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHTYVLC": "not sure.. but when I took a glucose test I had the test every hour for 4 hours and at the end of the 4 hours my blood sugar wasn't normal so I was diagnosed with insulin resistance.", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU5G7Z": "SOUTH CAROLINA Columbia, Travelers Rest (has BANNED ROTTWEILERS Chows, and Dobermans), Sisseton (has BANNED Dobermans) SOUTH DAKOTA Sissenton TENNESSEE Jackson, Smyrna, Watertown,The Lyn Pit Bulls Terriers are great dogs, the owner sounds like he is irresponsible, but the dogs are wonderful. I have two, males who live together in an apartment community with several other 'dangerous' breeds rottweilers, bull mastiffs, boxers, and other pit bulls. They are not born vicious or mean, they are like any other breed, (I was bitten on the face nearly loosing an eye by a lovely little black lab) but I love dogs and own pits.", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C15W9": "Feb 1, 2015 ... English Quaker leader and advocate of religious freedom, who oversaw the ... of Pennsylvania as a refuge for Quakers and other religious minorities... ... a sect of religious radicals who were reviled by respectable society and?... The coal industry was a major foundation for Pennsylvania industrialization in the nineteenth century: as a fuel source, coal provided a cheap and efficient source of power for steam engines, furnaces, and forges across the United States. Who were some leaders in the government of colonial Pennsylvania? William Penn was the founder. Thomas Paine, author of Common Sense and Ben Franklin?... Germans ?? Thousands of Germans were also attracted to the colony and, ... the Pennsylvania Charter applicable to the three counties, but Delaware leaders?... Houses were made of bark, clothing from the skins of animals. ..... Many patriot leaders were bitterly opposed to the new Pennsylvania constitution.", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ6SP3": "Get her help. Maybe a councilor or something. There is nothing to worry about right now.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6ULJK": "It was done to shorten the war. The bombing forced Japan to surrender sooner than if the USA had to beat the Japanese militarily for all the islands and Japan itself.I beleive that hundred of thousands more troops on both sides would have been lost if the US had to take Japan with conventional warfare.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYQKES": "The captain ordered the lifeboats to be readied shortly after midnight. Presumably he knew that there were not enough to save everyone but did not advertise this information. Many passengers were at first unwilling to leave the vast ship, believing it unsinkable, and the first lifeboats left half filled. Why did he decide not to follow the rest of the men over to the port side? Though he owed his life to that decision, the explanation he gives in his book is not entirely satisfying. I can personally think of no decision arising from reasoned thought that induced me to remain rather than to cross over, he says. The two passages are puzzling because in the first he says he made no conscious decision, and in the second he describes one. Isnt there perhaps something missing here, some consideration that he declines to make explicit? He knew the ship was in distress because it had already launched distress rockets.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZOVQ4": "My greyhounds are getting up in years now, but when they were a bit younger, they got together with other rescued greyhounds every week for 'fun races' which were a blast for the dogs. We'd usually run 3 males and 1 female at a time, grouping them according to age/condition so they could all have a fun romp. My bearded collie used to go out regularly and practice his herding skills on a basset friend of his, as well as on my kids. He worked really hard at keeping everyone together! He got to work on sheep a few times and loved it and was also an obedience/conformation dog. The afghans did a lot of lure coursing which satisfied their love of running.", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDNUD6": "The Deadlift is with the Squat the most important exercise you could ever do because it works all your muscles with heavy weights. Heres why: Deadlifting by pulling back  without engaging your posterior chain (hips/glutes)  stresses your lower back more. So instead of Deadlifting by extending your legs first and then trying to lockout the weight by pulling it back, focus on extending your hips on the way up. Your Hips Are Too High. You. Your hips must be lower in order to Deadlift using your legs muscles. For a guy with long thighs/short torso the hips will be higher than for someone with short thighs/long torso. Thats why the bar should remain in contact with your legs from start to finish on the way up of Deadlifts. Frankly, if you master proper Deadlift technique: You will build a stronger back You will be less prone to injuries because youll know how to pickup an object correctly from the floor  with a straight lower back You could eliminate nagging back pain, once and for all", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QZ7YS": "This was my final project last year for my introduction to audio class. It was a 3 part process of 'How To's': How to grow chest hair, how to mind read, and how to make a sandwich. Category", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K1YPM": "I've just moved and wanted to establish myself with a new dentist. ... any doctor, hygienist, receptionist, or employee that would choose to work for Bright Now Dental. ... T... Now that I? ?e left my career and cut some dead weight out of my life, I feel ready to look back and have a laugh?? or just finally be able openly bitch about it. I went to Aspen Dental because I have no dental insurance and have not been to dentist in years. I have 8 teeth in front on top and bottom that need to be pulled. 36 Reviews of Gateway Dental Centre of Seattle 'I've been going here for about five years now. Overall, I like the place and have been very satisfied with the service. I now work a full time job 4lol days a week WITH medical benefits and paid vacations. ... It is a two dentist office with 2 full time and 1 part time hygienist. Ive worked as a Dental assistant for 3 yrs now. I LOVE IT! Don't get me wrong, there are days that are stressful, but that's every career.", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEALGD": "your passport. How did you get round that? I REALLY don't fancy sending my passport to the US by post. If there is a way round this I will be eternally grateful for your advice. :-)I have never been asked for identification when acquiring my ITIN number. I am wondering if you are on the right form. The best thing is to ring them and explain that you are a uk citizen and would like a itin number. They will ask questions in relation to your details and then you get one. No ID was ever mentioned. It is a p off but you only have to do it once and then that is it. Make a nice coffee, sit down, calm down and think of this last step you need to make to see your published book. It is worth it. Kind regards Linda Mather Author of Gut Instinct , Jane, me and myself , A woman's world The haymaker and several self help books.", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3453NYI": "Awww...congrats :) Will she be an inside dog ? Daisy, Belle, Dinky, Missy, Dusty, Cleo  Princess is just a few off the top of my head.", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811AK9I": "to all my new followers ive gotten recently, im the type of person who will talk to ANYBODY who needs someone to talk to", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNEMDRO": "Fairy King Prawn Fairy King Prawn (Chinese ??? : foaled 13 October 1995) was an Australian-bred, Hong Kong-trained Thoroughbred racehorse. Fairy King Prawn is a bay gelding bred in Australia by Mrs Catherine Redmond. Fairy King Prawn raced well behind the leaders before moving out to the far outside in the straight. Fairy King Prawn was officially retired from racing in February 2003. Tiger prawns look great, but for flavour go with king. Add prawns and salt, mix and pan fry in olive oil 1 minute. Marinade prawns in a little Sambuca. Sprinkle a little sugar on prawns, set aside. Add to prawns and quickly pan fry in peanut oil. Rub prawns with turmeric powder, set aside a couple of minutes. Add prawns, stir fry till just opaque. Add prawns with the paste and garam masala, pan fry till cooked. Pan fry prawns till cooked. In many decapods, however, one pair of legs has enlarged pincers the claws are called chelae, so those legs may be called chelipeds.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM42DW": "What is a Healthy Weight? What's the best way to determine a healthy weight? You can look at your height and weight in the chart below or determine your body mass index (BMI) using the interactive tool at the bottom of the page. (Use the BMI calculator if you current weight falls outside of your ideal weight.) Male Female Height Ideal Weight Height Ideal Weight 4' 6' 63 - 77 lbs. 4' 6' 63 - 77 lbs. 4' 7' 68 - 84 lbs. 4' 7' 68 - 83 lbs. 4' 8' 74 - 90 lbs. 4' 8' 72 - 88 lbs. 4' 9' 79 - 97 lbs. 4' 9' 77 - 94 lbs. 4' 10' 85 - 103 lbs. 4' 10' 81 - 99 lbs. 4' 11' 90 - 110 lbs. 4' 11' 86 - 105 lbs. 5' 0' 95 - 117 lbs. 5' 0' 90 - 110 lbs. 5' 1' 101 - 123 lbs. 5' 1' 95 - 116 lbs. 5' 2' 106 - 130 lbs. 5' 2' 99 - 121 lbs. 5' 3' 112 - 136 lbs. 5' 3' 104 - 127 lbs. 5' 4' 117 - 143 lbs. 5' 4' 108 - 132 lbs. 5' 5' 122 - 150 lbs. 5' 5' 113 - 138 lbs. 5' 6' 128 - 156 lbs. 5' 6' 117 - 143 lbs. 5' 7' 133 - 163 lbs. 5' 7' 122 - 149 lbs. 5' 8' 139 - 169 lbs. 5' 8' 126 - 154 lbs. 5' 9' 144. Im Voting NO ! Smile's Mak", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBJP9R": "Making bile which passes from the liver to the gut and helps to digest fats . Liver Function Test results approx 100 - not sure what tests Cirrhosis is a condition where normal liver tissue is replaced by scar tissue ( fibrosis ) . The 'scarring ' tends to be a gradual process .", "3H4IKZHALBGC28HGFSVQTRMW0LWNNP": "PET/CT in the staging of patients with a pelvic mass suspicious for http://t.co/tTqpctLzWl sandipn", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXMJUB": "Natural Ejaculation Control Technique is a process where breathing techniques are combined with meditative efforts to stop premature ejaculation. How to practice:1 Relax and control your breathing - inhaling and exhaling normally. Keep your eyes loosely closed. Put your tongue against the palate. Focus your mind between your eyebrows at the center of your forehead.2 Inhale through your nose deeply at intervals of 2-5 seconds until you can feel your abdomen expand, maximizing the capacity of your lungs. Now, focus your mind to the center of your body, directly towards your navel. 3 Hold your breath and move your expanded abdomen downward by contracting your upper abdomen. As pressure gradually builds up against the bladder and the prostate gland, shift your mental focus to the prostate area. Step 3 is the most important step during intercourse  it requires that you hold your breath for as long as possible while applying pressure to the bladder and prostate area. This ...", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOG9W39": "please lol. Eat some berries before it might help speed up the process?", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIVIUW": "I haven't tried Guppies, I guess I'll have to..LOL The only Fish I have been able to keep With my Puffers sense they were baby's is a 8 1/2 inch Pleco.", "3GL25Y6843SBWKAK5X3ZEEOUX9XXMK": "I have a girlfriend who loves to eat. She is on birth control pills and I have noticed a disappointing weight gain in her. Anything that 'arrests' your hormonal system can make you gain or lose weight. Yes I have seen people gain weight taken Paxil. Please contact your doctor immediatley and let them know how you are feeling regarding your weight gain. Most of the calories from weight gainers come from carbohydrates, which will be stored as fat. So, assuming the fat burners you're using actually work, you'll just be lessening the effects of the weight gainer. You best bet, if you're not currently doing so, is to combine the weight gainers with a weightlifting routine. That way you'll also be gaining muscle along with the fat you'll put on with the weight gainer. Try to take in at least .8 grams of protein per pound of bodyweight), and the weightgainer and try to surpass your weight goal by 10-15 lbs. I'd try jogging 30-45 minutes a day for 3 days a week.", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDWJW9": "The current world record for the heaviest bench press is at 1010 lb which was set by Gene Rychlak. The All time world record deadlift is held by Andy Bolton (UK) with a pull of 1003 lb The world record in the Squat held by Mike Miller with 1200 pounds in 2005 as for the totals.. it just depends on what weight class you are looking for. This is what I could find out about the super heavy weights Chad Aichs Chad is the 2006 WPO Semi Finals Super Heavyweight Champion (275.515 pounds and above) and finished second in this division. Chad's lifts were 1174 pounds in the squat, 805 pounds in the bench press, and 755 pounds in the deadlift for a combined total of 2733 pounds as a super heavyweight", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2EAXPI": "My theory is that it's colder when its darker out, like when it's cloudy. And most people get down in the dumps and blah'' as you put it when its cloudy out. How do you think it makes the cold days feel?", "3FW4EL5A3LMKO03U7QZM9FG0EVF22N": "They are also required to send a copy of the check that they have in their possession, if it is requested. If a collection agency or the original creditor sue on an original check, then they are going to win, hands down. This is my personal opinion and experience. To me this is not debt validation. First any information that is provided by the debt collector is suppose to be information that was provided by the original creditor through the collection agencies. When they get it you'll never hear from the again. At the very least, make sure you send your payments on time every month (if you send a check it has your checking account info on it). No warranty is provided that the answer is correct. No attorney-client relationship has been formed with me until a signed written contract is complete. For an official opinion, it is advised you seek legal counsel.", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481SB2Y": "yeah that sounds like gastric ulcer this means that there has been a puncture created by acid from ur stomach cells in ur stomach. this is going to allow the acid whiich has a pH of abt 2 to trickle little by little in the space and affect other organs causing irritaions. I have Borderline Personality Disorder, and I spent most of my high school life thinking I was crazy, I couldn't figure out what was wrong with me.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHHR1A": "Make sure you let the dentist know about your fears and concerns . A little reassurance from them can go a long way . I too have had a molar pulled ( well it was a wisdom tooth but for all intesive purposes it was a molar . 3rd molar i think ? ) Anyway for me too it was very quick .", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGJM7F": "i have braces on and i have springs dont worry its all gona be ok tighten the braces is done by the doctor by removing the old wires and putting new ones and then pulling the new wires tell they get tighter so the adjust to the new look of ur teeth and pull ur teeth to the desired place and its not pain full dont worry :-RRB- and springs as they r called they are small springs, the doctor only uses springs when pushing away teeth from each other need an extra power  I can not stress enough how beneficial water is for your body. People kept asking how many I was having and why I was still pregnant when I was only 7 months along.", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LT75A": "I don't get why girls always want to be skinny and not muscular/fit. It's so much better and healthier to be fit and not thin. All those skinny girls on magazine covers are usually underweight and not healthy. It's not idealistic to look like that. It can cause health problems and is not good for your body. Who cares if u have abs? At least you'll know that you are healthy, and not an unhealthy, skinny stick. I don't mean to offend anybody by saying this but it's true. Girls nowadays only care about being as thin as the models on magazines and don't care about their health because of all this stuff society is teaching them. Anyway, embrace your abs:) don't try to be skinny, just make sure you are eating healthy and exercising and you'll be fine.", "3OZ4VAIBEXDTRNZ42LPPA1ZSD4VVJC": "24 hours to live, huh? i would go and slap some people i have wanted to slap for along time", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VSSBJ": "These costumes are often sold online, but also can be purchased from dealers at conventions. To look more like the characters they are portraying, many cosplayers also engage in various forms of body modification. Contact lenses that match the color of their characters' eyes are a common form of this, especially in the case of characters with particularly unique eyes as part of their trademark look. Contact lenses that make the pupil look enlarged to visually echo the large eyes of anime and manga characters are also used. It is also commonplace for them to shave off their eyebrows to gain a more accurate look. Cosplayers pose for photographers and photographers do not press them for personal contact information or private sessions, follow them out of the area, or take photos without permission. Good cosplayers are viewed as fictional characters in the flesh, in much the same way that film actors come to be identified in the public mind with specific roles.", "3FK4G712NXY6YY1QVKTYRF68AJFSSL": "Pay more attention to her than to what is happening with yourself.", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K69H3": "'Bend your left ear down towards your left shoulder and then your right ear down towards your right shoulder' to test for pain free cervical spine lateral flexion. Now test for stiffness or pain flexing or extending the cervical spine: 'bend your neck forwards to try to touch your chin against your chest.' 'bend your neck back to lift your chin.' The spine is an incredibly complex structure of bone and cartilage that must provide both stability for an upright posture and flexibility to allow bending in four directions. Vertebrae are linked by facet joints that stabilize the spine and, at the same time, allow it to bend. Increase flexion of your spine by bending forward a little when walking or by lying on your back or side with your knees raised. It takes most stress off your spine, because your spine is aligned instead of curved during sleep. Follow the normal doseage instructions, though. Bend your spine, and straighten it out. The more endorphins you release, the less pain you fe...", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51PYCB": "One of the major contributions of ancient Mesopotamia to government practice was the development of written law codes . The most famous of these is the Code of Hammurabi , written about 1780 BC . However , this code drew on earlier codes going back to the Sumerian city-states of the 3rd millennium BC .", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01KQLE": "I have the same problem, I just found out I need glasses for it, but also for distance and stigmatism. Nice combo, basically I need bifocals at the age of 25. The problem with computer screens is that each tiny pixel in the screen is moving on its own, almost flickering.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUQRW9": "Powders are , by definition , processed foods , so if you try to avoid processed foods , well , there you go . If you re gluten-free , read the fine print as some protein powders contain glutamine peptides as a cheaper filler protein . J thanks for the reference to the intestinal effects of Splenda . I interpret the intestinal changes reported as as characterisitcs I would expect with leaky-gut syndrome which may be the origin of many food allergies as well as raising whole body inflammation levels , and lead to exacerbations in variety of inflammatory autoimmune disorders like multiple sclerosis ( MS ) , etc .", "3R4QIDVOJPA4EWRQTUPODHYE81XEE5": "For 5-10 days before the bone marrow is taken you may have injections of growth factor (GCSF) to encourage the bone marrow to produce lots of stem cells. These are usually given by injection under the skin in the abdomen, arm or leg. Donating actual bone marrow can be done awake with no meds, but it very rarely is. It is done under general anesthesia or with an epidural. The difference between donating and the diagnositic biopsy is the amount of marrow taken. If donating actual marrow, they do it under general anesthesia, and anesthesia always carries some risk, but again, thats normal and pertains to any surgery. They give you shots before donating to make you produce extra bone marrow. ... A bone marrow transplant (BMT) is a procedure carried out to replace defective bone marrow stem cells .... The side effects of donating bone marrow are minimal.", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TV0IF": "You may be a late bloomer. I wasn't able to grow a decent beard until I almost 30. Take a good look at your ansestery. If your father or grandfather did not have a beard at a young age, then there is a chance that you won't. Feel lucky. Having to shave is a real pain.", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ4CTX": "The first volume appeared in 1729, and the last volume was published in 1769. This work is considered to be a very important source of information on 17th-century artists of the Netherlands, specifically those artists who worked in The Hague and in London. The engraved portraits included as illustrations in Volume I are below, followed by the artists listed in order of appearance in the text.", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63S89U4": "That is a very common reaction to birth control. I wouldn't worry too much unless you really think you are pregnant. Of course it's always best to be cautious for 10 a pregnancy test wouldn't hurt.", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDQUD9": "The only other thing that comes to mind since u mentioned waking up in the middle of the night with a rapid heart beat is that perhaps you have sleep apnea, and just don't know about it. Either way, check with your doc. All the best. ... dehydration and I just woke up at 4:30 am with my mouth crazy dry and a rapid heart beat. ..... workouts, that's the problem, once you fuck up and dehydrate its too late, takes a while to get back to normal. SAS is a condition in which during sleep the breathing stops for a few seconds when oxygen concentration falls and CO2 rises and the then the person suddenly wakes up. Many heart beat rhythm problems are associated with SAS, some might be serious. A rapid heartbeat may occur with or without noticeable symptoms, which can vary depending on the underlying cause. If you know how to take your own pulse, you will generally feel a rapid pulse at the wrist with a rapid heartbeat.", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ8SP5": "Like any other body part, your arms won't respond to spot training. In other words, you can't do arm exercises and hope to burn fat there. The only way to lose fat from under your arms is to lose overall body fat (and hope your body will cooperate (your body is in charge of where and what order you lose body fat). That doesn't mean arm exercises are useless...strength training is great for building muscle and helping to raise your metabolism and arm exercises can help you build strength and firm up your muscles. So, training the arms should be part of your regular exercise routine...just don't expect those exercises to get rid of any excess fat you may be storing there. Losing Body Fat:  Regular cardio exercise in your Target Heart Rate Zone. Beginners, do 2-3 non-consecutive days of cardio (such as walking) for as long as you can. Increase your cardio by 3-5 minutes each week until you can go continuously for 30 minutes. Strength training for your entire body 1-3 non-consecuti", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T631418": "Having a balanced is very important. No one food contains all the nutrients necessary for optimum health. A balanced diet that includes plenty of fresh leafy green vegetables, fruit, legumes, whole grains, and nuts and seeds provides a wide range of nutrients essential for growth, energy, and fighting disease.", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBJ9PB": "Well,you can start to draw from the face especially from the side of the air when drawing cartoons.", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V51LPL": "mot juste m?? ?u?st,French mo ?yst/ noun the exact, appropriate word.", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SIDBA": "Physical angerIt really sounds like you are suffering. And you are hating yourself it seems too. His calling you names is surely provacative and he knows it--no one should be called names in a relationship - that is his acting out and you respond by physicality. I know it is something most of us dont want to do, but you do need help by going to atherapist - in fact, you totally deserve it. I dont know what the circumstances are, but AlAnon which helps families of addicts is a group of folks who understand problems like this and could be helpful until you get professional help. Isuspect that not only do his actions upset you, but you are reacting to other things that have happened like this to you in your life. Please be hopeful - you can get help but this is not a do-it-yourself-er. His actions are abuse...you can find a group that also helps abused women. All the best - you will be able to deal with this.", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0LLMK": "So good luck.Cant wait to read The Map of True Places.Pat 0 Sarah says March 10, 2011 at 1:53 pm I belong to a small writers group and, yes, youre rightyou only get that one chance for fresh eyes on your story.", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRWUO5": "Eating Attitudes Test By D. Garner, M. Olmsted, Y. Bohr, and P. Garfinkel Use this quiz to help you determine if you might need to see a mental health professional for diagnosis and treatment of anorexia, bulimia, or another eating disorder. Instructions: This is a screening measure to help you determine whether you might have an eating disorder that needs professional attention. This screening measure is not designed to make a diagnosis of an eating disorder or take the place of a professional diagnosis or consultation. Please take the time to fill out the below form as accurately, honestly and completely as possible. All of your responses are confidential. I particularly avoid food with a high carbohydrate content (i. bread, rice, potatoes, etc. )The EAT-26 questionnaire is copyright David M. Garner and Paul E. Garfinkel, 1979, and David M. Garner, et al, 1982. Used with permission. Garner, D. , Olmsted, M. , Bohr, Y. , and Garfinkel, P.", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160P8MO": "well it was that AND 'TA' as initials on a dressing gown seen in a mirror. But yes. Not Theresa Arundel. Bella Thingummy.", "3KLL7H3EGDZX0H4EELM4YOJD0CRHVT": "PlanetBudwiggmail.com. 3 as you reasonably can, before it gets on top of YOU ! ... natural programs all on their own take more time than most people want to ...... After the cancer markers show no more cancer activity you could do a 1 or 2 month. So before we begin, if you feel that this article could help someone you love, please .... But if the kit does show 'positive' in a non-pregnant person, it is highly accurate ..... I live in NZ and currently take flax oil - the budwig mix. ... 3x daily, pancreatic cancer mass (size of a large grapefruit) disappeared and he ... IT HAS BEEN ONE YEAR AND HIS SCAN SHOWS A CLEAR ESOPHAGUS, HE .... I took it upon myself to make the HHA 4 herb tea and start him on it twice a ?... .... In the first case, a 51-year old woman with breast cancer did her first ... effects that improved with fasting, but also her physiological markers. ..... not just before attempting a fast, decrease your carb intake, don'...", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBW03D": "Matches are played under international netball rules. The 2011 season saw the implementation of new player import rules for all teams. Previously, Australian teams were allowed two import or 'ineligible' players as of right, while New Zealand teams were allowed one import and one ineligible player, with the approval of Netball New Zealand.", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W3CS4E": "Typically depression is treated with one or more of the following: -- Talk therapy -- Used alone for mild depression, often combined with medication for moderate cases. Includes long-term psychotherapy or short-term cognitive behavioral therapy. Psychotherapy alone can help about 50 percent of patients.", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZT157": "It'll help you stay calm and keep your mind off of things for awhile. When you get braces, they will hurt like hell for awhile. But after about a week(varies depending on the person) you'll be fine, and you can go back to eating regularly. Boy do I understand! Prior to getting the braces, I had to have 4 teeth in front pulled because my mouth was too small, which is why my teeth were so crooked. Sure... it's not fun, but my gosh is it worth it! You will notice your teeth moving in the first few weeks after getting your braces. I had two molars pulled out before getting braces on, and now, no gaps in the my teeth :) Just be prepared for a bit of pain. I am incredibly scared of needles and blood and pain, and the experience ..... So please don't worry about it. .... my dentist told me I need this surgery, but does it really help? This was definitely an option for me as I was shit scared of the chair. ... I can't open my mouth really well and I'm just eating jelly, ice cream and ....", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVHIFY": "you need to find out how much calories to take in first. Here is some tip on healthy eating: 1. Have a limit on what you eat. Its alright to dig in and eat the food you enjoy but have a limit and try not to over eat. Dont be picky on what you eat. You cant eat meat all the time, you got to throw some fruits and vegetables in there. Just limit the amount of it you eat. Dont think you can change your eating habit all at once, its call a habit for a reason. Take your time eating. You be surprise that you are not that hungry at all. Eat when you are hungry. You got to eat when you are hungry so that you dont over eat later. When people get bored or stress they eat, pick up a hobby it help get rid of stress and kills the boredom. Not eating is one of the worst things you can do for your body. Your body store fat when you dont eat. Eat more and never eat late. Eating smaller meal keeps you full. Set small goals (set small goal that you know. Get support( having other to support you can go along", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK30ZU39": "I do feel your pain. Dont take to many pain killers- you dont want an overdose. What I recommend is to use rubberbands if you havre top and bottom braces Use Novicane the gel to numb the pain if you have any or use wax I used some crushed ice and a warm glass of water If discomfort keeps continuing call your otrhodontist Hope ot helps", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG546LZ4": "I went through the same thing when my son was diagnosed with autism. I drank of Memorial Day before I even knew that I was pregnant and every possible scenario runs through your head. I had preeclampsia(toxemia) and thought that it could have caused it. Autism is caused by chemical and neurological imbalances in the brain. Our doctors once described it to us as this' All of the nerves that he needs are there but they are wired differently.' Children are either born with autsim or born with the ability to develop it. It is all genetic. There is nothing that you can do to cause it or prevent it. Email me with any more questions, just to chat or for support. I have been where you are. sbirch5yahoo.com", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUKH71": "Everyone is just different. Your breasts will fluctuate in size with weight gains and if you are on the thin side, maybe a few extra pounds will round you up a bit more. Don't expect to be what the rest of your family is. Maybe you are the lucky one because you are slender and can fit into more clothes.", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V50LPK": "I have quit in the past for months at a time (and was Dumb enough to start back) ... How can I get it across to young people that smoking can will harm you ... I have smoked for ten years, but I have been quit for almost 3 weeks. ... In 3 to 9 months coughing, wheezing, and breathing problems will dissipate as .... I used gums for a couple of weeks but then I was getting depressed so a .... Health ?? Health should be good at the time, if you have any current?... The emotional and mental dependence (addiction) make it hard to stay ... Nicotine withdrawal symptoms can lead quitters back to smoking .... 2 weeks to 3 months after quitting .... If you have children, you probably want to set a good example for?... If you have any further suggestions for the first two weeks of this, I'd love to ... Pain is present and I will probably have my second back surgery in ... quitting smoking, and it felt like I was getting nowhere for so long,?...", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR2RFD": "i remember it now!good luck with it.Kit.REPLY Steve Lehola says: November 11th, 2011 at 4:39 am Thank you ALL so much for your comments!", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDUWJK": "The Girl Who Owned A City (Paperback) by O.T. Nelson 'Good! The house was empty...' (more) Book DescriptionA killing virus has swept the earth, sparing only children through the age of twelve. There is chaos everywhere, even in formely prosperous mid-America. Gangs and fierce armies of children begin to form almost immediately. It would be the same for the children on Grand Avenue but for Lisa, a yen-year-old girl who becomes their leader. Because of Lisa, they have food, even toys, in abundance. And now they can protect themselves from the fierce gangs that roam the neighborhoods. But for how long? Then Lisa conceives the idea of a fortress, a city in which the children could live safely and happily always, and she intends to lead them there. Card catalog descriptionWhen a plague sweeps over the earth killing everyone except children under twelve, ten-year-old Lisa organizes a group to rebuild a new way of life.Could this be it?", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLYYJP": "Hey, maybe you should reconsider surgery. Sometimes surgery can go wrong and you can lose all feeling down there. You're young right now so don't make any decisions you may end up regretting when you're older. Someone who truly loves you wouldn't care what your labia looks like. You aren't alone in this, millions of girls over the world feel like their labia is too big or too small. Check out these blogs(they have pictures of large labia so make sure you're not at school or something haha):  http://largelabiaproject.tumblr.com/ http://beautifullabia.tumblr.com/", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I1DII": "I feel this way when 'ratteries' follow me on ig and like my pictures and have entire accounts for their stupid breeding", "31GECDVA9JKWO25WHUNSP5EOA5I66O": "nullBut in looking, I found a site that discusses this very issue you bring up. http://www.2ndchance.info/pain.htm And if you really think what works for dogs would work for cats, http://www.dogbiz.com/faq-arthritis.html", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WTUPN": "I would think that if you were going to have hair on your chest that it would have grown there by now. You should consider yourself lucky to not have hair on your chest. Some men don't get hair on their chest at all and some men get hair on their chest after 40.Sorry don't know how to tell you to grow hair unless you buy vitimins for hair growth from the pharmacy. (yes they have vitimins for hair growth) Give it a try,it couldn't hurt and maybe you will grow more hair and hopefully where you want it to grow.I can't say for sure it will work,but maybe worth a try.", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE9X5W": "Minor sunburns are 1st degree burns. 1st degree burns are indicated by redness, swelling, and pain. 2nd degree burns redness, blistering, peeling of the skin, and severe pain. 3rd degree burns blackening of the skin, severe pain, and usually permenant irreversable damage even after skin graffs. Puss filled blisters on the burn are a sure sign of 2nd degree burns. Another sign is that the burn hurts so much, it is torture to put on a shirt. Fever and nausea also accompany 1st and 2nd degree burns. You probably have a very severe 1st degree burn. 3rd degree burns are the worst, the burn actually kills the epidermis 'skin' to the point of irreversible cellular regeneration. 1st degree is a outer layer of your skin such as a quick touch to a burning match or something like a curling iron touching your skin for a split second. The confusion I had was when I started watching law shows and 1st degree murder is the worst, why isn't a 1st degree burn the worst?", "3PIOQ99R7YKPXY1PCT7C7MEQ8HOUNN": "It sounds like you're pretty shy. If you're a girl, you could try using some makeup that might help mask your face turning red, but if your a guy (and this also applies to girls too),  take some deep breaths and just relax. You're being too self conscious, and that's why your face is turning red. I'm sure your face doesn't turn red with EVERYONE....does it? If it does, you might want to talk to your doctor. :P Good luck! :)", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBTB2VY": "How cold is to cold for German Shepherd?Why are Germans so cold?More questions I've heard German men are cold people?", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2D0MT": "You have to. The only way that you can determine the source of your rectal bleeding is to have a medical provider examine you. It could be hemorrhoid or an anal fissure (a small tear of the anal ring). There are other causes, of course, but again, this is going to take an exam. Treatment will depend on the cause, so having a definitive diagnosis first is essential. While this may be embarrassing for you, it will not be for your medical provider. This is their job and they will get to the BOTTOM of this problem for you (pun intended). This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 9 of 9 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0OE0K": "Good luck. ''Yea, thanks.Ok, bye.'", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BPRA0": "Periods can change or act weird due to stress, diet changes or in my case, even the time of year. Sometimes my periods can be really heavy and painful or come and go and I barely notice because it's been so easy to manage. Just be sure you're not pregnant or taking any medication that has any impact on hormones and make sure you're eating properly. Other than that, stay relaxed and take notice of how you're doing over the next 2-3 months. If you're still worried, see a doctor. Best of luck :)   Opinion 2: everyones period is diffrent. if your period is late early or never happens doesnt mean your pregnant. but birthcontrol helps with that. i have a friend who had uncontrollable pain during hers so she got on birthcontrol and now she has hers every 6 months. talk to doctor or parents..", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXP0LT": "Bull breeds, including French Bulldogs are notoriously harder to potty train... You and your family will have to be patient, he will get the hang of it. Routines do help: crate time meal potty play  crate time meal potty play  repeat as needed  soon you will be able to decrease the crate time and add hanging out time... Good Luck!", "3VGET1QSZ0XDMHY7RM5OTDDXTIY7WS": "My mom said i have problems  if i dont go pee shw will squeeze me till i pee Because i havent pee'd all day", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPDR09": "Well I've never heard of anything called 'Linguine King Prawn'.", "3L60IFZKF3GSIG9U9W50JNS4SXFHH2": "Your canine teeth are meant to be rather pointy, hence the name 'canine'. They're likened to the teeth of dogs. I always wanted mine to be sharper, cause I went through the whole 'goth' stage when I was in middle school and whatnot, but no, they're definitely not weird. http://www.medem.com/medem/images/ama/amapreventiveoralhealthlev20theteeth01.jpg Not a fantastic picture, but as best as I could find. They are sharper than the others. 'The 4 canine teeth are very strong, pointed corner teeth for tearing and shredding, placed laterally to each lateral incisor. They are larger and stronger than the incisors. The canine tooth morphology is characterized by the large, conical crown which projects beyond the level of the other teeth and one single root, longer than all other teeth types.'", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734OIT5": "yeah, it's de stuff dey purrin jars of pesto t'make it green. Worral dey think ov next?", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLPRV0": "You can be referred to discuss it with a maxillo facial surgeon, but tread carefully with this as I doubt that they will be able to 100 guarantee you the perfection you crave. So make sure you ask lots of questions. Also it might be wise to see what another orthodontist will suggest as well.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5BHCU": "It starts with a list of very basic tools you will need - all things you probably already have around the house.The book is separated into several sections, starting with drawing basic shapes.As you move through the book, these basic shapes are used to guide you through drawing a variety of medieval-type things, starting with a basic person, and moving through to specific ones (king, queen, prince, princess).", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCVTFO": "You can regain that lost size (or more) through the use of a medical traction device such as the Andro Penis (side note : this device can usually be purchased on Ebay for 1/2 the cost charged by other websites) Use the device 4-9 hours a day for 3-6 months and you will see serious gains in both length and girth in both the flaccid and erect states. Flaccid gains appear first. penis PENIS PEEEEEEEEEENNNNNNISSSSSSS yay fun game.", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA7JFC": "I hope this helps.Good luck.Marc Mitnick DPM Click here to post comments Join in and write your own page!", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WURX0": "Fitness tips offer concise knowledge about developments in the field of health and fitness. It can be defined as expert advice on how to remain fit and healthy. Fitness tips inspire fitness enthusiasts to maintain a healthy life style. Fitness tips involbe exercise regimens, diets, even motivational courses, meditation sessions, and so on. Fitness tips provide readymade solutions, since one can easily obtain the very latest and valuable information about various ways to stay fit and in shape. Fitness tips mainly revolve around health, exercise, weight loss and nutrition. Apart from common health information, fitness tips highlight the dos and donts that must be kept in mind to. But one must be very cautious because unreliable fitness tips may result in health consequences. Health experts and professional trainers deliver up-to-date tips to best suit anyones lifestyle. Fitness tips can be accessed through magazines and other publications. A free collection of tips are also available online.", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDYJWB": "Of course your teacher, who's getting paid to teach you how to write an essay, will read the essay you've written regardless, but in the real world, readers make up their minds about whether or not to read your essay by glancing at the title alone.) I would take notes on the subject (ensuring that I wrote down the notes in my own words ... a lot of the time this is just rewriting what they have said so you understand it, or how you would explain/speak it to someone else). Well, first of all you need to have read the story a couple of times and made your decision - guilty or innocent. I don't know the story at all so can't help with that bit! You can preview some essays here I think it's just the first few paragraphs but it might help push you in the right direction: http://www.123helpme.com/search.asp?text...", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKS1NW": "He told the bloke to lie down,and then fiddled about with the bloke's knob,did one or two things and said,'Right.All donethat'll be 50. 'Sure enough,the bloke's penis was back to normal.Impressed he paid up.A couple of weeks later,he was chatting to a friend of his who looked a bit shifty and said,'You know,Ive got the same problem,but it's greenish,not red.That specialist sounds cheap--I'll try him out' The next day the friend went to the same doctor.He showed the urologist his penis,and the chap said,'Hmm...well,we can sort it out,but it's going to cost you 5000,I'm afraid,and we'll have to operate.' In the meantime, keep your penis clean (in every sense of the word... Asked by jimmycheong1471 - 1 day ago - STDs - 8 Answers - Resolved is it possiable to get pimples on your penis? i haven't had sex.? ...it's only on the base and underside of your penis. Asked by skadudejoe - 2 weeks ago - Men's Health - 14 Answers - Resolved What does it mean if spmeone has bumps on my penis ...", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEMKHC": "It's completely normal. I had/have the same issue and talked to my doctor about it, I even had a period that lasted for 2-3 weeks (terrible haha). My doctor said that its normal to have irregular periods in the early years and that a lot of women don't have regular cycles until they reach their 20's. If it bothers you a lot though, you can go on birth control to help regulate your periods.", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIL5TL": "Asking about health problem on Yahoo answers is probably not the best idea.", "3H4IKZHALBGC28HGFSVQTRMW0LYNNR": "Wisdom teeth pain symptoms: Over the recent years, it has become exceedingly rare for wisdom teeth symptoms to... http://t.co YDeKTJaEZ", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX24AR": "I trade at novelaction.com about once a month and usually get 10-12 books at a time (their best option since they ship 6 pounds for 4.80). Their membership dues are 25/year, so if you only read a few books a year, it's not worth it but if you read a lot like I do, then IMHO, it's the best option. I have been using them for about 18 months and the books are always clean and in very good shape. They say they ship the next day, but they often ship the very same day if I order early in the morning, and I usually get my books in about a week. I've contacted customer service 1 or 2 times and they were prompt, knowledgeable, and courteous with responses. Also - I just noticed they have a special for 5 books free til mid-March.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GU5JG": "If it is for an English paper you should talk about the hero having to overcome obstacles on his journey,and how the villain is an effective way to produce drama and conflict, providing insight into the hero. More so if the villain and the hero have known each other for some time as this intimacy hints at some desire on the part of at least one of them for extended contact. (English teachers will lap up that kind of thing) As for the second part, remember to analyse both. Literature imitating life is more simple, without life there is no literature, and virtually all literature is at least based on life as we know it. A completely mysterious 'life' with no recognisable aspect (ie literature that does not imitate life) will contain little that the reader can associate with or latch on to emotionally, and no connection will be made. As a last point I would suggest cherry-picking certain villains to showcase how they can affect the storyline in different ways. Good luck with the essay!", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRG01J": "If you browse around FurAffinity.net you might be able to find an upstarting artist who is offering free commissions, but they might not yet have the experience to make really good art. It's not impossible, though. The top quality artists pretty much never offer free work since selling art is a way they make a living. You might even try posting your request on the FurAffinity message board in case there's an artist who wants some work to help make examples of their art to attract paying customers. It's definitely worth a shot. I personally have paid for all my commissions so I can't offer any contact info on an artist who definitely does free work. I would recommend you start saving up your money, just a few dollars a week, until you have enough to get the commission you want from the artist you want (depending on their availability). By the way, great choice of fursona. I'm a fox too!", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VRSBI": "if you like things with flavor, you have to try trident gum called tropical twist or another trident gum called fusion flavor in the strawberry. In the fusion flavor, the gum comes with a sour strawberry and a sweet strawberry. You can combine them or keep them separate.", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811A9K7": "Pocket Dragon Adventures Pocket Dragon Adventures was a short-lived 1996 syndicated cartoon series, based on the Pocket Dragon character created by artist Real Musgrave, best known from Pocket Dragons figurines also based on his work. The cartoon was about the Pocket Dragons (a group of very small dragons) who live with a kindly old wizard, and their many adventures. The series was produced by BKN Entertainment, D'Ocon Productions and DIC Entertainment.", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13IR78": "I asked this same question over a year agoHere is the question and the replies I got. They were good and I hopt youll find them helpful too. http://askville.amazon.com/interested-tutor-employed-share-pros-cons/AnswerViewer.do?requestId4462642", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JLG60": "I don't think it's just rottweilers. In most apartments I've lived there's been a 50 lbs weight limit. But there's some bad facts about different breeds so that always come into play.", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBL0I1Z": "Burned bits and cancer: Haven't heard that little urban legend before, ... I think I' ve heard and/or read somewhere that burned food contains more ... I am not going to attempt to write a paper on this so you can look it up yourselves. They refuse to recognize any natural cure studies that have gone exceptionally well!!! The AMA must have a patent on chemo and radiation therapies so they will use it until pigs fly!!! Cannabis studies show it cures 7 out of 10 cancer patients!!! leo  cancer  3 ................Cancer - Leo Compatibility Cancer and Leo individuals possess different attitudes which tends to hurt their pride. Their compatibility works well as a Leo wants to be a leader and a Cancerian is a faithful follower. But, again, that takes years. The freckle is just your skin's reaction to the sun's rays. There are tons of pictures of skin cancer online, and you can google skin cancer images to see what cancer usually looks like.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMETE7J": "There are many. at elance, rent-a-coder and other quot. hire consultantsquot. that will do it for you. Problem is that sometimes the work is done by people who arent fluent in english. Now this isnt a knock against them, but if you plan to market to english speaking people, than its a good idea to get a person who is fluent in that language. Theres a vendor who does this exclusively for the ebook industry and they seem to have a great offer along with a decent price. Im pretty sure you can find it cheaper, but probably not at the same quality written by people fluent in english. Check it out here. They will also create an ebook cover and a web site for you to sell your ebook from. bizadvocate 97 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. bizadvocate bizadvocate Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EFYFK": "Could be vitreous floaters, normal w/ aging. If it's just stars when eyes closed or after pressure applied to eyes, just fun w/ the optic nerve. You can get a visual field test to test the integrity of the optic nerve. If floaters, you'd probably notice all the time especially when you look upwards. If floaters and came on suddenly get a dilated eye exam, worst case scenario retinal detachment. So, don't panic. No need. Go to Optometrist or Opthamologist, explain symptoms, have eyes dilated and take visual field test. Most Optometrists can dilate when requested 9or if see something that needs a better look) and some have VFT machine in office, just call and find out. But don't panic.", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMOT42": " I use pictures of those that play sports as examples of  ideal body types for funtion , but for our ancestors it was a matter of survival and depending on the environment and task at hand we needed ( and still need ) all of the different body types . What are the ideal body measurements for men ? What will they say ? Being a man , I did not know so I went to the blogs to find out .", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5BO6U": "Dental  Implant  surgery is very safe nowadays.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIPICN": "If you're trying to help someone else, this volume might be useful.Or if you've never tried to seriously declutter before.Good luck.", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJZA85": "also really need to revisit this one, because of how dense it is.", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0Q4CW": "If it's a large cavity, you'll be able to see it and it will most likely hurt quite a lot. If it's small, or in between your teeth, you might have sensitivity to sweet things (eat some chocolate on the tooth you suspect has a cavity - if it does, it will HURT!). That tends to be the earliest sign, then you start developing sensitivity to hot and cold things.If you think you might have a cavity, see your dentist as soon as you can, because if you leave it, it will just get bigger, trust me, I know!! And while it is small you can just get a little filling and it won't hurt - if you leave it to get bigger you need a deep filling, which hurts, or even worse, a root canal.......it's not worth it - see your dentist now!", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QRKNH": "great question because I have done a lot of studying on the answers to the questions that you asked. First fruits and vegetables are great, but you NEED PROTEIN. And lots of it. I would say for your weight you need about 180 to 200 grams of protein a day divided into six to eight meals. This will tighten muscles, and repair damaged muscle. Next, divide your time like this: twenty minutes cardio, hour lifting. ten minute stretch. Cardio should come first because you will be too tired after your workout to do it. do different sections of the body each day for instance: chest and biceps, triceps and forearms, back traps and shoulders, then legs. Abs and calves come every day Do this four days a week, then take three days off. Calories is not an issue for you avoid FAT AT ALL COSTS. Fried foods, milk, candy, all of these are what will contribute to your being fat. check out the enclosed website to look for certain lifts and other info. GOOD LUCK!!", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4FFOP": "Moira77, of all the hospitals I am familar with, they do try to save babies born before 25 weeks. If not, that's a lawsuit on them. However, the baby might be flown to another more advanced hospital, but hospitals make attempts to save babies lives. Ever heard of the little girl that was Micro-preemie?????? To the orignal question, no, I haven't been in labor around 24-28 weeks, some babies do survive some don't.", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VUBS4": "Or her monthly cycle. I admire your desire not to let any doctor put you on anti-anxiety medications, becasue they are habit forming an only hide the root cause. One on One therapy is the best way to get at the root cause of your anxiety attacks. Wow...the first person you should see is a Gastroenterologist so he can get you the proper tests....an upper endoscopy, perhaps a Barium Swallow, or a H-Pylori test...that will diagnose your stomach issues....start with that.... This is beyond what I know, but one thing I would try: just eat liquid foods for a few weeks- things that are really easy on your throat, and see if maybe it was just injured and will heal. Consequently patients with Huntington's Disease begin to have problems thinking and planning as their thought process begins to slow down. They also have trouble learning new things or initiating actions.", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP58SY": "Apply whole egg mayonnaise on your face (right from the jar) for about 20 minutes.", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC34EP": "Make a list of all your valuable property including family heirlooms, jewelry, bank accounts, real property, life insurance, etc. Then write a list of how you want your property to be distributed at the time of your death. You can include any instructions you would like your executor to follow. Think about who you would like to be the executor of your estate- who would be responsible and organized, and settle your estate most efficiently. Review what you have written after a couple of weeks and then make an appointment with an attorney who specializes in probate law. She will review your lists with you, review your situation, explain legal options you don't know about and draft a will that reflects your wishes and complies with state laws.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54HEB2": "If your looking for plants, stop. Nasturtiums don't like to be moved, so you're most likely to find seeds. By the way, nasturtium is really considered an herb or veggie.", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPLCEB": "However avoid lengths across the widest part of your hips/legs - your thighs Heels elongate your lower body and make your hips , thighs and legs look slimmer On the other hand , it 's the simplest way to downplay your curves , especially you feel uncomfortable and  fat '' with them , and just wish to draw less attention to that area .", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6VJLJ": "Thats not a symptom, you silly!", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA90Y5NJ": "It's not available but here's a link to a mailing list that will notify you when it's available.It's not available but here's a link to a mailing list that will notify you when it's available: check the box above 'subscribe now' http://www.oncefuture.com/phplist/lists/?psubscribeid1", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGSCSA": "try http://uk.search.yahoo.com/search?pShak... Use search engines, hope that helps. Opinion 2: Since nobody writes like this any longer, 99 of people just don't have a real comfort with all the forms like 'are' and 'art' and 'dost' and 'haveth' and their correct matching persons (1st 2nd 3rd, singular or plural). And I don't either! And even some pronouns have changed -- you have 'thee' right above, but you could rephrase a sentence to say 'thou' (subject case) and make it sound more Shakespearean, I guess. .... The only little Germanism is right at the end, where you say 'the death' / 'der Tod'. We just don't put the article with a lot of abstract nouns (life, love, death, beauty, kindness) in English. So I'd take that out. Otherwise, sounds like something a teacher could love to me. Fare thee well, and, forsooth: may the luck of all the Fates and the blessings of the Muses be upon thee!", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK3013UK": "bleeding, cramping, not feeling the baby move. Soreness disappears in the nipple area. Do you mean pain from being engorged (full in your breasts)?", "37VE3DA4YUFIR36894V4XCP6XKDHBP": "Dimitri Otis/Photographer's Choice/Getty Images Grace Fleming Homework  Study Tips Expert Share Pin Tweet Submit Stumble Post Share By Grace Fleming What Is Historical Context? : Historical context refers to the moods, attitudes, and conditions that existed in a certain time. Context is the 'setting' for an event that occurs, and it will have an impact on the relevance of the event. Context is an important factor to consider when describing something in history. When Will You Need to Know This? : You will be required to read historical documents, books, and essays in the course of your studies. It will be important for you to know the significance of events that occur, and you must consider context when contemplating significance. Example:  We can use a simple statement, taken from a moment in time, to understand the importance of historical context. Consider this statement: 'Sally hid her hands behind her back and crossed her fingers before she answered.", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7D6WR": "maybe u should check it out just to be safebut check out this site", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6TCRQ8": "Hi,It sounds as if u needed the good fats that r in the peanut butter, if u r eating low fat and exercsing vigoursley u may have depleted ur bodies energy fat stores and that made u binge as ur body recognised that wot u were eating was a good source of fast energy and fat!Other reasons to binge eat is depression, hormone levels and starvation.Rx", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014Y1YO": " Baltimore-Washington Beer Works 52. http://www.baltimoresun.com/sports/football/bal-ravens-timeline,0,1526129.story?collbal-football-storyutil 53. http://www.sportsecyclopedia.com fl/baltrav/ravens.html General references  Edgar Allan Poe: Poetry and Tales (Patrick F.", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZBTUO": "cats and kittensThey will eventually get along if you do nothing, but to speed things up there are a few things you can do to help the friendship along. First of all, anyone who has ever had a cat knows they are very independent and also pick who they do or do not want to be with in the family. Knowing this should be kept in mind and make sure you show equal attention to all the cats and never push a cat away,removea cat, yell or punish a cat,if it interferes with your time with another cat. That only reinforces the problem. There is a natural Alpha personality in all animals, even those of us walking upright! A kitten may, okay, will try to take the Alpha position, but more than likely be put in its place by the older or true Alpha in the pack. Trade 'blankies' back and forth with the cats and kittens, so they learn each others scents. Do this with other things you have for your cats, such as toys, pillows, whatever you pamper them with.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2CT1N": "wow it seems like your a practicer of dog whisperer methods, go to the basics you walk him everyday. I have two ratties and all their energy can be built up into aggression if they are not walked, ppl think that because they are small animals they do not need walking but this is not true. If he is not being walked ( i'm sure you do) then walk him next to you on a short leash 30-45 minutes a day correct his behavior right away and give him a tug on the leash if he shows aggression and have him submit.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FFY6K": "Good luck to you all xx There appears to be no prominent link on this web page to the NHS campaign called Perhaps it might be considered when the page is updated Here is the information from another NHS Choices page which features at the top of Google when you search Blood In Pee Blood in your pee is a key symptom of both types of cancer . Other symptoms can include ...   Read more ... I 've had very bad blood in my urine for nearly two months now , obviously when it first started , I rushed to the doctors in a blind panick .", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV698838": "Random Scarring The Past. Random Scarring The Past Months (Please Help. ) boafriend Los Angeles, CA 2 years ago I've scoured the Internet for those websites where you can ask medical professionals for help, but realized all of them required you to pay if a doctor actually responds. I guess nothing is free. I figured coming on here was better than nothing. Pretty much, since March, I have had a plethora of odd and disturbing things happening to my skin. I've come across many various posts on different forums with people who seem to have experienced similar symptoms as I have, but all these threads ended up dying out with no continued discussion. So this is just my experience: Near the end of March, I noticed random pockmarks and thin indented lines forming all over my face. From April to June, I've gone to 3 dermatologists or so for answers, all of whom have been unable to give me a proper diagnosis. The first thing Google and Acne.", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP137F": "UK Pakistani guys: 'Malcolm X, Malcolm X, I'm so like Malcolm X' his sister says: 'I fancy a black guy' Imran X says 'I", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL450L5Z": "If you are talking about a Bearded Dragon, you're alright. Lizards will only breed when they are mature enough to do so. If she's hiding out, she made be in the motherly way. make sure she has access to water amp plenty of calcium, to help with egg shell production. They bury their eggs, so make sure she has sand in the cage to do some. There is a product called Calci-Sand, or Repti-Sand. It's sand made of 100 digestible calcium. It comes in great colors. Awesome for desert dwelling herps. If she doesn't lay eggs, maybe she wasn't fertile right then... or she could be egg bound. Basically means, she can't lay the eggs. This is a medical emergency. You need to get her to a vet asap. She will act restless, stop eating completely, and look horrible. Keep an eye on her.", "3ZCC2DXSD720Q6P8TWDCRNIA8P4YYG": "Watch Tv Online Watch 3500 Channels On Pc, TV Online, Internet TV,Digital TV, Web TV,Streaming TV, Computer TV - http://t.co/bUT87vxk 8:00", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMUU84": "diet pepsi is better purely on calory count, though for flavour I like diet coke...but that's me...apparently calory count for diet coke serving is 1.3 calories, and zero for pepsi", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E69BMP": "Teeth grinding is medically known as bruxism: How to Treat Bruxism If you suspect that you suffer from bruxism see your dentist. They can tell you if your symptoms are in fact due to bruxism. In most cases, they can create a custom mouth guard for you to wear while you sleep. The mouth guard takes the punishment that your teeth would normally endure during your bruxism. This will minimize the damage associated with bruxism. Additionally, your dentist may help you properly position your teeth and tongue so as to reduce your bruxism. Reducing alcohol intake is also advisable since alcohol has been shown to worsen bruxism. It is now well known that stress and anxiety play the major role in causing bruxism. If you suffer from bruxism try to more effectively manage the stress in your life. By carefully monitoring and controlling the stress you can often dramatically reduce bruxism.", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3313I": "Anybody wanna buy a HEA Anybody wanna buy a LOVE Anybody wanna buy a TRUST ?", "3YLPJ8OXX8BVSULEZT33SK7UBICX4P": "You know what. I'm only sixteen and I've had panic/anxiety attacks for almost a year now. They are truly horrible.. but I learned something just recently. If you honestly learn and believe that nothing will happen to you and stop fighting them... you'll be fine. Like... when you get that feeling where everything is weird and your heart starts pounding and you feel like you can't breathe... just say to yourself that you want the attack to get as bad as it can possibly be.. and you want to go to the unknown side (the side where it gets as worse as it can if you let it go).. by honestly believing this.. you will come to a point where you realize that it's all in your head.. and it can be overcomed.. but you have to get through this step first. Email me at uhhsure8701yahoo.com if you wanna talk about it anymore! good luck.. :)", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP7JGB": "Re: blunt impact injury to top of foot Hi I had similar incident few years back as well, when I was working in retail we were trying to shift an industrial shelf and the other person lifting the shelf with me dropped it across both my feet (but force was borne mainly by my left foot), I had severe pain instantly and after going to the doctor I had an X ray which revealed no fractures. However, my feet has continued to swell up but I have been tolerating it so far But last year I tripped over a road sign and as result my left toe got hurt. Yet again the x ray did not show any fractures, but recently my feet have been playing up again making it difficult for me to walk and put pressure on the front part of the feet. Doing exercise can be result in large swollen feet that ache.", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NE34Y": "Theres nothing much that you can do about the bruises. Bruises are broken blood vessels and will have to heal on its own. Depending on how big the bruises are it could take a couple weeks to heal. You can cover them up by wearing pants. For the scars you can use a product called Merderma. Lots of people use this product for their scars. You can find it at Walmart. My walmart now carries it but if its not at your local walmart then any drug store should have it.", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6NKJE": "Lexotan is takes effect a very short time after taking it. You may notice a difference in as little as 10 to 15 minutes. Its effects only last for six to eight hours, though.", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB3BB0H": "Remember one important thing...it is far more important what you eat..than how much! You should completely avoid any processed foods, sugary drinks or foods, fried foods..and junk foods. Rice Vegetables  Fruits  ENERGY   are Very Healthy (eat all you want,but probably will not need to do that since they contain so much energy)...'Fried foods', 'Sweets'  just general 'Junk Food'  Fat..Fat Fat..and very unhealthy (you never will lose weight eating such things)   changing your diet to only healthy foods is the best thing to do. Cooking vegetables using an inexpensive electric 'crock pot', 'slow cooker', 'food steamer',' rice cooker with vegetable tray' or even a 'Dutch oven'/iron skillet with lid in a regular oven is the easiest and also the healthiest way. Also, despite what the latest 'health news' is..dont believe what they say about 'carbs'..Eat plenty of rice. And make sure the rice is the real rice. You can find this at most super markets.", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV3DZF": "http://www.Plagiocephaly.org  No, adults need more. If you are just replacing electrolytes then Gatorade would be better for an adult.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MOZNV7": "You need to break the prophets up into Major and MinorI suggest the James Smith books. I have both of them Now, there is no workbook, but these are great books Ok,,, workbook http://www.collegepress.com/index.php?actionshopping.product.displaypageid19categoryid108 Retrhing Revelation might work http://www.amazon.com/Exploring-Old-Testament-Guide-Prophets/dp/0830825541/sr8-2/qid1168721531/refsr12/104-4691694-2150319?ieUTF8sbooks Don't have this, but it might be good Exploring the Old Testament: A Guide to the Prophets (Exploring the Old Testament) (Hardcover) by Gordon McConville, J. Gordon McConville (Editor), Ernest C. Lucas (Editor) List Price: 27.00 Price: 17.82  eligible for FREE Super Saver Shipping on orders over 25. Details You Save: 9.18 (34)", "3QI9WAYOGQ91B03TO7QVQAAGSUG6SB": "BBCWorld: KattyKayBBC: In Haiphong with the Vietnamese navy and the US Defence Secretary. Excellent welcome. http://t.co/fpRc9QeCqJ", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE3Z5R": "'Haru is so mean..' He managed to say those words in spite of his blushing cheeks.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWTZR6": "Now , this is extremely common because once the inner ear nerves have been dead by the shot , it will automatically reduce your ability to balance correctly . The only alternative to fix this is Vestibular rehabilitation . I went through six months of balancing practice and only regained 40  . My balance issues in addition to the hearing loss , cochlear loud bursts , blah , blah , blah , can lead to other problems such as depression .", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30VA28T": "Hi Scott! a muscled 170 sounds ideal. It?? good to hear that you were so successful with a 1 meal a day approach and its also good to hear you taking such a common ... Thanks for linking this post on twitter (after my asking about quinoa and how it has made me so sick the last few times I? ?e eaten it). So, does the Paleo diet help ... Oh yes, and people do use the word ??lutened?? for every reaction, hiccup, fart sneeze, bellyache, zit or headache. when it may not be the case at all. French version of this post here, courtesy St?phanie Potin-Grevrend. So? ?elling people what to eat seems to be quite the thing to do, no? And telling people to eat ... The Paleo Diet solution mimics our hunter and gatherer ancestors. So if you can find or kill it in nature, you can eat it??ssentially. For those of you that would ... Jun 23, 2009?? Sometimes I wish I wasn?? allergic to chocolate. This looks so darn good!! I might just make them anyway with a bottle of benadryl next to me, lol", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFT2WDB": "It disrupts the flow, rather than adding to it. It's like you began the novel and then remembered that you should give the reader a context with which to understand or relate to the main character. The dialogue is unnatural and awkward. Writing a novel is like a giant jigsaw puzzle. Make sure as you formulate every chaper (or work on a few pieces) that you don't lose sight of the finished novel (your puzzle picture when completed). BFA in Creative Writing This complex cultural situation? ?n which young people are struggling to find ... media are saturated by popular culture and penetrate politics, the economy, ..... ing required in the Internet era, based on the old idea of learning to learn:?... In an open question like this, you have to state your thesis clearly, and write to it. You can choose to interpret it in any way you think makes sense and then argue your points in paragraphs that flow logically. Best wishes!", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN3809W": "Talk to someone else, probably another teacher or your parents about it. That's not something that should be in schools, plus it could be affecting how he grades. That's discrimination due to race and it's illegal now. Sorry you have to deal with that, no one should have to.", "3MJ28H2Y1E6QU4BMC7ZHEZMFZA15OW": "When you hit the bottom, release the penis. Now push hard against his penis. Then stroke the penis from the bottom all the way to the top. Shaft Stroke only his shaft, ignoring his glans head. Shuttle Penis Take the penis in both hands, fingers lightly touching the sides of the shaft. Now flick the penis back and forth between your two hands by holding onto the loose skin of the shaft. Ask From your description in your previous questions about the supposed problem, it's highly unlikely you have Peyronie's disease as this is a disorder affecting the penis that can cause: 1.a lump within the shaft of the penis 2.pain in the shaft of the penis 3.abnormal angulation of the erect penis ('bent' penis) Not all of these features are necessarily present, but, typically, a man would first notice a tender lump in the penis, which might later be followed by bending of the penis when erect, sometimes at very odd angles. The blood fills 2 spongy tubes of tissue inside the shaft of the penis.", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134OF63": "Bttner Bttner is a surname. Notable people with the surname include: Kruger Krger, Kruger or Krueger (without the Umlaut ) are German surnames originating from '', meaning tavern-keeper in Low Saxon or potter in High German. Notable people with the surname include: Khne Khne is the surname of several notable people", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2YWKN": "your breast size is hereditary.....if there too small...implants", "3ZRKL6Z1E8138TSZ0KZH21N5M8ISGY": "You can read about that here:http://www.healthatoz.com/healthatoz/Atoz/common/standard/transform.jsp?requestURI/healthatoz/Atoz/ency/allergicpurpura.jsp Keep taking notice of any symptoms you might have and contact your doctor if anything else shows up.Hope this helps...KieraI too have had for over three months now a 'group' of spots forming over mainly my legs.", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO8C0M": "Well it's different for every individual, some take longer than others to conceive - you should consult your GP about this topic. On the other hand it could also depend on how fertile you are. People always say one should try not to think of it too much and it will happen sooner..", "3QI9WAYOGQ91B03TO7QVQAAGSUFS6W": "Only after all the macros have been fully expanded and the resulting code compiled can the program actually be run . The time when macros run is called , when regular code , including the code generated by macros , runs . It 's important to keep this distinction firmly in mind because code running at macro expansion time runs in a very different environment than code running at runtime .", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGVPJM": "Typically , youll feel you cant be bothered to do anything , your muscles will feel heavy and youll get tired very quickly . Women with Chronic fatigue syndrome ( also called myalgic encephalomyelitis or ME ) is a severe and disabling tiredness that goes on for at least six months . There are usually other symptoms , such as a Sleep apnoea is a condition where your throat narrows or closes during sleep and repeatedly interrupts your breathing .", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1UNJO": "Got a health question? Get answers provided by leading organizations, doctors, and experts. Font Size How to Manage Oily Skin Get more glow and less shine with skin-clearing solutions from leading dermatologists. By WebMD Feature Reviewed by WebMD Feature Archive Oils produced by the body help keep healthy, but there can be too much of a good thing. Excess oil can lead to blemishes and flare-ups. Fortunately, there are plenty of ways to cut down on oiliness, Andrea Cambio, MD, medical director of Cambio Dermatology in Cape Coral, Florida, says. Clear strategies range from over-the-counter cleansers to prescription lotions and cosmetic treatments. Cleansers Dermatologists agree that the most effective way to manage oily skin is to cleanse your face both morning and night. Always use a gentle cleanser since harsh soaps can trigger the skin to increase oil production, April Armstrong, MD, assistant professor of dermatology at the University of California, Davis, says.", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN3509T": "First you have to label which text in the document are headings. You do this by applying a 'Headings' style to it. So if they are not already marked, go through the whole doc, and for each paragraph that's the section heading, select a 'Headings' from the Styles. If on Word 2007, the Styles are on the Home tab. If on Word 2003 or older, the Styles are under the Format menu, but it's quicker to select it from the Styles select box that's next to the font face type select box. If you've never used Styles before or changed them, your Styles box probably has the 'Normal' Style selected. Select 'Heading 1' for the first level of heading, and if you have subheadings, select the next level 'Heading 2' etc. Once you've labeled all the headings with the Style type, Word can create a table of contents finding all the Heading styles in your document and automatically indicate the page number where the heading is located.", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH3YWG": "The reason your voice is giving way so quickly will be because you are not supporting your voice, and breathing correctly. It will be difficult for you to retrain your way of breathing by yourself, so I would highly recommend you see a speech therapist (via your GP) - before you do any serious damage to your vocal folds and develop nodules (hard lumps).In the meantime, ensure that you are sitting in a supported and up-right way (but relaxed), so that you are giving enough space to your lungs and diaphragm (muscular wall below the rib cage and lungs) to enable them to work fully. Ensure you are not trying to talk without breathing fully first, and that you shoulders aren't raised.To learn how to use your lungs to their full capacity, breath out as far as you can - really push the breath out - and then just relax.. your lungs work as a vacuum and will automatically suck in air when you breathe out completely. Think when you relax after breathing out, that your breath coming in is pushing into y", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IKWGBL": "it ceratinly is not wierd. it is the reverse, its wired tha guys are watching porn. the public seem to think that its natural for men to watch porn. however the truth, which the public is slowly learning about, is that mind manipulation is used in various sex programs which powerfully impact the mind of the viewer. that is the real reason why so many people are hooked on watching them. in your quest to stop watching porn, yo have a great tool at your disposal, and informing others about it will help society greatly. Also i encourage yuo to teach it to others once you get older.", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13H7RN": "A pure emotion is like the joy felt when one sees an excellent and unexpected event like a complete rainbow. This needs no interpretation. Some emotions, like sadness, combine thoughts with emotions.", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PZ746": "then after three days i went through period till three days ...   but further i missed my period , do i pregnant ? im confused having an early period and why its stop i have my period last month may 24 and it takes for 3 days , , after a week me and my bf having sex once a week but this morning after we did sex i got spotting that i thought i hve my period but suddenly after 5hrs i 'd never seen any blood on me , i just want 2 know wat is the reason for hving this and is theres a possibility that i am pregnant ?", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD48X8W": "difference between tonsillitis and a sore throat?Banner Health About Us Locations Services Patients Health Info Donate Health Professionals News Careers Banner Health Services Health  Wellness A-Z Health Library Banner Libraries Ask the Expert Alzheimer's Disease Bariatric Surgery Behavioral Health Cancer Care Diabetes Digestive Care Ear, Nose  Throat Fitness  Outdoors Flu, Cold  Infections General Health Heart Care Maternity Men's Health Neurosciences Nutrition Orthopedics Pediatrics Sleep Disorders Women's Health Your Health Care Classes/Events/Support Complementary Medicine Ebola Fitness  Nutrition Flu Health eConnect Blog Health Calculators Health Links Health Profilers Prevention Guidelines Poison Prevention Recipes Safety Spirit of Women Tobacco Free West Nile Virus View All Services Your Health YOU ARE HERE  ServicesHealth  WellnessAsk the ExpertPediatricsdifference between tonsillitis and", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FM94J": "Hi passionate person!!! : )I can understand your mindset - me and my son(26 months old) are your kinds. In fact i even get bored of my husband many times coz he just cant keep up with us. We keep looking to do something interesting every day.My suggestions for you - join different classes but short time ones don't take the longer ones. Try to do and think what you want to do everyday or even better don't think in advance. Think when you are in the situation and see what you can do interesting . If you are at home then try to rearrange your house from top to bottom - or may be one room a day. Try to bring new ideas,experiment with different colors,materials,designs all this but with nothing new - just with whatever you have at home,with you. Take it as a challenge and rake your brain(this is just an example). By doing this you are completely occupied, you are happy with the results and tired for the day and this is just for a day and tomorrow you need to think again something new and innovative.", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWKC58": "i love cats, i have eight cats. Two from eight are kittens ...", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ454P": "However, if the psychiatrist, doctor, psychologist, etc. feels that you pose a risk to yourself or to someone else, they will report you. I'm not sure why your doctor took you off Prozac, but doctors and psychiatrists are the only people who can put you on medications, so a counselor will not place you back on any antidepressant. One other thing to note is that if you are having suicidal thoughts, but aren't actively planning to commit suicide, then your doctor may not place you on a 51/50. It all depends on the doctor's assessment. I would advise you to be as truthful as possible with your doctor, because that is the only way he or she can help you. Speak with your doctor about a weight control plan and let him/her know you have stopped your Paxil. Please contact your doctor immediatley and let them know how you are feeling regarding your weight gain. Use medicated cream or see a doctor. I have some of these bumps, but taking care of skin is the best thing you can do.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSR1E7": "A newborn kitten recently entered the world with two faces and, hopefully, at least nine lives. Roseburg veterinarian Alan Ross, who examined the kitten on Tuesday, said he can't estimate the kitten's life span. He said when he first saw the kitten, he wouldn't have given her more than a 10 percent chance of survival. Roughly three years ago, she discovered a litter of smaller than normal kittens she calls 'miniature cats.'", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V86NZ": "Photo: Men sexy gym shorts with jockstrap free shipping... http://t.co/eqlEsi69Tz", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FK49C": "Lastly, no matter what the reason for her behavior, I would suggest you write her a letter and tell her how you feel, along with how much you love her.Hopefully she will choose to talk to you again.Good Luck!", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF4OYU": "He may have a condition called Restless Leg Syndrome. I know it sounds funny, but it is actually a condition. I am a nurse in Ohio and I've taken care of many people with this condition. Tell your doctor, there are medications out there for it. Hope this helps.", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE16IP3": "Luck  32.Fortune  33.Chance  35.TIME 37 The Past  40.", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0NJ1A": "Hitler did not all of a sudden say, Hey, lets band everyone together by hating Jews.' The hatred of Jews in Europe goes all the way back to the time it became Christian. Our Lord also calls them a brood of vipers''  furthermore, in John' 3:39 he states : If you were Abraham's children would do what Abraham did..", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN5ZS7V": "'Visual Macro Designer' helps to create visually constructed macros. 'Remote Macro Execution Control'  running macros located on remote computers and monitoring such macro runs. 'Tasks Scheduler' is a key feature for creation of automated daily builds. It helps to create scheduled macro runs. 'Automatic notifications' - getting notification of whether a macro run was successful or not. Find out how to record a macro. Open up the macro and read what was recorded. Note: In the macro window, the Help file is completely different that the normal Excel help. The Macro help will give you much more macro oriented information. Many modern antivirus programs detects macro viruses as well as other types. Uninfected documents contain normal macros. A common way for a macro virus to infect a computer is by replacing normal macros with the virus. In the cases where the macro is run automatically, the macro is opened without the user knowing. Not all macro viruses can be detected by antivirus ...", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1J8BX": "We realize that some people insist on learning things the hard and expensive way , so if you 're one of those people , the tips below could save you thousands ! To better your odds of getting a healthy teacup dog and a dog who stays small , you 'll need to meet both parents of the puppy . The breeder should be more than happy to invite your into her home . In fact , any good breeder would insist on it . She would never ship one of her puppies off to a random stranger in another state , especially a small and fraile teacup , for fear of it ending up in a place like the dogs in the video below .", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1GKBV": "i was sore after, but it just all depends on the person. Opinion 2: COLLEGETIMES Home Sexual Abstinence: 10 Good Reasons Not To Have Sex, From K.I.D.S. To Health Reasons, Consider These First http://cotms.co/1n5XxjI Sexual Abstinence: 10 Good Reasons Not To Have Sex, From K.I.D.S. To Health Reasons, Consider These First Gawker Theres nothin wrong with me lovin you  And givin yourself to me can never be wrong, if the love is true, sings Marvin Gaye in probably the most famous song ever written about making love, Lets Get In On. Wrong or right, true love or not  dont ever expect to get a realistic view of human relationships from Hollywood, music videos, or pop culture. The truth is that sex is an exceptionally beautiful yet delicate issue, and it comes with many potential side effects that all too many people realize far too late in their decision making process. See also: Proven Ways To Last Longer In Bed (For Starters, You Can Practice Flexing Your Pubococcygeus) The Man", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OBA6L": "You could be pregnant, or your body could just still be recovering from the hormonal birth control. It can take up to a year.", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLECO3R": "If your cycles are irregular but you have a period every month or so (21-40 days), it's not usually a problem. It may still be possible to get pregnant, but it could take longer and you may need medical help. However, dont' hesitate to talk to your doctor if you are concerned over the late/missed period. It is physically impossible to get pregnant a week before your period. It is possible, however, to get pregnant a week before you think your period is due. A woman ovulates about 2 weeks before her next period. So by the time you're a week before your period actually would have been (not expected), the egg is long dead. (This is true if ovulation is less than 10 days before your next period.) If you only had sex 3 weeks before your period was due and 1 week before it was due, you probably got pregnant a week before, because neither is possible if your period would have been when you expected it, and longer-than-usual cycles are more likely than shorter-than-usual ones.", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOD7TZ": "Midline shift Midline shift is a shift of the brain past its center line. Midline shift is often associated with high intracranial pressure (ICP), which can be deadly. In fact, midline shift is a measure of ICP presence of the former is an indication of the latter. Immediate surgery may be indicated when there is a midline shift of over 5 mm. Methods of Detection Doctors detect midline shift using a variety of methods. Structures of the Midline Three main structures are commonly investigated when measuring midline shift. Midline Shift in Diagnoses Midline shift measurements and imaging has multiple applications. Dental midline The dental midline is the midsagittal line of maxillary and mandibular dental arches possessing teeth of ideal size, shape, and position, when situated in maximum intercuspation. I had an elastic from my upper right canine to lower left canine -- yes, crossed diagonally. The intention was to fix my midline.", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBLZI1Y": "I think it may be a hemorrhoid- they're little blood vessels that pop when you (no joke) poop too hard. They probably hurt a lot, and so you should go to the doctor to see if they are hemorrhoids. Anyway, I think that's completely normal, but I'm not 100 sure.If it's in your scrotum.....then maybe you should see a doctor.", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LTP7D": "Sunshine.I think I might have an answer. 20  of women can tell when they are ovulating. Pain in the lower left abdominal area most often suggests a problem in the lower colon, where food waste is expelled.", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17P50A": "I was sitting at my computer one day in March of 2011 , and I read an article written by . In the article he was talking about how to lose weight and he said cutting out just 100 calories a day could result in dropping . I had been diagnosed with cervical cancer in December 2010 , and I figured the healthier my body was the more likely I was to beat the cancer .", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT49R0": "It's a gel kind, because the glands under my arms are often swollen and ... you not want to look at people ('Peanut, why won't you play with Auntie? ... So, blogosphere, what kind of crazy is happening in your world? The problem resolved when I started going to a fancy (read: very ..... What SFBA said, or set alarms on your phone to remind you, or do it .... That's why I started taking allegra, so that my eyelids would swell so... Feb 18, 2013 ... My eye stung ?? the same sensation as when soap gets in your eye, but ... Friends were more direct ?? 'What on earth has happened? .... If your eyelids are swollen, this is also a sign of a severe infection. ... Believe it or not after 5 children all going through that toddler stage, not ..... but my son is still breathing, six years later, so I guess he's okay. ... Our downstairs bathroom has a hook eye loc...", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLHAGEM": "Split my gums on accident flossing, went to the dentist and now he has all my front gums sore from HIM flossing them too hard!!", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWR8CMW": "When you hit the bottom, release the penis. Meanwhile, bring your other hand to the top of the penis and repeat. Bookends Place both of your hands side by side against his shaft like a pair of bookends.", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V5YLPI": "It's normal, but disturbing, nonetheless  you can take feel a persons pulse most anywhere on the body. If you are doing lower body, and if they did not feel that way, you would not be working out hard enough.", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V75V4L": "http://www.amazon.com/How-Think-About-Weird-Things/ dp/007287953X/sr  1-1 / qid  1163282227/ref  pdbbssr1 / 104-5137931-5751100? ie  UTF8  s  books Do not click on link. Without a subject there is no beginning of course so that would be your first step.", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZTA7I": "... They at one time ate their little ones after giving birth to them, ... The great black leader and revolutionary, Malcolm X, was a member of the Nation .... Name's usually Jamal or Jaleel .... Thats how you thank the people who created you. It was Cassius X. The rejection of ??lay?? horrified his parents, ... ?ll of a sudden,?? she recalls, ? ?hey were breaking their necks, trying ... a fight at Madison Square Garden soon after his name change, Harry?.... I'm not American but there are many 'typical' names I can explain just by asking .... And here I was thinking, why did she get the name 'Honda Prius? .... I believe that's why Malcolm Little called himself Malcolm X. Although he received mostly rejection letters in return, a handful of his stories were ... Jones and Malcolm X. After concluding his 1963 interview with Malcolm X , ... from Africa to America as slaves, and then their rise from slavery to freedom.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMTKD3": "Sure, use protection (condom).", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6V08LN": "you need to start going to exercise like going to the gym and ask a trainer to give you the exercises that you need to do for getting your thighs smaller The best way to lose fat from the thighs is to lose fat overall. Overweight thighs can only be reduced by restricting ...read more The best exercise for thigh reduction involves burning off the fat while firming and toning. Which in any case do show some changes, but I have found that the best way to work out your legs and...read more For years I struggled with my thighs. When I was young I was very thin except for the fact that I had cellulite on my thighs. Don't cheat yourself and quit after thirty sec...read more The best way to lost weight and tone your thighs is to do some lunges and squats. wall sits find a straight wall. I've had ...read more Best for thighs, calves, arms, stomach, neck and derriere and is gentle to the body Callanetics. Also known as the stationary bike, this machine allows you to shed weight, flatten y...read more", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U261Q": "Flex coloured pasties that go over breasts to provide women some modesty, as well as ones that (forgive my inability to sound informed) female monthly product pads that cover the vagina. Not to mention there are tons of flesh coloured undies. Wow. thats not embarrassing at all! Do actors enjoy doing sex scenes? I have never met an actress or actor who is stoked for these scenes. Never. Not even the lecherous ones that hit on anything that moves. Its not fun business. What if the male actor gets excited? Youd think itd be hard not to get a boner, but its relatively easy not too. Its a totally different situation when youre being told how to lay, youve been on set 7 hours, lunch was an hour ago and it was chilly, the room youre in is 100 degrees, theres 10 people all exhausted and expecting you to perform and get it right the first time so they can move on. Its its all about the girl in the scene, and every time you miss a mark, you have to do it again.", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHXRSX": "Updated March 2000 For more information on the The Harvard School of Public Health College Alcohol Study, click here.Jump to: Main Nutrition Action About CSPI Alcohol Policy Biotechnology Canada Donate to CSPI!Eating GreenFood Safety Nutrition Policy Integrity in Science International Newsroom Take Action!", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX73A6": "very solid. The melting point of coconut oil is generally between 72-76 degrees depending on the quality of the oil. Therefore it remains in a hardened state in homes throughout many months of the year. I have bent countless spoons trying to scrape off peels of delicious coconut oil from the mass lingering at the bottom of the jar. While this doesnt say much for the quality of my flatware, it also speaks to the fact that using this everyday as a moisturizing cream can be somewhat of an overwhelming routine. While you have options to heat up the jar of coconut oil in warm water to liquefy, rub hardened coconut oil in hands before applying or search for a high-temperature spot in your house (like certain cabinets or closets), remember to NEVER microwave your coconut oil (or anything, but that's beside the point) in preparation. I know it's a tempting inconvenience, but the wonderful, delicate balance of this natural gem will become quickly destroyed.", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEAO3P": "I don't understand what you're saying", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1HKBW": "http://www.akc.org/reg/litterstats.cfm This gives you the total LITTERS registered with the AKC for 2006. I doesn't give you the total number of dogs. On a gross level. It should give you what you want. You'll have to go through all 155 breeds to get your number.", "3S4TINXCC0LSJKSVDHQUHLM796QBO6": "Well, is there any reason you don't want your new doctor to see your medical records? If you don't consent to release your records from the old doctor even if you do tell him that you are seeing a new doctor he can't show the new doc the records. The only way the new doc can see your med record is if you sign a consent form at your old doctor's place.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5DCHR": "still better than nothing", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXT18V5": "Yes it is possible for you to experience soreness on one side and not the other during the eruption process. The best thing to do is see your dentist so he or she can take x-rays to determine if your wisdom teeth are in the proper position to erupt without complications.", "3QREJ3J433VL62TS62NVO7131VRKLF": "I know it 's the only thing that saved my life . '' was written quickly by Williams in April 1936 in order to meet the deadline for a one-act play contest sponsored by the Webster Groves Theatre Guild in was performed by the Guild on October 13 , 1936 , to positive reviews . The play tells the story of a young artist and his ex-actress wife living in a slum that they refer to as their  magic tower , '' following them as their optimism gradually fades .", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDLF3W": "To review, symptoms for all influenza strains are typically similar, including fever, sore throat, cough, congestion, headaches and body aches. Occasionally, there may be some nausea or vomiting, but not that often. Flu-like symptoms seem to begin with general malaise and then develop over the next 12-24 hours until you just feel miserable. There is some confusion now about sore throats and the difference between a sore throat with the flu, which is due to a viral infection, and strep throat, which is a bacterial infection. As for most things in life, nothing is 100 percent and the same goes for viral and bacterial sore throats. That being said, there are certain things that might make a parent consider a viral sore throat over strep throat, and vice versa. Viral sore throats are typically associated with other viral symptoms, which include cough and upper respiratory symptoms like congestion or runny nose. A viral sore throat may or may not be accompanied by a fever.", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI65YI9": "Try some NSAIDs or ibuprofen if the pain bothers you , but always make sure you re treating the toe as the number one priority . Broken joints are extremely tender and react to any sort of touch . I stumbled an had my big toe hurt really bad , the feeling was numb , cold and touch was a bit painful too . the pain persisted for several days an even weeks .", "3O71U79SRBN303OLBNXCF672IUUMS0": "Thomas byles did not survive the titanic Thomas byles did not survive the titanic Minor edit? Bo Svenson QA Actor: Star of 'Inglorious Basterds' and 'Kill Bill: Vol. 2' In 1978 you played Lt. Robert Yeager in 'The Inglourious Bastards,' and then made a cameo in Tarantino's 2009 film 'Inglourious Basterds' as a tribute to your previous role. Whose idea was it to do a cameo? What was the experience like? What would you like to do? Flag How did Rose survive the Titanic disaster? When Jack and Rose were forced to jump into the water, Jack found a wooden door floating and helped Rose to lie on it. Later, Rose was saved by the men who came from the other  rescue boats and was placed on another boat to America. (MORE) 8 people found this useful What would you like to do? Flag Don Dfoofnik 1,115,460 Contributions There are three kinds of answers: ones that are mostly right, ones that are mostly wrong, and those that once were right but now are wrong. Answered  51 others found this useful Wh", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZU158": "I think that i may have answered your other question, I don't really care too much as long as i recive the 2 points and then hopefully the 10 as well. Still a question. A QUESTION IS ALWAYS A QUESTION IF IT EVER WAS A QUESTION REGARDLESS OF WHETHER OR NOT IT ANSWERS ITSELF.", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5AN9ZT": "It makes me feel bad , so please , if you would consider donating do n't hesitate to ask for art in return . So , sort of a pay want you want commission . I 'm really in need of help , but even if you just take the time to read this and just wish me well in a comment or note that would be great .", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMEU7ED": "Sounds like you you might want to take some magnesium - maybe potassium too. That might really help. NOW Foods has a pretty good magnesium pill - Reverse Ratio 2:1 - it has more magnesium than calcium. Take three of those before bed. Extra potassium you can get out of quot. No-Saltquot. which they sell at the store - shake that on your food. These are really important minerals. something to think about is sleep apnea. It's being discovered all over the place, and it's pretty deadly. When you're asleep you're choking all night (snoring often times). And over time this will tear your heart to pieces. By morning, your heart could be in a panic for oxygen. But of course you don't think that because when you wake up, you breathe normally and think everything is OK. It's something to think about anyway because it will damage the heart pretty severely.", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J9353": "try aloe vera lotion or eating vitamin E that really helps even rubbing the oil on the bruises.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXCJCY": "The only thing that kept me from going to the ER every month due to being in agony was being prescribed Morphine XR for daily pain , and oxycodone for breakthrough pain experienced during my cycle . These medications , along with acupuncture , allowed me to function , until I was able to get a surgery , which lasted 4.5 hours .", "3X52SWXE0X3JYYT3I3DZ9Z5BUTPWCA": "After the active recovery week , you should go ahead and test all those PR numbers that you recorded before you started the program . If you follow these guidelines carefully , you could add 90-100 pounds to your 20-rep max squat in just over two months . Trust me when I say you will be improving all aspects of your conditioning by trying this working for just 2 months .", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE71B9P": "VENISON SUMMER SAUSAGE     4 lb. ground venison 2 tbsp. coarse cracked pepper 2 tsp. mustard seed 1 tsp. garlic powder 1/2 tsp. red pepper 1 tsp. onion powder 1 tsp. celery seed 5 tbsp. tender quick salt 1/2 tsp. liquid smoke 2 c. cold water  Assemble seasonings in water and let set for 1 hour. Add to meat, mix thoroughly. Shape into flour logs and refrigerate 24 hours. Bake on cookie sheet at 250 degrees for 3-4 hours or until done. I use the website www.cooks.com to find recipes, that is where I found this recipe.", "3PIOQ99R7YKPXY1PCT7C7MEQ8HRUNQ": "There is a lot of recent research that suggests that the roots of anorexia are genetic...having a family member with an eating disorder increases the likelyhood of you having an eating disorder. I don't know how tall you are but regardless this weight sounds too low. The term anorexic means not eating, which anyone may be anorexic from time to time, but the eating disorder is actually called anorexia nervosa, which you may want to look up and see if the symptoms fit your eating habits. There is a good chance that she could end up with an eating disorder. but if she is practicing good eating habits now and they are working for her then she should be fine as long as they keep working. Theres nothing wrong no matter what age you are to start exercising and eating right...it doens't mean that she will develop an eating disorder. Unless you see her throwing up after eating, obsessing that shes 'too fat' or something or you notice she's not eating at all...then I wouldn't worry at all.", "3ZC62PVYDH8MQW9OJ458PV4S4DGXX3": "This Site Might Help You. RE: How to treat algae ... t see the fish. I tried changing half of the water and ... How can i remove green algae from my tank?", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAWKY8": "Our dentist also told us it was too early to try to do something, but he did give us a time-line of 3 months after which he would pull the tooth if it hadn't fallen out, but it did fall out before the 3 months was up.", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPOUEZ": "now i earn 25.00 an hour, married a hot green eyed blond, own 2 cars, a house, live with 3 dogs, 3 cats, a rat, a fish, and a murder of crows. funny what America can offer those that are not afraid to dream, huh? One of my favorite job stories was at Starbucks.", "3NBFJK3IOHGOA106T3I8IWD4PJJOG1": "With its own stores in Berlin, Aarhus and Copenhagen as well as an on-line store, Wood Wood is directed by co-founders Karl-Oskar Olsen and Brian SS Jensen fyfytfyfj. As a sub-cultural founded lifestyle brand, its founders grew up with graffiti and street culture in the 90s where style was key. They mix high fashion, sports and streetwear with youth culture, art and music creating the best possible product balanced between style and function.", "39KMGHJ4RZ86WGX2DGRU73U6KZD00J": "I tried that once too, and that happened. it looked like I had acne, or cold sores (is it cold or cole??) I haven't done anything to my upper lip sence but if I did again, I would try stuff like nair or go to a solan and get it done professionally. if you used something like nair, it would stop the pores from getting irritated like that, cuz I think its the pulling the skin with the wax that causes that.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082KU7D": "Because we're arrogant son's a . :D", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JIA4ZT": "  ? ?     ' '         a a     ' '   b b       c c         d d       ' ' e e       ( ( f f       ) ) g g         h h         i i       , , j j       - - k k       . l l       / / m m       0 0 n n       1 1 o o       2 2 p p       3 3 q q       4 4 r r       5 5 s s       6 6 t t       7 7 u u       8 8 v v       9 9 w w       : : x x         y y         z z                           ? It is a seriously endangered language the last strongholds of this language are the municipalities of Snsa and Hattfjelldal in Norway.", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJZMGF": "After you remove the teeth whitening strips there will be excess residue on your teeth left over form the gel from the whitening strips. As the whitening gel gets to work it foams up (which is the oxidation process that whitens your teeth) so it will spread out across your teeth. The best thing to do is to gently brush away the gel from your teeth using a soft toothbrush and your normal daily toothpaste - this will remove the left over whitening gel and freshen up your mouth.", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QXY7H": "slapshot  Sounds like they are on their way mine have been coming through for about a year or more and are very painful when eating at times other times they are fine.Sarah S  Achey jaw and saw gums, sounds probable.Good Luck.", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G667R": "A glance at the map -- remembering that the world is round like a ball ! -- will show that no place is literally at the world 's centre  this is just a way of expressing how important Mecca is in Muslim faith . Muslims say that Adam and Even ( Hawwa ) first built the Kaaba -- a flat roofed stone , estimated to be 50 feet high , and 35 feet broad by 40 feet deep .", "3NKW03WTLM5NSZ3MNLEUT4USY8OQW7": "RASPBERRY TEA HELPS WITH PERIOD CRAMPS PASS IT ON", "3X4Q1O9UBHK5H8P500EECJ0BQG07OH": "Attribute: An attribute is the following Generally, an attribute is an abstraction characteristic of an entity In art an 'attribute' is an object that identifies a figure most commonly it refers to objects held by saints in religious paintings that indicate which saint is being represented. In database management and directory services, an attribute is a property inherent in an entity or associated with that entity for database purposes. In network management, an attribute is a property of a managed object that has a value.", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8J1HN": "This is a good question and I don't know why there are no answers to it. I can only give you my best judgments as I am no professional on this matter. But language must have a purpose but we as humans do not instinctively make our language work for the highest purpose. I believe deities, spirits or God will speak in languages that show true understanding, logic and definitions. But we as humans must use our language to follow the human will or the human psyche thus that will tend to abuse, demoralize and usually just insult. They will give explanations as that is what our intellect does but they will not be thorough or even exactly true because the human will and psyche does not manifest itself with truth, logic and 'sense'. The human language is made to follow the rules dictated by the brain and the environment  and often this is a low morality with a low understanding to the point that it will lie or abuse instead of telling you the truth. Language has a true purpose of explaining", "3VO4XFFP15K82K2LFD6I1OVB5HEQ74": "Good Omens by Neil Gaiman and Terry Pratchett. This Book is hilarious, I bought it, read it twice, loaned it to one of my regulars (I am a bartender) who also read it twice, and then loaned it to a coworker. :-RRB- I hope your daughters get to read some of these this summer.", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLHGW4": "i don't think 'peeing' is a type of orgasm. however, when a woman has an orgasm, it feels as if she needs to pee, when in reality it's just a general feeling building up to the climax. a woman is able to squirt liquid from her g-spot, but it's rare. a woman generally gets wet and provides natural lubrication. but i read somewhere when a woman squirts, it can go very far distances. real talk, haha.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV7L2W": "I will try to make simple the decay process. Too much sugar? Nope. You can eat all the sugar you want.... you just have to eat it quickly! and not go back for more too soon! Bacteria do nothing in your mouth until they have sugar. Different sugars do make a bit of difference but for the most part the bacteria immediately begin using sugar as soon as they are fed. They also store about a 1/2 hour supply. So, upon getting sugar they begin to metabolize it and do what they do best with the energy...divide in half over and over again. During this time there are waste products produced. Most notable is lactic ACID which softens teeth by removing MINERALS from them. If the sugar exposure is stopped, the acid production will stop within about a half hour when the stores are used up and the acid slowly dilutes out of the plaque. The softened teeth will just as readily harden back up using minerals floating around and actually may become harder than before the acid attack if less soluable miner", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J54PA": "The hope is that these new guidelines will allow school children to learn how to make healthy eating choices , and how to embrace nutrition as part of their life choices . These changes went into effect for the 2012-2013 school year . Today , the National School Lunch Program operates in over 101,000 public and non-profit private schools and residential care institutions . Regulated and administered at the federal level by the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture ( USDA ) , it currently provides nutritionally balanced , low-cost or free lunches to children across the nation .", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBK5BU": "With that said, here is my best answer to the common question of vaginal discharge. A normal vaginal discharge consists of about a teaspoon (4 ML) a day that is white or transparent, thick to thin, and odorless. This is formed by the normal bacteria and fluids the vaginal cells put off.", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZHV9F": "As for your dogs , you can bring 2 dogs per family to Egypt as long as you are a resident and the regulations listed on this page are met : http : //www.pettravel.com/immigration/egypt.cfm Hello , I am planning for a week long travel to Egypt , I want to bring my dog with me ( 4 months old Lab ) . He is current on all vaccinations . So , it will be like bringing in the dog and taking out the dog of Egypt , dint se any information about taking the dog out of Egypt . Can you please let me know the process , . Thanks , Abhinav Abhinav - we are very familiar with import requirements for pets entering countries .", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1SJNI": "Yes...something animals get usually when there in a kennel!", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3MEMS": "Try putting a little bit of cod liver oil into his foodDon't use more than a spoonful or two over a bowl of dry or wet food once a day, but cod liver oil can work wonders to make a pet's coat more healthy and ease dry skin. And your cat will probably love the taste and smell of it, too.", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYPVMF": "new string noise, some love it some hate it. even after wikipedia and so on I couldn't get a straight answer , it goes away after a week and is probably due to the windings on the strings. I think guitar strings sound bright when new, because they are clean. As the strings get dirty, corroded the sound dulls. Washing your hands before playing and wiping down the strings after playing helps prolong their bright sound. Or if you buy coated strings (Elixir brand) they last a lot longer.", "39KMGHJ4RZ86WGX2DGRU73U6KZA00G": "At the ARIA Music Awards of 1989, 1927 won 'Breakthrough Artist - Single' for 'That's When I Think of You' and 'Breakthrough Artist - Album' for '...ish'. At the ARIA Music Awards of 1989, 1927 won 'Breakthrough Artist - Single' for 'That's When I Think of You' and 'Breakthrough Artist - Album' for '...ish'. Gift certificates are really good... but im 13 and i always like opening big things... so on my list i put 'clothes' and stuff. I also want a cheap-ish digital camera (you can get one for like 50 bucks), some perfume, and a new bathrobe. The largest furry convention is Anthrocon which is held each year in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. Artists may also trade art between each other using sketchbooks. Conventions with significant numbers of fursuiters may offer an event known as the 'furry games', 'furry races', or 'critterlympics'. Others come for the programming, or to meet friends or other furry fans in general. Sales of such accessories form a part of the commerce at furry conventi...", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FM49E": "They're livebearers - you just try STOPPING them from breeding!! You can tell the female is pregnant by a black spot just further forward of her anal fin. This is called the gravid spot. The darker and larger that spot is, the closer she is to delivery (and obviously, she'll look fatter than the others). This will take around a month or so. DO NOT do anything to disturb her during the pregnancy - any stress she suffers can result in her aborting the pregnancy. You'll have to wait a few weeks to be able to tell which are female and which are male. There are a few things to bear in mind when breeding guppies: 1. They put rabbits to shame when it comes to breeding. 2. They're best kept in a ratio of 1 male to 2 or 3 females - which means it's best if you get 2 more females. The reason why it's best keeping them in this ratio is because the male will harass the female to death - literally - because of his need to father young. Because you have 3 males and 4 females, 3 of the females are...", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8N1HR": "The first versions of the Echoplex were manufactured in the late ? ?50s by Market Electronics , of Cleveland , and were roughly based on the tape-echo circuitry built into Ray Butts?? EchoSonic amp , which he built for Scotty Moore , Chet Atkins , Carl Perkins , and others in the ? ?50s . The unit? ?s reputation ( and availability ) caught fire , though , when manufacture was moved to Harris-Teller , of Chicago , with marketing and distribution under the Maestro wing of the Gibson family .", "3YLPJ8OXX8BVSULEZT33SK7UBIFX4S": "Recruiter said to deny having Lasik Page Title Module Posts: 688 FONT'Franklin Gothic Medium'SIZE'3'Rest? IBHA!/B/I There's plenty of time for rest in the grave. --Conan the Barbarian/SIZE/FONT May 2nd, 2013, 08:36 AM Re: Recruiter said to deny having Lasik Originally posted by Mr.Incognito View Post Yes..they can. How many ophtamoligists (spelling..sorry)..work at MEPS...0, zero, and or none. Perhaps not at MEPS but maybe somewhere else. Case in point: I've got really, really screwed up eyes--scar tissue in my retinas from Uveitis. I got past MEPS--nobody cared. I got past reception downrange--A few eyebrows were raised but ultimately nobody cared. I ran into a G.I. Opthamologist at another undisclosed reception battalion. He took one look at my eyes, then he introduced himself as a full fledge Opthamologist blah, blah, blah. He was on the verge of pulling the plug when I had a very long conversation with him. In so many words I convinced him that since I was only pa", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G94W6": "Honey, I'm assuming U R fit, so I've done search:- WEB RESULTS 1.How to do the Splits Cheerleading FAQ: How to do the Splits, from your About Cheerleading Guide . Gymnastics and Tumbling Skills and Abilities How to do the Splits . - 28k - Cached 2.How to Do The Box (Front) Splits wikiHow article about How to Do The Box (Front) Splits. not used to doing the splits. www.wikihow.com/Do-The-Box-(Front)-Spl. lexibility exercises, how to do the splits and doing the splits, stretch classes, . www.jumpanddance.com/stretch.htm - 43k - Cached 4.How to Do Side Splits - wikiHow wikiHow article about How to Do Side Splits. How to Do the Splits. How to Perform Splits. With Ukrainian singer Assol (Learn how to do the splits) . Learn how to do the splits (3)- stretching. How to Do Forward Rolls in Beginner Gymnastics. - 30k - Cached 9.How to Do Splits for Cheerleading  eHow.com How to Do Splits for Cheerleading. and i wanna learn how to do a toe touch. soo will doing the splits help with that? - 32k - Cach", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTAQZBT": "It depends on what type of accounts and how high you're aiming for your lawn service. There were a few things a buddy of mine and I tried out in high school. We'd simply drive around on a Saturday and approach people working in their yards that were in need of a mow. We charged a low initial rate (like 15 or 20) and got 90 or more of the people say yes. We'd leave them our names and numbers and told them to give us a call and that the price would be 25 - 30 next time. About 10 of the people called back. Once we got a yard, we were often approached by their neighbors. We found out that a lot of people really don't like to mow their lawns. Soon we'd have several 4-5 yard clusters and we made decent money.When we were feeling really ambitious we cold called real estate agents and asked them if they had any listings that needed a mow. That generated some extra business for us. We were pulling down a few hundred bucks a week and setting our own schedules more or less. Not bad work for", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK3003UJ": "SL successfully wipeout terrorism bt still we hav nt,its gud 2 learn", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G3DSA": "Do you feel crazy because others have told you that your crazy? My guess is that you have been told all your life about how wrong you are in descision making.", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SH4G5": "Just ate raisin bran... I hate raisin bran", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS7AZB": "Following this diet for a long period of time can also cause Vitamin B12 deficiency. There is no scientific evidence that it kills cancer cells, slows disease progression, or provides any other medical benefit to cancer patients. I learned about alternative cancer treatments. It is well known that post-menopausal women who have not had a hysterectomy are at increased risk of cancer of the endometrium (the lining of the womb) if they take estrogen-only HRT. In particular, an estimation of the overall effect of HRT use on three common cancers in women: breast cancer, endometrial (womb) cancer and ovarian cancer. Together, these cancers account for about 4 in 10 cancers in women in the UK. Research examining breast cancer incidence trends in Sweden between 1997 and 2007, showed that the prevalence of HRT use in women aged 5059 years decreased from a peak of 36 in 1999 to 9 in 2007, a parallel decrease in incidence of breast cancer was also reported between 2003 and 2007.", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y9WIC": "Broad Breasted White The Broad Breasted White is commercially the most widely used breed of domesticated turkey. These birds have shorter breast bones and larger breasts, sometimes rendering them unable to breed without human assistance (typically via artificial insemination). These birds are grown in large, fully automated grow-out barns, which may house as many as 10,000 birds. The growing process for these birds has been so well refined, the birds often grow to larger than 50 lbs. Between 1996 and 2001, women were invited to join the Million Women Study when they received their invitation to attend breast screening at one of 66 participating NHS Breast Screening Centres in the UK. Results of the study show a small increase in risk of ovarian cancer in women taking HRT. A recent report assessing breast cancer incidence in Belgium between 2007 and 2008 also showed a significant drop in breast cancer incidence attributed to the decrease in HRT use in Belgium during and leading up 20...", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPRL1D": "However, if you already have a fat belly, the best option is to follow a healthy weight loss diet, combined with fitness exercises such as aerobics (to burn extra calories) and a stomach-toning workout to help tighten and strengthen abdominal muscles. That said, reducing a fat stomach takes time - especially if you are an apple-shape. Despite what commercials say, there is no diet-plan or type of exercise that can 'target' your fat stomach.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5AHCT": "I have also told my kids that when they begin getting out of bed on their own in the morning, then they can have a later bedtime (just a little bit later).I hope that this helps.Good luck!", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY8E24": "Why Im Pro-Vaccine But Oppose Mandatory Vaccination Laws http://t.co/7uKBMiEMCo", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KYVDY": "give the dog pedialite, it will help. if need be call a 24 hr vet for more info.", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X48LX7": "It is not unusual. The effects of the Depo shot can take a while to wear off, several months for some people. Opinion 2: try goin to see your obgyn doc,he may put ya on a birth control to help your flowing,   Opinion 3: Well a day late is a common thing to have happen in fact even later than that is a common thing. Stress can throw off how late a period may be. 3 days is a very short period, consider yourself lucky the average is 5-8 days. Hormonal changes can also effect the heaviness of one's period. If someone goes on medication that can also effect it. If it was your first time having sex you may have even broken your hymen. It doesn't sound to me like your pregnant because that wouldn't cause a period to be longer. Someone who is pregnant may have spotting but they don't get their period. If you haven't been using protection or another type of birth control or you had a condom break then go ahead and take a test but it doesn't sound like your pregnant.", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZRP1E": "Damn son............ that sux! Maybe she'd want another dog. See if you can find an older dog at the pound or something. I feel bad for both of you.... her cuz she lost her baby and you for your guilty feelings. I don't think it's illegal for the dog choking to death in your care, okay, maybe you shouldn't give a dog a bone like that but I don't feel you meant any malice. Hmmmm I don't know which would be worse for me, knowing my dog was dead or thinking it's somewhere lost, scared and hungry.", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJAYZ9": "It means that it is cancer.Im sure your step mom knows this.I dont know how old you are and why she wouldnt explain what is being done.You need to talk to her.Ive had breast cancer twice on the same side.The first time was 17 years ago.I had my breast removed but they left a small amount of breast and I developed cancer again in 2004.They removed it and said they got it all.I had radiation and now I take a pill one time a day for the next five years.Their very smart today much more then they were when I got breast cancer the first time.Have faith. My breasts were always pretty big (36D) but pretty much the same size. When I got pregnant they got HUGE and my left breast was noticeably smaller (at least to me).", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDX1AG": "The diligent student needs to to be cautious when looking up definitions of a specific word in Greek lexicons and using the definition to amplify or interpret the meaning of that word in a specific verse.If the definition you choose makes the verse more difficult to understand, then you have probably chosen a definition that is not 'compatible with' the context of the verse you are studying.Let me give you an example of how context affects the meaning of the Greek word.", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6JO95": "What about Physical Therapy? a TENS unit? Massage therapy? ESI (epidural steroid injection)? Nerve blocks? How many different types of pain medications has the doctor tried? In only 3 months, I can't imagine that all of the pain medication options have been tried. Has the doctor prescribed anti-inflamatories? Long-acting narcotic pain medication? Short-acting narcotic pain medication? Anticonvulsants or antidepressants? (which work to relieve nerve-related pain) Muscle relaxers? What about medication combinations? Many chronic pain patients take some combination of long-acting, short-acting,. If the doctor has tried narcotic pain meds - did the doctor try different narcotics? There are different narcotic medications (long ans short acting) that have different base medications in them. I would suggest going to see a pain management specialist, trying different medications in different combinations, and giving other treatments a try (and giving them time to work effectively). Good luck!", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE6X5T": "im ignoring cause I'm an insta swap type of guy ?", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMK8C5": "ummm...how can i put this? know how to use your hands and mouth and you may pull it off without your size mattering at all.but if you got it umm short and thin and you don't know how to use your hands and mouth, well then sorry buddy! all you gotta do is know how to make up for what YOU KNOW you lack in size. you can always ask her where and how she wants to be touched and kissed but you better be willing to do it. the best lover i have had is not all that big but i can't seem to get enough of him it's always great when im with him,--always baby!! get to work", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AM5MH": "Hi,i found a lump at the end of my penis shaft near the pubic bone and it moves.it stands out when erect Youre in good hands, meet ATDs founding physicians. Dr. Suneel Sharman CMO ATD Health Network Inc. Adjunct Professor at U Of T Dr. Kunaal Jindal Director ATD Health Network Inc. Fellowship Training Atlanta, GA I have a small red bump on my mid stomach I have a small red bump on my mid stomach and i popped it and it has been bleeding almost non stop for about 13 or so hours. every time it does stop bleeding, the slightest movement of the bandage i have on it causes it to start bleeding again. wh... My son is just under 6 months old, and was My son is just under 6 months old, and was born with a small skin tag on the front of his left ear. He has no hearing problems and is very healthy, but I am concerned that because of the tag, he may have a kidney problem. I have been a type 1 di... Hi , My aunt moved into our house one year Hi , My aunt moved into our house one year ago . About", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNXHXU": "Several people encarcerated in a POW camp in the aftermath of their radio being discovered and destroyed by the guards. One person has been taken away for punishment. Slowly, those left realise they must have been betrayed by one of their own number and with accusation and counter-accusation they try to work who the traitor is and why they did it.", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC33OEJ": "You always have to have a mammogram, every year, and its more important as you age, because the incidence of breast cancer increases with age, so that if a woman gets to the age of 85, she will have a 1 in 7 risk of breast cancer. So, a woman has to continue doing mammograms forever. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 434 of 514 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer Read the Original Article: At What Age Can I Stop Getting Mammograms?", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTP0KSU": "Sometimes I try to do things, and it just doesn't work out the way I wanted to. You know, you need to maybe get away and like maybe you should talk about it, you'll feel a lot better I go: No it's okay, you know I'll figure it out, just leave me alone I'll figure it out. I don't want to talk about it. I'm not crazy (being institutionalized) You're the one who's crazy (being institutionalized) You're driving me crazy (being institutionalized) They stuck me in an institution Said it was the only solution to give me the needed professional help to protect me from the enemy, myself I was in my room and I was like just sitting there staring at the wall thinking about everything but then again I was thinking about nothing And my mom came in and I didn't even realize she was there and she calls my name but I didn't even hear it, and she started screaming BUDDY! BUDDY! And I go: What, what's the matter? And she goes: What's the matter with you? I go:. I'll probably get hit by a car anyway.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4JEQF": "If the block doesn't slide, then it is acted on by the static frictional force, fs, which exactly balances the mg sin? component of the object's weight.", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWR9CMX": "Well, there has been better living conditions, a population growth increase, and doctors have technology and knowledge to save people. Hope I helped.", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51QYCC": "Because silly stereotypes abound.", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLMRVX": "I'm a mom on a mission... to help YOU provide nutritious food and a healthy lifestyle for your family, even on a budget (and you can do it without any more time or ... I? ?e written before about how teeth can be remineralized and cavities can heal (contrary to common belief). I was highly skeptical when I first read about this, but ... Illegal Mining. If you research areas where others have found gold and where mines have been abandoned which will still harbor gold that you may find useful, you may ... Update: Prof Ian Enting from University of Melbourne has provided a detailed, point-by-point critique of Heaven and Earth. You can download the 46-page PDF here ... Terminology The Internet Messenger by Buky Schwartz in Holon. See also: Capitalization of 'Internet' The Internet, referring to the specific global system of ... Sonic the Hedgehog (??????????????????? ?, Sonikku za Hejjihoggu?, born June 23) is the title character and main protagonist of the Sonic the ...", "3N7PQ0KLI5N14YBT4A8SUQUHHC7E3E": "I have a 3 year old male basset. He has an odor, but it's not Stinky, it's almost like tortilla chips actually. I actually enjoy the way he smells. Now if he gets into something or goes swimming then he stinks. I bathe 1x a month, making sure to keep his ears clean and dry, alot of odor can come from their ears. They are prone to ear infections because of the floppiness of their ears so they must be kept clean so that they don't stink. I really never noticed the smell until I heard about it from other people. If your houndie is kept clean and dry the smell isn't noticable. They are wonderful dogs to have (not that I'm biased :D)  Be sure to check out your local rescue or breeder.I also posted a link of a web page that has everything to do with Bassets including the rescues for each state.", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL0096LY": "TOKYO (AP)  The government and the ruling Liberal Democratic Party began working Saturday on a 4 trillion yen (dlrs 29 billion) tax-cut plan to jump-start Japan's struggling economy, a news report said. The meetings, reported by Kyodo News agency, came one day after Prime Minister Ryutaro Hashimoto said for the first time that he would support permanent income tax cuts. The report, which cited unidentified officials, said the government and the LDP were considering two plans.", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDVWJL": "This is called bruxism. You probably need a grind guard. I have one myself! They sell these over the counter in many drug stores, or you could have your dentist make one for you. Insurance often covers them. Mine was made at the dentist. Grinding your teeth can lead to dental and jaw problems, you should ask you dentist about it when you see one next. Every time I see my dentist he asks notices it  - like, whoa your teeth are grinded down flat! I hope you're wearing your grind guard these days or you won't have any teeth left in a decade...", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9CGNC": "It continued to grow to size of a golf ball. Our vet put a syringe into it  drew out 4 syringes of blood. She sent to pathologist  came back as non-cancerous. Its continued to grow almost back to same size. Were concerned that he has cancer, but not diagnosed yet. Is there anything else that needs to be done??? Thank you for any help you may be able to offer. aaron I noticed today my pup (whippet) has a soft lump on his left shoulder, he had hes jabs last week, gona get it checkd tomoro, bt hopefuly its what susan had , Chase Doesnt anyone WONDER WHY DOGS are getting CANCER? Does anyone inspect dog food or dog drugs as causes?!?! Why are all you talking about dog cancer like it is normal, like its expected and nothing can be done but to hope it does not afflict your dog? It doesnt matter if your dog food is insanely expensive, it matters what is in it. It matter if you filter your water for your dog.", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ1ZF0Z": "Could be conjunctivitis (pink eye) which is highly contagious, but not full blown yet. I could also be allergies and your cold could also be an allergy. If your over 18 go the pharmacy and get some over the counter antihistamine tablets and antihistamine eye drops. If these don't work in a day or so, I'd see you eye specialist.", "3R5LWXWHR06B4AEYUU54194X1NOGXY": "Frogs:   Pac-Man: This is probably one the largest frogs you can find on the market. They're really cheap and pretty easy to setup for as they can't climb and thus do well in a generic long tank with some substrate, a water bowl, a hide, and a heater, depending on your temperature. They really don't move unless there is food in the form of a mouse or insect, so not for you if you want some activity, although most amphibians aren't very active anyway. They need it really wet and a substrate like moss is probably better than coco fiber. Tomato: Also a pretty large terrestrial frog, they may be a bit more active, but still not too active. Their bright orange-red color is usually a selling point, but they're harder to find around local pet stores. Their requirements also aren't very much different than Pac-Man frogs. Green: Sort of the traditional tree frog, they need slightly more heating than normal and UVB lighting as they are diurnal. They are a lot smaller than other fro", "3ZRKL6Z1E8138TSZ0KZH21N5M8LGSP": "If possible you should check with a local veterinarian SKIN PROBLEMS, PARASITES and INSECTICIDES The following are brief descriptions of skin abnormalities:  lick sores - habitual licking at ankles, hocks and elbows there is also a condition that causes loss of feeling in the lower limbs...the dog may lick and chew his own flesh to the point of mutilation  ringworm - crusty, red round patches, usually seen in cats  warts - found anywhere on the body, face and limbs ulcerated moles may be cancerous  cysts - hard, round lumps varying in size usually roll under the skin, or more superficial may burst and drain on occasion  tumors - lumps under the skin which may or may not be malignant may are 'fatty' tumors which are not life-threatening, yet may require surgery if grow A tumor is a growth of tissue that is considered 'abnormal', usually resulting in a noticable 'lump' somewhere on the body. Examples include fatty tumors (tumors made of hard compacted fat) and malignant ...", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q3UFH": "Stress is the most common reason for teeth clenching. Dentists usually make the initial diagnosis on the patient by checking his or her teeth. And after a series of health questions, he should be able to formulate the assumption as to why a person grinds his or her teeth. If the dentist strongly thinks that the problem is caused by stress, then professional stress counseling may be requested. The dentist would then refer his patient to a stress therapy expert. Stress management is usually performed through total body relaxation achieved with meditation and exercise. However, if the problem is not too severe, a warm bath and a cup of milk or chocolate before bed should do the trick. For kids, try to ease out their fears and tensions by talking to them or reading them their favorite book a few minutes before bedtime.", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZSA7H": "Spend the money and take him to the vet now. You don't know if he's in pain or not. He could have a broken back. ouch! If that's the case I know it seems crazy but you may want an X-ray and pain meds. Maybe the doc can do something. Also you need to figure out how it happened because it could happen again. Have you been giving the water dragan vitamins. I know my friend had a huge iguana and she was giving it vitamins once a day.", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBJBPK": "go  wheat  free. No pasta, pizza, bread and so on. And no food  after  7  p.m. People achieve marvellous results with it. Depending on  your  initial  weight, you can drop upwards from 20 pounds a month. If  you  don't  eat  wheat then you don't eat all those sticky, fatty goey  cakes,  you  don't eat junk food, and you don't eat biscuits. But your  diet  is  still  balanced. It  costs  nothing, and you do not have to  calculate  points  or  to  buy special meals or plans. here is the list of foods, separated into 3 categories:  - good sources of protein   - good sources of carbs   - good sources of fat    Good Sources Of Protein   Chicken (without skin)   Turkey (without skin)   Lean cuts of beef   Lean cuts of pork   Lean cuts of lamb   Lean cuts of veal   Eggs   Egg whites   Tuna fish   Salmon   Shrimp   Lobster   Flounder   Sardines   Snapper   Swordfish   Trout   Crab   Clams   Scallops   Milk (2 or skim)   Cottage cheese (low fat on fat)   Yogurt (low fat on fat)   Tofu", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JUHOR": "Work it into your skin care routine 2-3 times per week for even more acne-fighting power! Home remedy for Acne using Orange peel Homemade Acne Treatment using Orange peel has been found very effective. Home Acne treatment using Garlic Garlic has been used successfully to cure acne. Garlic is known to have cured the toughest of acne problem. Acne can further be cured by eating three seeds of raw garlic once daily for a month. Acne treatment using Fenugreek Fenugreek is another useful remedy for acne. Avoid using moisturizers on acne-prone areas to get rid of pimples you have there or practice good acne prevention if you do use a moisturizer, make sure it is not acnegenic. Don't pick acne or blackheads on your face or body. It can permanently scar your skin. Sometimes the stress of having acne and trying to figure out how to get rid of pimples can make things worse. Since bacteria is one of the key causes of acne, anything that keeps bacteria from touching your skin will help in acne...", "3XU80RHWHZE4USX4FI1YV9AWIN744H": "I am not a doctor or a dentist. But I do know for a fact That grinding your teeth while asleep could mean you have parasites either from drinking dirty water or of course eating food cooked in unsanitary kitchens.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWLATV": "they should cut EMA though.. That was some bull", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBMBPN": "It may be a small bone fragment from the fracture. Being so small it may never be a problem however if it starts to bother you it may be worth checking out.", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMR2CV": "I just saw a picture of your dog on your profile page. He's handsome/beautiful. I love his rich chocolate coloring.", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555A96PV": "hairloss psoriasis thinning hair dandruff oily dry scalp sensitive skin. Just some problems I can treat.... http://t.co/fMQqqgtAh4", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA1OP0": "Someone at my gym recently was smelling strongly of that and the attendent didn't know what to do, so I looked this up not too long ago. The only macronutrient in your body that contains nitrogen is amino acids, the building blocks of protein. Your body uses amino acids for energy every day. When your body uses an amino acid for energy, it must convert the amino acid to a useable form of energy. Based on this explanation, it is clear that your sweat will smell like ammonia only if an excessive amount of amino acids are being used for energy, or you are not receiving adequate water. Since there is no direct metabolic pathway from fat to glucose, your body will use amino acids instead. The same goes for the ammonia smell - this is just the smell of amino acids being 'burned' in your body. You don't solve that by adding more amino acids. In that situation, it is advisable to consume 'sports drinks' or other sources of energy during the. An apple a day can help keep the ammonia smell away!", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEKKHA": "Heavy duty grades of neoprene rubber (like they use for wet suits) could do the trick. You can buy it from Seattle Fabrics -- check their website. You might also look at using the rubber in large truck tire inner tubes. BAG BAH BAN BAR BAT BAY BBC BBQ BED BEE BEG BEN BET BIB BID BIG BIN ... DIG DIM DIN DIP DIS DIY DJS DNA DOC DOE DOG DOH DON DOR ... LID LIE LIG LIP LIT LOB LOG LOO LOP LOT LOW LOX LPS LSD LUG LUV. The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Boy Scouts Book of Stories, by Various This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with almost no restrictions ... The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Art of Travel, by Francis Galton This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with almost no restrictions whatsoever. Some effort should be made to cover the signs of the work in a spiking operation. Again, the ideal spiking would take place several years before a timber sale, giving ...", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AQM52": "Yes, I would definitely say that anxiety could cause dizziness. Also, though, it does make me think of inner ear problems, as the other answerer said. I have some mild anxiety problems. ie, It's not all the time, and not severe when I have it. But, I've felt dizzy when I'm really stressed out. The thing that makes me think it's inner ear related is it's all the time, not just when you're really anxious. Ask your therapist he/she should know everything that anxiety causes, as well as some basic knowledge of inner ear problems.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5DHCW": "Good luck.Walter Riddle  April 22, 2013 at 6:17 pm  How about appeals that were denied, does this apply to video conferences?David Davis  April 28, 2013 at 10:15 am  Walter, Appeals are big problems for little minded men in charge.", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ7TCH": "If she will not listen and you feel that strongly about, just do it.", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQZ8NO": "I think she should look like a Jiang Shi since she is one, so pale (or blue/purple) skin, Chinese clothes, and a talisman on her face, but if you want her to look more human, then I think she should be a human skin color (still preferably pale) and dressed in a style of fashion that you're using for your theme, but she should still have the talisman on her body somewhere   Opinion 2: That's a cool idea for a story! I'd definitely read it if you get if published :). I don't think you should do the blond hair blue eyed angel type thing. Also her look depends a lot on her personality here are some examples you can use if you want: A bit loopy and eccentric: She could could have short spiky hair that's been dyed white/blond (sort of like this: http://pri4eski.files.wordpress.com/2009... OR go here: http://www.zimbio.com/ReallyCuteShort... and look at the bottom picture) with a streak of color in it or something. And very very short with mousy features and aquamarine eyes. Bad a and a", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ145L": "Hi, I lost 85 pounds five years ago so I can relate to what you're going through. I think you'll find this website helpful and not at all geared towards the 'already healthy' viewers. There are tons of weight loss tips, food and exercise logs (which I would recommend to you for motivational purposes), healthy recipes, motivational ideas, exercise ideas, etc. http://www.easy-weightloss-tips.com/  Congrats on your weight loss so far. I so remember what you're saying about no one noticing the weight loss. I was so heavy that I had to lose 30 pounds before anyone that didn't know I was dieting noticed and said, 'Are you losing weight?' After that first 30 though, people commented all the time and I was buying new clothes constantly as I went down through the sizes. A typical clothing size is 10 pounds, so once I got in 'normal' clothes, I was buying basics (black pants, jeans, khaki pants) to get me through to the next size. To be honest, when people got used to seeing me look go", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1K8BY": "Qurran is the only Holy book which is in the same form as it was revealed on Prophet Muhammad(PBUH).", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDWWJM": "unfortunately its never a good idea to let cats go out on halloween, that tends to be a bad night for cats.. but all you can is wait and hopefully someone calls.. check in with your local humane society from time to time.", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R3A6ED": "Andrew Bret Wallis/ Photographer's Choice RF/Getty Images Its a devastating thing for an artist to feel theyve lost their inspiration, to encounter a creative block. But suffering from artists block doesnt mean youve lost your artistic ability and it can be overcome. Dr. Janet Montgomery has some tips to help beat artists block: Beating Artists Block Tip 1: It's the fear of not being able to do it that is making you feel you've lost your inspiration. To get rid of the fear, you must approach your painting as if it were a job and DO IT. Beating Artists Block Tip 2: Force yourself to set a goal of X number of paintings. Copy if you must, use kitchen tools as models if you must, but simply getting into the paint itself will begin to inspire you, even if you don't like the subject matter. There's always something to learn. Beating Artists Block Tip 3: Change media. If acrylic, go to oil. If oil, go to printmaking.", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6OOQS": "a couple of days unless it was ordered stat in that case 25 minutes", "3P6ENY9P79USEBKEFENLJZTJSATIHV": "Can you spell beginning right?", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRJ01M": "I have got one big mouth ulcer of 2cm on the right side of my bottom lip which ... on the tip of my tongue, two on upper lower gums of right side of my mouth, ... I also get 3-4 HUGE ulcers on my tongue last 5 days now, half to tongue aria ..... There's a tiny one on my top lip, and another one/two about a ... The first time I got it, it was the size of my hand, right down through my eye, and across my cheek. .... Hello I'm a 17 year old male and I have a problem because I... Blood started pouring from the corner of my lip. ... down and there was a blister about the size of a marble between my big .... little blackheads on the area of my skin where my upper lip and skin ..... It was like a hard lump, with a soft center. To be honest, every one has them, so it's not a big deal...but if you're using any lip stick, lip gloss or lip balm, try not to put on too much, and try to keep it on your lips, not the surrounding skin.", "3YGE63DIN8VZ46YN6NKFEY3AL4PW0E": "'Unlike the other noisier and more colorful Aratinga conures, the gold-capped conure is a fairly quiet bird that also has a wonderful, calm personality and loves to cuddle with its owner and is a great hang out bird.' Lori Hancock, CAS, AACA, Lori's Bird Sitting Services, London, Ontario, Canada Top Products", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SW6RM": "Pink eye is a general term for a conjunctivitis that may include several conditions with different underlying causes. For example, patients can have a conjunctivitis caused by bacteria, a virus, or allergies - all of which can be termed 'pink eye'. If there is any yellow mucous discharge throughout the day or you if you should wake up with your eye crusted shut, that may be a sign of a bacterial infection which is contagious. If the discharge is mainly clear and watery, that is more of a sign of viral conjunctivitis which is also contagious. Allergic conjunctivitis also results in a mucous discharge, but it is more white than yellow and is obviously not contagious as it's due to allergies. You say you popped a pimple (hopefully it wasn't directly on your eyelid), the contents may cause more of a bacterial conjunctivitis. With any of the above mentioned conditions and symptoms, I would recommend a trip to your optometrist to get a quick eye health check. With their evaluation, they will", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3REI2G": "The Cybermen would be quick to shut the place down during health inspection. 'Your kitchen will be deleted and upgraded.'", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9HZ6A": "Who as Pope depends on the year: 1. St. Peter (32-67) 2. St. Linus (67-76) 3. St. Anacletus (Cletus) (76-88) 4. St. Clement I (88-97) 5. St. Evaristus (97-105) 6. St. Alexander I (105-115) 7. St. Sixtus I (115-125) 8. St. Telesphorus (125-136) 9. St. Hyginus (136-140) 10. St. Pius I (140-155) 11. St. Anicetus (155-166) 12. St. Soter (166-175) 13. St. Eleutherius (175-189) 14. St. Victor I (189-199) 15. St. Zephyrinus (199-217) 16. St. Callistus I (217-22) 17. St. Urban I (222-30) 18. St. Pontain (230-35) 19. St. Anterus (235-36) 20. St. Fabian (236-50) 21. St. Cornelius (251-53) 22. St. Lucius I (253-54) 23. St. Stephen I (254-257) 24. St. Sixtus II (257-258) 25. St. Dionysius (260-268) 26. St. Felix I (269-274) 27. St. Eutychian (275-283) 28. St. Caius (283-296) 29. St. Marcellinus (296-304) 30. St. Marcellus I (308-309) 31. St. Eusebius (309 or 310) 32. St. Miltiades (311-14) 33. St. Sylvester I (314-35) 34. St. Marcus (336) 35. St. Julius I (337-52) 36. Benedict XVI (2005) http://www.catholi", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30V882X": "it's not a scar. it's a scratch.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCB9J9": "Try Googling vulva vestibular papillomatosis.", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ28A6": "There are 2 directions to think here..  First would be the vertigo..  and during what?", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606V7N2": "As soon as the skin under it won't be sensitive to much the skin above will dry and than fall off or fade away. What you can do now is getting some cream on it so it might not itch anymore and will smoothly fade away..", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVG1B9": "My friend's cat was pregnant, and a whole group of friends happened to be there. And here, she gave birth. This was her second litter. But anyways, it was around 2 or 3 am, (this is the story she told everyone) and her cat came to her bed, on top of her blanket, and actually started giving birth. It was apparently quite a sight to have a cat give birth on your blanket right next to you, but ya. I guess it depends on your cat. Her cat was very owner-dependant. If your cat is more quiet, she may go into a corner and give birth without you knowing. You might give this a thought. While they're pregnant or during birth? While pregnant it would be best to keep the cat inside the house. During birth you will want to make sure the cat has a box large enough for her to lay out in with a towel under her. When the cat goes into labor, you may want to have someone around who can help her with the kittens. This is how we've helped all our cats give birth and kept them safe during pregnancy.", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENONH5K": "German Shepherds for Sale in Fayetteville, NC (1 - 15 of 53) Adopt Molly a Carolina Dog, German Shepherd Dog Carolina Dog  Coats, NC Molly is a 2 1/2 yr old Shep. mixture. She is very wonderful and loving with people, great with children, but not nice with other dogs an... Tools Adopt Cherokee a German Shepherd Dog German Shepherd  Pittsboro, NC Hello, my is Cherokee and I am looking for a forever home to call my own. I am currently at the Chatham County Animal rescue shelter wait... Tools 100 Adopt Cherokee a Black German Shepherd Dog / Mixed dog in Pittsboro German Shepherd  Pittsboro, NC Hello, my is Cherokee and I am looking for a forever home to call my own. I am currently at the Chatham County Animal rescue shelter wait... Tools Adopt Buster Brown a Mastiff, German Shepherd Dog German Shepherd  Coats, NC Meet Buster! Buster Brown has been with the rescue since July 2014. Veterinarian estimated age is 5 yrs old. German shepherd dog/ Mastiff... Tools See Photograph... see more", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPKECC": "(snickers) woman hoomin haz alerdy fixed da man hoomin vasectomy SpayAndNeuter pets ( hoomins too)", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWF9NC": "The first Pern short story, 'Weyr Search', was published in 1967. ... Action Girl: Prior to the Ninth Pass, female dragonriders are entirely normal ... However, a rider's preference can influence his/her dragon's choice of .... Libby Day was only seven years old when her family was brutally murdered in their ... Paranormalcy is the story of Evie, a teenage girl who tracks and tags .... Problems arise when she meets a boy and she can't find him in her future memories. Showing all 82 Titles .... to you and show that love explicitly when the opportunity arises. .... During her family's move to the suburbs, a sullen 10-year-old girl .... Slow at parts, the story does not develop as smoothly as on... ... who is forced to live with a messy American girl and her family. ... Pip gets to help her Magical Creatures Vet aunt Emma over the ... I enjoyed this classic (all be it predictable) story of a regular girl who finds .....", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVE190": "I don't know :(", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8OD5GC": "My bed creaked , so I would have to use a really fast motion when I masturbated so the springs could n't catch my rhythm . Once or twice my brother asked in the dark ,  What are you doing ? '' but I always pretended I was n't doing anything . Many nights I could hear him doing exactly the same thing  we had matching beds , so I guess he had the same problem  but I never had to ask him what he was up to .", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WQPUF": "TahitiTrim40, it will helpCleanse Beverage combines the power of TAHITIAN NONI Juice with an all-natural blend of fruit juices to jump-start your weight management and prepare your metabolism. Designed to help in your weight management efforts. A blend of noni, herbs, and other natural ingredients provides a safe, healthy solution for weight management, when combined with a healthy diet and regular excercise. to lose weight the healthy way, you must combine cardio activity with weight training and the proper diet. with the three of these combined, your on your way to a healthier lifestyle I agree with the first answer. If you are working out, eating well, and gaining weight, it is probably your increase in muscle which is adding to the s on the scale. But also, I can recommend the south beach diet, or weight watchers. South beach is a good jumping off point - most people lose 10-20 pounds the first 2 weeks. Then follow up with weight watchers which combines activity with healthy ...", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF5YO5": "Well, because I already make 'so much money', of course!Even though my production goes toward their bonuses.when you consider what I don't get, we all make about the same.Amazingly, they did add me to the 401K plan last month.", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0YM20": "A character who has some kind of highly developed or superhuman ability loses it for an episode, and has to experience life as an average Joe. Often, the?... He or she likes his or her liquor, and in large amounts. He or she may realize he ... It is entirely possible that successful people may be alcoholics on the inside.", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5652R": "Hmm Well, let me start by saying that talking to ones self is not as uncommon as you might think. I have seen firsthand how, while it has a propensity for being pretty freaky, it can help greatly. I usually do it when a part of me wants to do something, but another part wants to do the opposite. All I can do is give you my take on things based on my own experiences. Which I have already done Alright, all I can say is, if it really freaks you out, try and have talk with him about it. Tell him about your concerns, and try and see if hes doing this to work stuff out, like my brother and I do, and if it really helps him. But, if hes hurting himself, like you think he might be, you. But, if hes just punching a wall or something, hes probably doing it to relieve stress, anger, negative emotion, basically. My brother used to do that. In closing, try and be ready to accept it if this is just something he does to help himself. Now I am off watch a very sad movie! I hope I dont cry on this one", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KWJ4M": "The news of the invasion of the newly rising Mongol army from the east spread like wildfire throughout the region, but the dwellers of the city showed no greater concern than usual. According to a contemporary account of Mongolian history, Genghis Khan 'was born with a blood clot in his hand, a sign in Mongol. Genghis Khan was a warrior by nature, and a conqueror by profession, and in that he showed no discrimination among people he allegedly even killed his own half-brother. Unlike Genghis Khan, Hitler was not born to a tribal chieftain to inherit leadership rights, but he made his own way to the top, by his own ability. It could be said where Hitler, quite like Genghis Khan, was a natural worrier he was no simple conqueror. I could therefore say where Hitler, just like Genghis Khan, was a natural worrier he was not a simple conqueror. He was amused when he listened to the holy songs played along the lute, nodding gently as he listened and contemplated on the subtle meaningfulness.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKAQH6": "Well you need a decent cage, which could be ?40.If you bought a cage that is about 40cm long, 30cm wide and 30cm high, that's too small.I recommend something like this if yours is too small http://www.savic.be/cambridge The wheel and water bottle usually come with the cage, but if they don't then a water bottle is usually ?2-?6 and the wheel is usually ?3-?5.The bedding is usually about ?2-?5, depends on the quantity and quality.You'd have to buy a new bag of bedding maybe every 1-2 months, since it's best that you clean your hamsters cage every week.DO NOT BUY THE COTTON BEDDING, It can get stuck in their cheek pouches or wrapped around their paws.Get the shredded paper or tissue bedding, it works well. (It happened with my previous hamster and she ill because of it. )Chew toys, boredom breakers and hideouts can come to a total cost of ?10-?20, but you could make them out of old boxes and toilet paper tubes.Food is usually cheap, about ?3, and it lasts long.", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSS4H2": "Dinner: Chilli and Brown Rice with Weight Watchers Pitta Bread. Followed by a Weight Watchers Hot Chocolate.", "3TKSOBLOHLE80Q3M9CL8B1M8278BB3": "Yes, eggs from your partner will be gathered and sperm introduced to those eggs. Later, after fertilization, the eggs can be implanted into your uterus during ovulation in the hopes of implantation occurring. Eggs, as with everything else, are good in moderation.", "3ZXV7Q5FJBMHNC78SE3Z5BJBZQWCFP": " 99 effective label on birth control pills means that out of 100 women who use the pill in a year,1 will get pregnant.", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXY0E87": "It's not the size of the boat but the motion of the ocean. one inch or less. Of course you were good at ma  turbation.", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2E7XPF": "ContentsEdit Under Construction Contest Edit In late 2006 to early 2007, Palladium Books drew 10 names per month of fans who purchased the Heroes of the Megaverse Print.Winners were announced and listed on Palladium's home page.The following is a list of the winners.", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHURSU": "Brain effects: Even after months of abstaining, people who have used cocaine for a long time can have problems thinking, such as memory, attention, problem solving, and use of words. Heart and Blood Vessel effects: Cocaine narrows blood vessels by stimulating the muscles of the vessels. Cocaine makes the heart beat faster both in an organized way and. Cocaine users are 7 times more likely to have a nonfatal heart attack than non-users. Cocaine also directly damages heart muscle in 20-50 of users. Kidney effects: Cocaine does not directly affect the kidneys, but can cause long-term damage to them because of the effect on blood vessels. Anyone with these risk factors should get tested. Craving gets better over time, but you can never count on it being gone forever. Tell your health care provider about your former drug use, so that s/he can be aware of your risks, order appropriate tests to detect hidden conditions, help you heal and/or prevent worsening of any condition you may have acquired.", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBL5Q6": "Be true to yourself, help others, make each day your masterpiece", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U216L": "Pain Management Community Strong non-narcotic pain killers? trahansen posted: Hi, I am new to the boards, so I guess I should give you a bit of an introduction first. My daughter is 20 years old. She has had surgery for three neurological conditions: Tethered Cord Syndrome, Chiari Type I Malformation, and Syringomyelia. After the most recent surgery this past September, she had a serious fall in December while she was still healing the most recent MRIs show degenerative changes and either a disc fragment or complex cyst outside of the vertebrae along with a narrowing of the thecal sac (10mm down from 12mm on the previous scan). She had been prescribed Oxycodone 5mg tablets to be taken 1-4 tabs every 4 hours PRN for pain after her surgery by the middle of December she had weaned herself down to where she was taking one tablet perhaps 2-3 times a week, but since the fall she has been taking 15 mg every 4-6 hours and on bad days she is in pain before 4 hours is out. Last week we saw a", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RD2IZ": "It could be a muscle spasm which you've had for so long that you are no longer aware of it. Your eyes are blinking, just that one of them occasionally 'blinks' on its own.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K5YPQ": "Please keep them separate until you know the sex of Guinea pig 3 as yes Guinea pig 2 can get pregnant and the chances of her having a litter with out dieing is 80.She has been on her own for all these years so I do not think you have to worry about her having any problems if you rehome guinea pig 3.", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMNT41": "Here's a longer preview of my question with details:nbsp. Hi, I'm a 20 year old with a very strange pulse and sometimes very very light chest pain near my armpit/breast area. My BMI is 38 (currently working on lowering), I exercise at least 4 times a week. about an 1 hour of 4-5 miles. Note that I've been doing this type of regular exercise since I was 11, and some days would exercise with my partner for nearly 2 hours almost 2 times a month. I've been working on eating correctly as well (oats, fruit, no processed foods/sugars). I've recently quit caffeine and diet sodas, replacing them with 4 or more glasses of water. My blood pressure is 134/81. Usually, my resting heart rate ranges from 74-80 bpm. My problem is, during 2 weeks, I've been experiencing high pulse rates from (94-104) and on some days, a single heart flutter. Sometimes during sleeping, I wake with strange high pulses. A few days ago, I've awaken from a deep dreaming sleep having two heart flutters, and freaked out.", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U4EIE": "I don't know if this is normal, But I've been told by my friends, goofing off that 'Do you have Bipolar?! 'kind of thing.I don't know what to do.", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JOG63": "Half indian parent, half Irish parent. ImAHiddenMigrant", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQYNLP": "The signs of parvo are not eating and not drinking. My dog had parvo and the vet said one of the big signs was the bloody stool and not drinking water. If a dog won't drink water, it's usually very sick. Please take your dog to the vet. The dog will suffer and die if you don't get it help. Dont listen to the people who tell you your dog will die. It wont unless it doesnt drink water for more than two weeks. Make sure there are plenty of water bowls that your dog knows about with room temperature water. If not put a little water in your dogs food that will at least keep him a little hydrated. And you know if you drink a little bit of liquid and then stop you feel like you have to drink more, well that is what should happen to your little furry friend. I keep a food dispenser, and a water dispenser filled all the time so that they can eat and drink whenever they want to. But, I knew she could eat and drink and she wouldn't starve unless she chose to, so I decided to just leave her alo...", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LTWHI": "I agree, that's not right at all. If I were you, I'd contact a lawyer to see what can be done about this. It has to be illegal. t0mb0ygirlygurl 47 months ago nbsp. t0mb0ygirlygurl t0mb0ygirlygurl Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZCUTQ": "I had my tubes tied when my 2nd child was born, the way it works is that once the tubes are cut, tied, burned (however they do it), an egg cannot pass through the fallopian tubes. People have been known to get pregnant after tubal ligation, the only fool proof method of birth control is abstinance. Even after having my tubes tied almost 8 yrs ago, every time I am really sick the doc still takes a blood pregnancy test to make sure I am not pregnant and can take the antibiotics (I am allergic to many antibiotics).", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVVK8W": "There is no writing on any of the SAT Subject Tests currently offered, and there is no subject test in English. However, Writing is one of the three sections on the SAT general reasoning test, which includes an essay. Instead, you have to think of your own subject from a very big pool of ... Remember that the independent essay is only half of the TOEFL writing section. There's?... The third is reading fewn paragraphs and being able to correct them. Now for the first part, it is all about subject verb agreement and also reading the sentence. Read the sentence to yourself and look t the choices. Many of the SAT subject tests are used to gain advanced placement, e.g. in a foreign language. For creative writing, the subject test in Literature would be most appropriate. The SAT Writing section consists of three distinct sections: a 25-minute essay section ... Then find the verb to make sure there is subject-verb agreement.", "3ZVPAMTJWN1R7ESMLVZCCRI9060RGA": "If, on the other hand, you subscribe to a genetic theory of relevance then the study of genes becomes relevant. If you subscribe to the epistemology of empiricism, then only intersubjectively controlled observations are relevant. If, on the other hand, you subscribe to feminist epistemology, then the sex of the observer becomes relevant.", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3H3S5": "'This provides another source of cells which could be stored from the umbilical cord, which is otherwise just thrown away,' said Davies, whose team used cords only from full-term newborns, donated by parents specifically for research. Davies said these stem cells could be used in transplanting bone marrow, the body's factory for stem cells that develop into the components of all the different tissues of the body, from the brain and organs to muscles and bone. Bone-marrow transplants are often performed to treat leukemia and some other cancers, as well as immune-deficiency disorders.", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDQDUS": "All prawns and shrimps are crustaceans, which are mostly aquatic animals with a hard skin (an exoskeleton) over a segmented body. Crustaceans belong to the subphylum Crustacea. They are like insects, which also have an exoskeleton, but differ in usually having many pairs of legs, instead of three pairs. The Decapoda, the group of Crustacea to which all prawns and shrimps (and lobsters and crabs) belong, have five pairs of legs on the main part of the body, plus five pairs of swimmerets on the abdomen or tail. It is the muscular tail that is edible. The classification of the Decapoda is very complex, even to a carcinologist (a scientist who studies Crustacea). Your Biological Info!!! CheerS!!", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRYA6VG": "diet cola ? If Hani has type A blood and his wife has type B blood, which of the following is NOT a possible blood type for their offspring A.type A B.type B C.", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRK01N": "Mental health is often missing from public health debates even though it's critical to wellbeing. Call 1-800-784-2433 and talk to them, they'll find a proper specialist for you.", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPBR07": "(4) When citizens are divided on an issue, as they often will be, whose views should prevail, and in what circumstances? Should a majority always prevail, or should minorities sometimes be empowered to block or overcome majority rule? (5) If a majority is ordinarily to prevail, what is to constitute a proper majority? A majority of all citizens? A majority of voters? Should a proper majority comprise not individual citizens but certain groups or associations of citizens, such as hereditary groups or territorial associations? (6) The preceding questions presuppose an adequate answer to a sixth and even more important question: Why should the people rule? Is democracy really better than or ? Perhaps, as argues in the Republic, the best government would be led by a minority of the most highly qualified personsan aristocracy of philosopher-kings. What reasons could be given to show that Platos view is wrong?", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WYRX4": "4golfonline consistant?? im new and just curious about.... is this something that i sould wait on or should i jump in to it?", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFS4Q2": "- Choose a healthy eating plan be sure to find one that will fit your life style, does not promise major weight loss quickly or cuts out major food groups this won't be a short term diet, this is an eating plan you can use for life. Reduce calories ", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EIYFN": "I'm thinking that the U.S. would find a way to pull through. Deadly to humans would be the ability of the H5N1 strain to spread from human to human. and if it gets into the human population on an epidemic or pandemic scale then it would be best to avoid close proximity situations ie.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VXL8X": "the last picture does not show too much of a problem....as long as the bite feels okay. However, I would let the Orthodontist know that the midline looks off.", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0C86G": "Burt's Bees Res-Q ointment will help it heal faster,but you cant make it go away over night. You can also put Neosporen(i spelled that wrong) on it and that will keep it from scaring. And if she asks...its a battle scar,and its manly! Good Luck!", "3X4Q1O9UBHK5H8P500EECJ0BQGXO7V": "You should be evaluated before any recommendations can be made . We recommend you see a dentist or orthodontist for an evaluation as soon as possible . t worn my retainer for a few days and I just noticed I didn m not going to be wearing my retainer for about a week and a half .", "3XEDXEGFX3M89646H91CQN9FYXJK09": "Hammurabi's code of laws also has a big impact now because it influenced the rules and laws we have today.It contained some ideas that are still found in laws today.For example, we use the method of organization that started in Hammurabi's code(specific crimes had specific penalties).", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXSIBJ": "Also, see the doc if you notice the node continuing to get bigger, if it feels hard or fixed (you can't move it around a little under the skin), or the node becomes red/warm/tender to touch (could be a sign of an infection in the node itself). Feel on both sides of your neck in the hollow area right below your jaw line. If they are swollen you should be able to feel lumps on both sides. If not you may have strained your neck muscles or slept with your head in an awkward position. Pain in your neck for days could be manigitis. I cought spinal Manigitis 'sp' when I was a few days old and I was almost dead bu the time it had run it's course. Go see your doctor. Those lymph nodes are part of your immune system. They react to all sorts of things, mainly infections of the head and neck. When they have done their job, you won't find the infection any more.", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYGSZR": "A group can be felt most easily: In the neck (found on either side of the neck, behind your ears, or under your chin). underarm In the groin Normally, a healthy lymph node is not sensitive or sore. A child between the ages of 10 to 12 years old usually has large lymph nodes, which can be twice the normal size.", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5AO9ZU": "It is too bad we can not have more answers like the good ones sunsandsurf and havgunwillotravel provided instead of the of the moronic ones provided by blessedthangs, special ed, and vinster.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMPKDZ": "Liriano had ligament replacement in the elbow of his throwing arm. twenty years ago it would have been a real problem but today most pitchers come back the following year at near 100. Too many innings at too young an age gets them every time but he should be fine in 2008. You can bet the Twins will keep a close eye on him.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMM7JU": "Suggestion one to overcome my fear of birds: getting a parakeet to keep in my room ?", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B046KV": "Tylenol. Maybe a small cup of water with 2 parts ambesol.", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKNVCZ": "How's this for game day tailgating snacks? Sip on a U.T.ini while munching on petite buffalo-style cheese and foie gras-honey Dijon burgers and a tower of buttermilk onion rings with homemade barbecue sauce. Only the Four Seasons could dream up something so wonderfully lavish.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9EFP9": "well it depends, if it's just a drop or two when u alread need to go to the bathroom in the first place then no we all do that, but if u r just normal with no need to pee then all a sudden u pee a lot while u r laughin then u should get checked  having to pee after sex is normal.not being able to pee in public.normal... not being able to completely empty your bladder on the first go.not so normal.you could have an infection or you could have a another problem.. If you have to wait to pee, u probably didn't have to pee in the first place!! I doubt that it is an infection!", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEDGLB": "Cut off your dick.", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYIRJF": "Yes. That's some hard crying you have to do to make yourself sick... usually indicates traumatic incidents. Just email me if you need to hon :(   Opinion 2: yes. this happens because your ears, eyes, throat and sinus passages are all connected. When you cry you have a lot of liquid that is coming out....you eyes, your nose if probably running, and ultimately some of that drainage gets back in your throat. Also when you cry I am sure you make a sound too...all that going on can make you feel like you sort of have a little bit of a sore throat going on. No worries. It's normal.", "3MJ28H2Y1E6QU4BMC7ZHEZMFZA45OZ": "THEN i cut throat la sial.", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I2DIJ": "I hear that you want to lose weight, this helped a lot out  http:// ttp://t.co/V0eX0ldbw1 /pmy7njy gather the link", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWL5C2": "Good for you! You're one who actually does research and figures out that gerbils need to be housed in pairs and that plastic/wire cages are not acceptable! :   Anyway, you won't regret buying gerbils. A gerbils' aquarium needs to be changed and washed every 1-2 weeks. Usually a small bag of bedding goes a LONG way for aquariums. A gerbils' aquarium should be filled with 1-3 inches of bedding. Personally I hate the whole 'Fill the aquarium to the top with bedding!!! WEEE!' idea because it's MESSY and you NEVER see your gerbils! One can die and you won't know for days.1 bag of food lasts a long time. I've had the bag I have right now for 2 months and there's still a considerable amount :D A bag of food is about 7 and the average big bag of bedding is about 15 dollars. I use SunSeed Fresh World Bedding (sold at PetSmart). It works better than any bedding I've ever seen. Even carefresh :P 1 small bag can fill a 20 gallon aquarium (I have a 20 gal for my gerbs) with some left over! Ima", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5F6OG": "So my phone slipped out of my hand again. This time it hit me in my upper lip. Wonder if a bump will form and match the bottom one.", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ66M9Q": "The penalty reaches 25 five months after the failure to file happens. Hi, The probability that each person could get one side or the other is 1/2. when you are combining probabilities with an and statement, you multiply the individual probabilities.", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CR3ODR": "There's morning wood, early mid-morning wood, mid-morning wood, late mid-morning wood, early mid-day wood, mid-day wood, late mid-day wood, early afternoon wood, afternoon wood, - well, you get the idea.", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGWAWS3": "and now my nipples are tinder. And I have had really bad belly pains and my back hurts. Could I be pregnantOnlinePregnancyTest. biz is an open discussion site. This information is designed for educational purposes only and is not provided as a professional service nor should it ever be treated as if it were offering medical advice to specific clients. This website is not to be considered a substitute for professional medical care.", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKQVU5": "Now down to the bottom of your hand.The handwrap forms an X on the back of your hand.Now back to the top of your thumb again.", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYFXSW": "Sleep walking into walls, falling off of the bed, MIB neuralizer.", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAYYKO": "ISSUU - Healthy Living Magazines Sep'15 by Ocala Publications Upload About Plans  Pricing Plans Languages English Deutsch Espaol Portugus (Brasil) Franais Italiano Portugus (Portugal) Create Account Sign In Upload Explore Feed Publisher Tools Stacks Following Stacks Following Publisher Tools Services Account Settings Languages Statistics Campaigns Plans  Pricing Help  Support Sign Out Issuu on Google Healthy Living Magazines Sep'15 Ocala Publications Follow publisher Unfollow publisher Be the first to know about new publications.Follow publisher Unfollow publisher Ocala Publications Info Share Spread the word.Share this publication.", "3DWGDA5POF2MW6J0CWJJ6136JNU1VD": "Make sure they fit good in you butt and hips I know with a small waist and bigger hips it's hard to find jeans to fit properly try strech like denim they will fit nice and be comfortable. And as far as being small on top Try a good pushup bra with a little bit of padding it will give you great clevage and add about a cup size and your shirt shoul be kinda fitted around your chest area and gratually get a little loose around your lower stomach or hip area that way you will appear to the eye better perportioned and have amazing curves and a sfar as loosing wieght walking is the best or if you home watching t.v. lay on the floor on one side and lift your leg at about a 50-60 degree angle and then put your leg down repeat about 50 times and work your way up switch sides repeat that will work your hip and butt or do scwats that's really good but I still recommend walking. good luck sweetie but try the clothes thing I recommened and I promise you will look amazing Indonesian hip hop Indon...", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLHDGEP": "How could there be, dogs are used as working animals on many farms and ranches", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBW30G": "SOME KID MAGAZINES OR A T'SHIRT, PERHAPS A CINEMA VOUCHER OR SOME CD SINGLES...  GOOD LUCK!!", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BS402": "It doesn't hurt to get braces at all!!! it does hurt after you get them cause they are getting straight just take some ibuprofen and relax!! I've had my braces for a year now, and it's no big deal at all!!! in fact I'm going to an orthodontist appointment right now!! Really it's no big deal, just relax and don't worry!! The progress is awesome, and once you have them you won't be worried at all!! Good luck, Hope this helped!! Any more questions Email me at jordansmithisthebest32yahoo.com!", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4DZ2R": "I went froma size one in pants to a size three  no big change at all :)  I dont know of anyone whos hips got wider  They only 'go out' to birth the baby and then go back, it's what our hips are meant to do it is how the woman is built :)", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RCI2E": "My most recent one passed away about a year ago. ... Is it possible to minimize the shedding on a Golden or is it simply part of the deal? ... by having carpeting in my home and upholstery in my car in golden shades so it wouldn't be so ... Do this outside though, because there will be so must fur that its snowing puffs of white fuzzy fur. You can't really reduce the shedding, but vacuming does get a lot of the fur out. My dog sheds in clumps of fur so we kind of need to do this anyway. Heavy shedders, such as the Golden Retriever or the Husky have what can ... Puppy to Adult - You may find that shedding picks up close to the 1 year ... Every day, every hour, every minute, hairs are being shed off - even if you do not see this. Pros There is no doubt (especially with Siberian Husky owners) that this breed is one of the most beautiful dogs. If you decide to adopt a Siberian Husky, you will not only gain an attractive pet, but one that is friendly, social and great with kids.", "3TUOHPJXYHV71W4Y9Z9MNCQLVBBWXA": "Mahatma Gandhi led India against the tyrannical rule of the Britishers. He fought silently and practiced ahinsa or non-violence. He believed and truth and only truth shall prevail and without harming a single soul, he got freedom to India. Civil disobedience movements, boycotts of foreign goods etc is show he showed his resistance towards the British. Eventually, The British left India and Gandhi became the face of the nation. He is, without doubt, one of the greatest leaders to have ever walked the earth. Related posts: Sharing is Caring About author shreya samantNo Jesus or Mohammad? You will find millions if not billions of their followers in the world today, whose numbers are growing, and many of whom would die to protect their teachings and legacy. I dont think anything remotely close could be said, or frankly will ever be said, about any other leader.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYTEKP": "You can read more about this procedure here http://www.labiaplastysurgeon.com/labiaplasty.html If you go to this site, you can get a referral in your state http://www.lasertreatments.com/labiaplastypatient.html Labiaplasty Labiaplasty (also known as labioplasty, labia minora reduction, and labial reduction) is a plastic surgery procedure for altering the labia minora (inner labia) and the labia majora (outer labia), the folds of skin surrounding the human vulva. There are two main categories of women seeking cosmetic genital surgery: those with congenital conditions such as intersex, and those with no underlying condition who experience physical discomfort or wish to alter the appearance of their genitals because they believe they do not fall within a normal range. The size, colour, and shape of labia vary significantly, and may change as a result of childbirth, aging and other events.", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IDZ32": "For one thing, that's a huge rat! The cat probably has never had to hunt for food. It also sees that you take care of the rat and doesn't want to displease you. The rat may have nipped the cat's nose when it first approached the cage so now the cat stays away. I used to have a house rabbit and my three cats were terrified of it. The rabbit would nip them, so they stayed under a chair until the rabbit went back to it's cage.", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRQOCQ": "55-Year-Old Man Jailed For Exposing His Erection To 13-Year-Old Girl: A 55-year-old man in Zimbabwe has been thr... http://t.co/Xa3eHbaS", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN59I4B": "just approach him nicely like my wife did, like before my wife and i have sex i always shave for her and she likes that it turns her on, nice and clean shaving body.just tell him that it will really turns you on everytime he shave. Because from here on when the first time my wife approach me about my hairy self, she told me that everytime i shave for her she'll give me something in return later ).so now evertime i shaved i'll point it out to her that i did.so hope that helps.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3SAXA2": "Ask Experts Articles Encyclopedia Blogs Tickers Search Register FAQ Log in Vaginal discharge The time now is 04/30/07 - 17:38 SteadyHealth.com - Health Topics Forum Index - Cancer - Do I Have Cancer? Search forums for: Did you find posts in this topic useful? Author Message pretty Newbie Joined: 10 Aug 2006 Posts: 4 Posted: 08/10/06 - 10:07 Post subject: Vaginal discharge --------------------------------------. Hi, I'm 35 years old and notice during the. inflamation inside my vaginal area and I might be pregnant. red bumps on bottom of Vaginal area. Red point in my penis after vaginal. spams/crawling feeling (abdomen and back), vaginal discharge how to improve my vaginal oder red dots on vaginal area unusual vaginal discharges and pimples on pubic area Vaginal odor that smells like gas. chlmydia and vaginal yeast infection I need to urgently treat my vaginal cuts! I have lump. Period 2 days late! Then brown discharge! White discharge from my vagina been tied 3 year ago now missed a m", "3FW4EL5A3LMKO03U7QZM9FG0EVE22M": "Could REM Sleep Behavior Disorder Kill You in Your Sleep? Written by with contributions by , Winter 2010 REM sleep behavior disorder (or RBD) is truly one of the most intriguing, and indeed troublesome, sleep disorders known to man. In essence, it causes the afflicted individual to act out their dreams to some extent. Can you imagine that? Thinking about some of the dreams I've had, I know I could seriously harm myself or others if I ever unknowingly acted them out, even if in my room. And indeed, REM behavior disorder has led to some gut-wrenchingly tragic tales. Extreme cases where RBD afflicted individual have unwittingly murdered truly loved spouses lying next to them in bed have caused some of the most intense grief. With the help of sleep experts, the court cases that follow these events have become incredibly intricate and complex, and in some cases the defendants have been acquitted.", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDW6T2": "Bleeding will last for about 10 hours after removal. Gauzes should be places on the areas of removal to put pressure on the area that is bleeding. Wet tea bags can also be a good replacement as the acid, tannin, within it will stop the bleeding. The gauzes should be replaced every 20-30 minutes. You should remove the gauze both during when you are eating and when you are about to go to sleep. Bleeding can continue into the following morning.", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVAPMPM": "Listen to one of your favorite sings and sing and dance to it! Let it all out, then just think about things or people that always make you happy and just forget about all the bad. Trust me I have lots of bad days and this always works!", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T752GU1": "Squalamine (Macular Edema and Macular Degeneration) - Forecast and Market Analysis to 2023 :Market S...  http://t.co/vpn7aLb7cd", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08K8TO": "Doing something you enjoy that does not put a strain on your newly injured body is best. (Hope you feel better soon!) Maybe now is a good time to go through your family photos and work on a family tree or write down stories from your family and put together a family story book, that way your time of being disables yields something that your whole family can enjoy later. By the way stuff like makes WONDERFUL Christmas gifts and you may find talking onthe phone or emailing your relatives to get the stories and pics sparks some newly refreshed relationships.", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NGRKC": "I hope this helps to answer your question.Good luck to you and your family moving forward.Take care.", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ3ZNH": "Formula 1 1 quart whole goat's milk 1 teaspoon light Karo syrup 1 tablespoon nonfat plain yogurt (goat's milk preferred) 1 egg yolk Knox unflavored gelatin:  ampnbspNewborn-1 week 1 pkg  ampnbsp2nd week 1 1/2 - 2 pkgs  ampnbsp3rd week 2 1/2 - 3 pkgs  ampnbsp4th week 4 pkgs  Put goat's milk in saucepan, add gelatin in the amount above depending on the kitten's age.", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W39S4B": "Alice, I was at a party nine days ago, when my friends all started smoking pot. I didn't smoke any. Will second hand smoke show up in pee tests?? It's past tomorrow, so you either passed or failed your drug test. But for future reference, second-hand marijuana smoke  buzz producing, or not  can leave traces of the chemical tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) in your urine for a day or so after breathing the smoke. Most drug tests have intentionally high standards to avoid false positive results due to incidental ingestion of second-hand smoke. If you have only had a couple of hits, and you drink alot of water, you will be clean in less than a week. But I know someone who smoked alot, and he failed a drug screen after being clean for three weeks. If you smoked it, it's still trace in your system, and will show on a drug test. The only way to pass this test is to not smoke before taking it. Truthfully, I wouldn't smoke any less than a month before taking it, otherwise, you're likely to f...", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY3X1D": "(( I have a female Sam cosplay, I might get contacts eventually mainly because my eyes are brown. ))", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N5VSP": "Ann,     Just rust you gut feeling, it worked for me once and the relationship lasted for 3 years. weigh your possibilitys with the disadvatages of going out with him and who knows what will happen boys will be boys. they are unpredictiable I should know I am a male my self but just remember  its wats inside that counts you told me that this morning when you answered my question boys may act ince to you but consider the following:'what do he want form me?' 'Is he a player?' or 'Do I really like him or do I like him because of his looks?' Just ask your self that and who knows you may find the one. Good luck! -Sam lovelace", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMPJ79": "What do you believe.Despite the fact that Ive bookmarked it.Many thanks.", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXLR5R": "Usually it takes a blood sugar level of 180-200 before Sugar is found in urine (just for reference normal blood sugar levels are between 70 and 110). Now if it is a blood sugar of 60, it is low and Its not something to shrug off. Low blood sugar is very dangerous and can lead to coma and death. I agree with the others that it sounds like classic hypoglycemia (low blood sugar) symptoms. The 'shaky' symptoms come from your body producing adrenalin to raise your blood sugar back to normal levels. Your blood sugar can vary quite a bit throughout the day. The meter will give you an instant and current reading of your blood sugar. Normal blood sugars will be in the approximate range of about 80-120 mg/dL. DIABETES Even men with normal blood sugar may face a higher risk. The results were based solely on fasting blood glucose levels other diabetes indicators -- including glucose tolerance tests and glycated hemoglobin levels, which indicate long-term blood-glucose control -- were not measu...", "3VQTAXTYN3JNWPCS9323GREWRSCBUH": "OxyElite is really good for weight loss. You're workout plan is ideal 5 days a week especially for weight loss. The food you've listed looks good. Add meat to your soup as to have a balanced meal with carbs and protein. Try to eat the same amount each day. For example if you have a 1 Cup of soup on Monday have the same 1 Cup of soup on Tuesday consistency is key along with creating a meal plan for yourself to keep you from doing a lot of guess work. A sample meal plan might be. Breakfast 4 egg whites, oatmeal, 1/4 cup berries Snack Rice Protein shake 1/8 cup nuts or tsp nut butter Lunch Chicken or Turkey Breast 3-5 oz / Vegetable/ Rice cake Snack 1/2 can tuna and salad w/ straberries 3 sliced strawberries no dressing Dinner Lean Meat or white fish of your choice, spinach leaves, or other leafy veggie If you must have another meal have a protein shake (rice) Do not season foods.", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZJV9H": "Here is one thought, may be a help, might not. Hope so :) I would like to offer you one thought in answer to your query. About a year ago at the age of 47 i discovered that grains and in particular corn were very bad for me. ( it comes down to the oils they contain)nbsp. I gave em up mostly and the result was impressive. My aching back was not there every mourning, my allergies were lessened, my skin (atopic dermatitis) improved, i was less lethargic ANDnbsp. ----gt. here it comes gt. I lost weight. By lessening my intake of grains and corn to 5-10 i could feel the difference in 2 weeks. What i learned from this experience is thatnbsp. Corn Makes us FaTnbsp. AND it starves our body. Odd huh? But the oils in these foods are not what the body needs. What we know now is that every cell in the body needs the right Omega 3 and 6 oils. The wrong oils, like in corn, actually inflame the body. the enlarge the body. they hurt the body. The joke is:nbsp. I'm not fat. I'm inflammed.", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08M8TQ": "There was no bruise, so it wasn't until my folks got an x-ray of it that they saw why I was hurting.I like what Sandi said too - sounds very plausible considering what your daughter has been saying all along.Good luck!", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCHJQ7": "i also have a hard lump right above my ankle and it does not move and i think the lump keeps increasing when i do extreme sports. but i used bandage to press it in for time and it was kinda working", "3HUR21WDDUNBQ1ZYO0RA89B16J9YX9": "VERY AFFORDABLE HONGKONG PACKAGE.DAY1:MANILA-HONGKONG(NO MEALS) Depart Manila for Hongkong via UO714/0755/0955,meet and transfer to hotel. Free time for shopping or join optional tour to Ocean Park(USD38). Accommodation at Dorsett Far East Hotel or similar class. DAY2:HONGKONG(B) Breakfast outside hotel,0830 commencing compulsory Hongkong city tour visiting Mid-level Of Victoria Peak,Aberdeen Fishing Village(Sampan ride is optional),J.C.Jewelry Factory and Movie Star Avenue. Afternoon free time for shopping or join optional tour to Disneyland(USD60). Accommodation at Dorsett Far East Hotel or similar class. DAY3:HONGKONG-SHENZHEN(B/L) Breakfast outside hotel,transfer to Shenzhen by train,Shenzhen city tour visiting Shennan Boulevard, Window of the World(picture taking only,entrance ticket not included),Mineral Museum,Silk and Pearl Factory and local specialities store.", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0O0E6": "There are many pets in rescue canters because their owners realised they are allergic. Remember if you have asthma to hoover every day, hoover the mattress every week, replace your pillows ever couple of years and every couple of months wrap your pillow in a plastic bag and put ti in the freezer for 24 hours. This can drastically reduce the number of attacks, as can steam cleaning carpets, upholstery and mattresses.", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4FE9T": "Hi. I am an RN. Things should be kicking in by now but I don't think you have anything to worry about. I would call the place you were getting your shot from and talk to them to be on the safe side. Depo, if taken for a long period of time will stay in your system for awhile and it also will make it harder to get pregnant after stopping the shot. Hang in there, I think your okay. Just make that phone call. Good Luck!", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W3A4SO": "The average weight for male adults in the United States is about 76 to 83 kg (168 to 183 lb). The average weight for male teenagers in the United States is about 45 to 64 kg (99 to 141 lb). For female adults the average weight is 54 to 64 kg (120 to 140 lb). For female teenagers the average weight is 45 to 57 kg (100 to 126 lb). Weight is of course related to height, so people taller than average tend to be heavier as well. A quantity called Body Mass Index (BMI) is used to express weight relative to heightCountry Males Females Males Females Age range sampled Source Australia 178.4 cm 163.9 cm 5 ft 10.2 in 5 ft 4.5 in 18-24 (measured) g Australia 179.9 cm 164.9 cm 5 ft 10.8 in 5 ft 4.9 in 18-24 (self reported) g Canada 180 cm 165 cm 5 ft 10.9 in 5 ft 5 in 18-24 (self reported) j Denmark 177.1 cm 165.2 cm 5 ft 9.7 in 5 ft 5.0 in  a Estonia 180 cm 168 cm 5 ft 10,9 in 5 ft 6 in  x France 173.1 cm 161.8 cm 5 ft 8.2 in 5 ft 3.7 in  a France 175,6 cm 162.5 cm 5 ft 9.2 in 5 ft 4.0 in  n Finland 176.6 c", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3113G": "Register today to participate and remove the ads - Having lived so historically recently , Hitler is rightfully held up as the height of evilness of mankind . Go back some 700 years , though , and Genghis Khan fit that description just as well . Both men are similar , having wrecked havoc on the population of Eurasia in a relatively brief , swift reign of terror .", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3PEMV": "Your graphics card does support 3D, just not 3D games, or recent titles at least. I had this problem on an older laptop and there isn't much you can do about it except try games with an external configuration program so that you can set all options to low or older titles(Dx7.0 or older). If you really want to play some games you should get a dedicated video card. for around 130 you can get a buget gaming card. Just make sure you have the right kind for your computer(PCI/AGP/PCIe).", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY62EQ": "Bill Nichols is Professor Emeritus in the Cinema Department at San Francisco State University and Chair of the Documentary Film Institute advisory board. Professor Nichols has lectured in numerous countries, served on film festival juries on different continents, consults regularly on a variety of filmmaking projects, and has published over 100 articles. He is former president of the Society for Cinema and Media Studies, a former advisor to the American Film Institute and has served as Department Chair in Canada and the United States.", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ78OWZ": "it sure affects it, i had same expereince with my last period. i think it is due to the strenght of the anti biotics, it could possibly affect the blood level in the system especially when taken without blood tonic, causing light flow", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4WBOIT": "'Yesterday was one of the times when the students from the east were travelling together,' he told AFP. 'It's a very sad time for the school. It's a unique school, known for discipline, known for quality,' he added.", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW73ZET": "'Lift up and look' - opportunities for education in dental hygiene in PED - are we doing enough? ttps://t.co/9MDTzUhPFU", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88IFZR": "Do a strength training routine five days a week with a couple off days spread out for recovery. Use free weights if possible because this will force your body to develop balance. Arms - dumb bell curl (bicepts), french curls (tricepts), military press (shoulders, delts, lats), push ups with your hands pulled in close together Chest - bench press, inclined bench press, butterflys, push up with your hands spread out wide Abs - Crunches, supermen, medicine ball excercises (where you sit down half upright, knees bent and feet together, and have someone throw a medicine ball to you, as you catch it you go backwards and then crucn you abs as your sit back upright and throw the ball back to them) Quads and many other muscles - Squats", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNMTYM": " Wands only look like they 're too fragile to be deadly . '' The Magic Wand is a unique weapon in that unlike swords , bows or guns , this weapon is generally not for use in physical combat , but is instead a purely magical weapon .", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB528PM": "What To Do With Suicidal Thoughts If you are having thoughts of suicide follow these three suggestions: 1. Talk with Someone Instead of hiding suicidal thoughts, explore suicidal ideas in a manner that brings them outside of yourself. This means talking about your feelings with someone who can be caring, calm,. If you are feeling lethargic, then write about how that feels. Write about how you are hurting, how your life sucks, how you can't feel joy anywhere. But even though I'm feeling this way, I choose to go on with my life today. I don't know how I'm going to overcome this depression, but I am doing the best I can. Unexpressed, internalized suicidal thoughts tend to dwell on the process of suicide. Meaning thoughts are generally related to planning the act, thinking about when you would do it (today, tomorrow, next week), and the method you would use. Without expression, those types of thoughts gather momentum, growing bigger and stronger, until they obsessively swirl around in your head.", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30V928S": "I'm gon report on yall", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWTRZY": "If you want him to be happy I highly suggest you get him a friend, preferably one of his litter mates. Otherwise he can become depressed. I thought my male rat was fine on his own, until I got him a cage mate.. and the difference is just amazing. Think about it from your rat's point of view she is being picked up by something over 50 times her size and even if she is only being held a few feet in the air it can be quite frightening as it is a much larger distance for her. Many rats enjoy sitting on shoulders this doesn't usually imply fear. If she's not showing signs that she's afraid of something (freezing in place, trying to hide etc) you've simply got yourself a little 'shoulder jockey'. If your hands are not very big, they may feel insecure. My smallest rats are happy to ride on my shoulder, but my big fat foot-long boys find my shoulders a bit too small and are much happier in my arms or on my lap.", "3H4IKZHALBGC28HGFSVQTRMW0L0NNT": "The 1918 Spanish Flu was caused by an influenza virus and became a serious pandemic that killed millions world wide. Malaria is caused by eukaryotic protists of the genus Plasmodium, a different type of infectious agent than a virus like the flu. Malaria is transmitted by mosquitoes. The Spanish Flu lasted approximately one year in 1918 - 1919. It was a very deadly pandemic during WW1 and is estimated to have killed between 25 and 50 million people world wide in that short time period, perhaps the worst human infectious disease toll in all of recorded history. The plague in the middle ages killed 8 to 13 million, for comparison. It may have influenced the outcome of some battles in WWI since it was taking a heavy toll on military men from all parts of the world.", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUE9LGC": "Macular edema Macular edema occurs when fluid and protein deposits collect on or under the macula of the eye (a yellow central area of the retina) and causes it to thicken and swell (edema). Diabetic macular edema (DME) is similarly caused by leaking macular capillaries. In 2010 the US FDA approved the use of Lucentis injections for macular edema. Participants on both treatment groups showed a reduction in macular edema symptoms over six months. However, wet ARMD can look like diabetic macular edema on an eye exam, so I would make sure that the doctor has the correct diagnosis. Treatment for diabetic macular edema does not include visudyne. The best way to look for macular edema is just have your eye doctor look in your eye. Since macular edema refers to something happening inside the eye it would be hard to just see it on symptom's, especially if you are trying to catch it early on. However, you will notice that you are losing peripheral vision.", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160O8MN": "A retainer is not a good idea.I was a professional body piercer for several years, and have done thousands of piercings. What you need to start with is a surgical steel barbell. It is the safest for your tongue, and anything else may get infected early on, and sometimes your body will reject other elements in a fresh piercing. Also, the tongue, takes a lot longer to heal than other places as you can imagine, because it is always wet. If you live with your parents and are going to try to hide it from them, be warned that it's going to be really hard at first because your speech will sound funny to them, so they may notice tight away. I hope this helps, and good luck with whatever you decide.", "3PR3LXCWSFXWP0RQGOZU9SIAXAQX9L": "Oh dear. We'll get through the suffering together.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12G7CJ": "i would go to the doctor. the pill is not 100, but then nothing is, except abstinence", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J44P9": "Marching season only had a few weeks left in it when I first passed out and was diagnosed and somehow , someway I pushed my way through and finished my sophomore season of marching band in high school . My plan however of starting ballet back up didn My not being able to start ballet up again caused me to have this really crazy and new outlook on life because I was now sick .", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQLERG": "Can u imagin crap!! I even joined b4 U oh ws js nactiv.. imagine babalawo don join twitter", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD478X6": "Step 1 Your Sex To Know How Many Weight Watchers Points You Get The first step to know how many weight watchers points you get is to determine a starting point depending on your sex. Women  Start with 2 Weight Watchers points Men  Start with 8 Weight Watchers points Nursing Women  Start with 12 Weight Watchers points Step 2 Your Age To Know How Many Weight Watchers Points You Get The next step to know how many weight watchers points you get is to add. Take the first two numbers in your weight and add them to what you have so far to know how many weight watchers points you get. Weight  180 pounds  Add 18 points Step 5 Your Height to Know How Many Weight Watchers Points You Get The last thing to know how many weight watchers points you get is to adjust based on your height. 0 Weight Watchers points 5 ft to 5 ft 9 inches  1 Weight Watchers points 5 ft 9 inches and over  2 Weight Watchers points PS this is a great website to use a calculator http://www.webmilhouse.com/pointcalc.php", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08NT8C": "Everytime I poop, i clean my stool 100 and then notice that my butt is leaving spots of blood on the toilet paper. This means 2 bloody wipes, to sometimes 4 or 5. The blood is fresh and bright red, and they are just spots, no super liquidy blood clots, and there is never any pain. I started noticing this about two years ago, and never told anyone about it. Also, my intestines sometimes seem to make weird loud groaning noises when i feel like i have to pass gas, but i never do. Ever. Seriously. And it sounds like a hungry stomach but i can feel it and I know it's not in the stomach. I don't think my stool ever looks like its mixed with the blood, but sometimes my stool can be very very odd looking, and not normal at all. I've noticed that this happens more often when my stool is larger. I've been told by different sites that this could be something small like hemmoroids to something serious like cancer. I'm very embaressed about this subject and i'm not real quick to want to see a doct", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEF8GI": "Skin is itchy, feels to be crawling, feel unwell in tummy, eye is unhelpful, mood in the toilet  the thought of food makes me sick GG Body", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B02K67": "I have a painting and there is a signature somewhere on the painting, but I can't understand it. Is there a place online where I can show a picture of the painting or send a photo to someone and they identify it? 1 following 14 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  just now  I have searched for years to find the name of the artist of these paintings. Here is what I know. They were purchased in Mexico City in the yearly 80's. I have been told it is a female artist that may have lived in the the southwest of the United States. Diane  The artist of the painting of the woman is Anna Razumovskaya. Anonymous  Does anyone know the artist of this painting on the left of the photo?", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE17IP4": "any chance there is something stuck in his throat like a bit of stick or a piece of bone", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0P1JU": "never exp. b4", "3ZFRE2BDQ9CBVR93KMTTMGK3CDHXZ3": "I suggest you go to this web site because it has divisions of history according to country, time periods, and culture. Very useful for teachers and students of all levels. Esuhistoryprof offers bibliographies in both American and World history for teachers and students looking for texts concerning various topics. History Learning Site provides a wide range of links to significant periods in world history of interest to history teachers. The History Teacher offers ideas for teachers teaching AP world history with all sorts of aids that will expand the activities in the classroom. Medieval History in the Movies another film-based website for teachers covering the Middle Ages. Dowling's Passport. Samurai Archives provides a glimpse into Japanese history for teachers and students with background information on the way of the warrior, chronologies, and maps. Teacher Oz's Kingdom of History offers a wide range of topics for teachers of American history, world history, and government. gatita63109", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS4BC6": "This a a COMPLETE LIST of publishers in the UK..  HOPE THIS HELPS http://www.lights.com/publisher/db/country/United-Kingdom.html  Ya, i want to publish my poem book.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWURZZ": "RAT NEWS ONLINE: NZ halts cull after rare bird death: New Zealand has halted a bird cull ... http://t.co/NBCslJKE3M rats pets animals", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGUPJL": "In your case you have a couple of choices. First is if you only want them for a cosplay and not for everyday wearing yo may be better off just going on line to get a pair. If you Google search , non prescription colored contact lenses there are several good sources. I know that 'Freshlooks' offers colored contacts for under 25.00. But if your considering them to wear for the cosplay as well as other tomes then it is a much better idea to make an appointment for a n eye exam and contact fitting. This of course is going to cost you considerably more. But if you haven't had your eyes examined in a while it's probably worth it. that way you will know that there hasn't been any change in your vision and that the contacts are made to fit your eyes.", "3B0MCRZMBRSC8E56BMLA15WM0F0PPL": "You might have diabetes, If your mom won't take you to the doctor maybe you can ask a school nurse? Hope you feel better : http://answers.yahoo.com/question/index?...", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK0Z78": "Writing Erotica is just like writing any genre of fiction. You will have to find a publisher by writing query letters, synopsis, or possibly get a literary agent. --- E publishers don't require an agent but they do want the work as close to perfect as possible. They do have a contract to be signed just like a print publisher and you do have to query them first as well. Some erotic websites are Cerridwen, Ellora's Cave, Red Sage, and Echelon Press. --- If you just want to make some quick money and your work is more like porn then consider men's magazines. They pay up to 250 dollars for a few thousand words.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GUJ5U": "The American College of Sports Medicine suggests working out most days of the week for 60 minutes when trying to alter your body composition. The only way to melt fat is to burn more calories than you consume. To lose 1 pound of fat you must create a caloric deficit of 3,500 calories. Monitor your caloric intake and cut 200 to 300 calories from you daily diet. Eliminate empty calories such as soda and fast food since they provide your body with little to no nutritional value and can add up fast. Choose to eat lean meats, whole grains, low-fat dairy products, fruit, vegetables and nuts to keep your body fueled and feeling full, which prevents overeating. Train aerobically for 60 minutes a day to reach your flat stomach and thinner thigh goals. Cardio training burns a high amount of calories. Choose running, swimming, stair climbing -- all these activate the lower body and core muscles and can burn between 500 and 900 calories, depending on your intensity.", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWOPAMU": "Your blood sugar level drops, as do body temperature and respiration rate. But, the main problem is you become AWARE of breathing, heartbeat etc. as you have no 'daytime distractions', thus you're more prone to start exaggerating any body sensations. This spirals out-of-control into a panic attack. Look carefully at your life for any stressors and try to deal with, or accept them. If you are 'panicky' in the night, get up, move around, have a warm  non-caffeine  drink, maybe read something 'light' till you feel relaxed and pleasantly tired, then lay down again. If they are happening frequently see your doc., you may need a short course of mild tranquilizers.", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QV7YO": "a podiatrist is a good choice for your problem. if you would like to do some research ahead of going for visit, it sounds like you may have plantar fasciitis along with CT band syndrome. And if you have diabetes, you could lose your legs if you don't have this treated.", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFP4QZ": "There is probably nothing wrong with him. If you're worried just ask about it when they have a check up. There are often a lot of differences in families. Michael Jordan was 6'6 and his older (full-blooded) brother only grew to be 5'7. Another example is two brothers I know well. They are 22 months apart, and when they were 15 and 13 the older brother was 5'10 and 200 pounds, and the younger brother was 5'3 and 100 pounds. Now that they are full grown the older brother is a 6'1 and 275 pound weight lifting football player. The younger brother is 6' and 155 pounds, and is skinny with very little muscle mass. Sort of a reversal of what you're talking about, but you can see the brothers have very different body types and that the short one did have a late growth spurt and is tall too.", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY4E20": "YOU REALLY NEED TO SEE A DOCTOR as those things might be symptoms of cardiovascular problems. Having no health insurance should not stop you from getting the medical attention that you deserve. Never ignore chest pain or shortness of breath.", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2RHAT": "'The Code of Hammurabi (also Hammurabi), the most complete and perfect extant collection of Babylonian laws, was developed during the reign of Hammurabi (r. 1792-1750 B.C.) of the first dynasty of Babylon. The code consists of Hammurabis legal decisions, which were collected toward the end of his reign and inscribed on a diorite stele set up in Babylons Temple of Marduk, a temple named for the national god of Babylon. The 282 case laws include economic provisions (prices, tariffs, trade, and commercial regulations), family law (marriage and divorce), as well as provisions dealing with criminal law (assault, theft) and civil law (slavery, debt). Penalties for breaking the laws varied according to the status of the offender and the circumstances of the offense. The code survives only in the Semitic Akkadian tongue, but it is clear that it was also meant to apply to the non-Semitic Sumerians, representing an integration of the traditions of both peoples. Hammurabis Code is the most com", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAVADA": "AIDS, HPV (some kinds) and syphilis (if left untreated) can be deadly. HIV progresses more rapidly into full-blown AIDS without treatment, usually because of infections that develop as a result of the patients weakened immune system. yes, it is an std.", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF59CHN": "The amount of food you feed your pet is not only determined by the weight of your dog, but by the quality of the food you feed. Higher quality foods such as Iams, Eukanuba, Nutro, Science Diet etc., allow you to feed a lower quantity of food because of the higher digestibility of the ingredients. Whatever food you choose, follow the recommended feeding guide on the back of the package - consider looking for a puppy food specifically for small breed dogs. If you haven't already, you should also take your dog to the vet and bring a fresh stool sample. Almost all puppies are born with worms (transferred from the mother) and these worms shed eggs into your dog's feces. They can only be seen with a microscope, but if your vet finds something, treatment is pretty simple.", "3OQQD2WO8I4DK3DF0TYJF5S995FI3S": "Get another guinea pig to put in there with him", "3MJ9GGZYO349T3YYK5S1FXZYQJAA25": "I'm sorry I left you half-answered last time. I seriously suggest you go to another doctor fairly soon. The feeling of a rapid heart beat is called palpitations.", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LRWHG": "I have a problem with grinding my teeth OMG I grind my teeth when I sleep all the time!", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J8352": "Shut your eyes and think then write the first thing that pops into your head. Then take notes on other things that come to mind and use them for later.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXHJC3": "There are two schools of thought on this. The first says that it is not only important to know the time and the place in which a book was written, but who the writer was. For example, this school of thought would say that in order to fully understand Mark Twain's writing, you must know about his early life experiences growing up on the Mississippi River and everything that happened in his life after that. The second says that a work of literature should stand alone, which means we should appreciate it for what it is, not all the things the writer didn't put in it, even if they were a part of the historical context, etc. As a reader, you must decide what you believe, or which school you belong to. My own point of view is that it. If a book is ABOUT a time or place, then, yes, I think you need to understand that context. However, if a book is about the human condition--which most books are--it's really unnecessary to go beyond what is written in the book. This, of course, is only my opinion.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2GT1R": "OBSESSED - and here is the latest evidence. Please describe me in one word? 0 Stars In Other - Beauty  Style - 7 answers - 19 minutes ago - Open How do you get onto Broadway? 0 Stars In Performing Arts - 2 answers - 21 minutes ago - Open Please describe me in one word? 1 Stars In Other - Beauty  Style - 11 answers - 3 hours ago - Open How do you get onto Broadway? 0 Stars In Performing Arts - 1 answer - 1 day ago - Open Please describe me in one word? 0 Stars In Other - Beauty  Style - 11 answers - 1 day ago - Open Please describe me in one word? 0 Stars In Other - Beauty  Style - 15 answers - 2 days ago - Open Boy problem please help!? 0 Stars In Singles  Dating - 6 answers - 2 days ago - Open Please describe me in one word? 0 Stars In Other - Beauty  Style - 12 answers - 3 days ago - Resolved Boy problem please help!? 0 Stars In Singles  Dating - 4 answers - 3 days ago - Open Boy problem please help!? 0 Stars In Singles  Dating - 4 answers - 3 days ago - Open Boy problem", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK03JL": "O.K between your friend and the first answerer, we almost have it right. We need to separate three different aspects of ancient roman life, and then see if we can relate them:1) The Roman Triumph - this was not simply a parade. it was a supreme moment in the life of a Roman general (remember that for all of the republic and the early 'empire,' generals were just politicians rising up the cursum honorum (the ladder of honor, i.e. state offices in which you commanded troops.) In order to triumph, a general had win an overwhelming victory against a foreign enemy, add new territory to Rome (and kill so many enemy soldiers.) The general had to acclaimed on the field of battle by his own soldiers, and then a report had to be submitted to the senate and examined to make sure the battle had met the above mentioned criteria. What made the triumph an extraordinary occasion, was that the general and his troops marched through Rome to the Capitoline hill. The boundary of Rome was cal...", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXCFVR": "You are at very high risk for STD transmission. I highly recommend forcing your skank of a sister to move out.", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WUPUJ": "it all depends on genetics, if both of your parents are very tall and their whole families are tall, it is possible you could grow another inch or two. most girls nowadays seem to have major growth spurts ending by the time they are 15 or 16 then not growing very much more. im 18, 6'1' and have been over 6' since i was 14 (it was so awkward towering over all the guys in my grade:))", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2AM0C": "That happened to my pointer finger recently in a sliding van door. You can't really make it go away any easy way. Your nail will soon crack into about 10 - 15 pieces but will stay on your finger. They may then fall off and regrow badly and repeat the process, but it could also heal instantly. Just keep a band-aid on the finger and some ice every once in a while. Hope that helped and get better soon! :-)", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAVYKL": "Hi, First of all dont panic. Fisrt tell tale sign of FUS (Feline Urological Syndrom), is a change in behaviour, urinating outside his litter box, vocalizing, the abdomen feels round and hard, and there is a disntict amonia oder coming from his mouth. Your vet has already ruled this out.", "3NCN4N1H1GFA1ZSJC2QH2WM2JWLBNR": "So if you want to switch to another, by all means you should feel free to do so. When you find a new doctor, be sure that you sign any release forms provided at the new doctor's office for the old doctor to release your medical files to your new one. Aug 5, 2013 ... I had a doctor's appointment that morning to get a refill for my ... You get used to the looks people give you and you know they are ... That she would call all the pharmacies in town for who knows what reason. ... Doctors don't go against a patients wishes without good reason, so if they are not doing what you want them to do ask them why. You may have lost respect for your doctor, but be honest and ask yourself if they have lost respect for you also. The following day I left a message for my doctor at the office. ... but I told the receptionist I couldn't take Lortab, can someone please .... the doctors didn't give you ample time to explain all of this to them. .....", "37AQKJ12TXM8SYRK9K3EBPYGEL7TT0": "Title: My penis enlargement story The purpose of sharing my story with you is to make sure that you do not make the same mistakes as me. Just by looking at the other boys I knew that I was smaller, this infuriated me. In fact I lost a lot of girlfriends due to my penis size. To my surprise and astonishment I measured my penis 2 months later and I noticed that my flaccid and erect penis was 0.5 inches bigger! OK - so these are not massive gains but they were gains! I was NOW excited, I continued for months but couldn't achieve anymore gains. Within a few days I noticed a sharp increase in my sexual desire and I was experiencing the hardest erections of my life. Other women apart from my girlfriend noticed this, they must have noticed my now large. I wanted to share my experiences with others and that is what this site is all about. You can take my advice or leave it but whatever you do make sure that you do not get ripped off by the many sites out there that just want to make a quick buck.", "3UUSLRKAUL1EDBYGAR0Y1POCM2S7DJ": "im on the pill and the exact same thing happened to me babe :) i lost appetite, loss of interest in sex, headaches, i was tired ALL the time, got stomach ache a lot and went dizzy quite a lot lol, so if you get any of these. dont worry, its just the pill until you get used to the change of hormones xxxx", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5ID3Z6": "You should follow the instructions on the bag as a starting point, divided into two meals a day. Then, monitor your dog's weight-- if she's gaining too much, decrease the amount of food, and if she's getting too thin, increase the amount of food. You can monitor her weight using the 'look-feel' test. You should be able to feel her ribs and frame when you lightly run your hands along her sides. When she's running, you should be able to see her muscles and frame, but not when she's at rest. Your vet can also help you determine whether or not your dog is at a healthy weight. Better-quality foods will help her stay lean and at a healthy weight. You can use sites like dogfoodscoop.com or dogfoodadvisor.com to check out commercial dog foods, or you can research a prey model raw diet.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879KX6C": "Whatever you like. I prefer to wear nothing, if I go swimming in them I do not like the feeling of wet underwear after I get out of the water.", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30V682V": "Chest Pains Lots of things cause chest pains. How do you know if you should call 911? Some chest pains are minor problems such as muscle aches and gas bubbles.", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8LWBZ": "Keep doing what your doing. How long have you been exercising for? Try drinking more water and herbal teas(not black tea) Peppermint, alfalfa,chamomile are good. Eating fruits and veggies and avoid sugar, aspartame, starches and preservatives. As this will make you gain weight and will take longer to get a flat stomach. taking Vitamin C everyday, morning and night. Taking 2 tbsp. of apple cider vinegar 3 times a day before each meal will help your metabolism work better. Make sure its unfiltered though. (Bragg's brand is best). Good luck XD", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOGT7O": "Income .. Easily. These two words do not go with each other. There is no easy way to make money. Neither on the internet nor in real physical world. Now, when you visit a site, the site gets a profit and the one who asked you to go there gets points, which might or might not be converted to cash. Multilevel marketing schemes etc. the less said about them, the better, I think. Most sites either want to sell you a book or a kit or a cd or something like that, they say will tell you a thousand and one ways to ''earn money easily on the internet''. Some might also require you to pay a upfront fees for ''training and other expenses'' or ask you to make deposit. Remember one point, always. No one is out to make you rich. They are to make a profit for themselves.", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I1IDN": "my Personal items/my memory box", "3TUOHPJXYHV71W4Y9Z9MNCQLVBDWXC": "What's wrong with my body?Blackout/Greyouts on roller coasters. ?Is it normal for my body to feel this way?", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C2W51": "Can dogs and cats coexist in your home? The answer is maybe. In many cases, dogs and cats can learn to get along. With patience and persistence, you may be able to teach dogs and cats to tolerate one another. In some cases, they may even become friendly. However, it is important to understand that some cats and dogs will never fully accept one another and may not be able to live together peacefully. But, before you throw in the towel, take some time to try and make it work. Learn how to introduce cats and dogs to one another and prevent disaster in the household. Why Cats and Dogs Often ClashDogs and Cats are both predatory creatures. In general, they are genetically hard-wired to hunt and chase smaller creatures. This prey drive varies from animal to animal. In dogs especially, the breed has a great impact on prey drive. For example, Terriers were originally bred to hunt and kill vermin. If one sees a cat - especially a small cat - this predatory instinct might kick in.", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO8Y4Y": "That outlet is a GFCI protected circuit. If the radio fell into the bathtub it would trip instantly before you even felt a tingle. GFCI's are put there for protection. If you change it, replace it with another GFCI. DO NOT remove it. Have you plugged anything else, other than the radio, into the plug? Could be the radio tripping the button. Try a hair dryer or other device. If it still trips then fetch another GFCI and replace. If it doesn't trip then the radio is going on the fritz", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH0729QZ": "omg same here eye would probably di-eye cuz there just so gorgeous ! :)", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6FRHB": "The Liver Cirrhosis Bible  Ezra Protocol: Liver Cirrhosis Is Devastating Condition That Rui... http://t.co/akuXOUPqzW Liver Cirrhosis", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9TEJQ": "I've had this problem in the past and I don't think it's a creative block.", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH05D3J": "You sound like you have Generalized Anxiety Disorder. What you are experiencing is a panic attack which oftentimes occur for no apparent reason. You might want to make an appointment with your doctor. He/She might need to change your dosage, add an additional medication, or try a different medication altogether. Opinion 2: Major life changes can definitely set you back. But you already know that you can do and now you have even more reason to want to overcome the attacks. I have to be honest being a new mom is stressful, but wonderful at the same time. I gave up breastfeeding with both of my daughters after the first two months because I realized that I needed to be back on medication. The only way to take care of your child is to make sure that you are also taking care of yourself. The hormones after pregnancy for me were far worse than during. I am taking meds right now but want to work at getting off of them. I am doing this by exercising when my daughters take their nap and makin", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K57XM": "No. Studies show that protein  carbs as a delivery system is the best way to rebuild muscle after workouts. A lot of the things that many people claim are good for you are not really good or bad for most people.", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1EXNA5": "A healthy diet, with proper  of calories is the answer to belly fat.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8WE52": "As an example, a term rewriting system for 'multiplying out' mathematical expressions could contain a rule 'x'('y''z') ? ('x''y')  ('x''z'). In order to prove termination, a reduction ordering () must be found with respect to which the term 'x'('y''z') is greater than the term ('x''y')('x''z'). This is not trivial, since the former term contains both less function symbols and less variables than the latter.", "3OQQD2WO8I4DK3DF0TYJF5S995EI3R": "Balance Retraining Therapy is also of significant benefit for fall prevention in the elderly patient who may suffer from multiple sensory and motor impairments or for those who have sensory disruption with moving visual information. Visit VEDA 's Resource Library to get more information about your vestibular disorder and download one of VEDA 's many short publications . Please help VEDA continue to provide resources that help vestibular patients cope and find help . ( 800 ) 837-8428 Phone  ( 503 ) 229-8064 Fax  5018 NE 15th Ave  Portland , OR 97211  Tax ID 93-0914340", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CR2ODQ": "Sometimes this happens when stool is very hard and dry. Eating more fiber and increasing fluids can help this. If it doesn't, you could try a stool softener like Colace. It's very gentle and the body doesn't become dependent on it. You might have a small hemorrhoid. http://www.mayoclinic.com/health/hemorrh... Generally a little bit of blood every once in a while is not a big deal. If this happens every time you poop, and your stools are normal, please see a doctor. Opinion 2: Drink more water. Most likely your body is low on fluids (and im not talking about coffee, pop or juice). This basically causes the skin in your anus to dry up, and when you poop, and there arent enough fluids to make it just slide out, it gets forced out, stretches the dry butt skin, craking it and making it hurts like crazy. Then if you hold it in, you will get stomach cramps (constipation). Start drinking alot more water during the day. It may still hurt for a few more days, but once your body is hydrated, yo", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMUT3J": "Combine water and brown sugar pour over bread. 1/2 cup granulated sugar 1/2 cup firmly packed brown sugar 1/2 cup Butter, softened 1/2 cup peanut butter 1 large egg 1 teaspoon vanilla extract 1/4 teaspoon salt 1 3/4 cups all-purpose flour 1 teaspoon baking soda 1/4 cup granulated sugar 48 milk chocolate candy kisses, unwrapped Heat oven to 375F. Combine 1/2 cup sugar, brown sugar, butter and peanut butter in large mixer bowl. Continue beating, scraping bowl often, until well mixed (1 to 2 minutes). Roll balls in 1/4 cup sugar. As far as the cherry you wrap the dough around......use a basic sugar cookie recipe and roll out place cherry in middle and roll back...then shake colored sugar or crushed candy canes...it's fun, you can even roll the cherry in the middle where the dough looks like a candy wrapper.....just when baking keep your eye on it as it will burn faster! SUGAR-FREE STRAWBERRY CHEESECAKE 3 (8 oz.) cream cheese, softened 1 c. no-sugar-added strawberry pourable fruit 3...", "3OLZC0DJ8JDXWCFYK34PY0KS0P3IVK": "Macular edema Macular edema occurs when fluid and protein deposits collect on or under the macula of the eye (a yellow central area of the retina) and causes it to thicken and swell (edema). The swelling may distort a person's central vision, as the macula is near the center of the retina at the back of the eyeball. This area holds tightly packed cones that provide sharp, clear central vision to enable a person to see detail, form, and color that is directly in the direction of gaze.", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFTZDWP": "Get it pulled and get a false tooth. It will die and turn black soon  My son is having it done this Friday for his lower front teeth (both, I believe.)", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP88S1": "Gosh i hate it when it happens to me i feel so embarassed and somehow half the man and the fact that i know that inside she thinks its her who cant give me and erection when its not SHE IS SO HOT . I really dont have a deffinate answer to this qustion but below are some reasone why i think this may happen . relax dont think so much if you start thinking alot you loose the erection .", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1EZNA7": "My son got his first double ear infections at about 6 months old. After several years of constant ear infections, and hearing loss (from constant fluid) during kindergarten and 1st grade, he finally got tubes. He was 7, and hasn't had an ear infection since then. Warmth always seemed to help some too. It simply numbs the ear so the child doesn't feel the pain. If the eardrum ruptures, the child's ear would still hurt some, but he would feel instant relief because the severe pressure causing the pain would be relieved. Antipyrine and benzocaine ear drops Antipyrine and benzocaine ear drops is a medication for the treatment of ear pain caused by otitis media. It combines antipyrine, a pain reliever, benzocaine, a numbing agent to treat ear pain, and Hydroxyquinoline Sulfate, an antiseptic. A/B otic drops are effective because antipyrine reduces pain and inflammation and benzocaine numbs the ear. Finally, the mom could talk to the doctor about numbing drops for the ear (like Auralgan f...", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R39E6K": "The relationship failed with a huge crash as he left me for a younger woman . ( Talk about painful . He had an affair with her and she claimed she was pregnant . So he left me in complete and utter heartbreak while she was claiming they were going to have a baby .", "3T5ZXGO9DEMRMU8RY8Y1S8OAFAUZQ8": "The humans who developed pinky toes could balance better and therefore move more efficiently. Because of that, they could hunt better and catch more food. Therefore, the humans with the pinky toes got more food and survived long enough to pass on their traits, and their offspring developed pinky toes.", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBZ03G": "His tooth though was brown from him falling and hitting his mouth on a table and then he was playing with the dog and it got cracked...so it fell out early. No other teeth have come out yet. I will be anxious to hear what other Moms have to say...but I'm glad my son isn't the only one with this problem! The dentist told me his adult tooth is there and sometimes if a tooth comes out too early it takes  a while for the adult one to come down. L. G.B. answers from Tulsa   on   August 08, 2010 Go to a Pediatric Dentist, they put kids to sleep while they work on them. I wish I had had the opportunity when I was a child. I fear Dentists to this day and will not go except to get my rotten teeth pulled. A Pediatric Dentist is a specialist, not a family dentist, don't be fooled.", "3ABAOCJ4R82RNN98JJ87K6S106BQMH": "Make the audience aware of something that endangers the characters but the characters don't know about it. This heightens the suspense A LOT!!! For example, two characters are walking together at night.", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFTYDWO": "I too think that you need to switch-up and not use so many he so often. Will you let us read more as you go, or when you are done with the story please? Reading back through your earlier stories could be helpful to help you as you improve. I am a huge promoter of actually reading the book the way the author originally wrote it, so I beg you to actually read it. They can tell when those are the only notes that you've read. Quite often they will want you to quote directly from the actual book so please read it too. We actually read an exerpt of 'The Prince', but I think I remember enough to answer some of your questions. This may sound really stupid, but we learned that the main reason that Machiavelli wrote 'The Prince' was because he wanted a job as an advisor to a Prince. This book is sort of a self-help guide for princes LOL. He thought if he showed the world that he knew how to be a prince, maybe he could get a job as an advisory. I also suggest reading the book if you want to kn...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PESH8Q": "Yes- he really needs to go back to the doctor to determine what the cause is. Rectal bleeding has many causes including hemorrhoids, Crohn's Disease, fissures, peptic ulcer disease, polyps, amongst other reasons. Most rectal bleeding comes from the colon, rectum, or anus. The color of the blood often depends on the location of the bleeding in the gastrointestinal tract. The closer the bleeding site is to the anus, the blood will be a brighter red. Bleeding from the transverse colon and the right colon tend to be dark red or maroon colored.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PS81E": "It could be stress. Muscle tighen and contract. One way to tell is if you can pin point where the pain is you have to consider stress.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2CEFN": "A cats personality is more likely to change negatively when she's in heat and raising litters, than if she's spayed. I've had many cats, both intact and altered cats, and while a number of the breeding cats (show cats of several different breeds, not mixed breed cats) showed personality changes when in heat, pregnant, and raising kittens, I never had a cat's personality change for bad after that cat was neutered and spayed, regardless of the age that the cat was neutered or spayed. By being spayed, her chances of getting ovarian cancer or uterine cancer are gone. A spayed cat lives a longer, healthier life. After a cat is spayed, she can be switched to an indoor cat formula and no longer needs the kitten formula. Please schedule a spay ASAP for her health. Your best bet is to wait out the heat and be very careful about keeping her indoors during that time. Then, take her to the vet and get her spayed. Cats in heat are generally miserable and needy it's a kindness to get them spayed...", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYXE84": "I have been wearing my retainer tray now for 2 years and I am ..... Because the treatment isn't in-house they can improve your teeth but .... My skin is burning and tight. ..... Hopefully I can update with progress in the next couple of month. ..... I've noticed that my teeth tend to shift pretty quickly that it feels tight when I ... Also, there's a tiny gap between 1 of the front teeth and the retainer. ... They do not look bad but one of the upper front teeth isn't ver... Mine included it as a good will gesture to earn my business. I payed 2,995 for my treatment since my case was not complex and was close to an express case. Personal experience dealing with the invisalign process from the beginning to the end. Mar 19, 2008 ... I have found my retainer and put it in, its extremely painful at the moment but i ... me if i suck it up for a month or so my retainer should fix my teeth no problem.", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW88G15": "The Show is right on , we had a steer doing the same thing , fine in the morning when we put them in the barn , by afternoon bloated , started throwing hay out for them a half hour before we put them in the barn , bloat has gone away . We also cut back on the morning feeding and added it to the night time feeding .", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJY8A2": "Backyard Breeder Victim Rosie The Chihuahua: Her Heartwarming Story (Grab The Tissues) Bruine http://t.co/u0RJ3d878I", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBLXI1W": "Yes there is but it is a genetic fault and not accepted by the AKC along with red rotts. I have not come across any finding how long salmonella bacteria can live in a host. I hope he lives a very long life!", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12F7CI": "He led Germany and was very good although he was evil,' the newspaper quoted the group's leader, an un-named 15-year-old female student, as saying in Saturday's edition. 'Don't you think he's very handsome? He started World War II, but it's okay, he's still our hero.'", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX39Q05": "So very true......", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1P92M": "I just want to add this to the above referenced section of the FDCPA regarding interest. That section does NOT prohibit interest charges. It states that unless it is stipulated and is expressly authorized by the agreement creating the debt  (this is the consent form you signed at the dentist office) interest may be charged. Many medical practices include in their contracts to provide services a little clause that states if the client fails to make full payment, then the debt will be setteled in collections and any interest and fees may be included. If you can get a copy of the original signed permission form from the dentist, look it over to see what it says. Also your state law may allow for this practice as per the FDCPA 15 U.S.C. 1692n. Relation to State laws This subchapter does not annul, alter, or affect, or exempt any person subject to the provisions of this subchapter from complying with the laws of any State with respect to debt collection practices, except to the exte", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRYCV67": "I think what you and your husband are trying to do is a beautiful thing but I don't think you thought of the bigger picture. One child may be a hand full....Two toddlers is just plain suicide. I personally would wait a few more years before expanding the family.", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEMHK9": "More kids are taking AP, which has become a lot easier over the years. There is so much about history to be learned that it can't all be covered. I enjoy the earlier times in history and the modern (post WWII) less. An ideal teacher is well rounded, so just choose what you enjoy, and lots of different kinds fo subjects, that way you will do best... and are more likely to get the qualifications you need to get into uni, and then onto teacher training. but his employment history is with low-paying jobs not requiring a degree, ... I'd like to hear from anyone with ... about looking for teaching jobs and the ... the main thing that has worked for us is?... My best advice is to look for a teacher's aide/assistant job in the district you want to work in and learn the system (this allows you to network and be ready when a job becomes available).", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8OAG5K": "I've never had it, but I have heard a lot. I'm sure you know, but Tommy John surgery is major surgery. It does involve taking something out of your arm and putting something else in. Cost is something that you should not worry about if you are serious about reconstructing your elbow effectively, but it will cost you thousands of dollars. Not sure if insurance covers much, check with your agent about coverage. I am assuming you are talking about 'time out' as being time away from throwing something, a baseball, softball, or whatever it may be. One thing to consider is that the longer you wait to assume a normal throwing motion, the better your arm will be. Take note of Major League pitchers and their recovery time. A.J. Burnett took over a full season off, which came out to be about 18 months. Cory Lidle, Kerry Wood.....lots of pitchers took lots of time off. The norm is about that amount of time, 18 months, but a year is possible. You have to remember that professional athletes have", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5R5KC": "In the Furry Fandom, the wolf and fox are very common species to bedepicted Many furry fans use these related two species as the first two of them to be used as avatars (also called a Fursona). This means that is is fairly common to see art of these two species to start with. Add to this the fact that they are both Candide (Dog like) species that can both operate in similar family units and the fact that the color of foxes usually the rust-colored red fox and the white-colored Arctic fox) are naturally complimentary colors to wolves (often depicted as Gray, brown and tan), and it is easy to see how the two species can work together. However, no matter how many times you see the wolf and fox pairing one will tend to see far more depictions of the wolf with wolves and foxes with foxes.", "3MJ9GGZYO349T3YYK5S1FXZYQJ9A24": "U will always be needed in YOUR life because without U, YOUR life would not exist, so because of the existence of YOUR life, U are needed badly!", "3ZXV7Q5FJBMHNC78SE3Z5BJBZQ0FCW": "Excellent question. Site below explains it under phi -- the golden ratio.'' If you can see them they are really swollen.", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE8Z5W": "Go through the SPCA. They thoroughly screen potential adopters to make sure the animals go to a good home. Or, you can call local vets and ask them if they know anybody who is looking for a puppy. Sometimes they'll have a client that has lost their own dog and they'll mention to the staff/vet that if anybody surrenders a dog or they know somebody is trying to find a home for one, then to call them. Some people who have recently lost an animal aren't ready to physically go to a shelter to pick another dog, but if one kind of falls in their lap type of thing, they'll take it. And, the vet will know what type of an owner the person is (did they bring their other pet(s) in for yearly checkups, could they afford vet bills, was their previous pet well-kept, etc. ).", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD49X8X": "I like to take my time", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VFQ18": "Prophets are very aware of a supernatural Person communicating with them they have a sense of worthlessness. 2. Prophets often lose their strength. 3. Prophets at times fall to the ground in a deep sleep. 4. Prophets hear and see events in faraway places, as if they are actually present. 5. Prophets at times are unable to speak, but when their lips are touched, they are able to speak. 6. Prophets often do not breathe. 7. Prophets are oblivious to their surroundings though often their eyes are open. 8. Prophets at times are given extra strength while in vision. 9. Prophets receive renewed strength and breath when the vision is over. 10. Prophets occasionally experience temporary physical trauma following the vision. Not all of these physical characteristics accompany each vision. Thus, physical phenomena should not be used as the sole test of whether a prophet is genuine. Moreover, they can be easily counterfeited. The Scriptures do not present them as tests.", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM6D29": "i think its Dec 7, 1941 - Japanese bomb Pearl Harbor Hitler issues the Night and Fog decree. Dec 8, 1941 - United States and Britain declare war on Japan. Feb 2, 1943 - Germans surrender at Stalingrad in the first big defeat of Hitler's armies. Aug 14, 1945 - Japanese agree to unconditional surrender. Sept 2, 1945 - Japanese sign the surrender agreement  V-J (Victory over Japan) Day. Oct 24, 1945 - United Nations is officially born.", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6V0XB": "So he was doing the whole missionary thing while also learning English.Not easy.Okay, so this guy, his name is Doug.", "3P7RGTLO6EB4AJ2O9BY5FTLS7JTKAY": "Seven Songs for Malcolm X Seven Songs for Malcolm X is a British documentary film about the life of Malcolm X, the influential civil rights activist who was assassinated in 1965. It begins with the history of Malcolm X's family. Malcolm Jarvis (aka 'Shorty'), one of Malcolms childhood friends, describes meeting Malcolm in a pool hall, and says that his first impression of Malcolm was that he was a 'slickster from the yard'. Malcolm Jarvis describes their studies in mental telepathy, and says it has to do with Malcolm Xs transformation of the mind. Before that, he was simply 'Malcolm'. She says that before Malcolm X started this movement, there were less than six temples full of elderly people and Malcolm helped to transform it. Elijah Muhammad used this statement from Malcolm X to silence him for 90 days. Neither one of the people you mentioned changed their names for a cause. Malcolm X changed his for religious reasons and Dr. King changed his long before he got involved in c...", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNUX1OB": "it was on its way home!", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOPH5M": "Good Luck.Source(s): 2 years of fish keeping, and lots of research.I also didn't do research when I started and added an angel to my 14 gallon, but I had to give it away right after.", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TOB0CD": "At the precise moment in time when we ask ourselves What shall be done now?'' the decision will be based upon any number of variables influencing us at that time. Just another way of saying what is above.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1L8BZ": "'I don't suggest anyone should worry about anyone but themselves' -wise words of holly", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FX5PD": "It could be a sebaceous cyst. They're quite often close to the surface and you can sometimes squeeze white gunge out of them. shaft is a middle bulky poart of penis.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879L6XM": "He may be constipated, this can happen from time to time with dogs. You may want to try and give him some raw, mashed pumpkin (canned works well) or even a table spoon of mineral oil. Just as a warning though, the mineral oil may work quickly so be prepared to make several trips outside. The pumpkin takes a little longer to work but is not so harsh on their digestion. If the pumpkin or mineral oil doesn't work, or the constipation comes back in a day or so, definitely check with you vet to make sure it is not something more serious.", "3OQQD2WO8I4DK3DF0TYJF5S995B3I9": "For persons with severe cancer-related pain, the best medication can often be a narcotic combined with simpler medications such as acetaminophen or NSAID drugs (like Advil). Cancer pain is best managed by a doctor specialized in pain management. Most people think that taking a narcotic is going to completely take away all of their pain.", "3R16PJFTS3PP8UM70AOE2QZSF9Y4K8": "All of these comments are from my personal experiences, puppy pros- they are cute, cuddly and you get to watch your puppy grow up,  puppies are easier to train if you begin the training early on. Puppies will also tend to bond better with their owners, in my experience it is easier to get the dog on a normal 'routine' (eating, sleeping, playing at same time during day) while they are a puppy, puppy cons - they are quite expensive, puppies require numerous vet visits during their first year for all their vaccines, boosters, and if you have any other 'elective' surgeries such as dew claws removed, spay euturing, having tails docked. If you wish for your dog to be a house dog, it is time consuming and tedious to potty train puppies. They eat more often than full grown dogs and tend to have more sensitive stomachs (don't ever change their food)full grown pros- If the previous owner trained the dog then that is easier, (if the dog will mind you), if it is already house broke then you don't have t", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JTOHX": "Ok I've come on here to read some questions and answers regarding fitness... I didn't expect to find a question asking if I knew a 50 year old who burnt Cd's?!! But to answer your question as a matter of fact i do know a woman who is 50 years old and burns Cd's... my mother!", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S4SEI": "Barely matters to me at all. I had a boyfriend who had a lot of acne on his forehead and it never even phased me until he mentioned it. After that I noticed it more often but still didn't care at all. Another time, a couple weeks ago actually, I met a guy and he had acne on his cheeks and jaw area but he was still one of the best looking guys I have ever seen. Ultimately, acne isn't forever. It will clear one day so you no one should base their opinion of you off of something that is just temporary.", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4EUM4W": "A Game of Thrones (A Song of Ice and Fire, 1) A Clash of Kings (A Song of Ice and Fire, 2) A Storm of Swords (A Song of Ice and Fire, 3) A Feast for Crows (A Song of Ice and Fire, 4) A Dance with Dragons (A Song of Ice and Fire, 5) The Winds of Winter (A Song of Ice and Fire, 6) (in future) A Dream of Spring (A Song of Ice and Fire, 7) (in future) book 8 coming", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUUJAZ": "If you don't remember where you worked ask friends and family members. But the pillow works wonders! (well it works for me.)", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5TMO5": "Austin Cline Agnosticism  Atheism Expert Share Pin Tweet Submit Stumble Post Share By Austin Cline Many people imagine that the current structure and administration of the Catholic Church today is very much like it has always been, but that?s not the case. Early on, we can't even find evidence of a single bishop of Rome presiding over churches in the city. Although the official lists give the names of several ?popes? during the first decades, it is more likely that they simply presided over a council of elders. The first pope who actually is a single bishop presiding over the diocese of Rome was Pius I (142 - 155). In addition to the fact that there isn?t really any evidence for the existence of a church administration under the leadership of Peter, there isn?t even any evidence for such an administration under many of his successors.", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZJDT1": "a song of fire and ice a song of fire and ice a song of fire and ice a song of fire and ice a song of fire and ic", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHTZLV3": "You have to.... The only way that you can determine the source of your rectal bleeding is to have a medical provider examine you. It could be hemorrhoid or an anal fissure (a small tear of the anal ring). There are other causes, of course, but again, this is going to take an exam. Treatment will depend on the cause, so having a definitive diagnosis first is essential. While this may be embarrassing for you, it will not be for your medical provider. This is their job and they will get to the BOTTOM of this problem for you (pun intended).", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIJ3XD": "I feel your pain. I'm 19, also an artist, and even studying it in college for illustration. Too many artists think they aren't good enough when the reality is they are fantastic. Don't you worry your pretty little head, because there's lots of little things you could do to get over this artists block. One: Look up artistic quotes. You identify as being an artist and you should, so reading a bunch of these will help you feel better. My current personal favorite is Charles Horton Cooley's: quot. An artist cannot fail. it is a success to be one. Make a list of these quotes in your sketchbook, or on your wall, and view them everyday to keep yourself going. You can also look at work that you consider terrible, if you need some ego-boosting. This helps in moderation, but I don't think it should be used very often. Join and become an active member on an art website. Deviantart. com is my facebook.", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EOLHD": "Doesn't sound like you two are even going out.... Good luck.", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q6UFK": "Seeing occasional black spots moving in your vision is completely normal. Sometimes, though, it is a sign of a potentially dangerous condition. When you see a sudden increase of black spots, it could mean that your retina is about to detach from the back of your eye. If you see a lot of black spots, you must seek medical care immediately. The black spots you most likely have are just called floaters. According to the National Eye Institute, 'Floaters can look like spots, strands or squiggly lines. The spots move around slowly if you stop moving your eyes. If you try to focus on them, they move quickly out of the way. You can see them more easily if you look at something that is all white or the sky.' A retinal detachment is when any part of the retina detaches from the back of the eye. With any degree of detachment, you will suddenly see many black spots along with light flashes (called phospenes).", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1NQ8U": "nullAll people fantasise about being with another. Men more often. It's nature. No one wants to think about it and we certainly don't want to talk about it. 'Ouch!' says our ego. Movie stars are o.k. but neighbors and friends are 'real' and way too close to the bedroom. Is he respectful, dependable  loving? If so, tell him your willing to 'forget' about the whole thing as long as he agrees your friends are off limits for his viewing priviledges. His mind, however, is his domain. Don't torture him with your questions and he wont torment you with his answers. ", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134P6FV": "Ans(1 green link)--------  https://tr.im/mysites53", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEEO3T": "Could be many things. They could have fought and killed each other. They could have gotten sick. It could be they died of old age. they only live for one to two years. Are you sure they died? Some animals go into hibernation mode when the temperature falls and it looks like they are dead. Some adults turn down the heat when they leave for vacation and this causes hamsters to go into hibernation.", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUVAJR": "However , what makes finding the right exfoliation routine tricky is that it varies from person to person , depending on skin type . Someone with oily skin may exfoliate two or three times a week , while someone with dry skin may want to try it once a week . There are also different ways to exfoliate your face : You can do it chemically or physically , says Dr. Fox .", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGWJPH": "I don't know :(", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT7RBS": "Logic is the science and art which so directs the mind in the process of reasoning and subsidiary processes as to enable it to attain clearness, consistency, and validity in those processes. The aim of logic is to secure clearness in the definition and arrangement of our ideas and other mental images, consistency in our judgments, and validity in our processes of inference.", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUCOSK": "I really love the series. One of my favourite things is how there's no easy division of good and evil. Some characters are certainly more virtuous than others, but they're not necessarily on the side of right. The entire world is shades of moral grey, much like the real world. It's not as easy as nasty orcs vs. saintly hobbits.It will be interesting to find out what the motivations behind the Others are. Are they an impersonal force of destruction, or is there something else behind their campaign?I'm also eagerly anticipating the next book, and hoping that something good happens to at least one character in the next one.", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YILT59": "i think what u asked was 'cirrhosis' if im rite. Cirrhosis is characterized anatomically by widespread nodules in the liver combined with fibrosis. The fibrosis and nodule formation causes distortion of the normal liver architecture which interferes with blood flow through the liver.", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6X6QO": "Toothpaste is an old remedy, put it on before going to sleep. it drys it up. i use it when i get spots and it works. haven't tried it on my lip but there is no harm in trying..", "3EKZL9T8Y8K118YEN4RZ8WVOF5BCHP": "The Book Thief", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1L8QA": "I've woken up a few times on my stomach... Which is what woke me up and baby has always been fine. If you're 19 weeks then you won't feel baby move loads anyway because baby is still quite small... But it could be that they're having a lazy day which is why you haven't felt movement yet. I would ring your doctor or midwife to get checked out to put your mind at rest but most likely baby is fine... If you are worried then do what you need to do. They are there to help us. Don't forget that baby is Well protected in there and even in your sleep you are still caring for little one so probably weren't on your stomach for that long!", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N9VST": "Developing this idea, scholars have theorized on the relation of a spoken or written text to its broader context, that is to say everything outside the text itself. The question whether a performative is separable from the situation it emerged in is relevant when one addresses for example the status of individual intentions or speech as a resource of power. There are two main theoretical strands in research today.", "3UL5XDRDNCHN9CO65QALHDWFK5Z85Y": "it depends what the person is like. yes if he really cared about you. ANSWER: I think it depends on the married man, there are married men that become obsess towards his mistress because she is the first woman he slept with other than his wife. When and if this happens the married man become more into this other woman. There are some married man including my ex also becomes obsess with his mistress that he can't start his day without calling him first thing in the morning, and he can not go to bed without calling her first just to hear her voice. So the answer is yes there are some married men that do missed the time that he spent with his mistress after he got caught.", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX7A3D": "use the www.kayak.com search engine...its gets a whole summery of differnt airlines to compare with Valley Mill Camp Valley Mill is a children's day summer camp and kayaking school in Germantown, Maryland. It is accredited by the American Camp Association. Valley Mill Camp for Girls started in Colesville, Maryland in 1956 by Robert 'Mr. Mac' McEwan and May 'Skipper' McEwan, and then moved to Darnestown, Maryland in 1973.", "3UV0D2KX1MHES8UTZZXHMD7N7DH4F6": "Good luck and namaste angelwhispers  It sounds like she has been feeling bad for a while, I would go ahead and take her to the doctor.Good Luck.Mom to Leah and Adam  Add your answer 13 month old vomiting?", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX4WNT": "You are not pregnant  Also if you're not expecting your period, like say in the middle of the month you get a little blood, that would be spotting. When under alot of pressure and stress I've had two in a month.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX4GH4": "2 faced holaway tapped up jimmy kebe TRUE", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA8FJ9": "whoever is closest too you and mean the most to you tell them first......bear in mind go gentle when you tell them...as when you do they will never ever forget that time and day.......but you need to tell those you love at least first........it will be easier for you too. and you can also talk it over with loved ones too. goodluck,  may god be with you, jp", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26UZ08": "I can't imagine God not allowing my dog into heaven.", "3F6045TU7DM6O49SD8TGTPWSQ7099F": "WTF is a Pomsky? The German Shepherd is a good dog all around - intelligent, alert, fairly tolerant. But they can be dominant and high strung. Training can be difficult - needs a firm but fair hand and someone who knows multiple methods to find what best fits the individual dog. Needs over 40 minutes of exercise/stimulation per day. Should be socialized extensively from day one to prevent breed-common aggression/guarding behaviors. I don't recommend this breed for a first time owner, but will be great in a dog savvy family that can provide exercise, stimulation, socialization and training. Couldn't begin to tell you anything about a 'Pomsky', which i can only assume is a designer mutt. In which case traits could take after either dog breed in that particular mix.", "3M93N4X8HKLDZVI08QKKZEFLE0ZSJ2": "You are not the only one to slip but dont beat yourself up just try again. It took me 10 times or more to quit and I had smoked 50 some years. Well now its been about 3 months.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VY8LL": "You are not guaranteed to stop having your period while on Depo. For some people (like me) the effect is basically a couple days of very light bleeding once every month or two some other people bleed for the full three-month period until the drug wears off. What you're describing sounds like the normal side effects that some people get while on this drug. Not all birth control is right for everyone. There are a million different brands and methods for a reason - every woman has a unique body and her chemistry will react differently to various different types of birth control. It is clear that Depo isn't right for you talk to your doctor about using a different method.", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWRCCM0": "my brother,  Do analytical tests for thyroid such as free T3, free T4 , TSH and Thyroid Ab. and also do cardiac enzymes. then do eco for ur heart. and change ur doctor 'ask another doctors for that'. God give u the best health inshaa allah. N.B. sorry, if u r female, do hormones for postmenoposal like FSH, LH, Prol., Prog", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EGRUB": "Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado: Books: David Cutts,Edgar Allan Poe, ... The Cask of Amontillado is a perfect example of Poe's bizarre and peculiar style. ...www.amazon.com/Edgar-Allan-Poes-Cask-Amontillado/dp/0893756237 Amazon.com: Edgar Allan Poe's the Cask of Amontillado: Books: David Cutts,Edgar Allan Poe,Ann Toulmin-Rothe ...", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CRYODM": "' August is named after Augustus, the first emperor of Rome.ttp://t.co/yYb4zdPALr' Thanks for sharing! Happy Augustus month.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLPA0K": "The GRE may be retaken as many times as you wish, and only your highest score needs to be reported.However, you may only take the GRE once per calendar month, and you may only take the GRE up to 5 times per year.Each time you retake the GRE, you must pay the same registration fee.", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXFFVU": "I would advice this patient that they need to just go proceed with caution. We are finding out that lot of online pharmacies actually take drugs from other countries and send them overseas. So we can't guarantee the products that you get through the Internet are really what you think you are getting. So it could be kind of big problem in a small package. So I would highly recommend that if you are going to -- basically what are prescription medications over the Internet or through mail-order go through major companies based in United States These are also chains that have stores. We could actually walk into a store, and get a prescription refilled, and you want to be able to talk a pharmacist You know when you are doing with online, you are not going to be able to talk to anybody if you have a question about, is it going to interact with my medicine? It's actually a little bit risky.", "3VLL1PIENQMO1IVBJV6X33TA099OZM": "likley that person doesn't get on yahoo answers.... try 'www.craigs list and the name of the city you live in.You can post a free add their. example: yahoo search 'craigs list phoenix' do it for your city... Thats where people are buying and listing items maybe classifides.. you have much more of a chance finding that person. you can go right to 'craigs list phoenix' then scroll to the right and find your city", "3TC2K6WK9G0VAF5JN78NJ6T30VB28U": "Short term okay... but not designed for dogsOkay if you dog eats some but cat food now and then and good for a special treat. I isreally dangerous vice versa (cats eating dog food) though and that may be what you are hearing. In fact, cats can develop blindness or heart conditions from eating dog food. Cat foods aredesigned for cat's nutritional needs and dog food designed for dogs... feeding your dog cat foodis safer but could be some problems forthe dog. Cat food is supplemented with taurine and much higher in protein that dog food... that is probably why dogs like it--more meaty and less filler. However, cat food is probably too concentrated in protein and calories for dogs and likely metabolizing such a large dose of protein could be hardon their kidneys over time and may fatten them up and possibly cause the dog to become obese. Also, pet foods are supplmented with minerals and vitamins and doses designed specifically for youranimal. I would say...", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NHKR6": "If she isn't smiling then she just isn't that into you. Forget about her and move on.", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR8D6Q": "Not at all. I just started playing about a month ago and I already feel pretty comfortable.", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734RTIJ": "50 percent of women have no symptoms until rupture occurs. Following rupture of the tube, the woman may experience severe pain and profound hemorrhage (bleeding). There are new pregnancy tests that you can take up to 4 days before you missed period but at that point it is at best 50 accurate.", "3Q2T3FD0ON6ZGM36L8WB7YZQQEZ3MT": "It accounts for about 20 percent of acute viral hepatitis, 60 to 70 percent of chronic hepatitis, and 30 percent of cirrhosis, end-stage liver disease, and liver cancer. Almost 4 million Americans, or 1.8 percent of the U.S. population, have antibody to HCV (anti-HCV), indicating ongoing or previous infection with the virus. Hepatitis C causes an estimated 8,000 to 10,000 deaths annually in the United States.", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE4TQI": "Ever since I was a teenager I have dealt with a deformity called Tuberous Breast . The nature of the deformity is a snoopy nose shaped breast characterized with large areolas and bear little resemblance to normal round breasts . As an active teenager I figured I was a late bloomer because I played so many sports throughout High School , however , by the time I was 19 I realized that the way my breasts were is what I was going to get .", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXP5R9": "If living too far from home to live home while attending college, the student would NEED a dorm room. He/she only WANTS a college apartment, to live in a more expensive fraternity/sorority house, etc. Again, rightfully, the cost should be split 50/50, but the custodial parent can sink really low and burden the non-custodial one with 90 of the tuition in the state of NJ. Yes, this loan was announced for the first time ever last week. Unless you take the entire 50 years to pay it. But if you are going to live in a home for 2 years only and want to keep your cost as low as possible while you lived there, then a 50 year loan makes an awful lot of sense. (you're not going to pay much principal in 2 years, even on a 30 year loan. get a job and work while going to school. If the college is too far from home to live home while attending (another thing millions of people have lived through doing) a college dorm is NEEDED, however, a private dorm, college apartment, sorority house room is WA...", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6LO97": "I NEVER missed a period, with the exception of one month five years ago when I ..... All of you guys dealing with this that can't figure it out, PCOS sounds like the ..... there are no timeframes here, but is there one that I should be worried about? It's generally used for obsessive thoughts - so it should work quite well on standard worries. When something comes up that bothers you, tell yourself that you don't have time for it right now. Say - You're worried that you will...lose your job. Here's something I got from a site: Here are a few of the side effects of worrying: Self-doubt ?? It is a downward spiral that focuses on the negative and why things cannot be done versus why things can be done. And today, more than ever before, this is a life and death situation. Be very careful. The Word of God says: 1Thess4:3-5 3 God?? will is for you to be holy, so stay away from all sexual sin.", "3T6SSHJUZF8SA6VYLW56JBUYSN9IIP": "Let go to let in. How do you let go of stuff that has been handmade lovingly for you, but it is not your taste? This is a tough question and the answer is more for the gift givers and creators. If you do make things or have a specific craft or art specialty, ask your friends and family if they would like you to make them something OR if you can make something for a local organization in their name. For instance, if you are a quilter, you could make a quilt for a homeless shelter in the name of a friend. When you give a gift, include permission to pass it on without hurt feelings. As the recipient of arts and crafts (Im an artist so I dont take this lightly), ask the artist if you can donate the item to a place that could really benefit like a fundraising auction, library, retirement home, or appropriate venue/event. What about things that cant be donated, such as extra monogrammed wedding glasses? Even monogrammed items are useful to people who dont have the item to begin with.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4MEQI": "To arrive at this size, Van Gogh simply had to combine the legs of two standard sizes: the 50 cm leg from a size 12 and the 100 cm leg of a size 40 stretcher. The result was a 'double-square' of 50 x 100 cm, and from this size easily the 'square' could be derived by using two 50 cm legs. Other artists prior to Van Gogh and admired by him, like Charles-Franois Daubigny and Puvis de Chavannes, had used canvases of similar proportions, and Van Gogh was aware of this.", "3ZRKL6Z1E8138TSZ0KZH21N5M8KSG0": "nullCongratulations ! Emmoroid, This is a mydee fine day! Actually, I don't hava superpower. I'm not trying all that hard, and I don't understand how it works. Could this be, 'what you don't know, will kill you'. Oh, you have the day off!", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSF9DW": "If it is meant to be, it will be. If you are meant to be together, you two will find a way to make it happen.Now don't take this last part as flippant, it isn't meant to be.If you are not meant to be togother, there are other blokes around you know.Don't base your happyness on another person. Base it on yourself.And good luck with your romance.-Dio", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AAT15A1": "You can also use it yourself ! You can find it at reputable health food stores like Whole Foods . Good Luck ! Happy Paws ! Leslie My cat was fine until about three weeks ago and all of a sudden she stopped eating . She started going under the bed and wouldnt come out . Shes old so I figured she was getting ready to die .", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUI1MW": "First off, I am so sorry that you are 18 and have never had an orgasm. Secondly if the things you are trying are not working I have one suggestion for you that will not fail...Get a vibe. Use it by yourself or use it with your bf...either way you will be in heaven. )", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX1NWH": "a good complexion is admired by men (in my experience) however mild acne should not matter if a man looks at the whole package! There are men out there who are not shallow and who are not bothered about a bit of acne. I think the answer to this question will be self - evident - men who are interested in you and find you pretty will tell you so, acne and all. Just be confident and happy with yourself and the rest will follow :))", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPNUEY": "UR dk List of presidential qualifications by country This is a list of qualifications that potential candidates must possess in order to stand for election as president of a country. Article 62 of the Constitution of Afghanistan of 2004 states that a candidate for the office of President or Vice-President must: The 1998 Constitution, Article 86, Section 2 'Only an Albanian citizen by birth who has been a resident in Albania for not less than the past 10 years and who has reached the age of 40 may be elected President. ' Article 73, section 1 of the Constitution, 1996, provides that 'To be eligible to the Presidency of the Republic, the candidate should: have, solely, the Algerian nationality by origin be a Muslim be more than forty (40) years-old the day of the election enjoy full civil and political rights prove the Algerian nationality of the spouse (if born before July 1942) justify his participation in the 1st of November 1954 Revolution and if born after July 1942, 'jus...", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SY3HI": "Well, the fact that they've both driven you to submit this question in the mental health section, is reason enough to steer clear of both of them.", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B056KW": "Wait a few days then take a test if you haven't started   Opinion 2: It definitely sounds like you are ovulating. My nipples get sore right afterwards and I cramp right before I ovulate...", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RTC6M": "It might just be a skin condition.. or something to do with your genetics and all that... I have that same problem.. it doesn't bother me, so i don't think you should worry.. probobly just a minor non-harmful sideffect of something.. hasn't harmed me or you yet.. so it probobly wont.. don't worry that much about it.", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3513K": "Good luck! !anonymous4 years ago you can feed them pumpkin seeds and sunflower seeds, mine doesn't really care for them though, and sometimes wheat bread but rarely and not a whole bunch!anonymous4 years ago I have two guinea pigs and we live in Australia.", "3EQVJH0T40JINP0P9QMPX6VS3RATHO": "'The Globe and Mail' rated the film 3.5/4 stars and called the film 'gripping'. Jeff Shannon of 'The Seattle Times' rated the film 3.5/4 stars and described it as 'engrossing' and 'surprisingly suspenseful'. definately yes.", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNM0AE7": " Large molecules in biological systems namely proteins, nucleic acids, and polysaccharides. www.whatislife.com/glossary.htm  large single chemical entities such as pieces of DNA or RNA. www.biologylessons.sdsu.edu/classes/lab3/glossary.html  A macromolecule is a molecule of high relative molecular mass, the structure of which essentially comprises the multiple repetition of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of low relative molecular mass. en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Macromolecule A macromolecule is a molecule with a large molecular mass, but generally the use of the term is restricted to polymers and molecules which structurally include polymers.", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSHQDX": "Important Note: Frogs can make lovely pets, but frogs in the wild are facing population declines and extinction largely as a result of human activities. Unfortunately, the pet trade is likely contributing to the amphibian extinction crisis and the spread of an devastating infection by Chytrid fungus. For this reason, you should only buy frogs that you are sure are captive bred locally and tested to be free of disease. It may be impossible to find frogs which meet these conditions, but otherwise, pet frogs may be contributing to the decline of wild frog populations. Scientific Name: Litoria caerulea Other Names: dumpy tree frog Life Span: 15 years (up to 20 years has been reported) Size: 4-5 inches Distribution: White's tree frogs are native to Australia, Indonesia and New Guinea Appearance: Their color ranges from a green to a blue green or aqua color, and can be quite striking.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG547LZ5": "So if carbs are what we need to keep our glycogen levels full but we shouldnt be eating grains , cereal , and bread then what kind of carbs should I be consuming for my game day nutrition , especially for pre-game meals ? Well , Im glad you asked . We want easily digestible carbohydrates like fruits , vegetables , and sweet potatoes . Carbs arent the only thing that we need to be worried about as we talk about game day nutrition  we want to round those carbs out with our other macronutrients , PROTEIN and FAT .", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SW3HG": "It truly is anything to think about, and offers her a kind of distinction among her companions.When is your turn to come?You are likely to hardly bear to be long outdone by Jane.", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88IZFB": "How did you learn to masturbate?Men, how did you learn to masturbate?More questions When did you first learn to masturbate?", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R2LI5": "Yes You've mentioned iStockphoto. com, which is a primo site, and has a lot of traffic. A few photos there can sell to a large audience. Shutterstock is also a good company to submit to, and one I've had almost the same traffic to as iStockphoto. BigStockPhoto is another site, and they will accept small images for web use, but those don't always sell as well. In general, the bigger the image can be enlarged on paper, the better, because of a need for large images in print. Dreamstime is also a decent site, albeit smaller, and worth uploading your shots to. You can upload the same images to all of these places (unless you've signed an exclusivity agreement) because they have so many customers, and not all of them use the same companies for their stock photo or illustration needs. Canstockphoto is also smaller, but with these smaller sites, you have a better chance of having your image accepted overall.", "37SQU136V7M6AU325IZUZDWQUJP11Q": "HubPages HubPages is a user generated content, revenue-sharing website. On December 7, 2013, the website published data that showed that the website consisted of 910,106 'Hubs' (magazine-style articles on a specific topic), 73,969 published users, and 2,498,967 forum posts. The site launched on August 6, 2006, funded by a US2 million investment from Hummer Winblad.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSSE1L": "Hmmm do i want dinner....do i want dinner.....dinner....do i dinner.....i want dinner....i want dinner dinner", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDVA1N": "They had already destroyed Tokyo with fire bombs. I have an elderly friend who was in Tokyo right after the end of the war. He told me much of the city was in ruins. Most of the buildings then were made of wood. So the fire bombs burned them to the ground. There was a short list of cities to drop the nuke bombs on. I forget what they were. But Hiroshima  Nagasaki were chosen because of clear skies. They needed to see where the bomb(s) were being dropped.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BI59L": "Breast Cancer Symptoms Early breast cancer has no symptoms. It is usually not painful. Most breast cancer is discovered before symptoms are present, either by finding an abnormality on mammography or feeling a breast lump.", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E8CRL": "It varies, just like with fullterm preteens and teens. I know preemies who went through pre puberty while they were preteens and puberty as early teens, even though they were on the late side with tooth eruption and getting their adult teeth. Puberty may be delayed for preemies, but not necessarily. Preemie girls going through puberty earlier than their fullterm peers is often a topic of discussion on preemie parent boards. Ethnicity, nutrition, and genetics (especially between moms and daughters) all play a role in when puberty starts.", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMQU80": "This resulted in a world war as other nations attempted to stop them. World War II was the most destructive war in human history and became a turning point in history as is resulted in the division of the world into two competing political ideologies: Democracy and Communism. Rise of Fascism Fascism is the rule of a people by a dictatorial government that is both nationalistic and imperialistic.", "3ZCC2DXSD720Q6P8TWDCRNIA8P5YYH": "Every-Time Somebody Say ' Emotions ' I Randomly Start Singing destiny child- emotions !", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EEURC": "Well, the past actually happened but history is only what someone wrote down. So no real answer...", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE9QTK": "Purpose of breasts Friend, breasts were designed to feed babies - not to be some kind of 'turn-on' objects, special obsession points for men. Judging from the advertisements, one would think that men are supposed to be 'all ready' the instant they see a flash of a nipple. The media images are so screwed up!", "39KMGHJ4RZ86WGX2DGRU73U6KZC00I": "put your mouse pointer on the top edge of the task bar, hold down the right mouse button and drag the task bar edge to the size you desire", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2C0MS": "All dogs should be vaccinated against Parvovirus, Distemper and Hepatitis as a minimum, this is because these viruses are highly infectious and don't need direct contact with infected dogs to be passed on. For example, Parvovirus can be spread on shoes and clothing, and can last in the environment for up to 12 months. This means dogs can be infected with Parvovirus without even leaving their house. Dogs should be vaccinated against Parvovirus, Distemper and Hepatitis (C3) at 6-8 weeks, 10-12 weeks and 14-16 weeks of age, with a booster vaccinaiton at 15 months of age. After this, they should be vaccinated against these disease every three years. For dogs that will be interacting with other dogs such as those going to training classes, kennels or meeting other dogs on walks, we recommend vaccinating against Canine (Kennel) Cough at 10-12 weeks, then annually. Because we use high quality, modern vaccines, puppies can be socialised as early as 10 days after their 10-12 week vaccination.", "3HUR21WDDUNBQ1ZYO0RA89B16JDYXD": "Girls with small breasts are always happy when they grow boil on their breasts.", "3OWZNK3RYLNT8CCWQA9SFYBSXMZU2Y": "I NEED SIDE EFFects 2 AND 3 INMY LIFe", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5U5KF": "I hope that helps!Good luck!Reply Pingback: Mid-century Modern Dresser  Megan Elise DIY Leave a Reply Cancel reply Your email address will not be published.", "3B0MCRZMBRSC8E56BMLA15WM0F1PPM": "Have a good FridayNight Lexi!", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB3B0B6": "It means that bigger events always get more recognition than smaller ones even though they are, in actuality, less significant or impressive than the small events or happenings.", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE49TG": "If you can not write about everything you want, then poetry or any literature has no reason to be. The very question is if anybody has the right to publish whatever they write. You should find as many as you can that are comparable to the book you're writing/written.", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBITE8": "YES. Kennel cough in humans is simply an upper respitory infection. Bacteria spread from your dog to you after your dog has been exposed to a situation with many other animals ... lowered immune system causes this. We normally don?? call an upper respiratory infection in people ? ?ennel cough,?? but regardless of what you call it you will want to protect yourself from the invading virus/bacteria. Protect your puppy with shots and a good diet to strengthen his immune and in turn protect yourself", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBVL7E": "It is very important to regulate the size cricket given to juvenile dragons. Large meals have been associated with partial paralysis and hind leg extension. A general rule is to use crickets no larger than the distance between the dragons eyes to the tip of his nose, and should be offered in several small meals per day rather than one large one.", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE59TH": "Add a cup of whole corn (frozen or canned) to one of your dog's bowls of food. You will definitely know whose poop is whose! Yes, he'll get in trouble.", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIJ5TJ": "Sentimental Lady Bob Welch (Fleetwood Mac) You are here and warm, But I could look away and you'd be gone. 'Cause we live in a time, When meaning falls in splinters from our minds. And that's why I've travelled far, 'Cause I come so together where you are.", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF53EWM": "Good luck!http://www.toybreeds.com/ToyBreeds.htm 07-25-2007 02:21 PM lovemygreys Re: help me choose a dog please!I would probably NOT have a dal in an apartment.", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV2NO5": "I wouldn't do it. The turtles need special UV light and a heat source to bask.two totally different habitats", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS5AZ9": "some breeds like saddlebreds and Tennessee walkers just trot that way. Using weights is wrong and inhumane. You will actually feel how to flow with your horse.", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605MHDT": "The only thing that I can think of is go see a doctor. You might just have asthma. Or you can just look on the internet for asthma symptoms. If you have the symptoms of it I'd go see a doctor right away and get an inhaler. If you don't have asthma then I'd suggest doing some yoga breathing exersizes. Try searching youtube for Yoga Breathing Exersizes Or Methods. Have a wonderful day! And I hope you really do fel better and overcome whatever is ailing you!", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHVDNY": "If youre still stumped as to what colors to choose, ask Dr. Mark Sundberg or a member of our team. We can let you in on all the trends our other patents are sporting at our Tacoma, WA office! Tags: August 19th, 2015 At Pacific Northwest Orthodontics, Dr. Mark Sundberg and our staff have found that patients who like their smiles have better self-esteem. People who dont like their smiles are often skittish about talking to other people. According to the National Womens Health Resource Center , when women are asked about what theyd most like to change about themselves, many point to their smile. Despite wanting to change their smiles, quite a few of the people who are unhappy about that part of themselves wont consider getting braces. Most Americans Dont Have Straight Teeth The American Association of Orthodontics estimates that 4.5 million Americans wear braces or other orthodontic equipment to straighten their teeth and to get a healthier mouth.", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE65Z0": "you want another child? ?why would you want 5 kids though? ?maybe this is causing your anxiety..thinking about having another one,,,.I am 23 and been with hubby 6 1/2 years and i couldnt handle one now....i have really bad anxiety but am on no meds for it... but i will tell you something herbal that helps... take melatonia(a vitamin) of the night time...it will help you sleep...because if your like me, i have anxiety all night long... also, there is a vitamin call CALM THOUGHTS by bio align....you can yahoo or google it and find it...its pretty reasonable price and it does help...my friend who also had bad anxiety referred it to me... to... drummerboy above me.....exercise doesnt help anxiety...I KNOW..I am 23 and very healthy and exercise ALOT and have been dealing with them(without meds) since I was 19... the faiting,dizzy spells,heart beating fast etc...obviously you have never suffered with panic attacks....and dont understand...psychology doesnt teach you everything...", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXQIQS": "Islam means submission to Allah. 'Muslim' means a person who submits to Allah. In Islam, Allah is God, the Only God, there is no other God than Allah, Allah has no offspring or partner. Allah is the Creator of all the worlds. Allah has no beginning and has no end. Muhammad is a messenger or prophet of Allah. MAKE NO DISTINCTION BETWEEN PROPHETS Lo! those who disbelieve in Allah and Allahs messengers and seek to make distinction between Allah and Allahs messengers and say: We believe in some and disbelieve in others and seek to choose a way in between Such are non-believers in truth and for non-believers Allah prepare a shameful doom. But those who believe in Allah and Allahs messengers and make no distinction between any of them, unto them Allah will give their wages and Allah is Ever Forgiving, Merciful. All the Prophets are equal in status. Allah has created angels to worship Him, to carry out His commands, and to be His messengers to His human prophets. Angels obe...", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY5OVO": "Mar James Pazhayattil was the first bishop. He was succeeded by Mar Pauly Kannookadan. The eparchy is a suffragan of the Syro-Malabar Catholic Archeparchy of Thrissur.", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RUC6N": "this nagging pain from the cavity filling feels like a sore throat and as such pisses me off immensely.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWV1WM": "Jun 9, 2011 ... in a broadband age .... Fcc: Programming requirements .... 'The digital age is creating an information and communications renaissance. ... but, more broadly, at how citizens get local information in an age when the Internet has?... May 19, 2002 ... Warren Buffett Reveals How Anyone With 40 Could Become A Millionaire ... An example of a regional organization is FAME Renaissance, which ... Hello everyone, My name is Morgan Jackson, a citizen of USA am 42 years of age. There is an obligation of every citizen to have to actually understand the ... that establish the qualifications of any individual to serve as President. ... This one is titled 'New Dark Age or Renaissance: The BRICS Option, the... Becoming a citizen of the United States should be ?? exceedingly difficult?? as .... Japanese behavior during WW II was abominable, period. ... to expand too quickly, so they had to lower the bar for qualification.", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZR519": "Good luck!1 Like Bookmark Thank you for reporting this comment.Undo betsyhac August 4, 2011 at 10:58PM kerrylamanac, you can't possibly be for real.", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS9ZA2": "you might be- the week before my missed period I had gotten really gassy and had cramps that would come and go the week before I tested positive. (which was a week after i ovulated)  since you are ttc- i suggest this fabulous website I came across- it breaks down all the symptoms and when women had them and ended up being pregnant. http://www.countdowntopregnancy.com/", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOB3YH": "no 4 molar teeth so j can get braces i really don't want them out tho !!!", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKDAMTR": "If you? ?ve ever seen a dog or cat trying to eat whilst wearing a plastic cone you will know just how difficult and stressful that can be ! The ProCollar has a fabric outer layer and a separate inflatable inner tube , with a velcro fastening strap on the outside edge and fabric hoops to secure against your pet? ?s collar on the inside edge . The top-up valve can be accessed through the outer layer and pushed in so that it stays flush .", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V5YPLM": "I have heard that we all have a twin soul somewhere in the world. I have never heard of sister soul, however. Doesn't mean that it is not true. I am no authority.", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IKZGBO": "It is the spirit that determines the character of the men, the women, the individual citizens at the heart of the nation. And so if we are going to talk about human resources we must go deeper than mere psychology or an assessment of some generic set of values . We must get a handle on the spiritual resources inside the hearts of the individual building blocks of the nation. We must come to know the people that make up the body politic we happen to be studying. To understand the Puritans we must get a clear picture of their spirit and their character and get an accurate record of just how they impacted the people, the nation, and the world around them. This is absolutely essential if we are going to truly understand the history of the Puritans or the history of any group of people for that matter. The spiritual dimension to American history is unappreciated and hidden away. But the truth remains. And the lessons God showcases for us in the chronicles of the nations are His-story.", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SKDBC": "I would love to find a remedy ! I work out with kettlebells 4-5x week , and just the pressure of weight resting on my wrist will give me bruises I bruise so easily , most of the time have no idea where the bruises on my arms and legs come from ! I always have bruises and no idea where they came from , I would love to try this product .", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT7R9L": "One very important thing is to keep your metabolism high, meaning eating all day. Well, I will eat anything, anything. And thats it, my day is planned. Now, sugars, bad carbs, very bad carbs. I should know, I drank insane amounts of soda, soda all day, all night, I ballooned to 230 Lbs, apparently Im supposed to be about. I included a link to a Food Guide which shows foods in the food groups and how much you should eat from each group. I strip the skin off my chicken and use only EVO(extra virgin olive oil). I havent had chocolate in about 6 weeks, I just realized that. My daughters birthday tommorrow I will have some chocolate cake, I think it will be awesome, I noticed things with sugar (my OJ)are so much more enjoyable now that im not desensitized to the sweetness. Ever since I started eating this way I get alot of compliments about my skin looking so much healthier and brighter, from my research its the oatmeal I eat almost everyday plus the wheat germ, alot of vitamins in that stuff.", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSIDQL": "ok sounds like you still suffer from anxiety. maybe you have come off the meds too soon. go see your doc again. this is no way to live your life. your dog is picking up on your nerves and reacting to the stress your feeling. get some help from you doc and look into online groups for anxiety that will help you. spirts are not gonna get you,but its the fears that are ruining your life best wishes hun", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY42EO": "Two primary reasons.One was strategic. It is located on heights that made it a good location for a fort, which protected other settlements in the region in the 1700s.The other was economic. Quebec is located on the St Lawrence River, which makes it a good trading post. Trappers would pick up supplies and drop off their furs for shipment to Europe.", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8ITLU": "truth or dare you can always do. ask her something and have her visually explain what she would be doing with you. or anything else you find stimulating.", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTISFZ": "This is the biomarker used to screen for prostate cancer and is now no longer recommended for healthy males (but I have a family history and have it included in my blood tests anyway). Typical PSA range is between 1 - 4. I was at a 7. (This, to my knowledge, would indicate aggressive, late-stage prostate cancer under normal circumstances. ) My blood work from the prior year's physical exam had a PSA within the normal range, giving more credence to the fact that this was caused by my experiment. UPDATE: I had my PSA checked again 2 weeks after I started to ejaculate again and it was back down to 1. 6, within the normal range. Basically: my prostate had swollen/inflamed quite a bit, right during the time of this masturbation moratorium. I will be so bold as to claim that the moratorium caused the prostate sensitivity (given all other variables). There's basically almost no chance I developed prostate cancer (at my age) at the exact same time I ceased ejaculating.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXTDJX": "lol yea it would probably be attacked by antibodies before it even got close. you put up a good fight tho lol", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5VAN6I": "Henry was now , like his father , both King of England and Duke of Normandy , and the stage was set for a new round of conflict between England and France . In 1108 , Philip I , who had been king of France since before the Norman Conquest , died and was succeeded by his son , who had already been conducting the administration of the realm in his father 's name for several years .", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C45WC": "You want someone to write your essay? I'll give you a few songs  whitesnake 'here I go again' He's getting thrown out again, hence same road sheryl crowe 'all I wanna do is have some fun' speaks for itslef Billy Dean 'let them be little' but it fits because Holden has a passion for children. Randy Travis 'whiperwhil' For his little sister  If I can think of anything else, I will get back to you. For now that's all I have though!", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV453NP": "Augustus's main achievement was to produce a viable alternative to the obsolete republic i.e. Caesarism, or rule by Emperor, but with a republican facade to minimize resistance from the kind of traditionalists who murdered Caesar. He also established stability among the Romans and throughout the Empire--the pax Romana which was the height of Roman and Classical civilization. Augustus made peace with Rome's enemy to the east, Parthia, and, consistent with a desire for perpetual peace, decreed that the Empire in the future was not to be extended. Its defenses were based on easily defensible river frontiers such as the Rhine and Euphrates. There were some campaigns e.g. to crush the Cantabrian resistance in Spain, and the Illyrian revolt of 6 CE. Rome also tried to establish a new defense line on the Elbe but the Varrian disaster forced it to keep to the Rhine. At home, Augustus did much to beautify Rome. It is said he found it a city of brick and left it a city of marble.", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PMHJA": "Dogs want to please you, so it is your job to let them know what behaviors please you and what doesn't. So when my puppy goes potty, I give her a treat, and clap, and make a fuss and praise her. So she learns that going potty outside makes me happy. puppy classes will give you a head start on potty training, basic training such as sit, stay, down, no jumping, no biting, no barking except when nescessary, and loose leash walking. Not only will you be training your puppy, you'll be learning too. having set feeding times definitely helps with potty training. not sure what kind of puppy you have but generally a half cup of food, 3-4 times a day is good for a 9 week old. Again, make a BIG deal out of it. Keep your language simple 'POTTY OUTSIDE' as you take them out.. When they hear 'POTTY OUTSIDE' they will know exactly what that means.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHJR1C": "King crabs are a type of crustaceans, more specifically, decapod crustaceans, which means they have ten legs. They are also called 'stone crabs'. They are one of the largest species of crabs and that's why they are very appreciated, because it's profitable to catch them and sold them to be cooked for the quality and quantity of the meat that can be obtained from them.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCD9JB": "I really don't know, Sorry  Why would you want it to stop, anyway?", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C0W5Z": "Because he is a boy, not a friend. Meanwhile, report him to your local police department because animal abuse is against the law AND a common indicator of later abuse of human beings. Protect yourself and us by getting him into treatment--or at least off the streets--before that happens. Don't want him to go to jail? Then don't ignore these signs. Act now. danielpauldavis 49 months ago nbsp. danielpauldavis danielpauldavis Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6SJLG": "A hot air balloon voyage gone bad! A group of ballooners were blown off course across the desert. Running out of fuel, they began to drop, and cast off their clothing to rid themselves of extra weight. When this proved insufficient, they drew straws (or matchsticks) to determine who would be thrown over to lighten the load.", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y1AYI": "i would definitely try him eventing. he has a very pretty dressage like frame-and has the scope and confidence of a jumper and cross country horse. good luck on your jumping!! :)", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEE463": "She has elite totals in both weight classes. As of August 4, 2012, Watts is tied for 1 in the current Powerliftingwatch.com lifter rankings for the 114-lb. weight class in bench press.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHT2VLG": "Tonight's walk I saw: three toads, a leopard frog, a leopard gecko, and a half-eaten Chipotle burrito in the middle of the sidewalk.", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2SHAU": "It's an interesting question, the way you've phrased it, because it could be interpreted in one (or both) of two ways: 1. How did the British Empire affect people living in Australia before the British Empire had any effect (i.e. They also defined the boundaries of the country which would belong to each ... In the early years of white settlement in Australia, British law was carried ... while the right continues, be prevented by any law of the Commonwealth from?... They suffered greatly as a result of the arrival of the British in Australia. When Captain Cook visited in the late 1700s it is estimated that there were about 750,000 Aborigines. By the 1920s this number had fallen by around 90. Over the 80 years more than 165,000 convicts were transported to Australia. 1 The number of convicts pales compared to the immigrants who arrived in Australia in the 1851-1871 gold rush. In 1852 alone, 370,000 immigrants arrived in Australia.", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONWZHA": "nipples get rock hard and pointy,pusy is soaking wet,very slippery,tingling sensation starts ,builds up into massive waves of pleasure as pusy squirts c.umOften have multiple orgasms and lots of 'aftershocks'...at this point if he asked for ANYTHING,including anal,he'd get it!", "3GMLHYZ0LEVJ9X53JVGNO2CXC1XYUM": "By the late 1880s, the volume of investment had led to spiraling speculation, especially in Victoria, where the boom reached its greatest height and where the subsequent collapse was eventually the greatest. Low wool prices and a severe drought brought about a depression in the 1890s. Settlement of prospectors during the gold rushes in Australia. Gold was discoverd in 1851and led to the Victorian gold rush during this era Victoria dominated the world's gold output. Federation to 1945: The Commonwealth of Australia was established on January 1, 1901. After approval of a draft constitution by Australian voters, the British Parliament had passed legislation in 1900 to enable the commonwealth to come into existence. The constitution gave the commonwealth, or federal government, certain defined powers. all residual powers were given to the governments of the six colonies, which were renamed states.", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WTMI9": "Myself breaking the Canadian deadlift record 2 times in the 242 weight class with 645 lbs and 660 lbs at 238 bw!", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1FYZJD": "Don't worry, this is fairly natural. Yes your vertebrae are adjusting, but it's just like when you crack your knuckles, nothing is actually popping out of place or anything. This is probably happening because your back is stiff. I recommend seeing a chiropractor and they will give you good stretches/exercises to help strengthen your back and stop this from happening :)", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV697837": "YesA while back we had an aquarium. Had guppies, black mollies, zebras, and lots of other (I can't remember all the names) fishes. One of my sons won a goldfish at the ping pong ball toss at the fair. He or she was about 3 inches long so it went into the aquarium with all the other little fishes. It grew rather fast. The kids started calling it Moby Dick because it was so much bigger than the other fish. That's when I noticed fish were missing. Every day one or two fish would go missing. I looked for them in the usual places, but could not find any sign of them. One day while looking for the latest missing fish I noticed Moby Dick swimming casually behind a guppy. The next thing I knew guppy was inside Moby. Before I could get the net guppy was history. This happened again and again with any fish he could get his mouth around. We renamed him Jaws. I put him in a water trough with other goldfish about his size. They didn't last long with him either.", "3WRBLBQ2GR637K8NRIGXSVHMRG10GL": "breathe. you take a deep breath. right, you need to work out how bad the bleeding is. can you just blot it with tissues and put a plaster over it or is there too much? if there's more, you need to tell someone right now. get your mum or dad or friends or anything to either take you to hospital or to bandage you or something. your body comes first. then you calm yourself down. are your friends disappointed in something you've done or because you cut yourself? because if its something you've done, they're going to be even more disappointed now. but that's okay. it was your decision and they have to understand that. you didn't try to kill yourself. both you and others need to know that. it was a moment of anger and that was your release. and that's okay. it's not okay to cut yourself, but it's okay to make yourself feel better, and if it made you feel better for a short amount of time then that's why you did it. just don't relate pain to happiness. pain does not make you happy.", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN05YCGQ": "You're right - many books do come with Microsoft PowerPoint presentations. They are usually included in the instructor's edition of the textbook. As your instructor if they would be willing to share the presentations with your class.", "3UEBBGULPFMD96O8E5OZZH5H6Q3FU2": "if he has a herpes sore on his lip, you sure can!", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHRTXF": "I love you", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWOQMA7": "try freewriting and brainstorming. just write anything that comes to mind on the subject, then decide exactly what you want to write about. Choose several different areas of your topic that you plan to discuss and make an outline of what you are going to say, including any interesting points you want to make or sentences/phrases that come to mind. After that, all thats left is the writing and the rewritting. Depending on your competency level this could be quick, or long and arduous. Granted that process doesn't work for everyone. I do the first steps in my head and freewrite the first draft of my essays. Its rare that I really need to organize my thoughts before I draft my essay, but alot of people need to do it to keep things logical and organized. Just make sure you check it through when you finished writting it and have some other people read and give you imput on it to make sure it flows and makes sense.", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKVVUA": "It is important to note how long you have had this problem and how much bleeding occurs. Light bleeding that appears as bright red to pink blood that is noticed on toilet tissue after wiping as well as some tenderness and irritation is probaby nothing to worry about. Most rectal bleeding comes from the colon, rectum, or anus.", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WZRX5": "Hi..Don't worry,Panic attacks is curable. Try these easy steps to overcome panic attacks in a few minutes 1) You need to try and calm yourself down to a state where you are more aware that you are just having a panic attack and nothing more. Take slow deep breaths. In through your nose and out through your mouth. Slow yourself right down. 2) Try and control those negative thoughts going through your head. The easiest way to do this is shout out the word 'STOP' in your head. Make it really, really loud inside your head. This can help to interrupt the flow of adrenaline for a second, but long enough for you to try and control your negative thinking. 3) Once you have shouted STOP in your head, you need to start sending your brain positive statements or coping statements. Replace all those negative messages you are sending your brain with positive ones. So instead of, 'Oh no, i'm about to have a heart attack and die! ', you should be saying to yourself, 'It's OK, i'm just having a panic att", "3VEI3XUCZRVXKRLLOEPZ60W11XPRPG": "Let's talk labiaplasty http://t.co/4hYuzEUoaq plasticsurgery surgery labiaplasty", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF7AIG": "It all depends on WHERE you get kissed.I will try and clean under my fingernails more often, continue washing my hands thoroughly and often, and try and stop picking at things!Good Luck!", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKCQH8": "Unfortunately, the rate of destruction by acid exceeds this rate of repair. Normally, acids eating into tooth enamel is not painful. Left untreated, however, acid eats a hole through the enamel into the underlying dentin and pulp layers of the tooth. Can sinusitis also affect the front side teeth? 3rd / 4th / 5th from the front center (top row only)? They can?? figure out what?? wrong, either it?? clenching ... Safety may depend on specific drug particle size large molecular weight drugs such as Aristocort are safer and less likely to be transferred to the intracranial area. Avoid direct injection into blood vessels. Lidocaine and Carbocaine are extremely toxic and can compound infections in other teeth. 3. Does your dentist use a rubber dam to prevent toxins and garbage from entering your body? All this points to too much sugar, hydrogenated oils, white flour, white salt and too many carbs, along with cows fed GRAIN and not good quality grasses rich in minerals.", "3L4YG5VW9NQUUKZQ143K1HY88DUDDH": "Hit Me With a Hot Note is a big belty song that would be great for Mayzie. There's A Fine Fine Line from Avenue Q can be belted, and would show off range as well, and would be a good song for Gertrude. For Jojo anything that a child sings would be good, for example I Know It's Today from Shrek. Beyond These Palace Walls from Aladdin is also a great song that would show off range and belting, and wouldn't have to be specific to any role (so they could consider you for any of the 3 you're interested in). If it were a professional audition you couldn't sing that song, as the show is on broadway right now, but since this is most likely community theatre or school theatre you can get away with singing anything, even from the overdone shows you mentioned.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K37XK": "I think it may be a hemorrhoid- they're little blood vessels that pop when you (no joke) poop too hard. They probably hurt a lot, and so you should go to the doctor to see if they are hemorrhoids. Anyway, I think that's completely normal, but I'm not 100 sure. If it's in your scrotum.....then maybe you should see a doctor.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KZ4JA": "Topamax's Typical Side Effects: The usual for anticonvulsants.", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW61038O2": "Well, sounds bad. Did you talk to your doctor already?", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT44MFL": "Craig's list, Craig's list, Craig's list I have bought a nightstand there for 10, nice kitchen table with 4 chairs for 35, Refrigerator for 150, heredon sofa for 50. great deals all the time. Cats amp Dogs (Mental As Anything album) Cats  Dogs is the third studio album released by Mental As Anything.", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8QWB4": "hey i have a hamster that bleeded it is okay yea but if it is doing normal things than its good yeah but thats is all and seperate them well actually try not to even let them see they will go berserk.yea and that is all here is more advice You don't have to worry too much about the bite that you got, just keep an eye on it to make sure it didn't get infected. (If you're a kid, ask your parents about it.) The rectal bleeding may be the result of a number of problems.", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5XF9F": "It varies from person to person...some men start as early as the beginning stages of puberty...some guys don't really start until there early 20's and then some guys never get any hair on their chest...it's all a genetics game and everyone is different...there are no set rules to follow", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNUZO10": "Yes it is a good book. I read it several years ago.", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17L506": "I also have little red bumps on my thighs and my condition is called keratosis pilaris. It might be similar to what you have, I think that if you want to get rid of those 'dry bumps', the first thing you should do is exfoliate. In humans, goose bumps are strongest on the forearms, but also occur on the legs, back, and other areas of the skin that have hair. In some people, they even occur in the face or on the head. Eczema (child) Eczema is a common cause of skin rashes in children, causing redness, bumps, swelling, itchiness, and more. Eczema (teen and adult) Eczema is a skin condition that causes itchy, scaly, and dry skin. this will tighten your skin n soaks excess oil from your skin 21) i ld suggest d use of st.ives apricot face scrub that siuts your skin for your face..Apricot kernels are rich in vitamin A, which is vital for healthy skin.", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6OTVH": "nullMusicians have been stringing guitars left-handed since before they were manufactured, and before electric guitars. I suspect that the identity of the first commercial lefty guitar is lost to time. Hendrix played a righty guitar upside down because he didn't know any better, he taught himself. He could have had a lefty guitar if he wanted one I know Gibson made them at the time", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1P29F": "Eating more than 2 bowls of breakfast cereal per week, or having hepatitis. (Not joking). But if you are going to try one, just try the breakfast cereal one.", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17L051": "If they are flirting with you, stares you in the eyes when you look at them, also if they look at your lips while licking their lips every now and then.", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT43MFK": "The Code of Hammurabi is one of the most ancient written law known to men. Hammurabi, the king, reigned from 1792 to 1750 BC. He was one of the first rulers who organized the administration of justice in a written law.", "3VQTAXTYN3JNWPCS9323GREWRSEUB2": "What's the two things they tell you are healthiest to eat? Chicken and fish. You know what you should do? Combine them, eat a penguin.", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26RJ8S": "It could be broken. I once broke a bone in my toe and it only hurt a tiny bit. You should go to the doctor and see what they say. At the doctor's they will x-ray it and see if it's broken. Even if it is broken if you can still walk fairly well then they might just put you in physical therapy. But i didn't know that my bone was broken for 2 weeks and i could still walk pretty well so... Most likely they will give you a walking shoe to make sure that the bone doesn't move around to much. for the time being, take it easy. Rest it. Hope this helped you :) :) :)", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGK7M1": "Sounds like it could be implantation bleeding based on your timing.Good luck!You should be able to test in 3 or 4 days.", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ8TCI": "They constantly assess the dangers around them and alert the others if needed.You may notice your guinea pig stretching up, nose high in the air to check out what's happening nearby.These are very sociable animals, and need lots of attention to be happy.", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUJ1MX": "tips-------  https://tr.im/bestlinkkssy", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGN0HXX": "1)Spain and Portugal 2)They built the first European settlements in sub-Saharan Africa 3)Protestantism 4)Provide Spain with wealth 5) Pablo Picasso 6)Han Dynasty 7)Nirvana 8) Caste 9)Ancient Egypt 10)4700 years ago   Opinion 2: France had fewer people on the ground -- they didn't have as many settlers as the other two powers. The French tended to get along better with the Native Americans because of this (they weren't trying to grab Indian land) but when they fought with the English they didn't have as many colonists to take the field. Factors -- 1) later start in exploration meant the choicer sites were claimed by other powers 2) weaker navy 3) the French Wars of Religion -- yes, they encouraged Huguenot (Protestant) emigration, but they also grievously weakened the royal treasury.", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFPQ4L": "The intentions were good, and they have tried hard but the results were not as expected. They are good leaders but sometimes things don't' turn out as one expects.", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ554Q": "Billy tried putting on my board shorts and they look like underwear because he's so tall", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUCSOO": "'PREGAME' A PREGAME meal s eaten 3-4 hours before athletic competition (as that is how long it takes to digest).", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBNQ5T": "It's pretty good if your telling your parents, but it's a long speech and they will most likely cut you off before you get half way through... And also, when you wrote all the veggies and fruits they needed, try leaving a few out. They will probably be thinking, 'I'm not going to buy all those!! '.", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CR3DOG": "Well probably at the end of chapter 5 because that's when Holden talks about Allie's glove and writes about how he died and stuff.", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S7QCZ": "Waking up and feeling sick could be because you are hungry. If you have dinner at 5 pm and then nothing till you wake up at 7 am, you haven't had food for 14 hours. As for feeling sick and stomach cramps after tea, are you eating too much? Why it's good/bad? I haven't heard anything specific about eating food after work, except that you should snack and not skip meals. If you mean a workout.... then you should definetely eat after a work out, within 30 minutes after you workout. This would then affect my dinners where I will have no appetite for early dinner ... For lunch, you should eat a pastrami sandwich (piled on high), with french fries?... What should be on your plate at dinner? Tips on ... For this reason I'm a believer in weighing ingredients, especially when you are starting out at eating healthier. Mar 20, 2014 ... Well, this doesn't need to be you any longer! Take this totally easy magazine- style quiz to find out what you should actually be eating for dinner.", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1VJNL": "Please discuss any options with your healthcare provider.The information you share, including that which might otherwise be Protected Health Information, to this site is by design open to the public and is not a private, secure service.You should think carefully before disclosing any personal information in any public forum.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYSEKO": "Question 1  AnswerAll of the above. Questio2 AnswerAll of the above. Question3 AnswerLasts ten minutes or longer  Question4 AnswerWhen you are breathing faster then you need to.", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH074Q9I": "Also, make sure it's not food or some other gunk making the hair stick together she may be a sloppy eater and need some help to keep her chin clean. (Insert Paris Hilton comment here.) If it isn't bothering the cat and the skin looks normal, don't worry.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4MQEU": "No. While the damage to the land and cities, the battlefields and debris, and even the monuments and cemeteries may all fade away and be forgotten the course of mankind and the influence on the growth and shape of the human race can never be totally reversed. There are several ways in which the effects of WWI are still being felt today. Two easy to explain ones are politically and in the terms of population. Politically, the world as it exists today and will continue to exist is driven in many ways by WWI. 1. WWII was a natural consequence of how WWI ended, so all of the effects from that can be traced back to the first war. 2. The Russian Revolution, rise of Communism, and Soviet dominance over Eastern Europe during the Cold War are all results of WWI. The Russians had experienced minor revolts before, but all of them had been suppressed. However, the incompetence of the Russian monarchy (especially when the Tzar took over running the war personally) in fighting WWI pushed", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88KZFD": "They could have allowed the colonies to have representation in the British Parliament. The colonists would not have minded taxation as much had there been representation from the colonies.", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX0NWG": "The collection contains eight short stories and was not published in the UK however all of the stories were published in other UK collections (see 'UK book appearances of stories' below). For first publications in the UK, see the applicable UK collections below. The stories contained in 'Double Sin and Other Stories' appear in the following UK collections: World Book Day (UK and Ireland) World Book Day is a charity event held annually in the United Kingdom and Ireland on the first Thursday in March. On World Book Day, every child in full-time education in the UK is given a voucher to be spent on books. Several million schoolchildren in he UK were given a special 1 World Book Day Book Token (1.50 in Ireland) which could be redeemed against any book in any UK bookshop. Since then every child in full-time education in the UK and Ireland is entitled to receive a 1 World Book day Book token every year. List of World Book Day books This is a list of books released for the UK World...", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734PIT6": "As an example, a term rewriting system for 'multiplying out' mathematical expressions could contain a rule 'x'('y''z') ? ('x''y')  ('x''z'). Another order functional is the lexicographic extension, leading to the lexicographic path ordering. The two gardens were joined when Daniel and Ann married in 1968, and the combined gardens form the basis for the larger family garden that exists today. The oldest trail was named the Woodland Path, followed by the High Path, the Rock Wall Path, and the Raccoon Pool Path. It is possible for a person to give a great deal of effort to apologetic work, to defending Gods word, to answering questions, to reasoning with people and have it all seem as though it was worthless. To help you keep your eyes on the real issue of apologetics, I offer the following illustration. In the center of the field is a garden. The apologist resides in the field and points people to the true path so they can find the Garden. Getting them to the Garden is not y...", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY4VOU": "Method 1 of 2: Shorts for Women 1 2 1 Make your pattern. You can make a simple, quick pattern for your shorts by tracing the outline of a pair of shorts that fit well on a piece of craft paper. Fold your shorts in half. Make sure that the front pockets are on the outside. Trace the outline of your folded shorts on craft paper. Add 1 inch (2.5 cm) around the bottom and sides of the pattern for a seam allowance. Add 1.5 inches (4 cm) to the top of the pattern for a waistband. Cut the pattern out with scissors. Ad 2 Pin the pattern to your fabric. Fold your fabric in half and lay your pattern out on top. Pin in place. The long side or center of the pattern should be placed along the folded edge of the fabric. For a more accurate approach, sketch the outline of the pattern onto your material. 3 Edit step 3 Cut the material out. Use sharp sewing shears to cut along the outline. This will create one full side of your shorts. 4 Repeat.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K27XJ": "Best Quality Toys: Extenze Extended Release Liquid Gelcaps 30 Box: Extenze Extended Rel... http://t.co/6CvzSrH9Zm Pls RT", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPINPTS": "When you are young and just starting to get your period it can be very irregular. It takes time for it to adjust to a more regular cycle. This is pretty normal for your age. Of course, talk to your mom about it, but most likely this is absolutely normal.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879JX6B": "I'm a 13 year old girl and I feel fat. I weighed about 50 kilos at 152 com at the start of the summer holidays. Now I'm 45.5 kilos and I've started jogging almost every day whilst trying to eat as little as possible. I don't want to eat more than two meals a day, because I think doing so will make me gain weight. I see food as the enemy. Is there something wrong with me?", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y01ZD": "b?tches be in competition?? with b?tches that's paying? them no mind ?", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRUS0W": "Spirit was adopted 1. 5 years ago from a feral feline rescue group. Spirits previous owner left her outside quite a bit and she was found living with a local, urban feral cat community. After being trapped two times with the feral group, the previous owner surrendered her to the pet rescue group. We then adopted Spirit. While living with us, she was a calm, indoor-only cat that was friendly only around people she knows. However, she would run and hide from anyone she didnt know. Her behavior falls between a cautious cat and a xenophobic cat. We have two other indoor-only cats and she was very friendly and social with them. Circumstances of Disappearance Towards sunset on June 17th, one of our indoor-only cats pushed open the back door and went on to our backyard patio without us noticing for about two minutes. Spirit followed her out and ran into the bushes of out house. She would not come in and kept running away from us. We had no luck getting her back inside.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMEUE7K": "1, yes, 2 no, 3 yes, 4 yes, 5 yes, 6 no,7 yes, no, 8 yes, 9 yes 10 yes 11 yes, 12 no 13 yes, 14 no, 15 yes 16 yes, 17 yes, 18 yes, 19 no 20 no 21 yes 22 yes 23 yes 24 no 25 yes 26 yes 27 no 28 yes 29 yes 30 no 31 no 32 no 33 no 34 no 35 yes 36 yes 37 no 38 yes 39 yes 40 NO", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1T0PA5": "Well, you can do it, but you won't be very healthy. Basically, you can go on a 500-calorie-a-day diet, but that'll ruin your metabolism for the rest of your life. 40 pounds is not a lot you know like 100 pounds or more.", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOG8W38": "Sinclair Lewis's novel 'Babbitt' includes an extensive passage in which the title character reads from 'Three Black Pennies'. A 1922 poll of critics in 'Literary Digest' voted Hergesheimer the 'most important American writer' working at the time. Hergesheimer's works of long-form and short fiction sold well with both male and female readerships a 1929 teaser in for an upcoming serialized story in 'Cosmopolitan', for example, called Hergesheimer a writer 'who understands women better than any writer alive today.'", "3XDJY5RK5SJ3BQRJUOSG8D8QH0V4U4": "you should take it easy and not put a strain on your arm. it's your right arm as well, probably the one that you use the most. give it time and it will heal itself. additionally, a supplement of zinc, Vit C and a varied diet will help it heal faster that is what i do at least and i know from several studies and reasearch that zinc and Vit C help the body heal itself faster. The most common complaint with a rotator cuff injury is pain when elevating the arm out to the side past the 90 degree mark when the supraspinatus (the most commonly injured rotator cuff tendon) is injured. Strains and partial tears tend to get better on their own with avoidance of excessive use of the arm overhead...yet pain can last anywhere from weeks to months. Moderate to large tears tend to heal poorly because the blood supply to the rotator cuff is very limited which delays healing. The strain is a cross between Skunk 1, Haze, and Northern Lights 5. Jack Herer is the parent to many subset strains.", "39KMGHJ4RZ86WGX2DGRU73U6KZE00K": "The reason why we feel so deep empty is because our soul is so big. That for me means within us is a space that is larger than life. For now it may be filled with emptiness, darkness, fear, sadness, disappointment, worthlessness. But there is a gift in all this. The bottomless pit of darkness can be equity filled with light. How to get there is meditation. Find a teacher, a podcast, a youtube channel and a group. We are empty because we have yet to learn how to be filled so that we may shed our light into this world. LuLu Thank you so much for this. I started therapy yesterday and it is somewhat of a relief to have someone non-biased and non-judemental that I can spill my heart to. I avoided telling anyone (except my mom) because I didnt want to hear the youre too young to be going thru anything, or you should be grateful, it could be worse or youll be fine, just pray about it.", "3W0XM68YZPT8GVPODS5C4SSP3PPK1C": "A Song of Ice and Fire Roleplaying A Song of Ice and Fire Roleplaying is a role-playing game published by Green Ronin Publishing in 2009. 'A Song of Ice and Fire Roleplaying' is an adaptation of the 'A Song of Ice and Fire' novel series. On 24 April 2007, it was on George R.R. Martin's website that Green Ronin Publishing was producing a new line of 'A Song of Ice and Fire' RPG products, unrelated to the earlier Guardians of Order 'A Game of Thrones' effort.", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E6CBMS": "Never get out of a cold shower into a cold room. Please note: Cold showers should not be taken during a woman's time of menstruation. A woman needs extra rest and gentleness during her menses. Taking a cold shower is too much for the reproductive system during menstruation. A lukewarm shower is recommended. Generally speaking, hot showers are not good as they tend to depress the various physiological systems of the body. Cold showers have the following positive effects:  Brings blood to the capillaries, therefore increasing circulation throughout the body. Cleans the circulatory system. Reduces blood pressure on internal organs. Provides flushing for the organs and provides a new supply of blood. Strengthens the parasympathetic and sympathetic nervous systems. Contracts the muscles to eliminate toxins and poisonous wastes. Strengthens the mucous membranes, which help resist hay fever, allergies, colds, coughs.", "37S0QRNUFBE6WU783OHOTX66MV2882": "you better not cash the check until you get the confirmation. see again if it has your name on it, but it will be very good and safe for you to re-check again and look for the right answer. just hold the check. if it doesn't mean to be yours, and you check it, it will lead you into trouble. refer to the dates, i think there is a mistake.", "3W9XHF7WGKT9PF1XFBPMAYBKV8HTKV": "Have you seen pictures of normal non-sexual breasts? A huge proportion of American women are not happy with their breasts - most of them only because the warped media images make them feel they 'should' have big and perky breasts with an adolescent-type small nipple and areola. To reassure you that there is no reason to worry, these breast pictures are here to let you see normal breasts - big, small, sagging, asymmetrical big areolas or nipples.", "3T6SSHJUZF8SA6VYLW56JBUYSN8IIO": "My favoriteHalf Magic by Edgar EagerThree kids find a magic coin during their summer vacation. The coin grants their wishes BUT only by halfIt is a wonderful summer read.Golden Compass or Subtle Knife by Phillip Pullman  If you like Harry Potter, try theseDr. Franklin's Island by Ann HalamA plane crashes on the way to a wildlife conservation station deep in the rain forests of Ecuador. Semi, Miranda, and Arnie are the only survivors. They are stranded on what seems to be a deserted island, with only the little food and water they could find. They are unaware of being watched by a mad scientist eager to use them as his first human specimens in genetic engineering. His experiments cause them to experience the world in a whole new way... as animals!Alice in Wonderland by Louis Carrollclassic fantasy", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MO1NV9": "My calves are bigger than your future sounds like a problem we have", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6T9RQ5": "Okay I looked it up for you and Mycrobacterium Intracellular is Avium. Or you could have gotten it mixed up for something. Here is all the Mycrobacterium and a web site to go to. Hopefully this helps you out and you can find out how to get treatment. M. abscessus M. africanum M. agri M. aichiense M. alvei M. arupense M. asiaticum M. aubagnense M. aurum M. austroafricanum Mycobacterium avium complex (MAC), is a group of species which are a significant cause of death in AIDS patients. Species in this complex include: M. avium M. avium paratuberculosis, which has been implicated in Crohn's disease in humans and Johne's disease in sheep M. avium silvaticum M. avium 'hominissuis' M. boenickei M. bohemicum M. bolletii M. botniense M. bovis M. branderi M. brisbanense M. brumae M. canariasense M. caprae M. celatum M. chelonae, M. chimaera M. chitae M. chlorophenolicum M. chubuense M. colombiense M. conceptionense M. confluentis M. conspicuum M. cookii M. cosmeticum M. diernhoferi M. xenopi http://en.wik", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF1JX1": "Try a google bc pills and your location to see. I know in most places you can get then without your parents' permission (it's a confidentiality thing). Her friend's mother can't get her the pills because they are prescription only and a doctor would need to speak to and examine your friend and give the pills to her. But if she can get to a doctor/clinic/hospital and make an appointment they can most likely give them to her without parental permission. I know that is the law in Oz, US, UK so I'm assuming it's the same in Canada.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FISICQ": "http:/ ews.yahoo.com/s/ap/usswinefluemergency The swine flu virus in the U.S. is the same one causing a deadly epidemic in Mexico. What Is Swine Flu? Like humans, pigs get the flu. Most recent swine flu viruses have belonged to the H1N1 and H3N2 subtypes. The new swine flu virus infecting humans is very unusual. It's somehow acquired genes from swine, bird, and human flu bugs. Do Humans Get Swine Flu? Normally, swine flu bugs don't infect people. But from December 2005 to January 2009 there was an uptick in swine flu cases. There were 12 human swine flu infections during this time. But it is infecting humans, and that has world. Can Swine Flu Spread From Person to Person? The U.S. As many as 240 people were infected one died. The swine flu that spread at Fort Dix was the H1N1 strain. That's the same flu strain that caused the disastrous flu pandemic of 1918-1919, resulting in tens of millions of deaths. As it turned out, there was no swine flu epidemic. to second page, click on bottom link!", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1RJNH": "Cats do have a sixth sense! Example: my cat, who is very friendly to anyone who comes over, ran away from the maintainence man when he came to my apartment to fix something. like he was the devil incarnate.", "3XUSYT70ITZ0V0YWPSFPMAEPEOKD0N": "Short Book Summaries Sites with a short overview, synopsis, book report, or summary of Red Kayak by Priscilla Cummings. 1 Book Reviews Sites with a book review or quick commentary on Red Kayak by Priscilla Cummings. 1 280 votes More Books by Priscilla Cummings FreeBookNotes has 1 more book by Priscilla Cummings, with a total of 2 study guides.", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXGFVV": "He reads Holdens composition and becomes visibly annoyed, asserting that it has nothing to do with the assignment and that its no wonder Holden is being expelled. Holden tears the composition up and throws it away angrily. Afterward, he smokes a cigarette in the room just to annoy Stradlater. The tension between the two increases when Holden asks Stradlater about his date with Jane. When Stradlater nonchalantly refuses to tell Holden any of the details, Holden attacks him, but Stradlater pins him to the floor and tries to get him to calm down. Holden relentlessly insults Stradlater, driving him crazy until he punches Holden and bloodies his nose. Stradlater then becomes worried that he has hurt Holden and will get into trouble. Holden insults him some more, and Stradlater finally leaves the room. Holden gets up and goes into Ackleys room, his face covered in blood.", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBR7LW": "Malherbe's parakeet The Malherbe's parakeet or orange-fronted parakeet ('Cyanoramphus malherbi') is a small parrot endemic to New Zealand. In New Zealand it is commonly known as the orange-fronted parakeet, a name it shares with a species from Central America, while in the rest of the world it's known as Malherbe's parakeet. The species is critically endangered with 50249 individuals left in the wild.", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSDQU8": "You can find any kind of paint you want at almost any hardware store and they don't care how tall you are.", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC7492L4R": "Most cases of plagiocephaly self-resolve. Have pediatrician monitor and give it a few months. Plagiocephaly: Plagiocephaly, while ideally is treated as an infant can also be treated at any age. You would need to be evaluated by a craniofacial team that specializes in this disorder and they can make recommendations based on the deformity. In our team the oldest patient has been 41 years old.", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSMN0F": "i would get a standard size english bull terrier...they are ADORABLE, and not too large either.", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZOCGP7": "Posted:  Report This Report Answer", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65SPKI": "yes of course......Here r some details on it for u,. Masturbation comes pretty naturally to most guys. Also, some guys who have a fairly low sex drive don't masturbate. Masturbation using porn is more of an issue when a guy who is in a committed relationship. And if they can learn to masturbate with their partner, this can help them a great deal. And there are plenty of females who don't reach one for years after that - either through sex with a partner, or by masturbating. Learning to climax through masturbation gives a woman confidence and satisfaction - and also educates her about how she likes to be touched and stimulated. If you are a woman who has trouble in reaching orgasm - even through masturbation - you might like to follow the advice given below. One of Betty Dodsons famous videos on assisting women to reach orgasm through masturbation may help. If you have problems with sex addiction - including dependence on porn - contact Sex Addicts Anonymous:. Website:www.tickledonline.com.", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ4ZNI": "Surprisingly quickly. In 1986/7 the QE2 was re-engined and this included adding controllable pitch (CP) functionality to her gigantic propellors that allow immediate reverse power to be available. She can slow from 30 knots (she still is the fastest liner in the world) to a half knot in 3 minutes, which takes one mile. 12 minutes later she will be doing 19 knots astern.", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH5YWI": "I would definitely seek out a councilor, your school is a good place to start, see if they have a councilor on staff. It may feel awkward at first but I think you will feel a lot better once you find someone to confide in. You are going through a lot and hormones are kicking in as well causing high emotional responses. Even if you want to be a model it's still a good idea to get educated on another subject as models can have a very short career and need something to fall back on. It's terrible that your mom has taken such a harsh stance, I understand her wanting you to learn something other than modeling but she should still be there for you no matter what.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1T2Q1": "No doctor has ever been able to explain it and we've been trying for years.Good luck.Publicip - Mon Apr 11, 2005 12:29 pm Share Just wanted to let you know I have the exact same problem.", "39WSF6KUV2JQQN4FN8SKITSSC31OEH": "Suffering from anxiety can be a serious challenge . It can also lead to some incredibly unusual and troubling symptoms . One of the stranger issues caused by anxiety is tingling hands . That tingling feeling often leads to further anxiety , because it makes people worry that something is wrong with their head or nervous system . It 's a fair worry , because tingling hands can be caused by nerve issues , vitamin deficiencies , liver disease and more .", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMC9J9H": "i dnt know wat part of mexico hes going to but there is an office in el paso(if ur going to juarez) that accepts insurance and they lie about wat is done so ur insurance will pay...i got fillings in juarez, and they did a good job.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PV18A": "I wanted to let her have one litter.I think I better just  Jack Russells making puppies.Not rated yet How old do Jack Russells have to be before they can make puppies?JRT behaviorNot rated yet Can a 12 year old female JRT get along with a male dog?", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8LH15": "An orgasm is a feeling of pleasure that can happen during sexual activity. It is sometimes called a 'climax' because it is an intense feeling caused by muscle contractions, followed by a feeling of relaxation. Orgasms feel different for each person. From what you described, it sounds as though you have experienced orgasm through masturbation. Many women are concerned that they do not have orgasms while having sexual intercourse. Be assured that for many women, intercourse does not provide the stimulation necessary for an orgasm. Some women can only achieve orgasm through direct stimulation or touching of the clitoris. The type of touch required for a woman to experience an orgasm varies from woman to woman. For some women, oral sex, self masturbation or mutual masturbation, provides the stimulation necessary for an orgasm. You are your own best guide to knowing the type of touch that is most stimulating and satisfying for you, and it is important that you openly discuss your likes and", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKKCVD": "Taller and heavier pitchers , pitchers who throw with higher velocity , and those who participate in showcases are also at higher risk of injury . Pitchers who throw with arm pain or while fatigued have the highest rate of injury . Most of these conditions initially cause pain during or after throwing . They will often limit the ability to throw or decrease throwing velocity .", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9G320": "This was the summer i was going to lose weight And i gained weight Ive never gained weight over the summer before I hate myself", "3NRZ1LDP7W46MI7CYVJCS3Y0AE7PZ6": "Flossing removes up to 80 of the film that hardens to plaque, which can cause inflamed gums (gingivitis), cavities, and tooth loss.Aim for all 7 days!Only 50.5 of Americans floss daily, and good for you that you are one of them!", "3RWSQDNYL9KOQORIJGT0DH4EW3OFF3": "Could be a planter's wart - usually those appear on your feet. Other than that, a blister, a sist (syst? ), arthritis can cause lumps like this too so if you've ever had arthritis that might be what it's from. If it /is/ from arthritis it's harmless. Check with your doctor to make sure it's nothing serious (which I'm sure it's not if there's no pain).", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIFX33": "../src/QueryEnvironment.cpp(890): Couldn't understand this query: NoViableAlt", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYGRJD": "This information should answer your questions on Dental Hygienists: Most dental hygiene programs grant an associate degree others offer a certificate, a bachelors degree, or a masters degree. Dental hygienists rank among the fastest growing occupations. Dental hygienists also help patients develop and maintain good oral health. Dentists. Dental hygienists work in clean, well-lighted offices. A minimum of an associate degree or certificate in dental hygiene is generally required for practice in a private dental office. Employment About this section Back to Top Dental hygienists held about 158,000 jobs in 2004. Almost all jobs for dental hygienists were in offices of dentists. Population growth and greater retention of natural teeth will stimulate demand for dental hygienists. Dental hygienists may be paid on an hourly, daily, salary, or commission basis. Internet: http://www.ada.org The State Board of Dental Examiners in each State can supply information on licensing requirements", "3NCN4N1H1GFA1ZSJC2QH2WM2JWMBNS": "You will never stop playing because you grow old, rather you will grow old if you stop playing. So go on, enjoy yourself. Youv got over 50 of a lifespan if you live to the average age.", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZRZFRY": "Jun 26, 2007 ... However, anyone who survived the plunge into the water without a life ... The five postal clerks most likely drowned, as did Junior Assistant .... anyone who turned down a place in a lifeboat, but that is not what is meant here. And that will not have fictional characters in it as the film did. (Nothing wrong with that, but if you've seen the movie, you'll know everything that would be in the book, and that seems a bit pointless--at least, IMO.) He ultimately did end up in the freezing water and was rescued by Lifeboat 4. ... Edwina Troutt, who was 27 years old when she survived the Titanic sinking, was a ... throughout her life, she steadfastly refused to discuss the Titanic with anyone. That said, the only way the memories of Titanic survivors survive today are in the stories and memories of people other than actual suriviors. If you want to know more about the Titanic, I would be happy to answer any and all questions you may have.", "3FW4EL5A3LMKO03U7QZM9FG0EVI22Q": "Nah i have them too. I have a HUGE one in my right eye, plus tons of squiggly lines too. They are floaters. They are just a pain the ASS more than anything. You will probably notice more as time progresses, that is how mine all started, just one small dot in my right eye. When i go outside i wear sunglasses, makes it a bit more bearable. My eye doc said i won't go blind.", "3UEDKCTP9VOMRH4Q28ML52J26BOK78": "Here's to a decrease!", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6UX07": "Do you have any vet bills in your name? That would prove that you have taken care of the dog and legally 'own' it, thereby have a right to see/care for it.", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VSCXG": "Probably, As the ship was listing to starboard, the lifeboats on the port side could not be lowered, leaving only the starboard davits usable. Also, not enough boats on the starboard side to seat all passengers. Now days, ships must carry sufficient lifeboats on BOTH sides to accommodate all passengers and crew.", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TVWUJ": "The range for weight gain during pregnancy is from about 15 to 40 pounds. Underweight women tend to put on more weight, overweight women tend to stay on the lower end. Some weeks you'll gain a lot, and others not as much. If you have bad morning sickness in the beginning, you might even lose weight. You should NOT try to limit your weight gain! Your body knows exactly how much to gain to keep your baby healthy. I gained 50 pounds during my pregnancy (I was underweight) and lost 40 of it in 4 months of breastfeeding. Eat as healthy as possible, with lots of protein, green leafy vegetables and frequent meals. No. I was 95 pounds at 13 and my doctor said I was underweight, but I'm a guy, so he was right. 80 pounds, guy or girl is underweight by a great margin. BTW, I'm now 15, and weigh around 125-130 pounds, still underweight, yet I rock at baseball. gaaawwwd.... im 85 pounds....but im 5'0' and thats almost underweight. all she will need is food consult a doctor cause thats sad...", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KX4J8": "Hope that helps.Good luck!QUESTION: Whats wrong with my shoulder?", "3RZS0FBRWK8TEPW26HZ4H5XF1WJCPS": "whatever you say. To me hes a him and thats all that matters..", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54LEB6": "These tablets may also be used to capture data or handwritten signatures. It can also be used to trace an image from a piece of paper which is taped or otherwise secured to the surface. Capturing data in this way, by tracing or entering the corners of linear poly-lines or shapes, is called digitizing.", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O29XV1": "Most Common Text: Click on the icon to return to www.berro.com and to enjoy and benefit . the of and to a in that is was he for it with as his on be at by i this had ... While you can't fight your body's natural shape, you can certainly maximize what you've got. ... met a woman 2 weeks before her high school reunion or 2 days before a... ... use any there see c so only his e when contact here business who web also now help ... life know games way days management part could great united hotel w real ... forums mar... 4 days ago ... Statins could reduce risk of dying after surgery by half, study reveals ... 01 Sep 2015 ... New meningitis B jab offered on NHS could save thousands of lives .... ... Candy Crush Saga Cheats Candy Crush Saga Facebook Android Ios Hack Cheats Tool Candy Crush Saga Cheats Hack Download Free Download Candy Crush Saga Hack ?", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01NQLH": "neither, cats hate birds and mice. Use a neutral olive milk", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMYLD7": "Or if you separate the wrong one off, they will get no milk at all.", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQ8FDS": "answered this Common Non-Cancerous Lumps Under the Skin I had the same thing..   a little very hard lump at the underside of the base of my shaft . Absolutly painless and I could kind of  reach under '' it , like it was attached to the underside of my skin but not to the actual shaft .", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUJM1I": "(I've used this answer before for the same question, so you may have seen it around Yahoo Answers in the past few days.) I use 'we' and 'us' to refer to the others in the autistic community and me. As far as I know, you aren't autistic. You are afraid to be autistic because, people might laugh, make cruel jokes, treat you different or deny you opportunities. News flash my autistic brother by hiding your autism people are already denying you all those things and more. I am not a parent of an autistic child, nor am I autistic myself, but I have become fascinated in the topic over the last several years through my own research for purposes of my own. Don't be embarrassed or disappointed about it some of the greatest people in the world were autistic such as Albert Einstein or Thomas Edison who both had Aspergers Syndrome I am mildly Autistic", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC7494L4T": "Asking about health problem on Yahoo answers is probably not the best idea.", "3RIHDBQ1NEWEAUA50TLDBS009JGMHI": "For the third week: prepare the mix with 75 of the good food and 25 of the nuggets. 4. At the end of the month start trying to make the good food be prepared as though it looks like a nugget (shape and size) but only has a little bit (5) of the real chicken nugget left in it.... your kid will love it by then.", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U3IEH": "You are 5'3' tall so you should be between 45 kgs to 55 kgs to be a healthy girls. There is a method by which we can know that he person is healthy or not which is called BMI (Body Massed Index). You can get your BMI from this site:  http://caloriecount.about.com/cc/bmi.php   If your BMI is:   Below 18.5    You are Underweight   18.5 -24.9     You are Normal   25 - 29.9       You are Overweight   30  Above   You are Obese", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082L7UR": "What does your diet consist of and what exactly do you eat that triggers the 'sick' feeling? It may be stressed related. Try consuming foods that aren't too heavy. Eat some soup or anything with a broth base. Try drinking tea or ginger ale to soothe your stomach.", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC7495L4U": "Okay the first thing is that currently the brid flu is onyl contagoius from bird to human, not human to human. until the flu can be spread human to human we are okay. Is a bird flu pandemic imminent? Sooner or later, pandemic flu will happen. Flu pandemics sweep the globe from time to time as new flu bugs emerge. Bird flu could become a human flu in two ways. Bird flu could also evolve into a form adapted to humans, as was the case in the 1918 flu pandemic. Is there a cure for bird flu? The case fatality of even highly virulent flu strains are a couple of deaths per 10,000 people.' the above is false because 'bubonic plague infectious disease that is believed to have caused several epidemics or pandemics throughout history. flu virus Influenza A viruses, one of the several types of flu viruses Courtesy of the CDC/Erskine Palmer Oh come on now, Im sure youre saying. But thats not how it went during the 1918 flu season. Researchers still arent sure why the 1918 flu virus w...", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBT9V2P": "From a personal point of view it was necessary, my father was a Japanese interrogator in the 1st Marine Division and would have been one of the guys hitting the beach if an invasion had been required. As the Joint Chiefs of Staff estimated U.S. casualties for a Japanese invasion at 1.2 million, I'm rather glad the war ended when it did. Other conventional bombings by the U.S. actually did more damage and caused more casualties then dropping the two atom bombs. The fire bombing of Tokyo equaled Hiroshima and Nagasaki in casualties and damage combined. I think the Japanese military government had to be shocked in to surrendering, in this case by the idea that one bomb, and a whole new science, could cause so much devastation. I won't call it wise, because the U.S. had the capability to do more conventionally, but I do think it was smart.", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBV7L0": "that's not a second degree burn! I had a second degree burn, it went right up my arm, all of the skin peeled off and it blistered, it was about 10 11 inches long and it was there for about 2 months, when I had it I had to run my hand under water constantly - for 17 hours because it was so painful - I finally managed to take my arm away from the sink and have it bandaged up, that was a second degree burn - I accidentally reached over the kettle to get the coffee and the steam burnt my arm - a first degree burn is a minor-ish burn a second degree burn is believe it or not in between a 1st and 3rd degree burn lol - a third degree burn is when you see those poor little kids with no skin on one part of their body because they were involved in a terrible fire. I just think yours is a little burn - you'll survive, just put a dressing and some savlon on it and you'll be fine )", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY82ES": "We'll I hope this helps.dalton  In general, under a regular swimsuit, a guy does not wear underwear.A lot of guys are wearing board shorts and a lot of those have no inner lining, so the natural tendency is to wear undies.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VX8LK": "Female Health Vaginal Discharge Vaginal discharge is normal and varies during your menstrual cycle. Before ovulation (the release of the egg), there is A LOT of mucous produced, up to 30X more than after ovulation. It is also more watery and elastic during that phase of your cycle.", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGM9Y5": "The GMAT (Graduate Management Admission Test)he Graduate Management Admission Test (GMAT) is a standardized assessmentdelivered in Englishthat helps business schools assess the qualifications of applicants for advanced study in business and management. Schools use the test as one predictor of academic performance in an MBA program or in other graduate management programs.What the GMAT MeasuresThe GMAT exam measures basic verbal, mathematical, and analytical writing skills that you have developed over a long period of time in your education and work. It does NOT measure:     your knowledge of business,     your job skills,     specific content in your undergraduate or first university course work,     your abilities in any other specific subject area, or     subjective qualitiessuch as motivation, creativity, and interpersonal skills.Format and TimingThe GMAT exam consists of three main parts, the Analytical Writing Assessment, the Quantitative section, and the Verbal section. Analyt", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OCA6M": "Most likely you will be deported. Not only deported to your home country but also put on the quot. No re-entry list quot. for up to 10 years, as well. It's not called ILLEGAL for nothing, my friend.", "3YZ7A3YHR5R5SW3FJOGQY4WGWZ85SX": "If living too far from home to live home while attending college, the student would NEED a dorm room. He/she only WANTS a college apartment, to live in a more expensive fraternity/sorority house, etc. Again, rightfully, the cost should be split 50/50, but the custodial parent can sink really low and burden the non-custodial one with 90 of the tuition in the state of NJ. It is really low, but my cousin's ex-wife (who had cheated on my cousin) managed to do it.", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT69R2": "I personally do not think you have anything to worry about. The brown discharge is probably old period blood. for a few months, either before or at the end of my period, the blood would turn brown or dark brown. I asked my doctor about it, and she said it was perfectly normal. What happens sometimes is that oxygen gets into the vagina and this causes the blood to turn brown. If it is smelly then go see your doctor. Opinion 2: Sounds like break-through bleeding. Brown blood is old blood. Are you back on your pills? See your doctor. Different Types of Discharge: White: Thick, white discharge is common at the beginning and end of your cycle. Normal white discharge is not accompanied by itching. If itching is present, thick white discharge can indicate a yeast infection. Clear and stretchy: This is 'fertile' mucous and means you are ovulating. Clear and watery: This occurs at different times of your cycle and can be particularly heavy after exercising. Yellow or Green: May indicate an in", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEED644": "#NAME?", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP1125": "Genghis Khan was a trespasser , and stalin was a war criminal, but Adolf Hitler was a hero.", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRYOU1": "5 cm or larger will need to be doccumented on your form. it will not need any records to go along with it. just simply how big it is and how you got it and that it does not affect you in anyway. these scars are good to note in the event (i pray no one meets) of death where the body cannot be identified. scars and tattoos can identify you in that case. you can also google DODI JUL12 for basic intructions for medical enlistment. 02-10-2014, 06:56 PM 1 posts, read 2,658 times Reputation: 13 My son was DQ from MEPS in January for 1 over on body fat. Also had notes from MEPS doctor regarding medical records from tubes in his ears when he was six months old, RAD when he was in the second grade, (he is now a senior in high school), and from contracting stomach virus five years ago, resulting in the ER doctor sending him home with a laxative and to drink plenty of clear fluids.", "3BO3NEOQM0FD4OC098DT2D6FFF5AIE": "I don't know about online for free. I suggest going to your local library. Most libraries are sure to have this book, since it's a classic. Also, the library should let you check it out for around 2-4 weeks. You can use Google Maps (maps. com) to search for libraries in your zip code.", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ5ZNJ": "I THINK THEYRE ALL OKAY, I MEAN PARIS IS SKINNY, BUT IT LOOKS GUD ON HER..........NICOLE RICHIE ISNT HUMAN, SO SHE DOESNT COUNT, LOHAN PUT ON SOME WEIGHT AFTER HER BULIMIA SO SHES OKAY AGAIN AND THE OLSEN TWINS ARE JUST GROWING UGLIER EVERYDAY.........SO I CANT REALLY LOOK  THEM LONG ENUF TO NOTICE THEIR BODIES", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1TJNJ": "see inside This is a bit of a long shot, as you didn't mention the age/purpose of the book, but this is one of the books about inventions with lighnting in the tilte: How Ben Franklin Stole the Lightning (Hardcover) Price: 12. 40 Reading level: Ages 9-12 Hardcover: 40 pages Publisher: HarperCollins (December 24, 2002) Language: English ISBN-10: 0688169937 ISBN-13: 978-0688169930 Other books about inventions: Draw the Lightning Down: Benjamin Franklin and Electrical Technology in the Age of Enlightenment by Michael B. Schiffer and Carrie L. Bell (Hardcover - Oct 14, 2003) Buy new: 35. 10 Understanding Lightning and Lightning Protection: A Multimedia Teaching Guide (RSP Bird) by Tibor Horvaacute. th (Paperback - Jul 11, 2006) Buy new: 75. 00 Lightning: It's Electrifying: It's Electrifying (All Aboard Science Reader) by Jennifer Dussling and Lori Osiecki (Paperback - Sep 16, 2002) Buy new: 3. 99 Sources: www. com Mith 104 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0K62B": "Anyone who loves history and does a lot of reading can be a history teacher however to teach in a public school you must have a teaching certificate issued by the state.", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PZ473": "My implanation bleed lasted only a couple of trips to the bathroom. It was never enough to get on a pad or panties.", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1WR33": "TYhis kind of thing happends all the time. If you started on the 27th of February and you still have it and today is the sixth it has only been seven days you should be clearing with it. If you had a miscarriage it is totally different. A miscarriage contains blood clogs the size of golf balls. I know I've had quit a few. The brownish pinkish is discharge. This is letting you know that your period is stopping. If your period is still going on after ten days you call your doctor. Also if you have had a change in life or you become stressed or something this does effect on your period. Stress causes short,long, heavey, light, early, or even late periods. I have alot of stress related problems and I get my period every othe month. Sometimes mine would skip two months.", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCXFTC": "Still think they should have eventually gotten together. HATED Dani.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLOA0J": "Dietary changes: Small changes really add up. I cut cola out of my diet and it's helped a lot. If you don't have time to cook healthy meals buy a slow cooker. Chop up a bunch of veggies and some meat, throw it all in with some water and you have a healthy meal...but in a slow cooker you can get the food cut up and in the cooker in the morning and have it ready for dinner. Exercise: I walk my son to and from school so I'm making activity a part of my life, while the walk alone won't drastically change me overnight the concept or idea of working fitness into your daily routine and can really help. Walk instead of taking a car/bus not only does it save you money on gas/bus fair but it's a great way to squeeze in that extra bit of exercise. While you are studying take jumping jack breaks, not only does this incorporate exercise into your day but in increases the oxygen flow to your brain which keeps you more focused and helps you learn things easier. When you are reading class material ...", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA2PO2": "Operation Barbarossa was named after Frederick Barbarossa, the medieval Holy Roman Emperor.", "3V8JSVE8YYO2K18HTV1IKKQUQD1EYJ": "You should try www.onread.com :) They let you read online and download in many different file formats: - The Lion, the Witch, and the Wardrobe by C.S. Lewis http://www.onread.com/book/The-Lion-The-Witch-and-The-Wardrobe-191755/ - Holes by Louis Sachar http://www.onread.com/book/Holes-1465265/ ORhttp://www.onread.com/book/Holes-191069/ - Bridge to Terabithia by Katherine Paterson http://www.onread.com/book/Bridge-to-Terabithia-1414357/ I couldn't find 'Finding Courage: History's Young Heroes and their Amazing Deeds' or 'Surviving the Applewhites' or 'Among the Hidden' on the site. :/ If I find it somewhere else though, I'll update my answer. :) Really hope this helps, enjoy reading! :)", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q1XYD7": "Sad  Of the children requiring cardiac surgery at SickKids, 21 are under a month old  40 are under a year old. heartmonth", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE8QTJ": "If there is not any probable cause for the stop then it is unconstitutional. Unfortunately for you there are so many things that you may be stopped for it is incredible. Even a really good driver commits at least 5 traffic violations in the course of driving for just 10-15 minutes. If you want to ask something more specific or give more details I might be able to help you out. Feel free to ask me.", "3PCPFX4U40OLHDHRXW4UPG8S35XQF8": "Sure. I do.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BORAZ": "Read This:- What is premature ejaculation? Premature ejaculation is one of the most common sexual problems, and is most often described as being an inability to delay ejaculation to a point when it is mutually desirable for both partners. How long a man is able to last is not the important factor in diagnosing. Again, what is important is that even if a man cannot last five minutes past the point he wants to, he will fall under the diagnosis of a premature ejaculator. It is important to note that you do not have a premature ejaculation problem unless you FREQUENTLY ejaculate before or shortly after beginning intercourse. He has probably learned for himself that it is possible to ejaculate without having an orgasm, but he may not yet realize that he can also have an orgasm without ejaculating. Lasting longer serves no genetic function that we know of. However, some men will develop a longer-term anxiety toward sex, which can cause a prolonged experience with premature ejaculation. Good luck!", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEN2G9": "Board shorts are considered bathing suits if they have the net liner on the inside. If they don't they are just considered shorts.", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV32KB": "Choose healthy foods during your pregnancy. Jorn Georg Tomter/Getty Images Updated March 26, 2015. Written or reviewed by a board-certified physician. See About.com's Medical Review Board. Question: I just found out I'm two months pregnant. I'm very excited, and I want to do everything I can to help my baby be healthy. One thing I want to know is how much weight I should gain during the next seven months? I'm 5'10' and I weigh 175 pounds. Is it a good idea to gain a lot of weight or should I aim for a specific target? Also, how will that affect the number of calories I need each day? Eevy - About.com User Answer: Most women need to gain anywhere from 15 to 35 pounds during their pregnancies. The amount you should gain depends on your pre-pregnancy weight and body composition. You need to gain enough weight for your baby to develop properly.", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JRORZGTE": "As someone else mentioned, a lump could be a tumor. Some dogs/breeds can get 'lipomas' which are fatty, benign tumors. These typically would not cause your dog to limp.", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY4OVN": "When Arthur was dying, he ordered Sir Kay to throw Excalibur into the lake.Kay thought this was a wicked waste of a beautiful sword and hid it among the reeds, meaning to retrieve it later. When Arthur asked him what happened, when he threw the sword into the lake, he replied, 'Nothing, my Lord. Just the ripples widening.' At this Arthur told him he lied and bade him throw Excalibur into the lake as ordered.Three times this occurred until Sir Kay, ashamed, threw the sword far out into the lake, whereupon  the arm of a lady, clothed in samite (silk) rose up from the water, caught the sword and drew it beneath the lake.This time Arthur knew he spoke the truth and that Excalibur had been returned to The Lady of the Lake.", "3U18MJKL1UKTB4KPQ2MCDGSK1HICNW": "The higher the dose, the more pronounced these side effects typically become. However, some people feel sleepy, foggy, and uncoordinated even on low doses of benzodiazepines, which can cause problems with work, school, or everyday activities such as driving. Some even feel a medication hangover the next day. Because benzodiazepines are metabolized slowly, the medication can build up in the body when used over longer periods of time. The result is oversedation. People who are oversedated may look like theyre drunk. Common side-effects of benzodiazepines or tranquilizers Drowsiness, lack of energy Clumsiness, slow reflexes Slurred speech Confusion and disorientation Depression Dizziness, lightheadedness Impaired thinking and judgment Memory loss, forgetfulness Nausea, stomach upset Blurred or double vision Benzodiazepines are also associated with depression.", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNELDRN": "Louis XVI calls for a meeting of the Estates General, the National Assembly is declared, and a Parisian mob storms the Bastille are the events that represent the correct chronological order of events during the French Revolution.", "3VEI3XUCZRVXKRLLOEPZ60W11XNRPE": "I would reconsider invisalign and go with regular braces. You have to be very committed to wearing these trays they make you. Shifting your teeth is not comfortable and yes some people will say it hurts.", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SZR6A": "'A Drinking Song' was A-listed on Turkish TV Channel 'Dream-TV'. It was on high rotation on the channel and it was rated video of the week. All songs by Dag S. Vagle except 'Helltown' and 'A Drinking Song' - music by Vagle, lyrics by Vagle  Hans A. Wassvik, 'Guitar Noir' music by Vagle, lyrics by Wassvik, 'Waiting Around To Die' - music  lyrics by Townes Van Zandt.", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAJGIX": "It's not too late, but if you have no prior training and experience, it would be at least another seven years of very hard work before you could realistically expect to even get an audition for anything, and that's only if you have huge talent. In the UK the only way to get into acting as a professional is by getting into a top drama school and graduating after three years. To get into a drama school you'd need an excellent grade A Level Drama or Btec, several years of training at a basic level at a good acting school, good singing and dance abilities, a lot of stage experience (and ordinary school stuff doesn't count at all) as well as huge talent. Each of the drama schools gets about 5,000 people auditioning for only 24 to 30 places, every year. Its also very expensive  the fees alone are at least 27,000, and on top of that you have to pay all your own rent and living costs. Train for a good ordinary job as well, one you can work free-lance, as youll need it. Almost all actors...", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH6WYH": "Yes, all combined would give you as big a headache as Jack Daniels. I'm glad I've got Jesus instead. I know how you feel.", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5D6OE": "Some people feel uncomfortable taking a shower in gym class . But relax ... it 's easy to comfortably in gym class . Here are some guidelines to taking one under any circumstance ...", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVOMNQ": "I' m happy to say that these days I make more than 22.4k a year. ..... Plus, if no one came in for help, I got to work on my own homework or surf the .... I think that paid 15 an hour, but it was only for six or eight hours a week. ... As much as I'd love to pay 100 to ensure my kids' safety, 10/hour seems to ... We know she can now make money working a part time job, so we expect ... You get what you pay for! living north of seattle, I pay 7-10 an ... Sep 22, 2010 ... That said, the few days they assigned me to an un-air-conditioned kitchen when they were short staffed ...... I make half that much, but I only work half as much. ... Would these people be street clowns if that career paid the best? Mar 31, 2015 ... I just hope they can make him pay for wasting all of our tax dollars with .... Screw them, if they wanted their damn car so much, they should've parked it .... I work as a receptionist and make 11/hr.", "3U18MJKL1UKTB4KPQ2MCDGSK1HMCN0": "Well for over a year I notice that some nights I will have episodes where I wake up with a rapid heart beat. These episodes usually only last a few minutes and go away when I am awake. I notice through out the day I am fine, no rapid heartbeats- nothing. However sometimes when I sleep I wake up with a racing heart. My blood pressure is normal. My heart rate is normal. I have asthma and take advair in the morning and at night. I do not know if this is connected, but it is really scary when it occurs. I do not think I have heart problems and I had a chest xray maybe 2 yrs ago and it was fine. I had an EKG maybe 2yrs ago as well and that was normal. I am 22 with good health apart from asthma. Any ideas?", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPREUM": "Yeah I'll kik you probably", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL45ZL5Y": "Looking at your parents or siblings, if bigger calves run into your family, there is really nothing you can do to minimize them. From the human anatomy stand point, there is something called Achilles tendon, which is a tough band of fibrous tissue that connects the calf muscles to the heel bone. If genetically you have a short Achilles tendon, then your calves will look bigger because the muscles have to extend lower down your leg to meet the short tendon. Endurance running wont make your calves bigger. Seriously, sprinting develops the calves, but endurance running does not. The key is to run slower but for longer distances. Although you may notice what appears to be an increase in size after a long run. That is due to the pump you get from the increased blood flow to your calves muscles while youre running and it is not permanent at all. Yoga, Barre and Pilates are great exercises for calves.", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEELGH": "Fill your house with guinea pigs. Get like 50 of 'em and let them run around your house. Invite your in laws over often.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMWD8A": "I hope I have a story one day to tell how my dog beat this vestibular syndrome. If ..... My Piper pulled through her first bout of vestibular just fine, but the second ... The vet gave him a shot to ease his stomach and told us it was probably .... I believe that his stomach is very upset, but I dont know what to do. ... If his stools improve feed him the bland diet for 2 days past normal stools then gradually start mixing in his regular food ... Can I give my dog beano to help get rid of gas? I am sure there is alot of stuff I left out of here that I know I wanted to say!! lol MyJessi0612aol.com That is my email if you need anything. If you love this dog the way you say you do, Please do not 'recycle'. My first Bull Terrier suffered most of her life due to over vac. I just did the puppy ones on my bull terrier now and do Rabies, required by law here in the US... Best thing to do is call Vets in your area or stop in and chat with the receptionist.", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKD9TMX": "How to make a girl fall for you? ttp://t.co/CpTUm4ggTl", "3PKJ68EHDNUO9M4KXW8LV08J5PLJHB": "'I think another 50 cents might be good,' the mayor said at the time. 'There's a clear correlation: you raise your cigarette taxes, fewer children go and smoke.' Currently, the state charges a tax of 1.50 for a pack of cigarettes and permits the city to add another 1.50.", "3S1L4CQSFX3TUXAA8078ZGTNZNCAFM": "I am still unsure of how to make it show up by just typing the address in but , the link on the right and at the bottom of the page do work . Hopefully , that is a bug I will get worked out soon ! I woke up yesterday with the intention of doing an hour of yoga but when I checked my blog and I saw how many problems I was having , I kind of fell into panic mode I made some breakfast and fixed the problems that I could with the little time I had .", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9SJEU": "written 20 Jan 2010 . updated 21 Jan 2014 More like This Usually, when were looking at a layout of sexual anatomy it's through the lens of reproduction, so its all about penises and vaginas, testes and uteri. But from a standpoint of pleasure and sexual. There's a reason for taking things slowly, or for putting off intercourse or other kinds of genitally-interlocking sex, that often gets overlooked. I'm not talking about slowing things down for. 1  Information on this site is provided for educational purposes. It is not meant to and cannot substitute for advice or care provided by an in-person medical professional. The information contained herein is not meant to be used to diagnose or treat a health problem or disease, or for prescribing any medication. You should always consult your own if you have a health problem or medical condition.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BI95P": "... Of course, before wisdom teeth surgery, we mention the obvious risks like ... Getting your upper wisdom teeth removed would make it worse and ... Do you think that if I have my left wisdom tooth removed my face will become symmetrical? ... if treatment requires something more, like teeth extractions or jaw surgery? ... Correcting thumb- sucking and other habits that can cause tooth and jaw ... will give you a beautiful smile and improve the symmetry of your face. ... Would breastfeeding for longer after a corrective surgery make a difference? ... A good face will have straight teeth aligned naturally by the basic functions of ... which was partially fixed by jaw-expansion orthodontics (though I still feel?... Like you, my face is long and I was worried it wouldn't look good after the surgery. The surgeon fixed my open bite and shortened my face. My face looks better (and so do my teeth! ).", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O2BVX1": ".... (Also, for the love of all that is holy, please please please pay attention in .... gets rejected, not all of them having to do with the piece being bad ... do can matter, and help you to continue on your writing career. 10. ..... I trotted out all my best lessons and performed all my best tricks, but save for one ... or assemble a piece of furniture from directions, you could write a sentence. ... Lahey: By extension, how can writing teachers help students recognize ... If you find yourself in a situation where every piece of furniture is being chewed by your fellow cast members, hold your nerve and avoid the melodrama. Your performance will stand out like the calm at the eye of the storm. Act! You should break the egg up into however many pieces of 15-20 g worth of chocolate. Then each piece in its own baggie or tiny container. So you basically have given yourself a serving and you are less tempted to get another piece :)", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUURRWA": "problem with fillers is that to achieve symmetry , a  doughy '' look may result . , and the most natural result will be achieved with an implant or jaw surgery . The method I would recommend to correct your asymmetry would either to reduce the right mandible , augment the left mandible with an implant , or do a combination of both is also useful to add over the implant as there is usually a soft tissue deficiency in addition to the underdeveloped jawbone .", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN51S7X": "one of your answers said to get a job. you don't necessarily need a job. there are millions of government funds that are free that will help you to open a business. you can use Matthew Lesko's book or any of the other books or programs that talk about free government money. I think you can get about 25,000 to open a coffeehouse.", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1LBLP": "Real bones should be cow bones and large enough that the dog will not splinter it. I use to order marrow bones from the butcher, round bones with the marrow in the center and the dogs loved them. There are companies that specialize in safe natural bones for dogs. No dog toy or chew is indestructible. Clean your dog's Nylabone occasionally. Dog toy A dog toy is a toy that is specifically for dogs to play with. Dog toys serve different purposes. A 'dog bone' is either a real or toy bone that makes a good dog toy. Other dogs like to carry bones around with them. Dog bones also help getting plaque off of the dog's teeth. Latex and rubber dog toys are great for dog entertainment. In general, hard rubber bones and other latex dog toys help improve dogs' overall oral hygiene. It all depends on the positioning of the dog and the bone. My answer is that the dog is about 15 feet away from the leash tie-down and the bone is 15 feet beyond that and that would make it possible for the dog to g...", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y2AYJ": "Sulcata hatchling. Photo  Flickr user EraPhernalia Vintage Ohio exotics vets are pretty plentiful and if you think you don't need to take your pet rabbit, ferret, bird, or other exotic pet to one because you don't vaccinate them then you're wrong. Even if the kind of pet you have doesn't require vaccines they should still get at least an annual check-up with an exotics vet. Exotics are very good at hiding their illnesses until they just can't cover it up any longer therefore it is very important to catch diseases early on and before your pet starts showing symptoms. But why don't all vets see all kinds of pets? An exotics vet has had extra training and has extra equipment to enable them to treat exotic pets. Reptiles and other animals are very different than cats and dogs so not every vet out there can treat them. If you can't find the right exotics vet for you in Ohio, consider checking a neighboring state.", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLYJYA": "Get one of your dirty t shirts and give him the scent then hide it and tell him to find it. Doing this for the first time, hide it where he can see you hiding it, you want to make it easy at first for him to succeed. You can also hide dog bones or treats he likes so he has to find them. You can put a treat under a glass or cup and then switch them around and see if he can find it under the right glass or cup. Opinion 2: My Basset hound Scully playing his favourite game. Find the Scent Category", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E6ABMQ": "Don't worry, you are getting the correct treatment for your pup. The hair loss may increase before new hair grows back in, as the mites damage the hair follicles, and the dead hair continues to fall out for a while, even after you kill the mites. I am very impressed that the shelter did not do the dips, as I am not a fan of that expensive and rather dangerous treatment. Ivermectin takes longer, but is much safer for a pup. As far as diet, just make sure you are feeding a good quality kibble with a natural meat as the source of protein. No corn, no wheat. Ask your vet about an immune booster vitamin called Duralactin. You could purchase it from him, but you can also buy in on line at: http://www.petvetdirect.com/policies.asp The Demodex could have been caused by stress, but more likely it was caused by a lack of care given to the mother dog while she was pregnant. This can cause immune deficiencies in the entire litter, and is common in byb and puppymill dogs, as they are usually not...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PER8HG": "When the doctor calls and your STD test came back negative http://t.co/y06vjJ3HmJ", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TUI0W": "Or they lose their health insurance and just stop going to the doctor.'' The biggest problem I see are women in their 50s or 60s who had not had a Pap smear since they last delivered their last child  a period of up to 15 years,'' said Dr. Harrison G. Ball of UMass Memorial Health Care in Worcester, Mass., who participated in one study. They just aren't seeing a doctor, or their family physician doesn't do Pap smears.'' The five studies, which involved a total of 1,700 women, show that combining standard radiation treatments with a platinum-based chemotherapy drug sharply improves a woman's chances of beating advanced cervical cancer. Standard therapy for early-stage cervical cancer is surgery.", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLPVR4": "Probably not, but there are tests available. You need to talk to your OB/Gyn about your concerns and get regular check ups. I would also recommend the following resources to you, but above all, keep a positive attitude and believe in your granddaughter's abilities and possibilities!", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ75WO4": "I'm excited about my success so far.I continue to feel better and I fit into a pair of slacks that I had not been able to wear.That was nice!", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TOA0CC": "No.... For some reason, having sex on your period shortens or stops it... When my husband and I were dating we would actually have sex on day 3 of my period so it would be over sooner :-)", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ130FO": "HIV is the germ that causes this disease, AIDS. Tested positive for 'HIV': Need not worry, See a doctor and follow his/her guidelines. HIV POSITIVE: If a person was tested positive for HIV virus, we call that as 'HIV positive'. HIV positie not necessarily mean that one has AIDS. It means that HIV germ has entered the body. There are 'HIV positive' people who are living healthy since 15 years of the test confirming them as 'HIV positive'. Basic Facts on HIV/AIDS Human Immunodeficiency Virus AIDS HIV-1 and HIV-2 HIV-1 and HIV-2 Transmitted through the same routes Associated with similar opportunistic infections HIV-1 is more common worldwide. HIV-2 is found primarily in West Africa, Mozambique and Angola. HIV-1 and HIV-2 Differences between HIV-1 and HIV-2 HIV-2 is less easily transmitted. HIV-2 develops more slowly. Mother to child transmission is relatively rare with HIV-2. Once given the treatment, some 60 percent of the directly infected children can be saved from the killer disea...", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U2EIC": "What you have to do is make your weight loss part of just having a healthier lifestyle. Diet and fitness work together toward a healthy lifestyle. Changing your diet and your level of fitness is what can change the way you look and feel. The best way to lose weight is about living a healthier life than what you may be living now. You will need a complete lifestyle change and you will need to be committed. The body loses about 2 pounds a week optimally and thats 2 pounds that stay off. When you drop at a faster rate your body could potentially rebound and either plateau your weight loss or put extra weight on. If you are committed then you should reach your goal. There will be 5 basic elements you need to adjust to have a healthy lifestyle. They are:  1. Your Eating 2. Your Water Intake 3. Maintaining a balance of cardio and resistance exercise 4. Smart supplementation 5. Sleeping the best amount of time", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBKBPL": "Slowly eliminating the amount of old brand of dog food all together.As far as proportion, that is dependent on the Yorkie.Each Yorkie requires a different amount of food a day to maintain proper weight, just as in people.", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LQWHF": "well girls have a sex hormone called androsterone. This is not as much active as the testosterone. This causes a bit more patience than the testosterone. But girls get hotter and are easier to pacify than guys are. Their orgasm is more difficult to achieve. Moreover guys have the testosterone as their depressant while the female counterparts have oxatocynin as depressants. Making them less viable the sex hormone secretion.", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WVMIB": "A normal fasting glucose (sugar) level is between 60-100. 110 is considered Impaired Glucose Tolerance - it is also called 'prediabetes'. It means you are at risk for developing diabetes. Your medical history, family history, weight, diet, and activity levels are all important factors to consider. If you are overweight, there is a good chance that losing weight would help return your glucose levels to normal. Regular exercise and a healthy diet also help maintain good blood glucose levels. Some people, even with weight loss and exercise, may still have abnormal blood sugar levels that require medication. Your doctor is the best person to advise you on this. If you have not already, you should get a glucose meter and begin monitoring your glucose levels regularly. Keep a record for your doctor. Prediabetes is not usually treated with medication, but if your glucose levels continue to rise, you may need medication to control it.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PU189": "When that person that your in love with shows you respect, honesty, loyalty and does everything they can to make you happy without wanting anything in return, other then having that love reciprocated. Love is an unselfish emotion. There are many ways you can tell someone loves you and many ways you can tell they actually do not. The most important thing to remember though is when you're young and you think you love someone. you get butterflies and feel emotionally sick with them that it's only puppy love and the love you feel as you get older triples again and again in size. You know someone you love loves you back when they act a similar way that you do around them, if they aren't afraid to let you see what they are really like, if they always want to be with you. However some boys/girls are massive flirts and you may think they like you when really they don't.", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDV6T1": "Anal sex can be very stimulating. I've often enjoyed reading gay erotica just for that.", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TABY21": "Just make sure there is nothing wrong with the bowl that might be making it taste funny to her.For instance, if you cleaned it out recently, it could have soap residue, or if it is metal, it could rust.Good luck!", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ5CTY": "50 days is a long time I would go to the doctor and have them do a blood test for you. You might also being stressing out so much which is causing your late period. Archaeological sites in North Haven, Maine The town of North Haven, Maine is an island community located principally on North Fox Island in southern Penobscot Bay, separated from its mouth by Vinalhaven.", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL478Z5": "I have that same problem. I get twitches all over my body. I did some research and found this it is called Benign Fasciculation Sydrome. You can look it up on the web. Hope this info is helpful.", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMWDLX": "Gaining muscle takes the same amount of focus and preparation as   losing weight. Some important facts about gaining muscle:    ? ?ou can't necessarily gain muscle without gaining some fat as well. ?here are no magic foods, powders or pills that will allow you to   gain muscle and lose fat at the same time. Some people can do this   naturally (again, the genes), but most will gain some fat along with   the muscle. ?our body is very different from a bodybuilder--trying to gain mass   to look like them is not the best idea. They have different muscle   fibers than you and some may even be getting a little help from   illegal substances. ?f you're a teenager, you'll have a hard time changing your body   dramatically. It's changing constantly and it will change even more   as the years pass. ?aining weight requires eating more and lifting more   Gaining muscle requires that you eat more calories than you burn. For   those with high metabolisms, that may seem impossible, but if", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQ18NQ": "From experience I know exactly what you are talking about. It will be 2 years for me in October. We have also renewed our vows. I also offered my husband a divorce witch he didn't want (not what he told her). For over a year I had to deal with emails on his email account witch he gave me the password 2, saying things like isn't it funny that I think she is out of his life, and next year when he leaves me for good and I don't have a clue how great it will be, as well as take her for all she has so we will have money when you get rid of her.There is more but you get the picture. My husband to this day will not talk about it or give me an explanation. This is what seemed to answer it best for me. I shared it with my husband and he agreed. Romantic Infidelity  Surely the craziest and most destructive form of infidelity is the temporary insanity of falling in love. You do this, not when you meet somebody wonderful (wonderful people don't screw around with married people) but when you a", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10JMKL": "Dear Dana, Well what mother nature give us we can not stop it but we can try to avoid it's big punch. That said here are few things you can do, Three Ibuprofen every six hours. in about 30 minutes your period will stop and you will have a good three hours or more. Alcohol stops your period for a few hours, but you cant get drunk every time you want to stop it.Though vinegar cant stop your cycle completely it can slow your flow and regulate your period. During your period, you should do this three times a day.You wont be able to stop it completely this way, but it will be very light. Suck on a piece of lemon and your period will stop or at least cut short. As for the pill well You can't stop your period for a day (like in the middle of it). Stopping your period involves a lot of planning ahead( you can try to take two pills at one time that will effect your period might stop it but not 100 percent effective since you already have your period. please Plan ahead not on the day almost here...", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT41FMB": "Males reach their full adult height at age 18 ? 3 years. If you take a peek at the other identical questions by typing 'taller' into the box at the top of the page, 'search for questions' you will find yours is the  370,836th so far (really!) Your maximum height potential, just the same as the other 370,836 individuals, who have asked this question already, was fixed at the moment of your conception by your genetics. Malnutrition, injury, toxins or diseases may prevent you achieving that potential, but you can neither exceed it, nor accelerate the time it takes you to reach it.", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8FJ05": "All material must be the author 's own original work , and material that has been previously published Unless you are a previously published author , do not send a query ! Send the completed manuscript as outlined here . For NOVELS , when you submit , please include in the body of your email , a brief ( one paragraph ) description of the work , including the subgenre , and which Ravenous Romance line you think it is best suited for .", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO76EXC": "Age 17 (beginning of the story) 20 (end of the story) Weight 150 lbs / 68 kg Height 5'7' / 171 cm Weapon Sword", "3R16PJFTS3PP8UM70AOE2QZSF9X4K7": "It may be a one in a million chance but there is a danger that static electricity may ignite the gasoline vapours during refueling at a petrol station. People have been killed or severely hurt doing something as simple as refueling their vehicle or gas container. The killer providing the spark is sometimes ' Static Electricity'. Static electricity can be generated by the friction of the gasoline being pumped into a vehicle or container or by you when you get out of the car or remove an article of clothing. Static charges are dangerous! If static charges are allowed to discharge through the areas where there is petrol vapour a fire can occur. The results are frightening and may be devastating. Most vehicle static fires are caused by a person re-entering the vehicle during refueling to get warm or get a credit card, etc. When they go back to the nozzle area they discharge their static in the vapour rich space around the refueling nozzle and BOOM!! Sometimes the hose, nozzle or even the c", "3P4C70TRMRFG4GX9GB2GQF9AUEAGL8": "Simply - to breed mares and pass on his SUPERIOR traits to the future generation. If I had a quarter for every stud colt that I have seen where the owner said 'I'll keep... The horse has evolved over the past 45 to 55 million years from a small ... Female horses, called mares, carry their young for approximately 11 months, .... Heavy or draft horses... Unlike most mammals, the mare does not have an increase of LH right before ovulation. ... FSH is inhibited by inhibin (see below), at the same time LH and estrogen levels ... siz... All horses ponies listed below have superb ground manners and are easy for the ... HORSES. Lord Chesterton ?? 17.2h, Chestnut, Gelding, 9 years. By Chester Z out of ... eye ... If you are new to the forums, you must register a free account before you can post. The forums have a separate registration from the rest of www.chronofhorse.com, so ...", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVNNMQ": "How many white cloud minnows can I fit in a 10 gallon tank? I have a aqueon filter that goes up to 20 gallons as well as live plants, how many can I fit? And can anyone give me a step by step tutorial/explanation on how to breed white clouds please? Follow 4 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  just now  6 or 7 Alonso  White clouds are pretty small so about 5-8. SAbujbarah97  if you take the water out about a thousand or so but the thing about minnows is that they like water there like that lol joke about 7-9 meybe more i like cheese  5 years ago 1 Thumbs up 2 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Add your answer How many white cloud minnows can I fit in a 10 gallon tank?", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVW8KL": "I was walking home with heavy groceries and this bag kept hitting my left calf over and over and I tried moving it but I just wanted to get home because it's a far walk. When I got home, it hurt and I noticed a bruise starting to form. Now it's this huge big purple bruise but I still wanna wear shorts :D? How to get rid of it..", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIV0UZ8": "The Treaty of Versailles imposed restriction on Germany. Germany blamed, demilitarized and forced to pay reparations totaling 38 billion dollars (1917 exchange rates) or approximately 250 billion in todays currency. Treaty written without German input. -Poland created out of Germany and Russia. -France given Alsace Lorraine province from Germany. -Czechoslovakia created out of German and Austro Hungarian territory. Anschluss (Combining of Germany and Austria) forbidden. League of Nations created but Germany not admitted. Germany has to give up it's merchant fleet. Germany gave up 50 of it's rolling stock (railroad locmotives, train cars..etc) 8. Germany gave up 50 of it's coal and iron reserves 9. No military allowed within 50 miles east of the Rhine river Please remember that before the war, Germany was a major industrial and economic trading power in Europe. Hilde Gerg, Germany, 45.31 4. Sibylle Brauner, Germany, 45.73 5. Katja Seizinger, Germany, 45.86 6. Miriam Vogt, Germany, ...", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFSB39": "peace yuni005, 'pisceanola' and 'rfdyhs f' have given you the list of 25 messengers mentioned by name in the qu'ran. however, this list is not exhaustive. the qur'an states: (040:078) We did aforetime send messengers before thee (Muhammad): of them there are some whose story We have related to thee, and some whose story We have not related to thee. It was not (possible) for any messenger to bring a sign except by the leave of Allah: but when the Command of Allah issued, the matter was decided in truth and justice, and there perished, there and then those who stood on Falsehoods. in fact, god informs us in the qur'an that he sent messengers to every nation on earth. (034:024) Verily We have sent thee (Muhammad) in truth, as a bearer of glad tidings, and as a warner: and there never was a people, without a warner having lived among them (in the past). (010:047) And for every nation there is a messenger. And when their messenger cometh (on the Day of Judgment) it will be judged between th", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4IQEQ": "Chest Pains Lots of things cause chest pains. Some chest pains are minor problems such as muscle aches and gas bubbles. Most people describe heart pain as a deep pressure, ache, burning or squeezing. Dont goof around with chest pains. Sharp pains in the heart, could it be caused by anxiety? God Bless I have had panic attacks...it cause racing heart beat, difficulty breathing, dizziness and choking chest pains....it simulates a heart attack...basically its because you have an overwhelming fear that come without warning and its the best way you know how to cope... This could simply be a matter of too much negative stress...and if he has been suffering for a number of years with this condition it is probably not a bad idea to be seen by a cardiologist. The signs and symptoms of heart attack are: shortness of breath, cold, clammy skin, shallow breathing, weak rapid pulse, crushing chest pain, pain radiating down one or both arms, in the neck and jaw and an intense feeling of indigesti...", "3S4TINXCC0LSJKSVDHQUHLM796ROBK": "I work with babies and toddlers in a pre-gymnastics/physical activity setting (much like Gymboree) and have had extensive experience with teaching children how to walk. That being said, 13 months and not walking yet is COMPLETELY okay and normal -- especially if he walks well assisted, like you said. Sometimes they're either not ready physically to support themselves, and other times they can but (like you said) they just don't want to. Why? I've found that babies sometimes seem to think that it's faster to cruise. After all, they've got that under control -- so it's easier for them to hit the ground crawling and get from point A to B than it is to actually take steps (which are slower, and harder at the time). If he's not walking unassisted by 15 months, consult your pediatrician to make sure there's nothing physically preventing him. In the meantime, if you want to encourage him to walk, I suggest enrolling him in a physically oriented mommy and me class, much like where I wor", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUJH70": "I have had that much pain after having several fillings done. It is going to be sore and hard to open because of all the time the mouth was held open for the dental work, and that will take a few days to even a week to clear up. Also the trauma of that much work makes the mouth, jaws and muscles all around them sore. Then comes in the roots of the teeth. They are traumatized from the drilling and cleaning out of the cavity, plus the jamming of the filling mixture into the hole where they cleaned out the cavity. So the roots are going to need time to settle down from that. The roots can take several weeks to get back to normal and not be so sensitive. Take extra strength Tylenol is safest, but if you can stand to take the NSAID kind of medicine, taking three over the counter Motrin is the same strength as prescription Motrin.", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCU0YM": "There is no internet registry for email addresses and no way to enforce that it would be accurate if there were shy of a massive global internet police force. Moniker Whois Server. Moniker does not guarantee its accuracy. Moniker reserves the right to modify these terms at any time. Domain Name: GRANTSBLUE.COM Registrar: MONIKER Registrant 1952138: Moniker Privacy Services GRANTSBLUE.COMdomainservice.com Moniker Privacy Services 20 SW 27th Ave. Suite 201 Pompano Beach FL 33069 US Administrative Contact 1952138: Moniker Privacy Services GRANTSBLUE.COMdomainservice.com Moniker Privacy Services 20 SW 27th Ave. Suite 201 Pompano Beach FL 33069 US Phone: 1.9549848445 Fax: 1.9549699155 Domain servers in listed order: NS1.DOMAINSERVICE.COM 208.73.210.41 NS2.DOMAINSERVICE.COM 208.73.211.42 NS3.DOMAINSERVICE.COM 208.73.210.43 NS4.DOMAINSERVICE.COM 208.73.211.44 Record created on: 2009-07-03 10:57:38.0 Database last updated on: 2009-07-03 10:57:43.57 Domain Expires on: 2010-07-03 10:57:38.0", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1TNJN": "I lived in Durban during apatheid and basically it meant that blacks and whites (and in Durban Asians) lived completely separate lives. For instance, there were non-white (nie-blanke in Afrikaans) buses, toilets, lifts, trains, schools even beaches were segregated. Only whites could eat in restaurants and stay in hotels or go to the cinema or cafes or any place of entertainment. Non-whites lived in townships outside the main towns and in Kraals (sort of African villages) in the rest of the country.They could only do menial work as servants or labourers.No-one was allowed to marry outside their racial group.Apartheid was very similar to American segregation.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FISCIK": "A 'puggle' is not even a breed - it is a 'designer mutt' which bascially means people breeding these dogs are acting very irresponsibly and you are shelling out big money for a dog you could pick up at a shelter for a nominal fee (usually around 50). By rescuing, you will be saving the life of a dog who may otherwise be killed due to someone's irresponsible breeding. Check shelters in your area - petfinder.com is a good place to start.", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVRCZE": "I have a bad cold and I can not smell anything and I'm trying to get my smell back to. Do u still have a cold cause if u do ur maybe plugged up or maybe u can see a doctor", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVA19W": "Dental Implants for Diabetics Yes, just inform the dentist before hand and be sure your blood sugar is normal before the procedure. More input: You can possibly have dental implants with diabetes depending on the type. If you have severe bone loss, then that will not be an option. It may not be if you are considered a quot. brittle diabeticquot. Call your local periodontist and ask him/her. They may even give you a free consultation if you ask. Most dental treatments can be done for people with diabetes. When it comes to tooth extraction or dental implants, you must only do it when you blood sugar is well controlled and that your doctor says it is ok. After placing the dental implant, you must expect a longer healing period and your dentist will probably ask you to go for many control visits to make sure the healing process is going well. Good luck. (cyberanto) Answer Risk for infection is twofold for implants if your diabetic, I'm type 1 and was told a quot. bridgequot.", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW75ZEV": "Persson was born in Melbourne, Australia. His undergraduate studies were at the Victorian College of the Arts from 1979 to 1981. He completed a Masters degree from the same institution in 1998.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559XZML": "PhD whey doesn't taste like powder! It's good!", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKDBTMZ": "How Much Protein Should You Eat?How Much Fat Should You Eat?How Many Carbs Should You Eat?", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA90TU": "Sono results she's measuring 38 weeks I'm measuring 34 actually 36 weeks pregnant lol TubbyBaby sittin on my back!! HurryUpAugust!", "3XU80RHWHZE4USX4FI1YV9AWINA44K": "Well, I think you CAN get a wildlife license or some sort like that, but it would probably be incredibly difficult. I mean, reptile shows and zoos can get alligators, but the regular citizen probably wouldn't.", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M1933KN": "The pope resides in the Vatican City, in Rome. Rome, and Italy, have been major centres for Christian pilgrimage since the Roman Empire, and Rome is commonly regarded as the 'home of the Roman Catholic Church', since it is where St Peter traveled, ministered, served as bishop, and died. Owing to the Italian Renaissance, church art in Italy is extraordinary, including the works by Leonardo da Vinci, Michelangelo, Fra Carnevale (priest and artist), Gian Lorenzo Bernini, Sandro Botticelli, Tintoretto, Titian, Raphael, Giotto, etc. Italian church architecture is equally spectacular and historically important to Western culture, notably St. Peter's Basilica in Rome, Cathedral of St. Mark's in Venice, and Brunelleschi's Florence Cathedral (Basilica di Santa Maria del Fiore), which includes the 'Gates of Paradise' doors at the Baptistery by Lorenzo Ghiberti.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWUZR7": "She s a very religious/spiritual human-being , but the thought of her not being married is irresponsible ! What a great name ! We had actually been thinking about the same name for our baby boy ( due in four weeks ) , since we are Indian and as mentioned in the article , it t or everyone would have thought we were copying her ! Congrats shaki ! I LOVE YOU and wish you , Gerard and the baby the best ! I love the name , it is similar to my baby girls name Milana Why does baby have her last name and not his ? I think you are getting the name Milan confused with Mulan the Disney character lol Glad that I am married and my kids and I have my husband s last name .", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENON5H8": "How to lose love handles How to get rid of love handles How to lose love handlesBy know all of us know what are love handles. Love handles are created because of the extra fat build up in the body. Now we have to find out how to lose love handles.", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M1943KO": "After the 4 month my baby started having poop less frequently by the 6 month it got once aweek and still is it. HE is now 1 year old. I asked several times here and everybody said is normal for brestfed and also the hard stools everybody said is normal. I am reading now rickets can cause abnormal stools hard and constipation. I am scared that may be our case.Anybodyy knows anything?", "3VO4XFFP15K82K2LFD6I1OVB5HGQ76": "For other items that cannot be picked up such as wires, cables, etc. consider using a product called Granicks Bitter Apple http://www.grannicks.com/ to deter the cat from chewing on anything that could be dangerous or important to you.", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7CW6G": "Cocaine is one of the most potent , addictive , and unpredictable recreational drugs , and thus can cause the most profound and irreversible damage to the nervous system . The high risk associated with cocaine remains the same regardless of whether the drug is snorted , smoked , or injected into the user's bloodstream . In addition to the intense damage cocaine can cause to the liver , intestines , heart , and lungs , even casual use of the drug will impair the brain and cause serious damage to the central nervous system .", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBL1I10": "there are 10 mm (millimeters) in 1 cm (centimeter). Also if you need more information then 1 in. (inch) is 2.54 cm (centimeter).", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWJTAC": "about peanut butter and blueberies", "35NNO802AVUKO76PICIYOJQFEM5IN7": "Masturbation is quite common in young children. Children learn very quickly that it feels good to masturbate. For many children, masturbation reduces tension. When Children Masturbate in Public Places Masturbation is something that should be done in private. Masturbation is quite common in young children. Children learn very quickly that it feels good to masturbate. For many children, masturbation reduces tension. When Children Masturbate in Public Places Masturbation is something that should be done in private. Most young children, however, dont know the difference between public and private behaviors. This is one of the most common questions asked on yahoo answers, so you arent alone. Dont feel guilty about it, its your body and its fun. Masturbation is quite common in young children. Children learn very quickly that it feels good to masturbate. For many children, masturbation reduces tension. When Children Masturbate in Public Places Masturbation is something that ...", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWVW1H": "As an avid reader, I'd say that it's VITAL for a fantasy novel to be unique and engaging. To be engaging, no matter how fantastical the story is, the situation and characters should be grounded in some level of reality. there is no rules for the imangination.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082K7UQ": "Braces: Metal fixed upper and lower Estimated treatment time: 18-24 months Braces Removed: August 2013 (after 33 months in braces) Retainers: Upper  lower essix and lower bonded My Story / Before  After photos Post by BraceFace2o1o  Fri Aug 31, 2012 4:58 pm VA5 wrote:I have been in braces for over a year, and have a midline that needs to be centered. I was told that the midline is corrected with elastics. But, I don't really get how this works. First of all, I have no more space on the bottom for my teeth to move, and both bottom and top need reshifting. The top, I do have space for the midline to be shifted in the correct direction, but then that would leave a big gap on the other side. Does that make sense? i hope some of the orthos who come here can shed some light. I read some older posts here about elastic configurations and such.. can you describe these configurations?", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LCISI": "Dear Bobo:   I think it is very natural to feel worried about a heart attack if one's father has just died of one a couple of months ago. Here is my answer:   FIRST: You ARE worried the question is, SHOULD you be worried? The answer is more difficult than just statistics. If you want statistics, cardiac risk, i.e. the risk of a heart attack can be easily calculated:   http://hp2010.nhlbihin.net/atpiii/calcul... But as it states, this calculator, which is used nearly universally by physicians, applies only for those age 20 or greater. Why is that? Because the heart is like pump -- like any mechanical thing, be it one's car or one's sneakers, it wears out over time, and the older one is, the more likely one is have one's heart give out. Since 20 year olds rarely die of heart attacks (i.e. unless you do crack, etc), its not possible to calculate the odds for the 'average' 16 year old. SECOND: What IS a heart attack? Generally, it implies a blockage of one of the arteries supp", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V76NY": "The Merry Men and Other Tales and Fables The Merry Men and Other Tales and Fables (1887) is a collection of short stories by Robert Louis Stevenson. The title derives from the local name given to a group of waves in the title short story, not from the Merry Men of Robin Hood tales. Tale of the Goat Tale of the Goat is a short story by S. Y. Agnon.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q11YDB": "Not restarting your computer is retarded.", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSARMG": "Good luck!Clement Reply Adrianna says: at How many times a day should I do the burpees Reply Kelly says: at Hi Adrianna One 20 minute session a day is plenty.Good luck!", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F09O2D": "ANABOLIC STEROIDS DO NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. LONG TERM USE CAN LEAD TO TEMPORARY SHRINKAGE OF THE TESTICLES AND POSSIBLE ERECTILE PROBLEMS BUT THEY WILL NOT SHRINK YOUR PENIS. Expanding Monomers Expanding Monomers are monomers which are increasing in volume (expanding) during polymerization.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG548LZ6": "i wasn't like you, but i am in college and i'll tell you what it's like. everyone is in the same situation as you who dorms there (away from home, living on their own). so it's easy to make friends because you already have that in common with them. No. I'm in college and I don't think I'll make it into uni next year since stupid Britain has to up the fees. So if I have any chance getting there, I'd have to take at least a year out to be able to afford it the following year. .... Now, Bane raises an army of lower class warriors in the sewers of ... On a more positive note, there are a few new characters who add to the story. ... I am going to do my best to be nice and not call out any specific,?... I finished my first degree at 19, and I have to say that I really didn't appreciate it. I started my masters degree when I was 32 years old, and a single parent with two small kids - I really appreciated it.", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6CRH8": "Hey there. I am a dental hygienist, and I recently graduated from hygiene school. no, u dont have to work in a dental office at all.", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY3OVM": "Now when you eat a meal, blood sugar generally rises and in a normal individual it usually does not get above a 135 to 140 milligrams per deciliter. So there is a fairly narrow range of blood sugar throughout the entire day. The goal of digestion is to break your foods down into glucose (used in your cells), carbon dioxide (you breathe it out), and water (you pee it out). it is NOT true that your blood sugar lowers after meals. Your blood sugar RISES after meals. thedoctorwithin - how sugar causes disease aspartame side effects blood ... Natural fructose does not cause rollercoaster blood sugar, unless the person overdoes it. ... canned sugar drinks the day after surgery so they'll ? ?et their strength back.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGOBYG": "PVL Mutant Mass is a serious formula, designed with only hard working ... How does Mutant Mass work? ... to add slabs of strong, sinewy muscle, you have to make sure the protein ... Vextrago is beyond what other high mW carbs have been before. the of and to a in for 1 is s on 0 that by this 2 you with i or it 3 be are as at from your all 4 5 not com more have an new ... Reviews, Videos, Full Nutritional Information, Low Prices, Free Shipping Fast... ... Have been buying Gold Standard Whey now for four years and have never ..... or just add some good carbs (I recommend Waxy Maize) and it works great as a .... It contains high amounts ofDHA and EPA for extra strength in ... Healthy proteins transports essential substances throughout the .... Milk is not this best method of obtaining calcium as we have been ....", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ3TCD": "Be happy of your body but also believe it is what you make of it! Not eating is not a reaction by your brain, instead eating is encouraged in order to meet the vitamins, nutrients, and protein your body needs to get through the day and promotes brain functions. Not eating can alsocause problems tothe functions of your hypothalamus. If there has been any new medications in your regimen maybe that is a problem. I would encourage an exercise program as it has helped me in a daily routine of eating. Exercise is necessary among individuals whether you are overweight or not due to the release of endorphins which is food for your brain and makes you feel better. I was able to trim 6 body fat in 3 months due toa steady exercise program of 6 days a week and I am even eating 5 meals a day to keep my calorie intake high. I would suggest the first week starting slower with 3 days a week in order to loosen your muscles.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KY4J9": "Cons :  Puppies will need to be trained, which takes time and diligence and patience. Dogs and puppies need some maintenance. Pros : there cute, they like to snuggle, they are extermly funny in their behavior, they talk to you, and are peacefull Cons : they are stuck-up, they act like THEY own the house, they act like you are the pet, they somtimes dont shut-up / keep you up at night, and they manipulate you to pet them whenever they feel like it", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJZ1S7": "You self-published your book, which means that marketing it is your problem. Anyone can self-publish a book, so nearly all of them. If I wanted to buy your book, you don't make it easy. From www.booksdrugabuse.com, I see a link that says 'Click on image below to order book from publishing company'. (At this point, I don't know how many pages your book is, or what sized pages it has, so I have no idea whether the price represents good value for money.) Or www.booksdrugabuse.com has a link to the front page of www.ididnotknowbookstory.com, where there's a link to the front page of your publisher's web site. I don't see your book on there, so I'd probably assume you were lying about where I could buy it, or else didn't care whether I bought it. Make sure that every page has a button or link where the visitor can buy the book. It won't solve your marketing problems, but at least when someone finds your site and decides to buy the book, you don't give them any opportunities to change their mind.", "3VO4XFFP15K82K2LFD6I1OVB5HF7QM": "Because the nasopharynx infection is caused by any viral (mononucleosic, adenoviral, etc), bacterias (corynebacterium, arcanobacterium, streptococcus A, neisseria, chlamydia pneumoniae, etc) or any physical wound on nasopharynx. Maybe what you mean is only common cold.. There is only one similarity between the nasopharyngitis and common cold, it's about the viral which can be the cause of both. If you mean the 'Uvula'....The uvula, is a muscular flap of tissue that hangs down from the back of the mouth from from your soft palate. The soft palate is part of what separates the mouth (oral cavity) from the nose and the back of the throat (nasopharynx). The main purpose of the uvula is to close of the nasopharynx when you are swallowing or speaking. As far as I know it serves no other purpose. I had a feeling All Week The Cowboys were gonna win!", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ3MGJ": "Hello Cheaky, welcome to the Yahoo Answer family. But sincerely speaking, points are not that important. To become the Yahoo Prom Queen, you need to give quality answers from your knowledge and a little help of search engines. At Level I, per day i can earn 10 answers - 20 10 questions 5 qna to vote - 25 5 qna to best answer - 25 10 qns to vote - 10 10 qns to rate - 10 1 best answer - 10 total  100 points ------------------------------... ----------------------------------- At Level I, per day i can earn 10 answers - 20 10 questions 5 qna to vote - 25 5 qna to best answer - 25 10 qns to vote - 10 10 qns to rate - 10 1 best answer - 10 total  100 points -------------------------------------- For level 2, i need 150 more points so i take 1.5 days to get to level 2. At Level I, per day i can earn 10 answers - 20 10 questions 5 qna to vote - 25 5 qna to best answer - 25 10 qns to vote - 10 10 qns to rate - 10 1 best answer - 10 total  100 points ------------------------------...", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWI5CZ": "New birth control pill Mint Flavored Birth Control Pill The Cadbury's Candy Co. and Merck Drug Co. have combined to market the new Mint flavored birth control pill that women may take immediately before sex. The Pill will be distributed by the large major drug store chains and Wal-Mart's Pharmacies. They're going to be called....", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF1XJF": "my teeth just continue to rot away no matter what i do. i've also never had any teeth removed ever and my wisdom teeth have mostly all come in. my whole jaw has been realigned. i look like a different person than before. i also sometimes get a really nasty taste and pus from the back of my teeth. its quite unpleasing. my tongue sometimes gets big red bumps that hurt too. they last only a few days though then go away. i just winder is there any way at all that i can find someone who will work on my teeth for either cheap or let me make payments or something. maybe a chance for students to learn. trust me i've got a lot going on in there im sure it could be a great lesson or something for a college professor or something. is there something out there to help people like me that cant afford dental work. want to know what its like to not be in pain every day and not have people think im a crack head or something. my teeth disgust me and im sure others too.", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX3C0QI": "It is believed that over vaccination (yearly) causes many of the problems dogs have such as allergies and various diseases. If you think about it years ago dogs did not get all the vaccines they do today and years ago it was rare to hear of some of the issues dogs have today, such as allergies. I do not vaccinate all my dogs regularly, they mostly only recieve the rabies shot and only because it is required by law, two of my dogs I do vaccinate yearly but only because they are therapy dogs (they go to hospitals and nursing homes)and they have to have them in order to participate in the therapy dog program and out of 5 dogs the only one with an allergy issue is one of the dogs being vaccinated yearly.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIRCIJ": "The most common cause of gerbil nosebleeds is bedding irritating it. As for the gerbils kicking their bedding all over the place, that's just the way gerbils are. Top ten Gerbil basic do's and don'ts 1. Do keep gerbils in pairs -- gerbils need to have a gerbil companion. Two gerbils separated for more that 24 hours are strangers and must be re-introduced. And never let your gerbil 'play' with your hamster, bunny, or other pet (someone will get hurt). Do give your gerbil plenty of cardboard and wooden gerbil/bird toys to climb on and gnaw up, otherwise their teeth will become overgrown. Do not keep your gerbil's tank in direct sunlight or exposed to drafts. Gerbils are great climbers and jumpers and love to come out. Do not hold or pull your gerbil's tail (except at the base right near the body), it could break off. Do not use a wheel with open slats, as it could catch your gerbil's tail and break it off. Need more information on Gerbil Care? Go to http://www.rodent.demon.co.uk/gerbi...", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ41SC": "So I did end up taking it and it was positive!! !Good luck!posted01/16/2013byRachel.Ozz Report answer Was this answer helpful?", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8OBG5L": "If you noticed symptoms on other specimens , then its the right time to cure the home aquarium as well . One of my white cloud mountain minnows has had a really big round belly for about 3 weeks now and I only have 2 stringy plants , should I get some more for her to lay her eggs in , if so what kind ?", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XM083": "captsnuf  yes why souldnt they have the lady who was in the titanic movie the old lady was based on a true story and besides their were life boats and everthing and yed people got a way to safety.Source(s): ashleycakporteryahoo.com Ashley P  Yes, haven't u ever seen the movie?That was kinda based on a true story.", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3MME0": "hey I know its scary, but honestly try not to worry. You will get a local anaesthetic in your gum around the teeth, you will need quite a few considering its a few teeth, and it may sting slightly when it goes on but its only a second or 2 I promise. Then your dentist will ask if you can still feel the area by poking the gum, which doesnt hurt although you may still feel it slightly, if so he will give you another one until you cant feel it anymore, I promise it doesnt hurt then. And when he pulls themit doesnt hurt at all, you feel a little bit of pressure but that all, it is not pain - I have such a low pain threshold too and I've had 5 and a half, 4 for braces, and only half my baby tooth was knocked out by the bigger one when I was wee so they pulled the other half. Its not the nicest experience but just think how perfect your teeth will be soon :) Ive been getting orthodontic treatment for 6 years now, my teeth came in in the wrong order and I have 3 adult teeth missing. Lol its w", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JI9Z4N": "Make an appointment with your doctor for medication, and go start therapy. It will help you work through it.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0K267": "Gad what drama! If you pick up your dogs poop they cannot do anything to you..you are legal and if this nonsense continues I would file against these harassers!! Good Luck!", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ81YV6": "These claims however tend to drastically ignore context . While paging through one of my old nutrition textbooks , I came across a section in the protein chapter regarding amino acids and energy metabolism    E  ating extra protein during times of glucose and energy sufficiency generally contributes to more fat storage , not muscle growth .", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N9SVQ": "If i were you i would definitely call your doctor and ask right away.You wanna make sure youre ok before you keep on trying to conceive.Good Luck!", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJDTJS": "Feb.27, 2013 Update: This article is being checked in relation to the International Health Certificate exact validity (see page 5). If you are traveling to Brazil with you pet, this step-by-step will help you find out what documents you need and offer you some other planning tips. These tips are particularly pertinent to cats and dogs. Other pets are subject to an additional requirement: a pre-import authorization issued by a local chapter of Brazil's Servio de Sanidade Agropecuria - SEDESA for each state you intend to visit. Some animals may also need an authorization from IBAMA. This step-by-step also incorporates the change in the process brought about Presidential Decree 6946 of August 21, 2009, which eliminated the need to have your pet's international health certificate legalized by a Brazil consulate, with a few exceptions, mentioned in this step. Animal health departments mentioned in this article apply to the United States.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26V0ZA": "Artists name is Xerraire The artist goes by the name Xerraire. Verification is available at: http://www. skinsgallery. com/gallery/categories. catid5amp. page11 It is available at that site as an MSN background. I would suggest contacting the artist at her website for information about obtaining a copy. http://www. xerraire. com/art. htm Sources: http://www. xerraire. com/art. htm nb4506730 96 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. nb4506730 nb4506730 Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AN5MI": "I can not go to the doctor and this thing in the back of my throat is making my insane . I have no idea what it is and I can not stand it any more . Like I said it feels like a hair is caught in my throat and will not let go . When I breath I can feel it there , when I swallow I can feel it there , when I 'm sitting and doing nothing I can feel it .", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVVQSV": "The Three Musketeers is a novel by Alexandre Dumas . Set in the 17th century , it recounts the adventures of a young man named d'Artagnan after he leaves home to travel to Paris , to join the Musketeers of the Guard .", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT41MFI": "First of all i ve to ask u why u take proactive,for treatin acne or something else,and whom advise u to take that ur self or ur G.P ....if u have acne and wanna treat that its better if u go to a dermatologist cuz we have many kind of acne and every one of them has his own treatment and drug.... Good luck", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK30XU37": "If the concentration of uric acid in the blood becomes too high it crystallizes into tiny hard sharp shards. these crystals have a tendency to collect in synovial fluid around joints particularly peripheral joints such as the big toe and hands. It can also build up in other places under the skin like on the outer edges of the ears and elsewhere. These crystals can also block up the kidneys and form stones.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3S8AXD": "My Aviary plans are easy to follow and you can built your aviary with common tools for a fraction of the cost! 5.00 http://t.", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTXZWNO": "May 13, 2008 ... Now, to give you some background, I'm a runner but a complete .... I know this one tip will spark a debate, as it always does, but let me ... can tell people what you ate and what exercise you did every day. .... Many people show the drive, determination, and consistent effort, but don't reach their goals. ... spoke to some of the nation's finest personal trainers who gave us 25 insightful tips and strategies ... The Best and Worst Foods A Man Can Eat... Apr 22, 2011 ... I'm one of those skinny guys who can't gain weight, your tips are ..... my body I want to look big please give me some easy tips to gain body. If you are a moderator please see our troubleshooting guide. ... Knowing that I have an appointment with someone makes me haul myself there. ..... to positive music during morning exercises can give you positive emotions?...", "3KG2UQJ0MJMX55U8VKN7XLH15WJQNF": "Here's the lowdown for any guy who's ever worried about whether his penis is a normal size. There's a fairly wide range of normal penis sizes - just as there is for every other body part. And just like other parts of the body, how a penis appears at different stages of a guy's life varies quite a bit.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GT5JF": "By E. S. Leik on February 12, 2010 Format: Paperback Verified Purchase Nichols provides a concise explanation of the history and development of documentary films, as well as their roles in society. He covers the wide range of what we call 'documentary', from propaganda to agenda films, and he lists excellent examples that the reader will want to watch for better context. I use select chapters in a freshmen writing class that works with documentary film and nonfiction writing--really encourages discussion. I look forward to Nichols' new book, 'Engaging Cinema: An Introduction to Film Studies', as an explanation of how we view the importance of film in society. His writing style is clear, yet he raises many questions for the viewer to consider: Who funded this film? How was this film edited and presented? What are the audience responses? How does this film fit in the historical/social context of its time, our present time? Comment Was this review helpful to you? Yes No Sending feedback..", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZN2FA": "The Longspined porcupinefish has a circumtropical in distribution, being found in the tropical zones of major seas and oceans: Pale in colour with large black blotches and smaller black spots, these spots becoming fewer in number with age. Has many long, two-rooted depressible spines particularly on its head. The teeth of the two jaws are fused into a parrot-like 'beak'.", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MQLUE": "One sphincter consists of smooth muscle and its action is involuntary  the other consists of striated muscle and its action is voluntary . In many animals , the anus is surrounded by anal sacs . Role of the anus is when the rectum is full , the increase in intra-rectal pressure forces the walls of the anal canal apart allowing the fecal matter to enter the canal .", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ7ZNL": "Pat Robertson Health Shake In blender combine: 6 - 10 ounces distilled water 2 tablespoons apple cider vinegar 1 tablespoon Safflower Oil 1 tablespoon Flaxseed or Fish Oil 1 scoop Lindberg Protein Blend protein powder 2 scoops Optimum Nutrition Pro Complex protein powder 1 teaspoon Glutamine powder 1 teaspoon MSM powder 6 - 8 frozen strawberries  cup blueberries  banana 1 packet non-caloric sweetener If desired add a few ice cubes and blend till smooth. Whey Protein is the best. you can add its powder to your meal, especially mix food.", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWI9NF": "Write combining Write combining (WC) is a computer bus technique for allowing data to be combined and temporarily stored in a buffer  the write combine buffer (WCB)  to be released together later in burst mode instead of writing (immediately) as single bits or small chunks. Write-combining does not guarantee that the combination of writes and reads is done in the expected order. For example, a Write/Read/Write combination to a specific address would lead to the write combining order of Read/Write/Write which can lead to obtaining wrong values with the first read (which potentially relies on the write before). Adding complexity slows down the memory hierarchy so this technique is often only used for memory which does not need strong ordering (always correct) like the frame buffers of video cards. Uncacheable speculative write combining Uncacheable speculative write combining or USWC, is a computer BIOS setting for memory communication between CPU and graphics card.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FU3QE": "It depends how good you are and how commited you are. There are plenty of UK websites to search to find jobs to get started on make-up for film and Tv. How will you promote yourself?", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTWENS": "freaking crying ??", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23E0H2N": "You need to be persuasive, determined, energetic, kind, and outgoing. These are the MAIN types to becoming a good AND professional photographer.", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG61J2R": "i had a SEVERE ear infection ,,,i had blisters on my ear drum pop,,,18months later i still have hearing problems,,i have been to a ENT, and numerous tests and treatments. i didnt have ringing in the ear but i had the version of thumping/hissing. Sometimes, even after the infection is cleared, fluid will persist for quite some time. This can be extremely annoying (I have experienced it) and rarely, you may end up having to have it drained. But it's much too early to worry about that yet. Go back to your docs to see about getting them drained You may need more antibiotics You can't determine how long an ear infec will last, I had an infect last year, lasted over a month and became so bad it spread to my chest However antibiotics helps if the ear infection is caused by bacterial infection. But it could also be viral infection in which case this medication doesn't help. If you have had pain and is gone then it might have been bacterial infection.", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GGH03": "Help ! I saw bright red blood on the toilet paper after I wiped . : Come in to see us so we can check it out . t panic .", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW61048O3": "Sunglasses a fan carrying a violin case only show her from behind wearing a beret using a monocle. Any combination or single item.", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5UK5U": "nullYou want to click on the questions that need your vote and vote on everyone elses answers. The quicker everyone else votes - the quicker the Best Answer decision is made. Say you answer a question, and so does 4 other people. The (4 votes needed) will be there until you go back to that question and read everyone else's answer, and vote on them. You'll earn 1 coin for every vote you cast - so it's an easy way to gain some coins. Only the people that answered the question, and the asker can vote on that question. I believe the Best Answer 'badge' will be given out after everyone has voted - if they dont all vote it an be up to 10 days before you get to see who has the Best Answer. Personally, I check often if I have any that need votes - easy way to gain coins and gets the whole thing done quicker when everyone else does the same. Good luck and have fun!", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y2Z1D": "it doesn't even sound good", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWJN9U": "Yes I've had this too in the past (for 10 months when my sister and I were not on speaking terms after a big fight). You need to resolve the anxiety. That's what it takes. In the meantime, placing your hand on the side of your neck will help you to swallow. Worked for me.", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S9CQN": "i dont have the answer but i also see light flashes in a pitch black room. i think it is normal for most people cause i asked my friend and he sees them sometimes to. ask a friend or someone else and see if the do to.", "3S8APUMBJXHYD7F2EE74URDTH5WFBL": "well i lost weight by eating lots of cereals and special bread.also loads of salad and white meat.like chicken.and aslo fish.kippers are very good for you.the oil is very good for your heart and cholesterol.and they are not very fatty,the same goes for tuna.use skimmed milks and sweeteners for your hot drinks.and make sure you exercise.walk at least 2 miles very day or for at least 30 minutes.do not eat anything before midday.only drink pure lemon juice.it helps break up fatty compounds.eat plenty veg.as it makes you go.and that's the best way to lose weight.good luck.i went from 23 stone to 16 stone in6 months.but I'm 23 stone again and have started all over again.still i look forward to the challenge.never set your sights to high for weight loss in one week.don't expect to lose 5 lb per week it will happen at first but as you diet it gets harder to lose.so set yourself realistic goals.of say 2/3 lb per week weight loss.that way you will not be discouraged if you only lose 2...", "3AA88CN98P15610RPHCLIF3ZAAXKY9": "My son got his first double ear infections at about 6 months old. After several years of constant ear infections, and hearing loss (from constant fluid) during kindergarten and 1st grade, he finally got tubes. He was 7, and hasn't had an ear infection since then.", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE7O4B": "It won't feel good for HIM? What about YOU? This is something that always gets me about these sort of questions, girls thinking they are only there to pleasure their partners rather than knowing that they deserve good sex too. I'd not let a guy like that come anywhere near me, let alone have sex with him! The vagina isnt static, it changes day-to-day being looser. A virgins body is no different to a non-virgin, the problem of pain comes when a girl isn't ready to take that step or when she isn't aroused enough for penetration. Sex is something you have to teach yourself about and you will spend your whole life learning, get a good book on sex such as Guide to Getting It On! By Goofy Foot Press also check out their web sitehttp://www.goofyfootpress.com I'd recommend this article from a very good site called Scarleteen on the subject of painful sex 'From Ow! To Wow! Demystifying Painful Intercourse http://www.scarleteen.com/article/pink/fromowtowowdemystifyingpainfulintercourse", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYFZSX": "put ice on it, 15 min on and 20 min off until the swelling goes down, thats if u hurt it it could also be swelling if its really hot outside and wear flip flops or sandals so it doesn't hurt your toe if that doesn't work see a doctor", "3X52SWXE0X3JYYT3I3DZ9Z5BUTQWCB": "It sounds like she has Wet Tail. That can be fatal. Please look up information on 'Wet Tail' online immediately. Fortunately, if you catch it early, they have medicines for it at places like Petsmart and Petco to treat it. It has to be done ASAP though. Wet Tail is a very common problem in hamsters. It has nothing to do with her food, it is a type of infection. Sometimes it has to do with the living area, have you been cleaning it enough? But like I said, this is a very common problem in hamsters and other small animals and I'm not sure it can be prevented. Goodluck :", "3T2HW4QDUV58M2GVPS37VFX0WS39CW": "QL QL QL LEMON CURD TART PASTRY: QL 1 1/2 cups flour QL 2 tablespoons granulated sugar QL Pinch salt QL 1 large egg yolk QL 1/2 cup chilled unsalted butter, cut into 6 pieces QL 4 to 5 tablespoons ice water QL FILLING: QL 1 cup fresh lemon juice QL 1/4 cup finely minced lemon peel QL 1/2 cup unsalted butter, melted QL 6 eggs QL 1 1/2 cups granulated sugar QL Powdered sugar for top For Pastry, place flour, sugar, salt and egg yolk in a food processor fitted with a metal blade. Pulse until butter is size of lima beans. With machine running, pour ice water through feed tube.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61IMRNI": "Good Luck!Mae  Tylenol and wax..at the end, it's worth the pain!", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP5GJ6": "The German kings were forced to step in on Italian politics in order to get the Pope to continue to give the Holy Roman Emperor title. These kings were constantly in conflicts with Italy, while France and England were building up strong monarchies.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKRYIK0": "Guppies are warm-water fish but if your tank does not drop below 18 degrees Celsius (even at night in winter) then you can put them in, White Cloud Mountain minnows, Bronze shrubs, Shibunkins and Fantails (fancy goldfish). Neon Tetras require at least 20 degree water catfish suck on your goldfishes scales Clown fish are not only expensive but are salt water and goldfish are fresh water Angle fish are tropical I have 9 goldfish in my tank with 3 bronze Shrubs and 6 White Cloud Mountain Minnows, all are happy and healthy. Now he's a big boy with 2 tank mates. They grew up together and are in a 10 gal tank and he also was aggressive towards the fantail. Goldfish are not going to keep the bottom of the tank clean. Keep in mind the bigger the tank for a goldfish, the bigger the fish will get. While goldfish don't require a heater, that tank would be too small. Here are some possibilities for your tank size: white cloud mountain minnows, zebra danios, gold barbs, guppies or a betta.", "3D0LPO3EABXOWSL6N94EPWK8UF7OYX": "UN chief warns continued Israeli settlement activity could one day prevent Palestinian state http://t.co/pey5JBHcDP", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP037E": "You should to see your school nurse. The ace wrap also gives support to the injured area. Following are other reasons you may need. To wrap around an arm or leg splint during healing. How is the ace wrap used? Usually your health caregiver will show you how to wrap the bandage. The following example may help you learn how to wrap a bandage around an ankle. These directions may be used to wrap the bandage around your hand, wrist, elbow, or knee. Be sure to overlap the ace wrap. After the foot has been wrapped twice, move your hand to the heel. Wrap the bandage moving toward the ankle. Wrap the bandage under the foot to complete the 8 figure. Stop wrapping below the knee. Leave it off for a few minutes and wrap it again. You may want to have an extra ace wrap. Try to stay off your leg as much as possible, elevate the leg so it is above your heart when you have the time to lay down to help with swelling and throbbing, and a heating pad or hot water bottle can help with the muscle damage", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRYB6VH": "Imber authored or co-authored more than 50 scientific papers and contributed to several books, including the 'Readers Digest Book of Zealand Birds', the 'Handbook of Australian, New Zealand and Antarctic Birds', and the 'Checklist of New Zealand Birds'. Eastern rosella The eastern rosella ('Platycercus eximius') is a rosella native to southeast of the Australian continent and to Tasmania. It has been introduced to New Zealand where feral populations are found in the North Island (notably in the northern half of the island and in the Hutt Valley) and in the hills around Dunedin in the South Island.", "3SR6AEG6W5RE4BZJJW9O5NN7ITUYHK": "That's heartbreaking, and I have been there. I just wrote a post about this topic on my blog, Peanut Butter for the Artist Soul, at kathrinemcdowell.blogspot.com but because its a new blog it might not show up in search engines yet, so I will copy and paste to make sure you can read it. I hope this helps. Also get the book 'Art and Fear' by David Bayles. Its Super Helpful! Many Artists and Writers get to a point where their work hits a wall. No matter what Ideas they may have, if any, seem uninspiring. If they are producing any work they are not happy with the results. Short Answer, Creative Blocks tend to show up when you stop making art for yourself. Only make Art you would display in your home the same goes for writers if you like your story so will others. Long answer, It was September 2000 and I found myself sitting in the strangest and most eccentric classroom I have ever seen. There were 3 couches and several stools around the room. Every ledge, shelf and cabinet top was filled", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y0Z1B": "Each breed available on the market today comes with pros and cons , and crossbreeds are not an exception to this rule . If you care for the safety of your kids and for your own comfort , youll be just fine with a .", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP4219": "They are called floaters. Eventually, almost everyone experiences seeing floater and it can happen at any age though is most common as reach middle age and older. The vitreous (a gel like substance that fills most of the eye) becomes stringy, pieces break away and we see floaters. Floaters can look like dots, tiny flies, dust specks or tiny squiggly strings. There really is no worthwhile cure and it is a normal occurrence. However, if you experience seeing flashes of light (often looking like lightening bolts), or blind spots (sort of like a veil covering your eye) this could be an indication of a retinal problem which could be sight threatening.. See an ophthalmologist or go to the Emergency Room immediately. If you have not had a comprehensive eye exam in 3 or more years, it would be a good idea to get one.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EYH2L": "As far as I know, I have never heard of a 'Bone' swelling. It is quite possible that you damaged a nerve in your foot, which would be why it is causing you pain. As for the swelling, I'm not sure. I would definatley go see a doctor. They can't refuse to see a patient who needs help. insurance or not.", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV4ZD2": "u r so luckY!1!1! i is smart in the head!", "38VTL6WC4AB2OIFOIU8FGQKHDK15Y8": "A beautiful smile radiates health and self-confidence . Many patients with missing , malaligned , discolored and chipped teeth hold their hand over their mouth when they smile or use a closed-lip smile to conceal their unsightly teeth . Esthetic deals with beauty and has two dimensions : objective and subjective1 .", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U316M": "Cheese depends how they lost their eye. Cheese If the eyelid is still intact, then the muscles operating it will still be likely to function,  they would wink. Cheese If it was some hideous accident  they lost the entire eye area then they would wink. Cheese", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZV51D": "The device received media coverage in May 2005 in the United States after Onterrio Smith, a former Minnesota Vikings running back, was caught with one at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport, which resulted in his suspension. Actor Tom Sizemore has also brought the Whizzinator into the public eye after having been caught with one attempting to evade drug tests. In 2006, a Pittsburgh-area woman and her friend were charged with disorderly conduct and criminal mischief after they asked a convenience store clerk to microwave one of the devices so the woman could pass a drug test.", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26W8JM": "Up to 10 per cent of women in the UK suffer from polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS) - a condition where the ovaries produce cysts. While polycystic ovaries themselves do not always cause problems, the hormonal changes that accompany them can bring on many unpleasant symptoms. These include excess hair on the face or body, weight gain, irregular or absent periods, acne, mood swings, difficulty in conceiving, recurrent miscarriages and in some cases male pattern balding.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1MB83": "The following healthy living recommendations will help you if your trying to lose weight, have aspirations of building lean muscle mass, are attempting to get a wash board stomach, or just want to feel better:  1) Burn more calories then your consuming everyday and measure your results using the following formula: Calories Consumed minus Basal Metabolic Rate (BMR) minus Physical Activity.", "36AZSFEYZ4YN941SETC8CDGF5ZMVBR": "A Heart Surgery Overview Preparing for Your Heart Surgery (15 minute video) Thousands of heart surgeries are performed every day in the United States. In fact, in a recent year, surgeons performed 500,000 coronary bypassprocedures. And even though there is a shortage of donor organs, morethan2,300 people have heart transplants each year. Two major advances in medicine made heart surgery possible: The heart-lung machine, which takes over the work of the heart. Body cooling techniques, which allow more time for surgery without causing brain damage. What is a heart-lung machine? Perfusion technologists operate the heart-lung machine during surgery. The heart-lung machine is also called a cardiopulmonary bypass machine. It takes over for the heart by replacing the heart's pumping action and by adding oxygen to the blood. This means that the heart will be still for the operation, which is necessary when the heart has to be opened (open heart surgery). When you are connected to the heart", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGKM7G": "You should ask a specialist, not on Yahoo answers!", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN517SC": "I'm 15 and have always been at a 'healthy weight' but towards the upper end of it which made me feel uncomfortable. Try this: Exercises (at home): - walking/jogging - short sprints - sittups/crunches - leg lifts - 6 inches (where you lay on the floor, barely raise your feet off (6 inches) and hold it) - squats - reps with small weights (arms) - yoga/workout videos Eating: - try to eat A LOT of fruits, veggies, and whole grains - cut out or SERIOUSLY LIMIT soda and sugary drinks - try eating more, considerably smaller meals a day (doctors say that's healthiest) By doing this I've dropped from 122-123 to 116-117. (I'm only 4'11quot. to 5'0quot. and my goal is 110 or a bit more, no more than 113) -good luck.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EZH2M": "Amenorrhoea is the absence or abnormal stoppage of menstruation. It can be of a primary or secondary nature. It can be due to normal physiological reasons like pregnancy, breast feeding or menopause. Infact, the commonest cause of physiological amenorrhoea is pregnancy. The abnormal (pathological) causes are:  Girls who have attained the age of 16 years and still not started getting their periods are said to have primary amenorrhoea. Secondary amenorrhoea occurs when a woman who was having normal periods suddenly stops menstruating for more than 6 months. It can be due to a hormonal imbalance or a developmental problem. Stress, severe dieting, increased levels of exercise or chronic illness could also add to the problem. Most often women do not give importance to this but it needs to be dealt with more cautiously as it may be a sign of an underlying problem- imbalance in the production of reproductive hormones or even uterine cancers.", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8JLTN": "Did you know...  Hemorrhoids are one of the most common ailments known.", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDT6TZ": "LeapFrog Count And Draw Numbers Rs.1124  FlipKart Deal: LeapFrog Count And Draw Numbers Rs.1124  FlipKart Deal.... http://t.co/a60GEXelLV", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKTARBV": "bright red in the beginning....it should look fresh (without sounding gross)  as your period comes to the end...it should look a little darker...the blood is older and has been exposed to more oxegen. rest assured that both are normal", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H783V7": "Dana-Farber Cancer Institute CLICK ON THE GREEN BUTTON!You can donate online with a credit card. Need to get rid of an old car?", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXQIBH": "It's a known and commona92 symptom of gingivitis. You should get a dental check up asap. Gingivitis without treatment can lead to further problems. Your dentist can help you to prevent it from becoming worse by teaching you proper hygiene. If your gums are bleeding, but you have no bone loss this is called gingivitis. But you have to do your part too by maintaining immaculate dental hygiene. There is a difference, as I explained, between gingivitis and periodontal disease. ''There could be quite obvious gum inflammation in pill takers who neglect dental hygiene,'' warns Mena Soory, a periodontology expert at the Guy's, King's and St. Thomas Dental Institute in London. Gingivitis was 32 percent more common in these women than in the control group of 39 women who did not take the pill. ''It would take a very long time to get appreciable disease,'' says Soory. She recommends strict dental hygiene for pill users. ''Maintain regular dental check-ups and increase hygiene at home,'' sh...", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTIFSM": "I never really found myself able to enjoy One Piece tbh.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMSKD2": "Hey my name is Tom and im 18 and i have the same EXACT problem. It wasnt till my senior year i told my mom. I asked her if i could do online school or home school like everyday of my junior year summer. I couldnt take another year of highschool. My mom thought i was being lazy and didnt want to go to school. So when the first day of my senior year came i decided to go to see if i would be able to survive the year. So I called my dad and told him I had social anxiety disorder and he talked to my mom and they made an appointment for a therapist. I have had social anxiey disorder since 4th or 5th grade but. I guess I was embarassed or something and I used to hate reading about social anxiety disorder just knowing that i have that problem bothered me. I also would like to go to college but dont think i can handle it. I take zoloft now and i feel alittle better now but i still have some of the fears. I read the only way to help cure the social anxiety is by facing your anxietys. I wish you good luck.", "3ZICQFRS31G00M9IL4HEJ10EKDGZZ3": "you're very pretty, and have a nice skin tone and by the way, you aren't chubby, you're average. the dresses you shouldn't wear are ones that go out at the waist, stick to petite little outfits and soft colours to bring out your olive tone. you should wear purple eyeshadow to bring out your eyes, and wear gold eyeliner, not black or a dark colour. curl your hair to create a summery effect, and wear it down, hair always looks nicer down rather than up.. for accessories such as necklaces and bracelets, look at FREEDOM  Topshop or ASOS they do wicked necklaces and rings, some are alice in wonderland themed too to fit in with the new movie keep make up minimal, as it is summer, leave your skin out and if you're worried about spots, forget it because the sun will take them away:) just a bit of eyemake up - waterguard mascara, bright eyeliner and some eye shadow will do. a brush of lipgloss - light pink will look lovely on you. for some wedges to match dresses: http://www.office.co.uk/wo...", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZOFGPA": "First off , I have the HTC EVO View tablet with Sprint which requires a monthly data plan . It is not that expensive , so I thought I 'd dive into the tablet craze and get one . I had an iPad , but hated using iTunes . In addition , I hated the small memory , and the lack of a micro sd card slot in the iPad .", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDH07H": "You need to revamp your entire system, visit this website and just read about the products. http://www.m2cglobal.com/inchesoff  First - a person can NOT feel nauseous'', because that word means causing nausea''.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWZ1WQ": "Kirsten is one of more than one million Britons who suffer from atrial fibrillation ( AF ) , the most common type of abnormal heart rhythm . Patients experience bursts of rapid , irregular heartbeat , leading to unpleasant symptoms including palpitations , light-headedness and breathlessness . For years dismissed as 'a funny turn ' and a normal part of ageing , doctors now recognise that atrial fibrillation not only affects people of all ages , but doubles the risk of premature death through heart failure and triggers one in three strokes .", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JTHOQ": "For instance , I modified a measure of astral projection , though it appears I 'd also had some help from Zen Buddhism , not to mention that my unique connection to the realms of Oblivion . I had no idea , of course . I could n't . Not when you consider my physical limitations ' ,  What limitations ? '' asked Harry , he collapsed back onto his bed and stared out his now barless window . It was easier than trying to speak at someone who was n't there .", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB5YP8Z": "my kitten had a broken leg herself and i had to get a pin put in,dont worry im sure your cat was older than my 5 week babygirl, and e pulled through, so you have nothing to worry about", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDI07I": "Panic attacks are not fun, I have a few of them last year and they scared the heck out of me!", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWMTAF": "It hurts like crazy, but it ends. Your pain ends when the procedure is over. The pain for the other person has lasted longer and probably is not over. I hope that helps.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2Q0O6": "First you have to show him that you are the leader of the pack and show no fear when he growls and bites at you, he is going to get bigger and know how to dominate you. You have to show him from the start that you are the boss. I keep my pup on a leash at all times when in the house to keep an eye on him and teach him manners. Put him in time out when he acts up, show him that you will not put up with anything. Puppy classes would also be a good option. I use the Nothing In Life is Free Method, you could do a search on that on the interent. Here is a website that is for rottweiler owners there is a forum there to talk to other rotti owners to ask them for help and techniques http://www.rottweiler.net/forums/ I copied and pasted what I found on a website about Nothing in Life is Free for you: Nothing In Life is Free: Does your dog get on the furniture and refuse to get off? Nudge your hand and insist on being petted or played with? Refuse to come when called? Defend his food bowl or toy", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEF646": "First, congratulate yourself. Just reading this article is a huge step toward becoming tobacco free. Many people don't quit smoking because they think it's too hard to do. They think they'll quit someday.Its true, for most people quitting isn't easy. After all, the nicotine in cigarettes is a powerfully addictive drug. But with the right approach, you can overcome the cravings.The Difficulty in Kicking the HabitSmokers may have started smoking because their friends did or because it seemed cool. But they keep on smoking because they became addicted to nicotine, one of the chemicals in cigarettes and smokeless tobacco. Nicotine is both a stimulant and a depressant. That means nicotine increases the heart rate at first and makes people feel more alert (like caffeine, another stimulant). Then it causes depression and fatigue. The depression and fatigue  and the drug withdrawal from nicotine  make people crave another cigarette to perk up again. According to many experts, the ...", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM3D26": "You are at very high risk for STD transmission. I highly recommend forcing your skank of a sister to move out.", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R6LI9": "TIP  Pets: Guinea Pig: Guinea Pig The Champion Recycler is an Ideal Pet for Children description of the guinea  http://t.co/MS9ktKK55T", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26U0Z9": "Games keep your dog alert and energetic.They give your dog a chance to play and have fun.Games give you and your dog a chance to be together.", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5C6OD": "But before I got all in my feelings tragic mulatto style I revisited the names and dates in my family tree and realized these results gave me a deeper connection to those distant relatives and proof of our relation. Before I had this information, I connected with a cousin of mine whose grandfather is my grandfathers brother and he told me there was a book written about our family titled The Forgotten People: Cane Rivers Creoles of Color . The book tells the story of Marie ThrsediteCoincoin, a woman who is said to be the daughter of two slaves, presumably from the Ewe tribe of Togo. Marie, a slave, had four children with a slave from theNatchitoches Native American tribe in Louisiana, but was chosen to be the concubine of a French man namedClaude Thomas Pierre Mtoyer, with whom she had several children and who eventually freed her.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AMACD": "Schutte Schutte is a Dutch occupational surname derived from 'schutter', meaning 'archer'. The North German form of the name is Schtte or Schuette. McAuley (surname) Macaulay, McAuley, MacAuley, and Macauley are surnames in the English language. In the United States of America, the surnames are not very common, and 'McAuley' is a much more common surname than 'MacAuley' and 'Macauley' combined. The Gaelic surnames originated as a patronyms, however they no longer refer to the actual names of the bearer's father's. The surnames originated as a patronyms, however they no longer refer to the actual name of the bearer's father. None of the surnames ranked amongst the most common surnames recorded in Scotland, in the United Kingdom Census 1901. McCauley (surname) McCauley and MacCauley are surnames in the English language, that are borne by both males and females. Neither surname ranked amongst the most common surnames recorded in Scotland, in the United Kingdom Census 1901.", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBLY1IG": "Louie is basically correct. Write and the write some more and again write some more.Clearly there are dos and don'ts and you will find any number of experts who will lean one way and others who will lean another, telling you to use this technique or that technique and all of it is informative and interesting, but it only works if you write.The primary thing to remember is that you are telling a story. Would anyone want to listen to the story the way you are telling it? Can you keep them involved with your style of telling a story until the end?When they lay the book down, what will remain with them. Are the characters real in their mind or are they mere wisps of smoke with no substance? Is the world the characters move through a stage upon which they act or is it something tangible, that can be seen, felt, smelt, all within the mind? When one character interacts with another, do the readers hearts race, do they sweat, do they tense up, do they figuratively swoon with p...", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMT8UH": "Stay away from him, you are only hurting yourself....so you had a good sex life big deal....you are just wanting what you cant have right now and that is it. Does his live in know that you two are doing this? That makes you the other woman,,,,, stay away as far away as possible. This is dangerous to your sanity. You won't ever find a another boyfriend with this going on. He is holding on to you for what ever his sic reason is and you are doing the same. Cut the ties. You say you don't love him that why the sex at all. There are other ways you know . You are hurting yourself by not moving on as he already has....", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8HLTL": "It is like two vegetables making out as described by a botanical scientist!", "3JAOYN9IHL0YU0VWFQRWBZQKQNG33B": "For a better experience, please enable JavaScript or upgrade your browser . All regions, United Kingdom The RSC is looking for boys and girls to play Matlida, Bruce, Lavender Casting complete. Applications are now closed. Share Email verified We review all castings Learn more The Royal Shakespeare Company is looking for boys and girls to play Matlida, Bruce, Lavender and their classmates for its production of Matilda The Musical at Cambridge Theatre, London. There is lots of singing involved, as well as acting and even more dancing! - The children must be between the ages of 8 and 13, and must be under 5' tall. - Boys must have unbroken voices - All children must live with the M25, as we would like then to live at home and attend their own schools - However, for the role of MATILDA only we welcome children from further afield. - The RSC assist with accommodation and tutoring where nessessary. - For the role of Matilda, children must be under 4ft3'.", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S6QCY": "it depends on what game(s) you want to play There is no one answer to your question. It's entirely dependent upon what game(s) you want to play on the Wii. Every game will show on its box what kind(s) of controllers are used in the game. IN GENERAL, you will need one Wiimote for each player who wants to play the game. Depending on the game, you may also need one nunchuck for each player. I do not believe any game REQUIRES the classic controlers - they are alternatives to the Wiimote/Nunchuck combination. Here are a few examples from the games that I currently own: nbsp. WiiSports - Tennis, Golf, and Baseball require 1 Wiimote per person. Bowling requires only 1 Wiimote (all players can share). Boxing requires 1 Wiimote and 1 Nunchuck per person Super Monkey Ball - requires 1 Wiimote per person. Some of the extra mini-games also require 1 Nunchuck per person Mario Party 8 - requires 1 Wiimote per person.", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE13PI7": "Here's an answer to your question and some other information you may find useful. Average Life Span:  10-13 years   Average Weight:  Male 110 pounds, Females 90 pounds   Color And Coat:  Coarse flat coat, black in color with rust markings on cheeks, muzzle, chest, legs, above eyes and under the tail. Typical Health Problems:  Rottweilers are generally healthy. The more frequent health problems found in the breed are: hip displaysia, rupture of cranial cruciate ligament, cancer, heart disease, enthropia eye conditions. Owner Level:  For experienced involved dog owners   Personality:  Rottweilers are a German breed so they tend to be of a serious nature. The ideal Rottweiler is quiet, even-tempered, obedient, easy to train, faithful and brave. This breed should show a strong understanding of what is right and wrong if trained and guided by a responsible and involved owner. This is a physically strong breed that will leap to the defense of the ones they love. For this reason train", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQZNLQ": "Ur gonna have to see a doctor... It's some type of urine infections and you cannot get rid of those on your won. Try a free clinic if you're worried about cost. Try drinking cranberry joice in the future to help prevent these. Opinion 2: Sounds like a problem. Wait 2-3 days and if it still hurts go to the doc. Something has irritated your pee hole and it may clear up on its own but be prepared to go see the doctor. Good Luck! Opinion 3: It is not a sign of your period. It's likely that you have a UTI (Urinary Tract Infection). So basically, the tube which connects your bladder to your urethra is inflamed and that's why it hurts when you try and pee, and it's also why you feel very sick (infections always cause us to feel miserable and ill). UTI's can occur as a result of having sex for the first few times, because basically, your urethra isn't used to having so much bacteria lodged up there (meaning, bacteria from your boyfriend). I got two UTI's during the first month I was having", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ5TCF": "Failure to correctly identify explicit content may result in your album being removed from one or more of our partner stores after it has been delivered. Compound Artist: Only one performing artist name should be listed per artist name field. Having two or more performing artists listed in the same artist name field impairs an album's ability to appear correctly in search results as well as how it will display within our digital partners' stores. When signing-up your album, use the 'additional artist' icon to add more artist fields to correctly enter each performing artist separately as a primary artist. This does not apply to a group, which can be entered in its entirety in the same artist field (i.e., Brooks  Dunn, Chris Robley  the Fear of Heights, etc). Group names do not have to be separated into their own artist field. Featuring Artists: If there are featuring artists on your album, they must be properly identified when you enter your album information during sign-up.", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFLWTP": "200kgs ' Those who stripped that Lady Must be Tout a Lesson.'", "31GECDVA9JKWO25WHUNSP5EOA5J66P": "Gotta have both and I do. But I have to admit that my husband doesn't: Scratch up the furniture. Eat the friendly chipmunks:-( Miss the litter box and get pee all over the floor. Leave cat hair all over my clothes. Refuse dinner because it's just not right! Run up and down the stairs at 4 am in the morning. Balance on the backs of chairs to watch the birdies at the feeder. Shred the brand new toilet paper roll! Walk all over the table.", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX2HG3": "I have an 11 and 14 year old. When they went to public school, bed was at 8:30.. now that I home school? Bed is still at 8:30. Sleep is actually very good for the brain. On fridays and saturdays its 10:30. But, I do sometimes make allowances for my 14 year old. He is VERY responsible for his age and gets up at 6am sharp to do his chores and take care of his pets. So sometimes I will give him an additional 1-2 hours over. His sister will probably never obtain that.. even if she drops off exactly at 8, she still fights getting up in the morning until 9. You should respect your parents in this..they arent being bad parents, just unreasonable. Maybe if you got up early and cleaned your room, took a shower, got ready and had breakfast all before they get up for awhile to prove to them that yes you are more than capable of handling less sleep? As well as maintain good grades? they may reevaluate their decisions. Keep a journal of times you accomplished each task and ask them to please con...", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IFZ34": "Tears in Heaven...Eric ClaptonI guess because it's about the death of his young son, which addresses one of my greatest fears--losing the true love of my life, my daughter...I imagine the pain he went through dealing with his son's death, and admire that he is able to deal with it by writing this song. I can't even write about the darn song without crying! These are definitely sad tears... It's even worse for me right now, I suppose, knowing that a good friend of mine just last week lost her daughter and son in law in an tragic car accident--and then today my daughters boyfriend totaled his car (he is ok, and she wasn't with him, thank God!). You just never know when things might happen...ok, this is TOO depressing! But it's a beautiful song, anyway...  Tears In Heaven by Eric Clapton and Will Jennings Would you know my name If I saw you in heaven? Would it be the same If I saw you in heaven? I must be strong And carry on, 'Cause I know I don't belong Here in heaven.", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZOCPGG": "Your question is anachronistic. 'Spain' did not exist in the medieval period. There were many kingdoms and multiple monarchs. Spain as a nation began to come into its modern form with the union of Ferdinand and Isabella, king of Aragon and Queen of Castile. When they married both monarchs controlled much of what is now Spain, with the exception of Portugal and the Moorish Kingdom of Granada. Continental Spain would take its modern shape when those monarchs completed the Reconquista and captured the last Moorish kingdom in 1492.I do not believe there was ever a monarch in Iberia with the name Casiano. My favorite royal name comes from a Visogothic king: Wamba. Casiano sounds more like a surname than a given name anyways. Some monarch may have held that surname, but before the 17th and 18th c surnames did not necessarily pass down paternally, or as they do now in Spanish countries paternally and maternally, ie Juan Delgado Sanchez (Delgado: father's surname) (Sanchez: Mother's ...", "3L2OEKSTW98LB0YQGSFISAU8FA28YD": "What do u call crystal clear urine? 1080pee nice one my Alaskan brotha ??", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N7SVO": "Narrator can assist a blind person in installing a full-function screen reader, assisting the user until his/her screen reader of choice is up and running. As well, because Narrator is a lightweight screen reader that requires minimal 'hooks' into the operating system, Narrator can provide speech when a full-function screen reader might be unable to do so, such as during the process of updating hardware drivers. The Windows 2000 version of Narrator uses SAPI 4 and allows the use of other SAPI 4 voices.", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3F3S3": "Some suggestions:The Lewis and Clark Expedition (See National Geographic)Some saints were bornUSA buys Louisiana from FranceSlavery is abolished in Denmark The Maratha war in India startsOhio is USA's 17th stateBerlioz is born", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMU8UI": "I have a 14yr. Old Shih tzu and two westie-shih tzu mix 4 yr. olds. We have used First shield trio for years and have had nothing but rave reviews 0 1 Reply Anonymous Aug 05, 2014 852064 Anonymous: I've been using first shield trio on my 11 yr old dog for the past 4 years and had no issues whatsoever! She has no fleas or ticks while using this product. I ve been using first shield FOR CATS for two years since I adopted my cat? The only issue with it is it makes her fur a little greasy and flaky for two days. I then brush it and it's like nothing was applied. Every pet is different. Who knows why some dogs have had horrible reactions to first shield trio and other s do fine. Applying ANY topical flea treatment carries a risk? Sorry to everyone who had a bad experience with the product, but this doesn't mean it should be taken off the shelves. My friend's one yr old corgi just suffered a chemical burn from the pet amour plus she bought and it is marketed as a cost efficient alternative", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179D5FD": "i think we're great )", "3RZS0FBRWK8TEPW26HZ4H5XF1WMPC8": "All of my cats have gotten fixed, and while all initially were a little sensitive for a time after the surgery, all bounced back to their original sweet personalities. She is more likely to change if you DON'T get her fixed, when she starts going into heat all the time or gets pregnant and has all those horomones running around her body. If you have concerns call your vet, or your local humane society, they will know better than anyone the advantages of spaying your Pixie!", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWLTAE": "( you want the length of hose under the tank , ) Adjust the grommet to a height that will allow the undergravel plates to lie flush with the tank bottom . of the hose until it reaches the underside bottom of tank . Pull it back slightly and place silicone glue onto the glass where the grommet will sit .", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BF95M": "if you were chosen to have have free surgery on anyth...  My Boobs........ smaller then I would want to lose th... http://t.co/fdfGrUhwJy", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TFYGJ": "Kennels and coughs. Almost every dog owner has heard of kennel cough, which causes severe coughing... http://t.co/2ZC9tBxUvY", "3R0WOCG21M7GBMACNZT9BH2WUDMUD5": "Please try again later . I was amazed with it from the very first time I used it , and no longer have to refer to my Machinist Handbook for drill sizes for tapping , or sitting down and figuring out bolt patterns for flanges , just a few clicks and all the X 's and O 's are there for me .", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV2ZD0": "insideARM believes that is flawed thinking . on the increased CFPB focus on healthcare debt . We also reported on the CFPB enforcement action against , a healthcare collection agency . This case continues that trend . Second , this is appears to be a case where the CFPB investigation showed that representations made to consumers were inconsistent with written materials ( the actual loan documents ) AND that staff was either improperly trained or trained in such a way to intentionally mislead a consumer , a clear UDAAP violation .", "3YZ7A3YHR5R5SW3FJOGQY4WGWZ5S5H": "i jus got the ab lounge and if u do it slowly and do a lot of reps u can actually feel the burn...but u need to have a regular schedule in order to get rid of love handles...im not exactly sure about losing weight though.", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA80TT": "You are kind of putting the cart before the horse here. No need to worry about how to stud until your dog is a Ch. dog with clear health  temperament tests. Once you are to that point, you should be working with a mentor who will help you along further. Most people lose money when breeding, barely break even, or make a minimal amount of money. Maybe enough for a nice dinner - not wnough to buy a new house or anything. I have serious reservations with your family in general. You own numerous wild animals and it seems you have a facination with animals, but a limited amount of ethics to go with that fascination. Having seen capuchin and spider monkey breeders up close and knowing how detrimental they are to the species, it's hard for me to understand people like you. I guess if you follow the show  advancing the breed path, it's a step in the right direction in your morality journey.", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW87G14": "Hope you feel better soon. I know what it's like to have to care for others when you should be taken care of yourself. You must get some rest, though, so if you have any help or offers for help- use them. Good luck to you Misty Blue 3 years ago I have experienced waking from surgery feeling great, alert, relaxed and calm. When waking from anaesthesia two out of three of my last surgeries I experienced none of the above. One was a day surgery. Dis ease then uncontrollable shaking. Returned to hospital. Maxeran was suspected to be the cause. Given Ativan and antihistamine. Second experience was when coming out of anaesthesia. Shakes, spasms (jerking arms and legs), put on antihystamine I. Anaesthsitist was called. He said not an allergic reaction. Another surgery in a month and making sure all know my concerns. Please, anything you might add to what I have experienced would be appreciated. TahoeDoc 3 years ago from Lake Tahoe, California Hub Author Hi Misty.", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13KR7A": "Hi Dave,   Well a morning erection is actually due to physiology. First and foremost you must understand the system that controls erections. Erections (among other things such as pupilary dilation/constriction, heart rate, sweating etc) are controlled by a special aspect of the nervous system called Autonomic Nervous System (ANS). This is an autonomous system which does not require the brain for basic function (however the brain does have some oversight and minor control up to a point). Thus you could say that the ANS is responsible for regulation of our organs and glands and this occurs unconsciously. The ANS is divided into 2 different and opposing parts: Sympathetic Nervous System (SNS) , Parasympathetic Nervous System (PNS) in which together (SNS and PNS) are used to maintain homeostasis. For those that do not know this term, homeostasis simply means the ability of a system to maintain a constant condition or balance if you wish through regulation of its environment. As", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEJG2J": "nullHe went from being a shy kid, to a ruthless (as they say) young man who made many enemies. As he was coming into himself in his late 30's he not only became aware of the poor and hungry in this country, he spoke up for them, challenging medical students for instance to search their own consciences--do they just want tomake money, or do they really care about improving the health and life expentancy of children. It seems like he 'softened' as he neared 40, the meaness left and he cared more. But his softening actually seemd to make him and his convictions stronger. Not perfect, but a better human being. Imagine some of these spoiled, famous, rich young adults who have never done a thing to contribute to their family's wealth other than to live off it. For all of the Kennedy's many, many faults, Bobby followed a family adage, 'to whom much is given, much is expected.' This is nothing new, but he was taken way to young.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GTJ5T": "If your cycles are irregular but you have a period every month or so (21-40 days), it's not usually a problem. If you skip whole months (cycles are often 50 days or longer), you may have reduced fertility. It may still be possible to get pregnant, but it could take longer and you may need medical help.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHT0VLE": "Normal periods are 54 minutes long. (Also, it's really 7 class periods -- '5th period' is lunch.)", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDN3FM": "oooh I'm bringing my pillow pet on the bus. It's happening ?", "37YYO3NWHDOAK0NY1CDYX5Y82D5CCF": "i think 20 and actually i heard that when you turn twelve it is the best age to know if a child is going to be overweight or what. i was also in the same situation before and still am. teenage yrs are awkward my younger brother at your age was a little husky but in a matter of one yr shot up to be almost 6' tall and average weight i see this in alot of young men.", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V9N6H": "Dog to dog desensitization exercises. It is important with desensitization to always start small and never push the dog over his threshold. The goal is to teach Sephy alternate behaviors and to help him re-associate a previously bad stimulus with something positive. Calm energy Sephy is very sensitive to the energy of the people around him. If he senses that I am worried, stressed, frustrated, or otherwise not-calm he will pick up on that, get stressed himself, and that will trigger his reactive behavior. With Sephy, I try to stay very calm at all times, and I always have a plan of action so that I can be decisive and stop things before they escalate. Clear dog-to-dog interaction rules at home. I set up clear dog-to-dog interaction rules. If there is a new dog, I slowly teach him those rules so that he understands what is expected of him and what he can expect from me and my other dogs. I do not let my dogs correct each other or work it out for themselves.", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8OC5GB": "She is currently at Queen Margaret College, Wellington, New Zealand and is taking the International Baccalaureate course offered there. National Law College, Nepal National Law College (NaLC) is one of the undergraduate and graduate law school of Tribhuvan University in Lalitpur, Nepal. The school offers a five year B.A. LL.B program at undergraduate level and a two year LL.M course at graduate level. The college uses a yearly evaluation method. The first year course consists of eight compulsory courses with 125 hours of classes for each subject. The first three years of the course consist of law and social science subjects. Starting in the third year, all the courses are legal subjects. Three seminar courses will be offered by professors in the third, fourth and fifth year. The LL.M course runs for two years and has three compulsory subjects. The students choose at least two of the six optional courses that have been provided.", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGRD1R": "There are separate articles for the overall history of the Earth and the history of life before humans. Vere Gordon Childe then describes an 'Agricultural Revolution' occurring about the 10th millennium BCE with the adoption of agriculture and domestication of plants and animals. As late as 2004, entire cities were still being unearthed. I am not sure if this answers your question, but if your are referring to the 'agricultural' revolutions, a term used by 20th century historians, then here it goes: the first agricultural revolution took place 10,000 years ago. The second agricultural revolution took place from 1750-1850 and is concurrent with and the force behind the first industrial revolution. The is/was a green revolution. Until the early nineties, the prevailing view of the human revolution was notably Eurocentric, focused on the Upper Palaeolithic Revolution as humanitys Great Leap Forward. The human revolution occurred as part of modern human speciation in Afri...", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2ET1P": "First off, it is very important to see a trained medical professional because people on the internet cannot properly diagnose nor prescribe you treatments for your issues. I CONSTANTLY worried my boyfriend would leave me. I would have most likely picked a fight with my boyfriend and I was on a terror mission and then I would come back, say sorry, and not understand why he was still upset. The one I still have nightmares about was when I cut up my wrists and sat in the bath tub, bleeding to death before my boyfriend found me. If someone said something a little off to me, I would go 90 to nothing in a second. I broke up with my boyfriend a lot, I walked away from a lot of friends, and quit a lot of jobs. In one of my fits of rage, I ripped up all my boyfriend's clothes, set fire to other valuables, and then tried to turn the knife on him. I'd cheat on my boyfriend with people I may or may not have known. I'd make excuses not to seek help but hated not being able to move. I knew I needed help.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q12DYR": "My life  Anxiety attack, pain, take medicine to take away anxiety, have an anxiety attack after swallowing pill because I honestly believe", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSFQUA": "You are definitely not insane. Probably just bored like me. Yes, you CAN stop!", "3SMIWMMK613FKSA34UYZ35RH1TSWUG": "Well First let me say ' DAMN'! I Fabricate my own line of Dance poles here in Georgia, I also teach lap dance lesson, shadow box and beginning Pole dance class's. ( www.hardcorepoles.com) I also am a parent of an 15 year old girl and 17 year old boy. My children are very active and my son goes to the Gym 5 days a week more if he could. My daughter is very active but does not go to the gym. When my daughter was smaller between the ages of 9-13 she was a cheerleader and did strenuous workouts at a CHEER-GYM, because that was what she was conditioning her body for, my question is what are these children conditioning their bodies for at this age? I do believe that there are other forms of aerobics and dance class's for children of that age to attend. But who are we to judge what another parent wishes for his/her children to do as form of exercise, At least the parent is not sitting back and letting there children become obese which is real problem in the age range of the children that th...", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VTBS3": "i dont know ! i just want to find an answer so my boyfriend and i can have some sence of relief if it isnt something that i was born with , etc..   few weeks ago i masterbated and felt sick afterwards , like dizzy weak , lightheaded , heart was beating very fast , fekt very hot inside , what do you think it was , i do get panic attacks sometimes , could i have had that , what was it I am now 47 , condition started after abstaining from sex for 3 years at age of 34 .", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI3HF5": "Well if you're not prepared to offer a lot of exercise then don't get a dog, that's for sure. They need exercise and outdoor play a lot more than 'once in a while'. Try an hour or more PER DAY, and that's for smaller dogs with lower energy levels. Anything larger or high energy (hounds, herding dogs, terriers) need double that or more. They also need regular socialization - that means going out to introduce the animal to different situations, people, and dogs/animals so they know how to behave and socialize. Otherwise you wind up with a neurotic mess that will more than likely need to be PTS because it bit the mailman or next door neighbors kid. It's cruel to contain a dog indoors 24/7. And to deny proper socialization or exercise. Even tiny toy breeds need it. If they don't get it, that's when you get highly destructive and aggressive animals that are NO JOY to live with. In addition to regular exercise and socialization, dogs do need to be paid attention to. Most will not be happy...", "3SV8KD29L4Q5BRAWL3E4WMC1G41KZ0": "WHY not! Please call David Blain!!", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACEBJL": "that was over 15 years ago though.good luck.Helpful?", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNZHXW": "Its bad to cut yourself in general. Please dont do it. It will hurt the people that love you.", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V014DV": "Males get just as emotional as females but they tend to hide it. Females get emotional and show it, they don't hold it in and pretend like it's nothing because they have no reason to. Society tends to stereotype people more than teenagers do. An emotional affair can develop real love between the two people-- passionate, romantic love not platonic, friendly love. If you find you suddenly wish you were not married because you want to be with this person, that is an emotional affair. In other words it is a lack of empathy. When one lacks the ability to 'put himself into the shoes of someone else' it certainly suffers from emotional detachment. Many emotional and mental disorders can be fixed within ourselves by ourselves. I would strongly encourage you to look at the wheel and see that most everything a batterer does is emotional abuse a batterer may only use physical or sexual violence when the emotional, verbal, and economic abuse doesn't work.", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9DGND": "Well, just trying to find some info. My mom has had a Tracheostomy for 4 years or so because her oxygen levels were always low so now she's able to breathe better but she's interested in smoking marijuana to relieve her physical pain instead of using prescribed painkillers because our family has a history with addictions. I just want to make sure it'd be Ok for her to smoke through a pipe or cigar wrap. And before I get 'it's a drug' comments, we live in California and medical marijuana is OK. I just want to make sure it won't cause any harm to her or her Tracheostomy.", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR1FR0": "if they are no declawed alot of farmers will take them in. My motherinlaw is a crazy cat lady in a way. she always has about 7 or 8 of them at a time. they are all out doors. this cut on mice and other critters getting into the out buildings. She tries to get them all spayed or nueters but that doesnt always happen since it does cost alot to do that. alot of the times the kittens they have dont survive since they are outdoors and other animals can get to them. alot of the younger cats didnt make it through our harsh winter. She however will not take hte stray cat that has taken a liking ot puking on our weelcome mat and pooping in our bush. it reaks now. IT declawed and thats why she wont take. they need claws to survive. Another place you could take them too is a animal shelter that is in another town. SheweeGirl 90 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message.", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQYLNN": "The corn head is used to PICK corn. not the pickups that city slickers call 'trucks'.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHVXTN": "Cant seem to get rid of this fist shaped bruise on my leg. Thanks", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WRPUG": "Yep, I even had white clouds in it.", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TA92Y3": "It would've been 4 minutes.. But it didn't draw blood.", "35JDMRECC472YANHZPFCDKJQLH9GEL": "How to lose belly fat is a question that gains popularity day by day. There many reasons as to why people want to lose belly fat. First of all the absence of fat in the belly creates a better appearance and this makes people look better but most importantly feel better. The truth is that losing belly fat is not the easiest thing to do but it is not impossible either. Follow our guide on how to lose belly fat, browse through our articles and enjoy your new self. The belly is one of the areas, especially for women, that tends to attract more fat and as a result the bulging belly is formed. Step 4: Which foods can help you lose belly fat? To consume foods that burn belly fat, an understanding of food is essential. Examples of the best foods for losing belly fat are: fruits and vegetables, legumes, dark chocolate, nuts and whole grains. Above all, to lose belly fat you need determination,. Our team includes certified fitness experts and dietitians and they are here to help you succeed.", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPC0RH": "Depends if he's a weakling. I know many people who are heavier.. And are so weak. This fat guy i no, he weighs 300lbs. he claims that he trains weights everyday... Yet when me and my bf got him to bench 40KG (which is about the same weight as a 10 year old) he couldn't do it. Was too weak... Everybody's different. Some people are weasels", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2AMCAF": "i know that you should take pill all days for 21 days in 28 days cycle not just for 2 days ...and also you can use condom also for better protection caz if you don't take pill regullary you maybe become pregnant.so you can wait untill your period if you miss it do test the day after it but if you don't miss take pill regullary from next month you can ask your doctor about the pill also...and about bleeding i read about it that maybe there is no bleeding even in first sex but maybe you didnt do it completely......... (I, I) I wish I didnt love you (oh ooh ooooh) Like I do (I, I) I aint mad at you Sometimes I wish I didnt love you (I, I) but Im glad I do (I, I) I aint mad at you Sometimes I wish I didnt love you but Im glad I do No noooo ohhh IIIII Right/Wrong for what? If you dont want to remain pregnant, the safest days are up to 7 days after the bleeding started.", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6NTVG": "Discount On Klor-Con. If You Don't Have Insurance,This Card Can Save You Money on Your Prescriptions http://t.co/8ducvBZs", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6UQ65": "The Summer Prince by Alaya Dawn Johnson  BOOM, ALREADY FINISHED. But since it fit nicely into the picture anyways, Im listing it. Always a nice feeling to add something to your list just so you can cross it off. Modern Romance by Aziz Ansari  Listening to the audiobook on Scribd. He has a very distinctive voice, so Im pretty sure this is a good choice. Its a LITTLE weird to be listening to a book about technology/romance but also reading a book about rape, but I think the different formats may help keep them separate in my head. (I also recently bought Come As You Are by Emily Nagoski which is about female sexuality and stuff after starting Missoula, Im thinking thats going to wait a bit. ) COMICS Black Widow volume 2 Manifest Destiny volume 2 East of West volume 4 Postal volume 1 Plus a million other things because Im so behind. This week was supposed to be a big reading and blogging week, almost like my own private readathon.", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPILPTQ": "Scar Scars are areas of fibrous tissue (fibrosis) that replace normal skin after injury. A scar results from the biological process of wound repair in the skin and other tissues of the body. Thus, scarring is a natural part of the healing process.", "35O6H0UNLSECTTKPWU7C635T0GVJ5V": "But it makes it more fun i think. My family has a theory that they give each writer a charcter and set them in different rooms and tell them to write a story or plot about them and then they combine them all for the show. You can write about anything you find interesting and worthwhile telling about. As you do that try to describe what the story was about, what captivated your attention and think of ways you would change the story to make a different version or perhaps became a character in that story. If you must write an essay then first sketch an outline shaping the conflict, beginning, the end and the conclusion. When you do that keep the reader in mind by providing a logical (sequential) development of ideas. Do you have a story in mind before you take the pictures, or do you take the pictures and then write the story? Once I have pictures telling the story I start writing in sequence, which is dictated by the pictures. I let the pictures tell me the story.", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVTSQV": "If you go to a shelter, they will take back a cat that yours doesn't like.", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6EHR0": "You can cut firewood whenever you like..I prefer winter but that does not mean it to be the best time for you, just the best time to get to where our wood is located (no mud)...we cut the wood and allow it to sit a year to dry, then split it. In the fall I give them a hard pruning because by the time the rain starts and stops in Missouri they are already another foot tall. I have a fence row 180' long I just let them grow now to keep from looking at the junk in my neighbors yard. I don't want to kill myself this year, but the thoughts get so bad, and the urges are getting worse. Is it worth goon back to the hospital or is that just a waste of their time and I just I don't know. If you have tall grass (5') tie the grass with jute twine to keep it neat during the winter. Then in spring it will be easier to cut. When you cut it back in early March or late February, you want to cut it back to about 12 inches.", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CRZDOC": "Osteitis pubis was first described in patients who had undergone suprapubic surgery, and it remains a well-known complication of invasive procedures about the pelvis. Their pain improved by 82. The hormone usually disappears after childbirth and the ligaments become strong again. Symptoms include one or more of the following: pain in the pubic area, hips, lower back, and thighs. Osteitis pubis can also be associated with pelvic girdle pain. Pelvic congestion syndrome Pelvic congestion syndrome (also known as pelvic vein incompetence) is a chronic medical condition in women caused by varicose veins in the lower abdomen. Women with pelvic congestion syndrome have a larger uterus and a thicker endometrium. 56 of women manifest cystic changes to the ovaries, and many report other symptoms, such as dysmenorrhea, back pain, vaginal discharge, abdominal bloating, mood swings or depression, and fatigue. The condition can also be diagnosed with a venogram, CT scan, or an MRI.", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOET7M": "You should drink cold water because cocoa and tea will dehydrate you and your period will last longer. To ease your cramps try doing some small crunches and back bends. Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen or naproxen slow the production of prostaglandins and generally help ease cramps better than aspirin or acetaminophen. Start taking the medication the day before your period starts or at the first sign of pain, and continue taking it on a regular schedule for the number of days that your cramps usually bother you. Take herbal teas, many herbal teas are ideal for menstrual pains as well as other menstrual or cycle related problems including curing PMS, reducing flow, inducing your periods and regulating your menstrual cycle. Commercial pads are also best avoided because as well as also being bad for vaginal health they are generally uncomfortable so hardly help with menstrual cramps. Also avoid soy products these are notorious for causing menstrual cr...", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBHTE7": "Buy every guy in school a valentine card ? Fukk no Being a good dude is n't about one-upping the other gender , it 's about being a good dude . Wondering what all the symbols in my post mean ? See this post : http : //goo.gl/XRSL0U Lol does n't matter which way u spin it it 's still unbelievably pathetic and nothing can change that fact .", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9548Q": "Just eat less junk food. Have more meals but smaller portions. Don't sit around as much all day, be a bit more active.", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZT7AF": "According to the National Sleep Foundation teens need 8 1/2 to 9 1/2 hours of sleep each night. But I think 9:30 to 10pm is a good time to go to bed. You can read a little more about what they have to say at the link below.", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014YY1L": "family orgasim, homosexual orgasim, hot girl tingle and gf hand job", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9RNHK": "Chocolate is very bad for cats-and dogs for that matter-but giving your cat a little bit of dairy normally isn't harmful. So a tiny bit every once in while won't hurt. I've had at least 50 cats and kittens combined so far(at different times) and i know that even a little chocolate can give them the runs-it always did when I did it so I stopped after the first couple of my cats got sick.", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JVOHZ": "I own a cattle farm  cyotes  wild dogs sometimes kill the calves (9 last calving season ) . Now we collect fresh bones and store some for use later . The dogs have always brought old-dry bones home from the fields  pastures anyway . This way , I don't lose  waste the entire 300.00 calves as bones cost 4.00-11.00 . Jul 8, 2011 Salty Doggy Like the song says, 'Nick Nack Paddywack give the dog a bone.' Jul 25, 2011 babydog Each dog is individually different, Some dogs can tolerate raw feeds others cant. But it us as humans that are causing the food intolerances in our dogs by over feeding and the wrong stuffs. A dog is an animal and has animal needs. Back in the day, dogs had few health problems they where fed scraps and left overs, offal etc etc. The diets allowed dogs to mature slowly and consistently with no surge of proteins and over absorption of calcium. I have fed both processed food, raw feeds and bones.", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4EU4ME": "Topamax in a strong medication. I was on it a year or so ago for migraines and quickly switched to something else because of the side effects. Once you have finally stopped taking this, the side effects will start to fade away. Memory loss, slurring of speach, forgetfulness all are side effects from this medication. If your doc does not plan to take you off of this, I would suggest telling him about the side effects and ask to be placed on a different med.", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5AQ9ZW": "(a) Any person who, without malice aforethought, causes the death of another person through the violation of subsection (j) of Code Section 52-7-8.2 or Code Section 52-7-12 or Code Section 52-7-12.1 or subsection (b) of Code Section 52-7-13 or subsection (a) of Code Section 52-7-14 or subsection (c) of Code Section 52-7-25 commits the offense of homicide by vessel in the first degree. A person convicted under this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two years nor more than 15 years. (b) Any person who causes the death of another person, without an intention to do so, by violating any provision of this title other than subsection (j) of Code Section 52-7-8.2 or Code Section 52-7-12 or Code Section 52-7-12.1 or subsection (b) of Code Section 52-7-13 or subsection (a) of Code Section 52-7-14 or subsection (c) of Code Section 52-7-25 commits the offense of homicide by vessel in the second degree when such violation is the cause ...", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXM0LQ": "Increase Penis Size Naturally - Joy Your own Women of all ages Having a Bigger Penis. Penis Enlargement http://t.co/JqUvmX2o", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160PM82": "A wound is an injury that causes either an internal or external break in body tissue. Even if external bleeding is slight, there may be serious internal bleeding resulting from internal damage to an organ (as in a gunshot wound). Also, they might be required if the wound is deep and tends to gape widely, or if the bleeding cannot be controlled after 20 minutes of direct pressure. The physician will often inject some local anesthetic (numbing medicine) to the area around the wound so that suturing will be. Infection After an injury that causes a break in the skin or after an operation, various wound infections may occur. The skin around the wound becomes hot, inflamed, tender and red. This infection causes sudden pain and swelling around the wound, moderate increase in temperature, decrease in blood pressure and rapid heartbeat. As with any wound, it is important to have a physician inspect the wound and help decide if sutures, antibiotics, tetanus therapy or other treatment is necessary.", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA2OP1": "There are two color models you're talking about and they are different.Substractive ColorThis refers to media such as paint. Example: Red paint will absorb all colors in the white light spectrum (from our sun) EXCEPT for red, which will be reflected back off the red paint into your eye so you only see red. Paints SUBTRACT color from white light and reflects only the color you end up seeing. The subtractive primary colors (in paint, colored pencil, pastel, etc) are blue, red and yellow (some people prefer to think of the subtractive primiary colors as cyan (bluish), magenta (reddish) and yellow instead). When these colors are mixed together you get a dark grey. When none of these colors are present, you get white since a paper or canvas with no color on it, will be left blank and 'white. 'Additive ColorThis refers to color in light itself, such as colors that are projected on a projector screen and colors on computer and television monitors. White light consists of a full spectrum of color (Red, O", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXLUJL": "Try the 5 R's http://www.apple.com/support/ipod/fivers/", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONVHZR": "Geometric abstraction Geometric abstraction is a form of abstract art based on the use of geometric forms sometimes, though not always, placed in non-illusionistic space and combined into non-objective (non-representational) compositions. Throughout 20th-century art historical discourse, critics and artists working within the reductive or pure strains of abstraction have often suggested that geometric abstraction represents the height of a non-objective art practice, which necessarily stresses or calls attention to the root plasticity and two-dimensionality of painting as an artistic medium. Thus, it has been suggested that geometric abstraction might function as a solution to problems concerning the need for modernist painting to reject the illusionistic practices of the past while addressing the inherently two dimensional nature of the picture plane as well as the canvas functioning as its support.", "37ZQELHEQ0W6KQWG3RGQGCXWVVONMR": "First of all, do not give the dog milk. Dogs are lactose intolerant, which may cause her to have diarrhea. As for the water issue, try soaking the kibble for 20 minutes before she eats or feed her a mixture of kibble and canned food. That will keep her hydrated enough, even though it's just a temporary fix. Make sure the food is of high quality and not something full of corn and soy. You can make it a game by giving her small ice cubes that she can chew and chase around the floor. If she takes to it, place some cubes in her water bowl and let her figure out how to fish it out. She will eventually drink her water as she gets used to reaching into the bowl. If all else fails, freeze some chicken stock (fat free, low sodium or homemade) and place that in her water bowl for a while. Don't stress. It's only been 3 days, she needs time to adapt to her new environment and feel safe enough to act normally. If she doesn't improve or show signs of dehydration, get her to a vet asap.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYSKEU": "... Black Dog Cycle Works, Rigid Industries ... which is almost as thick as the Michelin Ultra Heavy Duty tubes, ... Mefo heavy duty inner tube for my Tenere. ...", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QUNKN": "As long as you are not holding pee in your bladder for a long time prior to urinating, you will be fine. Stopping the stream of urine while peeing will not cause any harm, and it's an easy way to practice Kegals. Best of Luck! This is weird! Most UTIs present with less pee, and it does really burn when you pee - so this sounds completely different. I think there are quite a few conditions that can cause you to pee a lot, one of the more advertised ones is diabetes. You must have treats with you. When the puppy is urinating, say 'GO PEE PEE' in a nice praise tone of voice the entire time. When she is finished, pop the treat into her mouth at once, and praise praise praise. Finally, make sure you thoroughly clean all old urine spots. If she can smell the old urine she will think that place is a good place to pee. Use a fluorescent black light to find old urine and treat all old spots with an enzymatic cleanser.", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9F23Y": "I don't think they meant that men in black suits and ties are going to drag you away. But they wan na get the point across that giving blood when you have AIDS is like trying to slip poisons into water resevoirs.", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O27VXX": "1.to re-establish peace in the world---They really wanted to avenge Pearl Harbor but they said they wanted the world to have peace.2.NATO---North Atlantic Treaty Organization--an organization created to try to contain communism.3.establisment of the People's Republic of China---Mao Zedong rebelled against Chiang Kai-Shek and established the People's Republic of China.4.communism---NATO didn't try to stop communism--they tried to 'contain' it.5.Truman---He defied Truman's orders not to cross the border to China because he thought it would end the war.", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG60J2Q": "I really get tired of all those people who want to lose weight extremely quick or just have 10 minutes a day. Why do people have all the time to make themselves fat, but dont have time or dont want to put effort in it to lose it. Than comes the hard part, losing the fat. I bet you lose weight. 50 is maybe fat, but what is the other 50??? Result less fat and less muscle. Everybody, dont just look to your bodyweight, but also to your body fat. This tells you clearly or you really lost what you want to lose. It is very easy to lose 2 kilo water, but it is hard to lose two kilo fat. It is very good to lose weight to get a good bodyweight/fat, if you make this decision, make a good decision. Good luck Strength training (even minor strength training, like sit-ups) won't help you lose belly fat. Cardio, especially running, and a healthy diet are the only way to actually lose fat. So unfortunately, losing belly fat just means losing fat in general.", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4HE9V": "Cirrhosis is a slowly progressing disease in which healthy liver tissue is replaced with scar tissue, eventually preventing the liver from functioning properly. The scar tissue blocks the flow of blood through the liver and slows the processing of nutrients, hormones, drugs, and naturally produced toxins. It also slows the production of proteins and other substances made by the liver. Recommended Related to Digestive Disorders Proctitis Important It is possible that the main title of the report Proctitis is not the name you expected. Please check the synonyms listing to find the alternate name(s) and disorder subdivision(s) covered by this report. Read the Proctitis article   According to the National Institutes of Health, cirrhosis is the 12th leading cause of death by disease. What Causes Cirrhosis of the Liver? Hepatitis C, fatty liver, and alcohol abuse are the most common causes of cirrhosis of the liver in the U.S., but anything that damages the liver can cause cirrhosis, inclu", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y0YA5": "I believe you are looking for quot. Shadow Castlequot. I remember reading this book--written by Marian Cockrell--as a youngster and a teen, and loving it. In fact, I am looking at my old, dog-eared copy right now. It is a sweet, lovely, story-within-a-story fairy tale. Here are some of the characters' names, which may jog your memory (if this is, indeed, the book you're looking for. ): Lucy, Michael, Gloria, Flumpdoria, Branstookah, Robin, and Bluebell. It has, of course, magicians, as well as fairies, goblins, dragons, and swamp-fairies (urgh). Here's what the back of my copy says: nbsp. In the middle of a deep, dark forest there is a castle. Only shadows live here -- shadows of kings and queens who are waiting. They have been waiting for hundreds of years. They have been waiting for someone to break the enchanted spell that was cast upon them. Then one day, a girl named Lucy wanders into this shadow land. Here is a front-cover picture: nbsp.", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1T1PA6": "A few ideas : - Give readings/signings at your local bookstores and/or library - Attend relevant conventions, conferences and workshops - Offer to give readings/talks at local schools/colleges/universities, if appropriate - Send a press release to local papers, the papers of schools you attended, etc. - publish an interesting blog about your writing, your book, other things that you read, etc., etc., and include links in the sidebar to your book on Amazon, etc. - Have an author's website with sample chapters from the books, interesting background info, links to related research or whatever else you might find appropriate  I do not find a book with the title Family Structure though. Meanwhile, to let you know that I did try and find some information about what YOU wanted to ask about, here's a link that I'm sure you already know about, but here it is anyway!", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160R8MQ": "Suicide chatter on Twitter hints at state suicide rates -- study: In the aftermath of a suicide, family ... http://t.co/LAoQ2aYUI8 Tech", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSCRMI": "Scientists have long known that cocaine can raise the risk of a heart attack. Mittleman said this is the first controlled study to actually quantify the risk. Research over the past decade has shown adrenaline-like drugs such as cocaine can trigger health problems such as increased heart rate, high blood pressure and stroke.", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFV3B4": "I crate trained. Read up on the Internet, talked to a few gd friend with experience and executed.", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9EZ67": "nullI boughta seat belt for mine. It's a harness that you slide the car's seat belt through. It is absolutely dangerous to drive with your dog loose. It is especially bad if the dog is loose in the back of a truck. Not too long ago, I saw someone driving on the freeway at 70 mph with their dog siting up high on one of those truck tool boxes. He wasn't tied down at all! Made me kind of mad that the driver didn't seem to care about the safety of his dog.", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9H321": "If you're writing on Twitter about writing, you're not writing. Nor are you writing if you write on Twitter about writing about not writing.", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEFG8Q": "But if you're lucky enough to be able to feel it, there's a growing and thriving ... And yet my brother catches me, asleep, with my phone on my chest and a ... of the calming, soothing effect of a mother's voice on an infant, coupled w... Deep in my heart, I do want this to be a phase that (she) grows out of. ... is transgender, acknowledge that this is ok, and then make the necessary changes to help them .... I remember the day when my mother finally stopped using male pronouns. He works in his father's business, his mom thought he was God's gift! ... Did he have to be with the accounting firm of Dewey, Fuckyou, and Howe? ... yet, it has been brief, 'tis over, and the lights do turn bright. ... Yet, in his new guise, he doesn't labor to come across as .... wanted facial hair and a deeper voice and a more masculine frame. .... ?o I say, 'O.K., so you're ...", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51NYC9": "It is a respiratory infection. The vaccine that you can get from your Vet is called Bordetello. The same is true with the colds'' spread from human to human.", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI4HF6": "Ok well the defination of a delusion is a belief thats not normal within society causes the patient a lot of stress and isnt shared by anyone else so anyways regardless as the way you look at this these are my religous beliefs which are completly true as you will one day see of course but at the same time absoulty abnormal beliefs. IM GONNA SCREW THE WORLD OVER! I believe I am one of Gods two witnesses because of some prophetic words my parents received about me starting when my mother was pregnant with me and continuing up till I was a small child. I see this as a prophecy as to why only I was able to understand that I am one of Gods two witnesses. I also had an interesting experience at the end of July I read the parable of the unfruitful fig tree(the two witnesses are referred to as two olive trees hence the fig tree) Luke13:6-9 A man had a fig tree, planted in his. I see this as Gods message to me that I have up till the end of July to have fulfilled everything and be ready and if I", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y4AYL": "Follow these instructions and your furniture will look great for many years to come. How to Stain Furniture Prepare Your Sanding Space ? Place a large drop cloth where you intend to do the sanding. If it's possible to work outside you'll find the clean up much easier. Sand the Piece Lightly to Remove the Old Finish Gently sand all areas of the piece. Don't rub to hard as you don't want gouges or flat spots where they don't belong. If you're sanding a table, you can use a power sander with fine-grit sandpaper for the flat surfaces. For chair spindles, use a foam sanding block. It will allow you to curve around the found spindles. Clean Up the Dust Wipe down the piece with a damp lint-free cloth to remove any excess dust, then wipe again with a dry cloth. Place the piece aside until you're ready to stain. Protect the Floor or Work Surface Lay a sheet of plastic on the floor before you start staining. Lay some newspaper over the tarp to provide an absorbent layer for stain drips.", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRNCOB": " Sign In: Username Password Keep me logged in Forgot your password? or Login with Facebook Last Updated: Aug 16, 2013  By Tammy Dray Not all antidepressants cause weight gain. Photo Credit Jupiterimages/BananaStock/Getty Images Antidepressants have a bad reputation for causing weight gain. While this is true for many of them, there are also several drugs that can lead to weight loss. Antidepressants cause weight gain in one of two ways: they increase appetite or they affect metabolism. According to Dr. David L. Katz in an article for O, the Oprah Magazine, if you're taking antidepressants and can't seem to lose weight, try eating more fiber-rich foods to keep you full without adding too many calories, or ask your doctor about switching to an antidepressant that can actually help with weight loss. Bupropion Bupropion, sold under the brand name Wellbutrin, causes weight loss in up to 28 percent of people who take it, according to eMedTV. The average person loses 5 lbs.", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDUT6N": "5, Renate Goetschl, Austria, 3:17.45 (1:43.17, 1:34.28). 6, Florence Masnada, France, 3:17.50 (1:43.47, 1:34.03). 7, Alexandra Meissnitzer, Austria, 3:19.58 (1:42.68, 1:36.90).", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE15PI9": "Take your contact out and rinse it really well with your solution. (If your eye still hurts after you take them out, make sure that you really don't have an eyelash in your eye.) Now I have contacts.", "324N5FAHSX9O275MK6P1BGZ5STTVK9": "Blink of an Eye Blink of an Eye may refer to: In the Blink of an Eye In the Blink of an Eye may refer to: Blink Blinking is a semi-autonomic rapid closing of the eyelid. A single blink is determined by the forceful closing of the eyelid or inactivation of the levator palpebrea superioris and the activation of the orbicularis oculi, not the full open and close. It is an essential function of the eye that helps spread tears across and remove irritants from the surface of the cornea and conjunctiva.", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I0IDM": "On the basis of those findings , an appropriate series of in utero and postnatal studies is performed . ( See the images below . ) Prenatal longitudinal ultrasonogram of the right kidney demonstrates right hydronephrosis . The right kidney is enlarged compared with the left and measures 55.3 mm in length . The renal cortex appears to be thinned .", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVB19X": "or I was looking forward to turning 30 and gaining credibility, but you made me look forward to turning 50 and gaining the respect. (or insert your favorite noun or adjective) or In five years you will become my favorite shopping buddy on Tuesdays - I do like to put that Senior Citizen discount to a good While elderly parents need the daily care and attention of younger people, they nonetheless want to maintain independent styles of life, said Zhang, adding that senior citizens homes which offer improved healthcare and entertainment facilities provide a viable option. The homes enable the elderly to enjoy a private family life, while at the same time enable them to enjoy the benefits of maid service, laundry and shopping facilities, said Zhang.", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWS5UC": "Not unless it says so on the can, you can get a flea and tick killer all in one at your local vets, ticks kill, so I would get there pretty quickly, they are poisoning your pet, it paralyses them in the legs first then they stop your pet from breathing, so if you use one of these little tubes, like advantage plus or frontline plus (make sure its one that also covers ticks not just fleas), and that should help, but I would take the dog to the vet first, hope this helps and goodluck to your four legged friend! :)", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDU6T0": "yes cats get dandruff. My siamese gets it. Most cat dandruff is caused by saliva, some is caused by dry skin.", "391FPZIE4CKXN2FE9VCZ22HUM5GHU2": "Physignathus Physignathus is a genus of large, diurnal, arboreal, agamid lizards, commonly known as water dragons. The two species are the Chinese water dragon 'P. cocincinus', and the Australian water dragon 'P. lesueurii'. They are sometimes kept as pets, especially 'P. cocincinus'.", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWORMA8": "It's just a generic name...........no abbreviated meaning.", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVSSQU": "I used 'sweet oil' to keep the ear drum soft til I could get an appointment but I rarely have ear infections. But I can tell you this...You need to see a ear, nose,and throat specialist if you've had this infection this long. They are right you can lose your hearing from ear infections. Most (approx.80) ear infections are caused by allergies, even if only one ear is involved. Those that are not are caused by something specific, like water in the ear from swimming, wax trapped in the ear canal by hair, structurally abnormal ear canal (Sharpeis have tiny canals,as a breed), or something actually falling into the ear canal (e.g. shepherds that have ears like Venus Fly Traps!). THESE EAR PROBLEMS ARE NEVER CURED! Long-standing or recurrent ear infections frequently cause perforation of the ear drum and entry of the infection into the middle ear. To put it simply, most dog ear infections are caused by dog allergies. The problem clears up only to return when the treatment stops.", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9BNGI": "William Penn   Opinion 2: Katie a few seconds ago Hi there!! Just wondering if you have any problems with your school work. We've got plenty of people who can help you here :) Also, my last question was answered in less than 10 minutes :D Anyway, you can just go ahead and try for yourself. Opinion 3: Katie a few seconds ago Hi there!! Just wondering if you have any problems with your school work. We've got plenty of people who can help you here :) Also, my last question was answered in less than 10 minutes :D Anyway, you can just go ahead and try for yourself.", "3ZXV7Q5FJBMHNC78SE3Z5BJBZQ0CFT": "Weight training. But keep in mind that it takes a lot of work to build legs muscles, particularly the calves. And remember if you are a thin build like you said, once you build muscle bulk in the legs, your knees and ankles remain thin. But good luck! Go for it!", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WVXR7": "In some formulas there might be..  look for milk protein, lactose, whey, calcium carbonate (I think). what do you mean by dust bowl era?", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZS7AE": "'Visual Macro Designer' helps to create visually constructed macros. '840 built-in operations' - a variety of automated builds that run unattended. 'Distributed build support' lets users distribute the execution of macro operations among multiple computers.", "30EMX9PEVKH8AFOIQBKW0TFYTP1KSV": "eating nomally has many definitions. Try eating breakfast that contains lots of fiber, snack on fruits and veggies, get your protein and dinner should be the smallest meal of the day. You shouldn't eat past 7 or 7:30.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0BIZM": "The father is YHWY (pronounced Yahweh) or El both of which were ancient Canaanite gods that the Jews adopted and later combined into one. Joshua Bar Yussef is the son, mistakenly called Jesus due to erroneous Greek translation ( the new testament was originally written in Greek.) The Holy Spirit is called that or the Holy ghost and is usually represented as a pigeon.", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQWNLN": "Anyways, thickness is more important than having a super long penis. what happen to those below 6 inches? lol..", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW9424NC": "I've never had a headache after a filling, but the soreness is perfectly normal. Although the Novacaine meant you didn't feel a thing at the time, your dentist did a bit of drilling and so forth ... and there's also soreness at the injection site. Don't worry about it ... warm salt water sloshed around may help. Opinion 2: OK..so you had your jaw open for an extended period of time..Yes that could be the explanation for the jaw ache. You said the one filing was placed very close to the nerve...When that happens the middle layer of the tooth, the Dentin is removed while drilling out the decay. The Dentin is the layer of the tooth's structure that is the basic insulator that blocks shock from cold and heat...Now that the dentin has been overly thinned out the insulation factor has been radically altered...The dentin will in time thicken back up but it will take day's to weeks...However the tooth's sensitivity should settle down a greatdeal over the next week. If it doesn't and the toot", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EX2H5": "Kids his age should be getting around 10-11 hours of sleep each night. So, to figure out a bedtime, first figure out when you want him to wake up and then count back from there. As far as getting him to go to sleep at night, here are a few ideas:   1) Make it boring for him to stay up. He shouldn't have access to TV, music, conversation with others, or any other source of entertainment that would keep him awake. 2) Make him get up when he is supposed to get up and make sure he isn't taking naps (at least at first). This will help him to be TIRED AT BEDTIME, so that he will be ready to go to sleep. 3) Keep the routine regular. Don't let him stay up more than an hour past his bedtime on weekends, or elseshe won't be in the routine when Monday comes. Besides, it's not good on his body to have this constant 'jet lag'. 4) Let him know about the change hours before bedtime. I hope this helps!", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDST6L": "Wet your hands with clean water - warm, if available - and apply soap. Lather by rubbing hands together. be sure to cover all surfaces. Continue rubbing hands together for 15 to 20 seconds Thoroughly rinse hands under running water to ensure removal of residual germs. Use paper towels or an air dryer to dry hands and then, if possible, use a paper towel to turn off the faucet, also to grab the door handle with on the way out.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOAY3B": "Nearly everyone has hemorrhoids at some time. What are the types of hemorrhoids? Hemorrhoids can develop inside the anal canal (internal hemorrhoids) or near the anal opening (external hemorrhoids). Internal hemorrhoids have four degrees of severity. First degree: The hemorrhoid does not protrude from the anus. Third degree: The hemorrhoid protrudes from the anus during a bowel movement, but you can push it inside the anus with your finger. Fourth degree: The hemorrhoid is always outside the anus and cannot be pushed into the anal canal. External hemorrhoids: External hemorrhoids can cause itching, burning, and irritation. Internal hemorrhoids: Rectal bleeding is the most common symptom of internal hemorrhoids. Internal hemorrhoids can range from small, swollen veins in the wall of the anal canal to large, sagging veins and tissue that bulge out of the anus all the time. You also may see mucus on stool or toilet tissue from hemorrhoids that protrude. Nearly everyone has hemorrhoids ...", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1HKQ7": "Its normal to think about dying if youve just been told you have cancer. You may feel better knowing that the outlook for many people diagnosed with cancer is very good. Many people still believe that cancer  death. But the fact is that most cancers can be treated. There are more than 14 million people living in the United States today who have or had cancer. The survival rate among different cancers varies greatly, so youll want to look at how well treatment works for your type of cancer. Numbers can give you an overall picture, but keep in mind that every person is unique. Statistics cant predict exactly what will happen to you. Talk with your cancer care team if you have questions about your own chances of a cure, or how long you might survive your cancer. They know your situation best. Sometimes people are found to have a fast-growing or widespread cancer and are told that they might not be expected to live very long. This is hard to hear and take in.", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTXNE2": "Time...some cats will be buddies right off. My male cat is friends with anyone new. 2 of my girls take a few weeks to get used to people or other cats. She's finally getting used to and playing with my latest cat. But when I first introduced her to the male, it only took a couple weeks. Don't know if it was because my male was friendly or if it was because he was opposite sex. They will eventually be best friends. i have had 2 male cats from the same litter for 1 and a half years and i have just introduced a male birman kitten to them the first week was abit difficult with spitting and hissing but now they all tear about the house together like the 3 stooge's.When i lived at homei introduced a male kitten to a female and they never got on they just stayed out of each others way hope this helps. I've always read when wanting to introduce a new cat to a house with cats already, always get a girl cat. I have a girl cat, they are smaller, and don't mark their territory like male cats (s...", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1MBLQ": "She gave me t help she is going to give some injection on effected area . I have a 3 inch section there my beard stopped growing and a one inch section to the left of my chin that stopped growing . It s been about 5 months now with no hair growing bach it seems .", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5ARZ9N": "Hi Dave, Well a morning erection is actually due to physiology. First and foremost you must understand the system that controls erections. Erections (among other things such as pupilary dilation/constriction, heart rate, sweating etc) are controlled by a special aspect of the nervous system called Autonomic Nervous System (ANS). This is an autonomous system which does not require the brain for basic function (however the brain does have some oversight and minor control up to a point). Thus you could say that the ANS is responsible for regulation of our organs and glands and this occurs unconsciously. The ANS is divided into 2 different and opposing parts: Sympathetic Nervous System (SNS) , Parasympathetic Nervous System (PNS) in which together (SNS and PNS) are used to maintain homeostasis. For those that do not know this term, homeostasis simply means the ability of a system to maintain a constant condition or balance if you wish through regulation of its environment. As a general ...", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08L8TP": "Nevermind, she a lesbian...she has a vagina but she a virgin...she doesn't eat meat.", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV5ZD3": "click on this site for the infohttp://www.healthchecksystems.com/heightweightchart.htm", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O2AVX0": "Rapid ejaculation (coming more quickly than you'd like also called premature ejaculation) is quite common, particularly among young men or those just beginning to have sex. The good news is that many men find strategies that work for them to help them last longer and gain ejaculatory control with time and practice. Both the stop-start and squeeze techniques are useful long term strategies that men can use to teach themselves to pay attention to the physical sensations they experience as they get closer to climax. ... Short-term solutions include desensitizing condoms...that are lubricated internally with a substance that includes benzocaine. ...You want to be careful not to let that substance, or any other numbing agents, touch your partner's mouth or vagina, as it can desensitize her parts, too! ...", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYEZSW": "Cultural studies combines sociology, social theory, literary theory, media theory, film/video studies, cultural anthropology and art history/criticism to study cultural phenomena in industrial societies. Cultural studies researchers often concentrate on how a particular phenomenon relates to matters of ideology, race, social class, and/or gender. 4.", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLP0AA": "Nope- there is no way of stopping a period early. It can be regulated with birth control pills, but there is no way to stop it.", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1IBLM": "CHORUS: I dont care, I dont care, What they may think of me, Im happy go lucky, Men say I am plucky, So jolly and care free, I dont care, I dont care, If I do get the mean and stony stare, If Im never successful, It wont be distressful, Cos I dont care. VERSE: Some people say I think Im it, But I dont care, They say they dont like me a bit, But I dont care, You see Im sort of independent, Of a clever race descendant, My star is on the ascendant, Thats why I dont care. CHORUS: I dont care, I dont care, If people dont like me, Ill try to outlive it, I know Ill forgive it, And live contentedly, I dont care, I dont care, If people do not try to treat me fair, There is naught can amaze me, Dislike can not daze me, Cos I dont care.", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDS1AB": "See you're dentist. Some dentists can actually perform the surgery though others would give a referal to an oral surgeon. I wouldn't go to Mexico for any surgery or medical help.", "3NC6WP7WJHISCWZ8ZUD0LTCEM94WWG": "nullIt really depends on who you're going with. Being from Ohio, I can tell you that there is often little to do in the more suburban areas of the state. So, you might have to take a trip to some of the bigger cities to find something extraordinary to do. What's most important is who you are going with. While one person might think going to a sports game is fun, another would prefer a romantic restaurant, and another would prefer to go to a concert. There are plenty of sports games going on all over the state if your date is into that kind of thing. If he or she has a MySpace page - you can check out concerts coming to Ohio that he or should would be interested in. Every newspaper's website should also have restaurant reviews and a section for local festivals and the like that you should attend together. So, it would be best if you find out what your date is really interested in - and tailor the date to that.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGLYB0": "nullI am not sure if this is the book you are looking for, but it may be. Here is a description- From School Library Journal Grade 4-7-- Homesick for the Earth he grew up on, Scott teleports down from the spaceship for an outing in a sunny Dallas park, where he makes friends with a group of young people from a school for 'gifted' children. When his telepathic powers enable him to see a fatal car accident seconds before it happens, he saves the life of one of his new friends, but when he's taken from the scene of the accident to the school, he finds it's really a research institute for psychic children run by a ruthless doctor, where his identity as a telepathic alien is in danger of being exposed. Events from Wisler's The Antrian Messenger (1986) and The Seer (1989, both Lodestar) are summarized smoothly within the text, but readers will care more about Scott if they have read them.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMOJ78": "Then you can wash it off if you want (you probably don't want to get the numbing stuff on you - that may defeat your purpose).", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VRXC0": "It s really noticeable when he bends over. ... I have a vibrating type feeling in my spine and right rib cage when I bend my neck ... feel pressure on my back more ...", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LV75C": "i agree with the first two people that answered this question. i often felt that way one summer because i guess i was going through a hard time i didnt eat well and i was very very paranoid... it eventually went away when i began school again, i guess being with my friends helped. i think talking about it with someone might help you.", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVR0VC": "In Rifkins estimation , all this connectivity will bring on the Third Industrial Revolution ,  poised as he believes it is to not merely redefine our relationship to machines and their relationship to one another , but to overtake and overthrow capitalism once the efficiencies of the Internet of Things undermine the market system , dropping the cost of producing goods to , basically , nothing . His recent book , The Zero Marginal Cost Society : The Internet of Things , the Collaborative Commons , and the Eclipse of Capitalism It is also deeply wishful , as many prospective arguments are , even when they start from fact .", "3GMLHYZ0LEVJ9X53JVGNO2CXC1TYUI": "Hard to say if the 'gained' anything, but they did men's jobs because the men were at war, and they've been doing men's jobs ever since.", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHPZTI": "Oh dear! Sorry to hear about your injury. You very likely have a fracture in your foot. When you have a fracture it hurts really badly and doesn't stop hurting until you get your foot set correctly and bandaged or in a cast. Please go to the E.R. and have it xrayed and treated ASAP. Good luck. Hugs. :)", "3KLL7H3EGDZX0H4EELM4YOJD0CSVH8": "Dont use jacking world! Use: Lotion. Bolony. Massage Oil. Sock. InterCourse Style Masturbation w/ Coutch Cushions: Need (Lube) (Lotion,. (2) Inset the bag between the couch cushions, making sure enough plastic is exposed to allow for pressure once penis is inserted. You may need to experiment with different types of bags before you find one that is comfortable. (8) Use your hands to push down on the sofa cushions to increase the pressure on the bag to make the hole tighter (if desired). (6) Now add a fair amount of lube, I like to use baby oil. (8) Once you no longer feel any dryness in the glove insert the rag (with penis) between the couch cushions or (My favorite) between two mattresses and have fun. The orgasim is one that can't be compared to anything your hand can do. It's very much like sex as you are unable to move much during or after orgasim because your penis has become so sensitive. Try seeing how long you can continue to thrust at orgasim before the sensation is too much Have Fun!", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367YAWID": "nullAll of the following might mitigate my response: 1) How allergic are you? 2) Are you suffering symptoms right now? If so, severe enough to impact your work? Medically serious? 3) Is this a large company with an HR department? 4) Is there an existing policy manual that precludes animals? 5) Whats your proximity to the animal? 6) Can you work from home? 7) Is the 'dog to work' thing a one-time event due to boss emergency, or possibly a recurring practice? And there are probably a lot more variables that, with clarification, might adjust my suggestions. But with the limited scenario youve provided, I suggest you talk to your boss immediately. Do it directly, politely, without accusations like 'YOU brought your dog and IM allergic!'. Let him know this is directly affecting your health and your ability to complete your work. Ask him for a solution - you may not want to even propose one - let him come up with options.", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3KMEY": "if u think its time then u go ahead with it but if u dont then make him wait if he loves u he wont mind waiting what u got to think about is the question is he going to try it on when ur in bed with him make ur own mind up men can be nice when they want to be just be carefull dont do it because u like him wait for the right moment if ur not ready as yet", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNP8RD": "The atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, the air raids on Tokyo and other cities, and the ground battles in Okinawa, among others,", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2QO0U": "Photographers selling photos through a stock agency have their own agreement with the agency. The agency then has an agreement with the customer. Who can have objections to the commercial use of such public like places, bridges or buildings? Plenty of people. But note that in most cases, it's not the public place that is copyrighted, but the particular photo of said public space. In other words, Central Park isn't copyrighted. But any particular photo of it, is by default. In other words, who can sue desginer for the use of such 'Editorial Use Only' photograph if photographer does not have any objections? The owner of the copyright and/or the license. If the photographer is OK with it, and gives you a license to do so, all is good. Is there such thing as 'Editorial Use Only' for images in Public Domain? At least in the US, public domain has a very specific definition and that is that it's free for use without any restrictions at all. If there are restrictions, then it's not technically", "3H4IKZHALBGC28HGFSVQTRMW0LXNNQ": "You already have way too small a bowl for the fantail. Adding the minnows would increase the bioload and the chances of you losing fish to ammonia poisoning. You would be creating a toxic sump. Opinion 2: I don't recommend it. For a start, if it can catch one, the Goldfish would eat a Minnow. Minnows also prefer a long tank with lots of current, Goldfish need a heavily filtered tank, but don't cope well with strong currents at all.", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I4DIL": "This feature is not available right now . Please try again later . This is Lily , our 12 week old Norwich Terrier puppy playing with the door stop . Don t worry , we got rid of the rubber stopper so she doesn When autoplay is enabled , a suggested video will automatically play next .", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATX5AX": "Good Luck!college  I was told mine was 11.4.I had bleeding at my small intestines and stomach.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZK2F7": "hope this helps..please post after trying  Did you find this post helpful?You marked this post as helpful!", "3OYHVNTV5TWTCNWPJU3NGO5XW0WOK0": "is like riding a wave . People who do it well know how to bob and weave . They tend to zig when others zag . Their main tools : leadership , strategy , and innovation . They use these three elements in varying proportions , depending on the situation .", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHK1RN": "You would benefit by reducing it I have 1-2 beers most weeknights , get pretty drunk about 2 times per month , and I smoke like 4-7 cigarettes a day . I ve gained 12 pounds in 7 weeks by going super intense in the gym 3x/wk and eating a buttload ( 2500cals , 80g protein ) . My bodyfat has gone from 10 to 8  during that time period .", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8YEPP": "Once you stop the diet, you'll gain the weight back and probably even more pounds :(. Use the Dr. Phil Weight Loss Program, and buy his book. I gained weight and the program worked very well to help me lose 20-30 lbs over the period of 4-5 months.", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0UM2W": "I would suggest you visit this site - How To Get Ripped. There you can find a customized nutrition and weight training plan based on details you fill in. Like age, weight, height, metabolism and body type. You can also read my story, it contains information about my struggle. Meybe you will find it heplful. Good Luck The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 8 of 10 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "3FK4G712NXY6YY1QVKTYRF68AJDSSJ": "Other people can be really confusing, especially when it comes to crushes and dating. He may IM you constantly but never ask you on a date. She might stare at you throughout English class then ignore you in the hallway. Maybe you've got a sneaking suspicion that your best friend has the hots for you. How can you tell for sure if he or she likes you? Here are a few signs that he or she is probably into you.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXOJDY": "Sep 30, 2014 ... Find the most trusted low cost dental care with Patients Beyond ... The way to achieve those goals is often an implant, a crown, some bridgework, or braces. ... and Texas can easily cross the border into Mexico, an hour's drive?... Sam Dental is a Tijuana dental clinic located in Mexico, just across the border ... Root Canal Therapy Dental Implant Placement Standard Finish Porcelain Crown .... how safe you are here, you can visit this page: http://howsafeismexico. com/?... Find out what's going on with dentistry in Mexico: Should I Get My Dental Work in Mexico? Dental work is the United States is very expensive. So is the cost of ... Dental tourism may be the solution for your needs. Getting work done in Mexico can help your budget during this recession. At Dental Art International, you get great ... Low Cost Dental Implants. by Joseph K. Where can I find low cost dental implants? My dentist said that my only option at this point is to go for surgery ...", "3UUSLRKAUL1EDBYGAR0Y1POCM2SD7P": "No, 24 is not too old to start an acting career. You just need to have something about you that will stand out. Some people don't stand out until a little later anyway. Good luck to you!", "3K1H3NEY7LXX649H3U4S7215L59GDT": "Get it pulled and get a false tooth. It will die and turn black soon", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0K04JB": "Well, it occasionally happens that breasts suddenly get heavier at a quite late time. I knew one girl who went from approx. B to D between 18 and 21. BUT I don't think you should sit and wait for that, because that is unusual, and because that is not even the important thing. The important things are stuff like:  how extra good you will about everything once you don't feel awkward about it anymore  how extra sweet you will be when you are going to want to give yourself, even while uncertain if it is good enough  how much extra you will enjoy a guy who is strong enough to remove all your doubts about it  and not least that extra love and wisdom you have to find in yourself to handle all this gracefully and realistically. That will stay with you for the rest of your life and make you such a lovely 'whole' person whom it is a pleasure to be with - and breast-wise, it will probably always be a little extra significant to you when your breasts are liked and admired. You will be able ...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PEP8HE": "Carrot and cottage cheese mask Mix one tablespoon of fresh thick cream with one tablespoon of cottage cheese and... http://t.co/CFFbnwlVWb", "3TZDZ3Y0JS4OZZ6X9VENEJE9SVF191": "Use exact nouns to paint a clear picture . Why is the revised sentence clearer ? B. Replace the underlined noun in each sentence with a more exact noun . Remember that a noun names a person , a place , a thing , or an idea . 14 .", "360ZO6N6J1HLVOSM2HXLYB2CQ659MC": "Keep an eye on the mom to make sure she's feeding all the kittens. Give the mom kitten food cuz it has higher nutritional value and she needs all the nutrients she can get while she's nursing. The best thing to do is let your cat have the kittens.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKBQH7": "Sweetie, I felt the same way when I was pregnant with my daughter, the first trimester, I had no morning sickness and I did not feel pregnant, just tired and 'crappy', just like you are feeling now, it is totally normal, and since every woman and every pregnancy is different, it will get better, since your body and baby is constantly growing and changing, then just wait another week and you will be experiencing new 'feelings', and then feeling better also.??? It will get better honey, just wait??", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S7CQL": "The Buffalo Bills franchise was originally founded in 1960 and joined the NFL in 1970. The Bills played for three AFL Championships and won two. They have also had four Super Bowl appearances, but have yet to win one.", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZL9VX": "Mixed Martial Arts organizations usually allow wrist locks but they are almost never performed due to the MMA gloves and wrist wraps which stabilize the wrist. Wrist locks are also seen as being easy to defend against and often leave the attacker vulnerable to punches and elbow strikes. One notable use of a wristlock was by Royce Gracie against Akebono Taro.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559VMZ6": "You need to seriously evaluate your common sense. A stray dog licking you means he trusts and likes you. Quit letting anxiety make it anything more. If concerned, wash your hand with soapy warm water. End of story. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 1 of 3 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7BW6F": "Although Australia was not known to the Western world, it did exist in late ... allowed the rising power of the Netherlands to establish a string of trading ..... After the Pacific war between Japan and the United States broke out in 1941 and ?... In countries across the South Pacific, Chinese money is pouring into ... but it's been a mixed blessing and as a result Tonga is now in debt distress. ... that China is seeking to replace Australia or the United States in the ... in power . Mar 3, 2014 ... 3 March 2014 at 1:21 pm .... ON RadioNZ Nine to Noon this morning, two major NZ home builders ..... The aftermath of the second world war saw the largest ethnic .... ... The euro gave these countries access to cheap credit, which was used to ... would fuel political tension ?? as occurred in the United States in its first decades. ...... To explain:-", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW89G16": "heat is a trannys worst enemy..", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL45X5LG": "At least I don't feel a migraine...however I've read that all headaches are some form of a migraine, which is interesting.At the same time, if this is true it doesn't allow people who've never had a 'real' migraine the appreciation for just how horrible they are.", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPNAB7": "Hot ! Cotton Mens Underwear Boxer Trunks Sexy Underwear Shorts Gay Wear Home Pouch Penis Lot Designed Waist Popular Brand Fashion Picture 25cm x 15cm x 5cm ( 9.84in x 5.91in x 1.97in ) 25cm x 15cm x 5cm ( 9.84in x 5.91in x 1.97in ) Our Buyer Protection ONLY protects Payment Methods on AliExpress as below", "3MJ28H2Y1E6QU4BMC7ZHEZMFZA55O0": "Our bodies are smart, they will do everything they can to stay at the bodyfat it feels it needs to function, therefore losing the last 10-15 lbs is always the hardest. By exercise alone this means : Stair Stepping, 10 cal/min  88 hrs to lose 15 lbs Walking, 4 cal/min  218 hrs to lose 15 lbs  I'm guessing if you only want to lose 15 lb then you're close to goal weight?", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOHT7P": "I have never seen Seinfeld/so happy", "3QREJ3J433VL62TS62NVO7131VULKJ": "Why did President Truman choose to drop the atomic bomb on Hiroshima and Nagasaki? Well, Germany had given up and Italy had surrendered years before. Moscow was considered but the US had just finished drawing up the Cold War plans so all that was left was the Japanese Islands.", "3TFJJUELSHNXMIVW4JOSLSPMQMT2CX": "Yes, they're really great! You can usually get them a lot cheaper than the regular book new, too! The only downside is if you need to keep the book for more than 1 semester or need to keep it for studying for grad-school tests, like keeping your chemistry book to review and study chemistry for the MCAT, DAT, PCAT, etc. Most online textbooks should have search features which can be really helpful for quickly finding something. And of course, the best feature is not carrying a 10lb book with you all day long. The only time an online textbook could be problematic for you is if an internet connection is required to read the book... If you like going to the park or whatever to study/do homework, if there isn't a WIFI connection, etc., you might not be able to do your work. Overall, I'd say go for it. Just be sure to shop around and see how every company handles their e-textbooks. I know chegg's e-textbooks aren't that great. I saw one of their e-textbooks in use a few months ago and it was", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN145I3": "Hi You can but I think you find the success is not that high, you would need to see an obstetrician, for advice on your chances of success. Hope this helps. Good Luck", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9F6ZF": "Causal closure has stronger and weaker formulations. The stronger formulations of causal closure assert that: 'No physical event has a cause outside the physical domain.' - Jaegwon Kim.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9FFPA": "Though the intention is that students have no entitlement to state benefits in most cases , it seems harsh that most student carers are frozen out of the benefits system not least as their caring responsibilities are likely to preclude working . If your son did not live at home , you 'd keep your severe disability premium and single person 's council tax discount , though your housing benefit might change ( not least because of the ) .", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FX3QH": "as much wood as he could", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y5WI8": "You should ask a specialist, not on Yahoo answers!", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54HBEZ": "Throwback to when my friends hamster ate my hamster and then my friends hamster died because she forgot to feed it karma", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0EXI5": "Logical-mathematical To do with numbers, with logic and abstractions. Those who favour this intelligence generally excel in mathematics and computer programming, and are often jacks of all trades by virtue of logic. Careers might include those involving science and computer programming.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6QLJG": "Leather is an expensive natural product, so when a leather good acquires a stain its owner will want to know how to correctly clean leather.", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN5Z7SA": "TahitiTrim40, it will helpCleanse Beverage combines the power of TAHITIAN NONI Juice with an all-natural blend of fruit juices to jump-start your weight management and prepare your metabolism. Designed to help in your weight management efforts. This allows your body to burn fat more efficiently when combined with the Plan 40 program, which consists of a healthy diet and regular excercise. Appetite Suppressant helps you feel full faster and fend off cravings, which in turn helps you control your portion sizes.", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1O92L": "Cover bottom and side with' cake or cookies crumbs Put rice mixture in dish and cover with more crumbs. Serve hot or cold, Makes 6 to 8 servings I'm on Weight watchers so for 8 points I'm having cabbage , carrots , roasted chicken and brown this is my standard ) and thats what am bothered about !!! lol lol here is my answer :D 'Ctrl  V ' hi :) am not sure whats available in the markets...but, this is what i did to lose weight... Indian food is very very oily and very difficult to diet... and try cereal in the mornings... weetabix... etc... have a good breakfast...alwaays use brown bread... whole wheat brown bread is very good for weight reduction... for lunch , we are staple rice eaters... rice is bad for fat reduction... but i still took rice because its a habit tht cant be changed... everyone takes rice here... so... rice - one cup - 100gms and lots of veggies cooked in", "3XT3KXP24ZWCHM0XJVWHM84TJWH6IM": "Forensic medicine is sucking my blood! I have to remember fatal doses,fatal period of all the poisons! Signs  symptoms:(", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179EF5O": "A third degree burn is much more severe, it would have burned through all tissue and reached bone, then it is an emergency. You do not have to go to a doctor, but it may help to. Just don't put any creams, lotions, or ointments on it. Meaning that you need to go to the Emergency Room tonight! First, the way that you explained that it is white with yellow specks could very well indicate a more severe burn than second degree. This could be a second degree and third degree burn. I would keep it under band-aids for a bit but if it does not hurt to much and there is no layers of skin removed off your wrist then you should let it air out with no band-aid this will help the healing process. If you have a bubble on the burn that usually means a second degree burn. Unlike the general population says don't pop the bubble right away. The purpose of the bubble is to protect the burn area.", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGNZXHC": "The main division is between combined oral contraceptive pills, containing both synthetic estrogens and progestogens (progestins), and progestogen only pills (mini-pills). People who use them may experience irregular light bleeds, and whilst irregular in the first few months of taking, usually settles to a regular pattern in time. As well as being an effective contraceptive, the combined pill can be very effective in treating the pre-menstrual syndrome and heavy or painful periods. The combined pill is usually taken for 21 days each month followed by a 7 day break when the period will usually occur. Although the combined pill is a very popular method, if pills are taken over 12 hours late, the effectiveness can be lost. However, the combined pill is not suitable for all women. Pregnancy can happen if an error is made in using the Pill  especially if 1) pills are started too late in the cycle, 2) two or more pills are missed in a row, 3) pills are taken in the wrong order.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMTT3I": "The only proof that the guy you are going to marry is still a virgin is his wordunless you have had sex and u knows that he is inexperienced. I mean how can you learn everything you need to know if you dont have sex. You dont have to be a whore but a couple guys would not hurt your reputation. Dont you want to please your husband? Marriage is just a word and a piece of jewelryif you cant satisfy your partner he will find someone else who will. Hi ,i do know a think or two about the pill ,i just came off it myself and i am 30 ,it takes a while for youre body to get back to the cycle of periods after being on the pill for 4 years,could be another 2 weeks before you get yourre period and i think you wonnt get pregnant until you have had a full cycle .You are better to go to youre nearest family planning they will tell you alot more and put youre mind at ease and let them know everything ,that you are wanting to get pregant.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSQ1E6": "Mystery and suspense writers use noun-based descriptions . approach to description . These writers favor description . In verb-based descriptive passages , every Western and horror writers like verb-based description because it maintains a sense that the story never stops . The reader moves from action to action , without pause .", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1RR4N": "I have had a similar problem and what really made the biggest difference was I went to a spa, where they offered free 'face mapping' which is basically just a dermatologist or skin specialist sits down with you and determines your skin problems (they look at your face with a special light). The reason it is free is of course they will try to sell you products. However, although I spent a ton of money on products by the brand of Dermatologica, it was TOTALLY worth it. I found that good quality face products have made such a difference- and other things such as using proper cleansers and such. My point is that yes I think you should see a Dermatologist because its obviously been hard for you too. She taught me tons of stuff I didn't know- that regular soaps strip the skin of its normal PH level and you need to use special cleansers to not make your face too acidic or basic (forget which one, lol).", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E5KG9": "Survives titanic. Lifeboat hits another iceberg.", "3R16PJFTS3PP8UM70AOE2QZSF9Z4K9": "I began having a period every three weeks and grew concerned. It even would come sometimes every 18 days so, essentially it was like two per month. My internet research pointed toward possible early menopause (I am 39) as the periods only lasted two days tops. I went to the doctor and the exam and blood work came out normal. I was advised to keep a journal and come back if any irregularities presented. But growing older brings changes and i was told not to be alarmed. Hope this helps.", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555A7P6C": "Anyway, not trying to bash on corrective surgery, but I'd definitely try exercising for a couple of months before I let people stick stuff into body.Good luck! jenfromzen replied October 16th, 2014 No you can't increase the size of your pelvis/pelvic girdle from working out muscles.", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1E1NA9": "I can't imagine God not allowing my dog into heaven.", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWXAA3G": "Caffeine can cause a rapid heartbeat. Dehydration can cause a rapid heartbeat. Being suddenly awoken can cause a rapid heartbeat.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52OYRD": "I would not be doing so for any other reason than my own need to .... As noted above, she seems to see my previous post about her as the attempt of some sad sack .... So in that one post, she's fired up the animal drives of her readers,?... He spent each day doing his practices and taking care of his duties to the ... On a daily basis he did the long sadhanas of Vajrayogini, Yamantaka, Heruka Body Mandala, ... Or if it was about the oncologist, he'd reply ?? am following Dr. Lieber. ... relationship (or whatever the particular externals), so you have no .... The other thing I'm doing which really helps things not to 'stick' in .... can't talk about animal cruelty, can't watch... I am asking that anyone who reads this article is helped to see the signs that their .... to your angel whatever you feel is needed ?? no need to spend too much time on it,?...", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2TTSB": "Turns out is was just massive stress I had to take Benadryl to be able to breath! !I hope this helps you!Me says: February 26, 2014 at 8:32 am I forgot to add that I know sometimes Depression is caused by imbalances and a few books that helped were A Diet Cure by Julie Ross.", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFUB3B": "Tested NEGATIVE for HIV/STD's.So proud.Never putting myself in a position to feel that way again.Its a terrifying feeling.", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC4PWH": "Here's a cure fpr prostate cancer. Far less painful than radiation.http://dgwa1.fortunecity.com/body/cancercure-dandelion.htm", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQXN81": "Green Tea with Ginsing. It helps me. I tried avoiding it for a period of 6 months. My short term sucks as it is and I noticed I was worse during that 6 mo. period. Started back up again with the Tea. I've noticed an improvement. Also: Do small exercises. If you're like me you need familiar memory tags to apply to them to remember them. I talked to a guy about Martinis and what's his best Vodka he prefers. I couldn't remember it. He must have mentioned it a few times. Even told me after I had asked him on two occasions. But on the third he said, 'It's Burnett's. You know, like Carol Burnette on TV.' Word association works. You might also want to carry a small palm-sized notebook with you. And when you wake up in the morning, write down an item, errand or task you might like to do that day but isn't immediate. When you come home, check that mini-list you wrote before you left. Did you remember to do it during your day? Keep it up until you train your mind to recall things when ...", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL009L6D": "Mar 14, 2012 ... It is not just an illness for people with dark, mysterious pasts or ... emotional and he said: 'Look, I think you need to take some time off ... I have been told it is common to get depression after a brain injury. I cry every time I watch it and as far as I'm concerned it's as good as Clannad. Fate/stay night Fate/Zero - I first saw Fate/stay night 6 or 7 years ago and loved it. Then I discovered the games (visual novel and PSP games) and loved it even more. ... has happened and realize that time will take the edge off the intensity of .... Even a sleazy character in a poorly lit parking garage gets noticed ... whereas when we're depressed we tend to look on the dark side of?... If every character is either that (or both) it's not going to be real at all. Just look at people in your life. Take traits from them, mash 'em up and make a new character.", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL45W5LF": "ARTIST/COMMISSIONERS BEWARE!! DO NOT COMMISSION FURRY ARTIST ADIAGO. TRANSPHOBIA OUT THE WAZOO. Please spread/RT!! http://t", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBGP9O": "E-IR publishes student essays dissertations to allow our readers to broaden their understanding of what is possible when answering similar questions in their own studies . Following the 1945 Allied victory of World War II that ended Japans colonial rule of Korea , the United States and the Soviet Union agreed to split the Korean Peninsula along the 38 parallel against major opposition from the Korean people .", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFSYMS": "You're not autistic. In fact your probably one of the humans that will inspire all. I would hate to see you go to waist. Here's some pointers to get you started. 1- If you have faith lose it. a- if your a believer in god, look up the (atheist experience ) on YouTube. ( this will destroy the silly thoughts of god.) 2- study the works of Richard Dawkins and Christopher Hitches. 3- Look up physics. ( physics helps you understand the world and how it works, also allowing you to think freely. ) 4- understand the univers. --- Learn all this knowledge. It will greatly improve your way of life. I'm 17 now and when I was 15 I kept thinking I was different. Tho I never thought I was autistic. Your a smart kid and you know it. Become apart of the intelligentsia. I hope I changed your life some how.", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W6OIO": "In this assignment, you really have to THINK about it that's the point. No one can tell you how to creatively solve the problem you have been given. You need to think about what your teacher said and start thinking outside the box. You can do it - get the 'I don't know what to do' phrase out of your head and put some thought into it - sketch out some different ideas before you start on the actual mandala. Good luck!", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSRORU": "3, Trude Gimle, Norway, 3:16.54 (1:44.70, 1:31.84). 4, Janica Kostelic Croatia, 3:17.11 (1:46.77, 1:30.34). 5, Renate Goetschl, Austria, 3:17.45 (1:43.17, 1:34.28). 6, Florence Masnada, France, 3:17.50 (1:43.47, 1:34.03). 9, Catherine Borghi, Switzerland, 3:22.19 (1:44.05, 1:38.14). 10, Bibiana Perez, Italy, 3:22:26 (1:43.66, 1:38.60). 13, Spela Bracun, Slovenia, 3:22.89 (1:44.50, 1:38.39). 14, Morena Gallizio, Italy, 3:23.78 (1:49.16, 1:34.62). 15, Ingrid Jacquemod, France, 3:26.44 (1:47.83, 1:38.61). 3, Trude Gimle, Norway, 3:16.54 (1:44.70, 1:31.84). 4, Janica Kostelic Croatia, 3:17.11 (1:46.77, 1:30.34). 5, Renate Goetschl, Austria, 3:17.45 (1:43.17, 1:34.28). 6, Florence Masnada, France, 3:17.50 (1:43.47, 1:34.03). 9, Catherine Borghi, Switzerland, 3:22.19 (1:44.05, 1:38.14). 10, Bibiana Perez, Italy, 3:22:26 (1:43.66, 1:38.60). 13, Spela Bracun, Slovenia, 3:22.89 (1:44.50, 1:38.39). 14, Morena Gallizio, Italy, 3:23.78 (1:49.16, 1:34.62). 15, Ingrid Jacquemod, France, 3:26.44 (...", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZODPGH": "What is important is making sure the lenses fit your eyes properly.Hope this helps!If you do find someone to sell them to you without an rx-please be aware of the risk you are taking.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHVTXJ": "From Wikipedia: 'Potassium is vital in the human body and oral potassium chloride is the common means to replenish it, although it can also be diluted and given intravenously. It can be used as a salt substitute for food, but due to its weak, bitter, unsalty flavor, it is usually mixed with regular salt, sodium chloride, for this purpose to improve the taste. Brand names include K-Dur, Klor-Con, Micro-K, and Kaon Cl. KLOR KLOR may refer to: KLOR-TV KLOR-TV may refer to: Medically it is used in the treatment of hypokalemia and associated conditions, for digitalis poisoning, and as an electrolyte replenisher. Side effects can include gastrointestinal discomfort including nausea and vomiting, diarrhea and bleeding of the gut. Overdoses cause hyperkalemia which can lead to paresthesia, cardiac conduction blocks, fibrillation and arrhythmias, also sclerotic effects.'", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8IH12": "Fayetteville Nc", "3GKAWYFRAPR3JH2G6DUF1BFXMWWDPU": "My boyfriend is kind of an ape, does he count? Then just one.", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP7LS0": "Also, if you can't afford to pay for health insurance and your job doesn't offer it, or if they do it costs too much... then you're in big trouble. I had to go to the emergency room once and I didn't have health insurance.omg it was bad. Other than for urological reasons, the doctor should not have any reason for measuring the length of a problem free penis.", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIF3X9": "BCAAs are 3 of the 8 EAAs needed for muscle growth, but unlike other amino acids1/2", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOFT7N": "Overview of Chromosome 7 Project Objectives of the project Introduction to human chromosome 7 Progess of the project References --------------------------------------. To refine. Importantly, these repeated regions contain active genes, so understanding the positions that are involved in making the duplication chromosomes may help us understand the variability in the symptoms of people who carry duplications- the symptoms may depend on the regions that are duplicated, which repeat was involved and possibly the specific position of the exchange within the repeat. What do we know about the region that gets duplicated? The most commonly duplicated region contains at least 20 genes. Importantly, the imprinting process that regulates activity of these genes from the specific chromosomes is most apparent in brain, while in other tissues in the body both maternal and paternal genes are active. We plan to extend these analyses on the larger group when we have completed the clinical assessment.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQW01WR": "Upgrading a VPS hosting plan is easy to do and can be done at any time.The full root access offered by Hostgator allows VPS customers to install software to further customize their hosting for their own needs.Dedicated Servers Dedicated servers for either Linux or Windows are also available for purchase by Hostgator customers.", "3FDWKV9VCN0JFGGP0SSCU7PQ3RGUMP": "Category:OB GYN Share this conversation Expert: Dr. Norm S. replied5 years ago. Do your periods come regularly every month? Are you on the pill? Have you had much stress lately? Thank you. Ask Your Own OB GYN Question Customer: replied5 years ago. they come regularly and I'm not on the pill...stress has been no more than usual, which is really pretty low. Expert: Dr. Norm S. replied5 years ago. Usually a brownish discharge like you've described would indicate that you didn't ovulate. When you don't ovulate, the hormone changes that cause the uterine lining to clean off with a period aren't there. Consequently the lining doesn't clean off and further bleeding or spotting or brown discharge can occur. Usually if you don't ovulate, your period doesn't come exactly when expected, so it doesn't quite fit with your story. However, it's still the most likely reason for the abnormal spotting. Not ovulating happens to all women at times.", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF9F73": "or Login with Facebook Or sign up now for your FREE account.Go Sign Out DashboardProfileMyPlateMy FriendsMy InboxSettings LIVESTRONG.COM Food and Drink Diet and Nutrition Protein Is Whey Protein Good or Bad?Is Whey Protein Good or Bad?Last Updated: Apr 14, 2015 By Joseph Eitel Scoop of whey protein.Photo Credit JANIFEST/iStock/Getty Images Whey protein supplements are convenient and possibly beneficial for some people, but only when taken correctly.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3S7AXC": "Augustus First Roman Emperor 63 B.C. - 14 C.E.", "3GL25Y6843SBWKAK5X3ZEEOUX9ZMXB": "You have to find out the triggers, is it when you have a lot to do or are tied for time to get places that you feel anxious? Or is it people in your life? Finally - you have got to pull it together and do what you need to do to get the help you need because if you are only 14 years old and last year you missed 56 days of school - you are going to grow up without a proper education, which will only make you feel worse about yourself, intensifying your problems.", "37S0QRNUFBE6WU783OHOTX66MVZ88Z": "31.?. ?.201 ? 1 ? About Diffen Log in / Register Request a Comparison Submit Feedback Stay connected  All rights reserved.Terms of use  Privacy policy share x Up next Catholic vs.Protestant", "324N5FAHSX9O275MK6P1BGZ5STVVKB": "nullHi. I think that it all depends on what motivates your travel? You can visit Switzerland any time throughout the year. Summer lasts roughly from June to September and offers the most pleasant climate for outdoor pursuits. Unfortunately, you won't be the only tourist during this period, so prices can be high, accommodation hard to find and the mainstream sights crowded. You'll find much better deals and fewer crowds in the shoulder seasons of April-May and late-September-October. At any time, as you travel around the country you'll hit many different climatic conditions. The continental climate in the Alps tends to show the greatest extremes between summer and winter. Mid-August to late October generally has fairly settled weather, and is a good period for hiking trips. If you're keen on winter sports, resorts in the Alps begin operating in early December, move into full swing around Christmas, and close down when the snow begins to melt in April.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXU202": "Biggest thing I think is learn to love your body. Take care of it and protect it...eat right...watch what you eat and drink...share it only with those you completely trust...and always protect yourself. If you love your body...then whomever you share it with will realize that ...... and they will be more respectful, caring, and responsive to you.and i think watergraymutt's answer is right....", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDYWJO": "Because those tissues were predetermined to become nipples, just that men received the hormones as embryos to not grow breasts. Same thing for females with the clitoris it just never received enough male hormones to grow into a penis during the embryonic stage. Hormones are the reason why men can grow breasts (man boobs) and how women bodybuilders can enlarge their clitoris (steroids).", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO4Y4U": "who has been cheating? perhaps, the key here is that you don't really know the daddy. horrorfan 69 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. horrorfan horrorfan Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1FZJZY": "I had to be sat down and given ginger-ale and crackers.Hope this helps.Good luck.", "3N2YPY1GI6WLG7DCOKEYDLM08W0EVB": "There were three alternatives to the Atomic bombing of Japan with it?? attendant 200,000 (approx) casualties   Firstly, hold off on the Nukes and bomb the Japanese into submission using conventional bombs. Remember that 120,000 people died in one raid on Tokyo and it appeared to have no effect on the Japanese will to continue fighting. Add to that the vitriol that has been poured out in the last 60 years over the use of conventional bombing in Europe and whatever was done in the way of bombing would have been attacked by the Bleeding Heart Liberals. So that one cannot be done without people complaining about it in 60 years time   Secondly, invade the Japanese home islands where the civilian population were being trained to take on the invaders with carving knives attached to broom handles. The estimates for casualties, based on Iwo Jima and Okinawa were approximately 500,000 allied casualties and up to 2.5 million Japanese. Macarthur, Truman and anyone else in the top brass would h", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZH9VT": "There is a possibility of being fertile as women have gotten pregnant soon after stopping their BC. It may also depend on when you stopped them. Different birth control pills do different things to different people.", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ545P": "truthteller, you are naughty! Naughty! I am smacking your wrist, see?", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYGXSX": "What I did to survive my high school year: - Read during Lunch - Draw during lunch - Join lots of clubs - Isolate myself from others until the perfect oppurtunity has arrived (Not Recommended) - Acting all mysterious so people would either leave me alone or unresistibly notice me   Opinion 2: I Graduated last year, and i went through everything you are going through for several years, so listen up. First thing is first, Take a DEEP BREATH! Breath in and out.. Anxiety is nothing to mess with, you need to start exercising, yoga or even stretching, get into the habit of it, because stress will be a problem for you,( its nothing to be worried about of course, its very manageable but stretching and meditating will help.) When i was in middle school up to my sophomore year i felt exactly what you feel like. Looking back i would say what helped me the MOST was actually joining in. So when i was in middle school i was very awkward and i sat at the back of the class, and i didn't know how to in", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC7493L4S": "If this is your first visit, be sure to check out the FAQ by clicking the link above. You may have to register before you can post: click the register link above to ... The new MSN, Your customizable collection of the best in news, sports, entertainment, money, weather, travel, health, and lifestyle, combined with Outlook, Facebook ... Find the latest sports news and articles on the NFL, MLB, NBA, NHL, NCAA college football, NCAA college basketball and more at ABC News. We know your time is valuable. Select the type of help you need, then provide us with some basic information including your contact phone number. The Real-Time Contact Center: Strategies, Tactics, and Technologies for Building a Profitable Service and Sales Operation Donna Fluss on Amazon.com. FREE ?? Im sad nobody likes me Blixin The Reindeer SO STUPID RUDOLPH WITH HIS BRIGHT RED DUMB NOES GETS ALL THE FAME SOOOOOOOOO I HELP SANTA TOOO ?", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB5Z8PJ": "I worry so much that I get worried when I'm not worried because I feel like I'm forgetting something that I should be worried", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP572PA": "I dont think children should take care of parents that dont do their job just because they are irresponsible. Maybe there is an organization near where you live that can help you live alone with your brother (I guess you are at least 16) and if you take care of yourselves the money you earn will go to your benefit and maybe you can combine some study too. dont let anyone ruin it. You can be in touch with your family and love them and help when you can. Dont forget that if you dont take care of yourself and put your needs first...no one will do it for you... don,t do it..this dentist is just trying to make some money out of you..stop smoking that will help..bleaching will make your teeth very sensitive as well.and very white teeth looks completely unnatural..and no it should not be free on the NHS..do you know how much the stuff costs?....why should tax payers pay for your vanity", "324N5FAHSX9O275MK6P1BGZ5STXKV2": "... im a 15 year old girl. please help! i feel like im going to die! ... I have a lot of blood in my pee, and it hurts please help!", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVHB1K": "Exercise regularly to improve your leg strength, circulation, and vein strength.", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIG3XA": "The easiest thing to do is go to local buisinesses, for example large chain restaurants and ask them for a donation form. Most restaurants are aloted a donation budget each month but you do have to go through their corporate offices. Fill out the donation form and send it in.", "3XQ4XW3OD9ADTZKS15ES0XT4CPD2SP": "neither, you were screwed whoever won. fight for the south and you get to stay in slavery, or fight for the north and you get put out with no job, no money, no education, no respect. I think Americans have a very skewed view of Africa and Africans.", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP2217": "Pets can add so much to a childs life, but many animals -- especially cats, dogs, and birds  are common allergic triggers. Always consult your childs doctor before getting a pet. Your doctor might suggest allergy testing or controlled exposure first. If you already have a pet in your home, have an honest discussion with your doctor about the risks. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Archived: March 20, 2014 Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. Choose as Best Answer Read the Original Article: Asthma in Children: 12 Questions to Ask Your Doctor", "3VAOOVPI3ZQWQ8BAR2ZW37EIQVXLLK": "She wasn't Amy's daughter, but Amy's and Meg's and Jo's sister and Marmee's daughter. Yes, Beth died in chapter 40 - The Valley of the Shadow. She never regained complete health after contracting Scarlet Fever years before. The book doesn't precisely tell you the cause of her death, but you know she never fully recovered from that life-threatening disease. You can read the story http://www.online-literature.com/alcott/littlewomen/ or search for things in it. In fact, Beth was truly the name of Louisa May Alcott's sister who died very young. Elizabeth (or Beth or Lizzy) died in real life at age 22 from complications of Scarlet Fever. Louisa's youngest sister, May (the pattern for Amy), died from complications of childbirth.", "3OWZNK3RYLNT8CCWQA9SFYBSXMZ2U6": "In fact, Im still getting them. A small injury, like a badly scratched mosquito bite with a hint of infection(or maybe a zit)- anything like that and I'm quite likely to add another mole to the collection. If I ever decide to have a tattoo all the artist would have to do is to join the dots. What you need to do is to watch them fornbsp. rate of growth, tenderness, bleeding, flaky/scaly surface. Rapid growth and/or any of the previously listed are good reasons to have them checked out by a specialist(and possibly removed) as they can be precursors to skin cancer. dabac 86 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. dabac dabac Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "33W1NHWFYHJ4EA0JFCSWXDZXZHUTZH": "Sharpie....college logos on staff bags only. MooseOutFrontshuldatoldya", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LTHW3": "Hmmm, the fact that they are in your bootyhole too means it's prob related to the shaving. Did you shave there too? If so it's razor bumps prob. If they are kind of zit like. try using some hydrocortizone / anti fungal cream. Could be an STD but only you would know that. see a doc. BTW, not related to your UTI. does your BF know you shaved your butthole with his razor ?", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CRZODN": "It's not the size of the boat but the motion of the ocean. penis sizes!", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS5ZAY": "Here's a link that should get you started.", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0TC3I": "No matter how many times the offspring are bred they would always be mixed New Zealands. Generation 1 3/4 New Zealand 1/4 mix, generation 2 bred to father 4/5 NZ 1/5 mixed. Generation 3 4/6 NZ 2/6 mixed. They could look pure new Zealand but once breed could show the mixed in the litter. Same as with humans, say a person with red hair had a child with a person with brown hair or blond hair. The red hair might now show up for a few generations and all of a sudden a child is born with red hair. Once something is in the dna it can show up even 20 generations later.", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ2GMC": "'I checked her nasal cavity and found a lot of fly maggots there,' Tawee told the paper. The maggots had eaten so much of her nasal tissue that some of her cartilage was exposed, Tawee added. He anesthetized the woman and during an operation removed 34 maggots from inside her nose.", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RBI2D": "Just a few months. Answer by Dave Submitted on 11/18/2006 Rating: Not yet rated Ratethis answer: N/AWorstWeakOKGoodGreat I have a massive dog, he is just 6 years old, ideal companion, a one man dog faultless.Hope he lives longer than the expected  Answer by SHORTY Submitted on 12/7/2006 Rating: Not yet rated Ratethis answer: N/AWorstWeakOKGoodGreat MY ROTTI HAS CANCER SHE IS 14TEEN.I LOVE HER AS ONE OF MY KIDS.I WAS READING THIS PAGE AND IN A WAY GOT SCARE JUST THINKING THAT I WONT HAVE HER SOON.I READ THE LIFE SPAND.AND I KNOW I'M LUCKY TO HAVE HER THIS LONG.BUT I PRAYE FOR HER TO LIVE LONGER.", "3S829FDFT2Z8SQ47S44WVO10OV7DXK": "Therrien better give them a piece of his mind. It's getting unbelievably ridiculous. And it's only the first period!", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXDVF8": "Results from the women's World Cup super-combined event here Sunday which featured a downhill and slalom: 1. Janica Kostelic (CRO) 2:19.35 (1:35.65  43.70), 2. Anja Paerson (SWE) 2:19.78 (1:36.46  43.32), 3.", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRT0S3": "I am usually not a supporter of weight loss pills, but TwinLab's Extreme Fat Burn supplements work wonders. The ingredients are all natural, etc. If you combine those with a healthy eating and workout plan, you'll get amazing results. For workout, weight training every other day increases speed of weight loss, and do cardio on an elyptical for about 30 minutes on days you aren't weight training.", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI69YID": "They can be spayed at any age. She shouldn't change much. A cats personality is more likely to change negatively when she's in heat and raising litters, than if she's spayed.", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EI63K": "Total Metal Jacket. is intended to keep airborne lead to a minimum. Some ranges require it. TMJ completely surrounds the lead core with copper.", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEDO3S": "I spray the bottom of my pants leg with Deep Woods Off.", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0N0E5": "So hopefully , I can offer some new tips and tricks along the way . Here are a few things to keep in mind about learning how to draw , and the cartoon drawing lessons here on this site - before you start drawing . Click on one of the following links , and you 'll be taken further on down the page to learn more ...", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX5GH5": "In his living room you see: your old friend, an attractive stranger, and a cuddly dog.Whats on your mind?Can't wait to talk to my friend!", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9D24L": "nullMany, many reasons...  As I see it, the primary reason was the combination of a slave-based economy with a very decentralized and inefficient trade system. That is, with the exception of a few very large cities (e.g. Rome) and their accordingly very large populations, all of a village/town/region's needs were met with local resources. Also, all of these resources were produced with slave labor, i.e. very cheaply. A farmer in Syracusae and a farmer in Britannia would each be producing food for roughly the same cost, as after the initial purchase of the slaves, there was no external upkeep beyond the land tax. So, if you're a farmer in Syracuse, and you want to try to sell your surplus grain outside of your locality, you have to ship it. And that suddenly adds a massive cost to your product, immediately giving your product a huge disadvantage against the locally produced product. Shipping and transportation at this time was slow, expensive, risky, and dangerous.", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR00XPNN": "Don't eat late at night. Eating late at night can cause you to store more fat in your waist and stomach. Stop eating 3 hours before your go to bed. If you need a snack, eat something healthy like a piece of fruit or a handful of nuts (unsalted). Eat often, but in small portions. The less your body peaks and falls on the blood sugar scale, the less likely it will be to overeat and/or store unwanted fat. Ideally, cut calories, but dont starve yourself. If you eat the right foods and eat often enough, you wont find yourself eating huge portions and overeating in general. Eat fats like fish oil, sunflower oil, flax seed oil. Also whole grains, legumes, and vegetables and limiting meats. Ease up on the salt and gassy foods that cause you to bloat. Cleanse. You need to cleanse and detoxify your body to get rid of toxic waist that my be building up in your intestines and causing your to be more bloated. Try a detox such as the Master Cleanse. Get out and move.", "37AQKJ12TXM8SYRK9K3EBPYGEL4TTX": "Massage gently into scalp and hair. Avocado Oil (Refined): A light, premium base oil. Ideal for salt rubs (saturate 4 ounces of sea salt with Avocado Oil to use as an exfoliant body scrub) Coconut Oil: The ideal choice for massage if you are concerned about soiled sheets, as Coconut Oil washes out easily. Grapeseed Oil: Silky and highly absorbent, this lovely pale green European oil is an excellent base for aromatherapy massage and often recommended for infant massage. Hazelnut Oil: A luxurious and subtly fragrant, silky body oil. Sweet Almond Oil: A very nurturing and luxurious, pure vegetable oil. It can also be added to massage oil, salves  ointments to prolong shelf life. Try applying or take extra virgin coconut oil orally. Much research has been done on coconut oil until it is now dubbed 'nature's healthiest oil'. To quote Dr. Mary Enig: 'The research over four decades concerning coconut oil in the diet and heart disease is quite clear: coconut oil has been shown to be benefi...", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014W1YM": "I've been doing multiple intact dogs for nearly 40 years. I've NEVER had an 'ooooooooops'!!! But then I'm a sane ADULT w/more braincells than fingersa rarity now-days.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXPJDZ": "A newborn kitten recently entered the world with two faces and, hopefully, at least nine lives. Gemini was born Sunday with two mouths, two tongues, two noses and four eyes. 'I kind of feel sorry for her, because I can't know for a fact if she's going to live or die,' its owner, Lee Bluetear, told the (Roseburg) News-Review.", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBIB5Y": "Yup - sometimes they do. Sometimes they don't and that is when they recommend surgery. The only way to know for sure if you have them is to have an ultrasound. It is also possible that you have endometriosis. Which is when the lining of your uterus bleed OUTSIDE the uterus causing scar tissue. This can cause quite a bit of pelvic pain. I would go to another gyno for a second opinion.", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP5SL5": "If I haven't had sex, and I've missed my period almost twice. What could be wrong with me and should I be worried. I masturbate daily, I have never had sex, I do use penetrational toys sometimes. My period is irregular, and sometimes I miss a cycle but that's normal for me, but I've never missed it two consecutive times in a row. Youre in good hands, meet ATDs founding physicians. Dr. Suneel Sharman CMO ATD Health Network Inc. Adjunct Professor at U Of T Dr. Kunaal Jindal Director ATD Health Network Inc. Fellowship Training Atlanta, GA Spotting during second pack of pills Spotting during second pack of pills taken without a break but going on holiday next week, i am usually due on at this time. Will the breakthrough bleeding have gone by my holiday next week?or will it continue until a break Long period while on birth control pills I am taking a low dosage birth control pill. I take it without taking the placebo at the end of three weeks. The first month it was fine, but now that I a", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6O8A6I": "Amazon has used copies starting at 0.01. It appears that they are out of stock of new books, so that might be why the price is so high. Also, they may only have a hardback book instead of a paperback or magazine style version, which would be more as well. If you don't mind buying used, then you should be able to get a copy for about the same price, delivered, as you paid for your first book. I have had no problems buying used off Amazon - just look for a seller with good feedback and reasonable condition and pricing. You may need to get some help with the online purchase if you don't have a credit card you can use, buy a pre-paid Visa at Wal-Mart or another store and you should be able to buy it. Good luck http://www.amazon.com/Disappearance-W-I-T-C-H-Chapter-Book/dp/0786817291/refsr12?ieUTF8sbooksqid1210872749sr1-2", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5G6OH": "I have rarely come across a British person who has good clean teeth, even dentists. When I was younger I ate alot of sweets and later I was worried my teeth started moving and I harrassed every dentish in my county to give me a note to get my teeth fixed. I am taking off my brace in 2 months.", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF7F71": "I would not suggest this as a healthy lifestyle, but If you eat lots of fats and sugars together like a burger with ice cream or a soda, then you will gain weight. It will put pounds on in no time. The key is to eat them together. But for a  normal diet, you also need veggies and lean meat too. And dont consume too much sugar at one time for too long, cause it will throw your body off balance. Drink water too instead of pop, even though pop will make you plumper.", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRU0S4": "A bordetella shot is considered current within 6 months of being boarded Most places require the shot within 6 months of boarding, but this will vary. Is There A Vaccination For Bordetella? An intranasal vaccination (meaning to squirt some up each nostril) is used to protect against Bordetella or your veterinarian may prefer the injectable vaccine. The vaccine also usually includes protection against Parainfluenza. What Is The Recommended ended Protocol For The Bordetella Vaccination? This will vary from region to region so what I'm describing here is simply an example of a Bordetella vaccination program and may not be what your veterinarian recommends. You can usually give an intranasal dose at least one week prior to boarding or exposure to Canine Cough situations (exposure to other dogs). Boosters are recommended yearly if the dog is not being boarded or to be current within the last 6 months prior to boarding.", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWRCMCA": "Evelyn Ray sounds nice to me... Evelyn May Evelyn is also nice alone. Evelyn Hatch Evelyn Hatch was a child friend of the adult Charles Lutwidge Dodgson, better known by his pen name of Lewis Carroll. Evelyn Maud Hatch was born in 1871 to Edwin and Evelyn Hatch. Evelyn, along with her sisters, was introduced to Dodgson through mutual acquaintances. Evelyn's family were of an upper middle class station and they became friends with Dodgson. Both Evelyn and her older sister Beatrice were muses of Dodgson who were each photographed clothed and nude. Beatrice, rather than Evelyn, was considered the 'long term favorite of Dodgson.' Dodgson's friendship with Evelyn continued for a number of years, however, lasting until his death when Evelyn was in adulthood. The photograph to the left was taken by Dodgson and is of Evelyn at age 8. He blurs her nipples and has her cross her legs again to hide genitalia and to suggest he is not commenting on the childs reproductive ability, but her inno...", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXEFVT": "Hi dear Robin  step 1 -11  3/2   (-11  3) / 2  -33 / 2   Step 2 0.12 / -12   - 0.01  -1/100   Step 3 (-33 / 2)  (-1/100)  ( -33  -1) / ( 2  100)   33 / 200    0.165  Good Luck  you can solve it by calculator as well", "3IHWR4LC7DBZL0JLCATF6M0KPR6I8J": "Mixed tension migraine Mixed tension migraines are also known as mixed migraines or mixed headaches. They combine characteristics of tension headaches and migraines and are often presented as a third class of migraines (the first two being common and classic migraines). A person may also be thought to have this condition when they already experience migraines and then begin to experience chronic daily muscle tension headaches in addition to migraines. It has been found, in some cases, that this type of seizure is instigated by the migraine preceding it, coining the term 'migraine-triggered seizure'. The neurological condition that combines migraines with epileptic seizures is known as migralepsy. Regular exercise, such as swimming or vigorous walking, can also reduce the frequency and severity of migraine headaches. Drug therapy for migraine is often combined with biofeedback and relaxation training. One of the most commonly used drugs for the relief of migraine symptoms is sumatrip...", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J8534": "Retin-A will dry out your skin, but, it is a great product. try Oil of Olay overnight moisturizer, it works wonders.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZOBY3C": "no. anyway you do it at home will make him torture not die peacefully. Vets will usually work with you on a payment plan for this..just call them. Please do not attempt to do this at home. One of our other ABer's did that and her dog died slowly and painfully for days. If you give them an OD of 'human drugs' they won't die fast, they will die slowly and painfully while every organ shuts down and they struggle to breath. IF YOU LOVE YOUR DOG, borrow the money, work it out with the vet, somehow do it humanely. It's not that expensive and at the vet, it will be quick and humane.", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYFRJC": "A casket with a U.S. flag draped over it.", "31SIZS5W59DIK3M0OR4O65MB6T8QR3": "your so lucky you live in jacksonville there is a really good gerbil breeder by you. here's information for you. name: Danielle Cromer email:shootingstargerbilsgmail. com website:www. shootingstargerbils. com go on there website see if u like them then email them and ask were there at in jacksonville and tell them u want to adopt or they can drop the gerbil off but it's a 1 per mile.", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3431L": "The feeling of thorns sticking out my back and the tingling , burning and cold feeling is unbearable , why in this day in age is there not something to help us ? ve been feeling crawling under my skin , something that feels like spider webs , like I I am currently suffering with weird sensations began with what I could only describe as it was irritating but I could cope with it .", "3UV0D2KX1MHES8UTZZXHMD7N7DJF4J": "If it still hurts you can use the aloe. Snap open the leaf, remove the inner goop, and apply the gel to your burn. Since it is open now, it does run the risk of infection. For little raw burns like these, I usually tell people to keep it covered with antibiotic during the day, and leave it open to air at night when you are sleeping. It keeps it protected during the day, and lets it dry out and develop a scab to begin healing at night. I especially like the new Neosporin spray- it's not nearly as goopy as the ointment, and lets everything breath a bit. Best of luck-", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0X2MF": "Hare games Hare games are two-player abstract strategy board games that were popular in medieval northern Europe up until the 19th century. In this game, a hare is trying to get past three dogs who are trying to surround it and trap it. The three dogs are represented by three pieces which normally start on one end of the board, and the hare is represented by one piece that usually starts in the middle of the board or is dropped on any vacant point in the beginning of the game.", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVSCZF": "At the core of  religious mysticism is the understanding that God is unknowable, unnameable, ungraspable, etc., but when ordinary preachers speak about their faith, they presume to give characteristics to their God that  are human in nature..", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKBHQY": "never doubt me", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO75EXB": "You want to keep your drinking buddy's, or your wife! I would keep my wife because your buddy's most likely aren't sleeping with you are they.", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSSH4F": "put it off you can loose your nail forever slight chance of that happening maybe This does indeed sound like a corn. Red bumps on the skin of your big toes may show up all . - Cached Bump On My Toe - Image Results More Bump On My Toe images . - Cached I have itchy clear bumps. More results from answers.yahoo.com  What is this bump on my toe? ChaCha - Questions  Answers . What is this bump on my toe? ChaCha Answer: A bump or lump on the toe is most likely a wart, ganglion cyst, blister, or perhaps somet. recently i have noticed there are clear/browny orange bumps forming on my last three toes and the skin is peeling around it. healthquestions.medhelp.org/bumps-on-t. - Cached I'm starting to get a big bump on the outside of my little . I'm starting to get a big bump on the outside of my little toe. Search Related bump on my toe knuckle what is this bump on my toe i have a bump on my toe hard bump on my toe painful bump on my toe small bump on my toe red bump on my toe big bump on my toe", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBJPBY": "A: became a world power B: opposed german reunification C: was unable to reduce it's national debt D: had a significant decrease in trade with allied countries", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNEKDRM": "... The short answer to your question on how many goldfish can you ... Common goldfish will require an even bigger tank again or a pond. ... 16th January 2011, 07:55 ..... White Cloud Mountain Minnows, 6 to 8 of them as they are a?... They have bred many times with great success however, due to other ... 12. fancy goldfish ranchu white large fish five inches, 10/05/15, Yes ... a show tank. any questions call andy on 07973828670. i will be adding more...", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCC9JA": "Losing a pet is never easy on the heart, and I'm sure you can look back at things you could have done differently to have avoided this loss. For many people, the loss of a pet is just as devastating as the loss of a family member. You take the time to grieve- no matter how long that time may be  as each day goes by you learn to deal with the pain like a wound that heals, but leaves a scar to constantly remind you of the moment that 'it' happened. Sometimes a new pet can help heal the loss from the one that is no longer with you. It is because you still have the love to give to the pet that is gone, so you shower it on the new pet that comes into your life. Every time, but EVERY time someone asks how to deal with losing a beloved pet. I've lost two, and it was like losing my heart. How long have you had your poor cat? Try to relieve this love your cat. If you don't have the time or patience to deal with your cat lovingly, you shouldn't have a pet.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNNRLH": "Hmm, interesting. But yeah, I think that some people can actually cry without shedding a tear. I've seen some that make-up the tear effect with the sobbing and lack of breathe effect. Peace ", "3KA7IJSNW63A4K4WSH396LRXJBNPB2": "It is thought that panic disorder may result from an imbalance of chemicals in the brain (neurotransmitters). Panic disorder also may be passed down through families (genetic). Children of parents who have panic disorder are up to 8 times more likely to develop panic disorder.", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6O96AF": "Hello Jambo,    After cancer treatment has finished it is relatively common for people to feel worried and frightened about the possibility of the cancer coming back. This can be hard to live with, but with time and the support of family and friend?? most people find that they are able to feel less frightened and worried. It is not possible for me to give you reliable information about your own situation, as the risk of relapse is different for each person with Burkitt?? lymphoma   But it may be helpful to know that children with lymphoma tend to have a good outlook and many children with Burkitt?? lymphoma are cured. it responds very well to the intensive treatments that doctors use today. I am unsure if you have been able to talk to your parent?? or the doctors and nurses involved in your care. You could ask your doctor or nurse to talk realistically about the chances of the cancer coming back, as they are the only people who can answer your question. Disclaimer: We hope thi", "3VEI3XUCZRVXKRLLOEPZ60W11XMPRB": "I'm so sure they are wrong. You are in no way day, you are gorgeous", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW28VZX": "The reason you come too quickly when you suffer from premature ejaculation is because there?? too much friction on your penis. The stimulation gets too intense and your climax is triggered. So, what can you do to stop this from happening? You can increase the lubrication. One common way to do this is to use shop-bought lube, like KY jelly or something. This is okay, but it?? not great. You have to keep applying it, which is annoying for you and your partner. A much better way is to pleasure your partner so much before and during sex that she becomes and stays soaking wet herself, without the aid of artificial lube. This is a good idea for two reasons. First, it keeps things slick, so the friction is lessened and your sexual performance is extended and second, you break up sexual intercourse with other pleasurable activities which not only keep your partner wet, but also keep her turned on and enjoying the sex like crazy. Here a few ways to do this. Remember: make foreplay last at lea", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT9F16": "Well, sounds bad. Did you talk to your doctor already?", "3T5ZXGO9DEMRMU8RY8Y1S8OAFAQQZV": "I hope all the spinning is something easy  he gets happy again.Good luck!reply Posted by kaitlyn N on January 30,2012 at 03:22 PM if your dog is spinning a lot that usually is a sign of worms, it is very common symptom/sign in horses moreso than dogs..", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCGJQ6": "He was no more important than the Bishops of Alexandria, Byzantium, Antioch or Jerusalem. He did not pronounce doctrine binding on the rest of the Church. He did not appoint Bishops.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIOICM": "Most women experience pelvic pain at some time during their lives. Many times pelvic pain is just the normal functioning of the reproductive or other organs. There are many causes of back pain/kidney pain that are not picked up by a CT..", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRTOUW": "Network Engineer is needed urgently with the following qualifications. Qualifications:  Graduation... http://t.co/SE4FWoMvSg", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUK1MY": "There isn't a real way to stop your period once it has started. As well, it's always healthier to allow it to run it's course. Especially being in a relationship, your boyfriend needs to understand you're bound to get your period while seeing him. Good luck, and just wait it out.", "3ZVPAMTJWN1R7ESMLVZCCRI9061RGB": "Anything under 50 gallons isn't big enough for angelfish AND your current fish. You can, if you have over 50gallons. Angelfish are really happier in groups of 3 (or more), so you could get 3 angelfish, plus your current fish, for a 50gallon tank.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0AZI2": "I'm a bit older than the average Joe here so back in my day things were different. I don't like the opera, plays or musicals. I don't like Madonnna. I don't wear designer clothing or use cologne/perfume or cosmetics except for the rare aftershave. My deodorant is mens not womens or unisex. I am a registered Republican, a moderate Republican. I don't like the chimp in the white house. I don't shave my pits or down there other than one time when I was younger and in a very sexually intense relationship. I don't hunt but I do fish and enjoy it. I have never considered the vegan lifestyle. I am a person of faith believing in a supreme creator and an afterlife aka heaven or hell. I do brush my teeth daily as I would like to keep them for a very long time. I bathe daily. I've never bought GQ magazine or any other men's fashion magazine. I have bought underwear from Undergear but it was underwear not thongs and the undies were for my boyfriend and myself. I've never worn o", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPAR06": "Female Health Vaginal Discharge Vaginal discharge is normal and varies during your menstrual cycle. If worried, see a doctor. Different Types of Discharge Is this normal? White: Thick, white discharge is common at the beginning and end of your cycle. Normal white discharge is not accompanied by itching. Vaginal discharge is normal and varies during your menstrual cycle. If worried, see a doctor. Different Types of Discharge White: Thick, white discharge is common at the beginning and end of your cycle. Normal white discharge is not accompanied by itching. If itching is present, thick white discharge can indicate a yeast infection. Clear and stretchy: This is 'fertile' mucous and means you are ovulating. Vaginal discharge is normal and varies during your menstrual cycle. If worried, see a doctor. White: Thick, white discharge is common at the beginning and end of your cycle. Normal white discharge is not accompanied by itching. Pain Itching Discomfort Rash or sores alone or with a va...", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3FS3S": "There are two basic causes of cramping. One is inadequate oxygenation of muscle, and the other is lack of water or salt. Cramps from poor oxygenation can be improved by rapid deep breathing, as well as stretching the muscle.", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E6RCY": "Tubular Breast/Tuberous Breast http://t.co/k60kBnofrr", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI6AYIE": "I agree with the other about the blockage, that is a possiblity. I have 2 female geckos as well (4 years old and 1 year old) and the oldest went through a phase of not eating as well. I wouldn't put more in the cage than it would eat in one sitting because the ones that are left could bite your gecko (they get hungry) I have had geckos before and I would feed them like 4 crickets or 4 meal worms a day.", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRH01K": "kiwi is fiber rich..  if u wana increase ur blood sugar, u need 2 concentrate on vit. How bad is a blood sugar level of 470?''", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2OAHJ": "You weigh 144 pounds. You burn 1440 calories each day just carrying your weight around. If you ate 800 calories per day or less (don't starve yourself) and drank plenty of water, you could loose the 24 pounds in 16 weeks. That excludes exercise. But, if you also work out for 15-30 minutes each day you should be able to achieve your goal. Remember though, just because you are working out doesn't mean that you will loose, you have to stay on your eating regiments. I know all this from personal experience. I weighed over 330 and now am down to 250 in less than a year from just changing my eating habits.", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8QBWJ": "Chocolate is very bad for cats-and dogs for that matter-but giving your cat a little bit of dairy normally isn't harmful. Everyone I know who has had cats or dogs says just about the same, so you should probably avoid chocolate completely. qte39 is right, chocolate is like poison to cats and dogs It depends where you live, if you live in a big city then people will pay more like 30 for small dogs 50 for medium dogs, and about 100 for large dogs or they may even start at 50 like 50 for small, 80 for medium and 100 for large, but that's for 1 dog, so if she walks 5 large dogs then that would be 500 dollars for each day!!! but that's only for the large dogs!!", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FC6YP": "The Depo shot is horrible. It was the worst form of birth control i ever tried. It can cause long term effects in your body depending on the person of course.", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1S29I": "once you figure that out for consistant weight gain, back it off and try to manage it.Atelast all said and done this all works for me , i should , or atleast could, for you too.Good luck!", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSUH4H": "Ok..read everything..   My dog was pooping in the house too. He'd never urinate, he'd just poop, like yours. I thought it was medical but he was negative for any worms. So i thought he just had a sensitive stomach. I began adding things to his food to help a sensitive stomach..like canned pumpkin (supposed to firm up stools), sweet potatoe, oatmeal and rice (all supposed to soothe stomach). None of that did any good either and I gave it months. (he's 10 months old now). Finally about 3 weeks ago, it just couldn't continue. It's unsanitary to have that poop sitting in the house..you can easily get e-coli without even knowing it, plus I have other pets in the house, plus all the bacteria that gets left in the carpet and floor..yuck.. So, I just tweaked his exercise schedule and when I COULD NOT physically be there to watch him, he went into the crate with a kong. (I'll get to kong stuffings in a minute). Now I'm a mush...if he whined, i wanted to just open the crate door and hug h", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M193K34": "but liiiiiiiiike, sweets are SO good. CantStopWontStop", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE16PIA": "Today , baby boomers who remember their childhood trips to Florida collect these truly tacky treasures , popularly referred to as ?kitsch '' , ?shabby chic? or ?gaudy gone good.? Most were produced by the Japanese , some say as revenge for losing the war . The pop-revival of these counterculture , mid-century miscreants and their Florida trademark status has , until recently , overshadowed earlier Florida souvenirs . But this is beginning to change . It appears Florida?s rampant commercialism has finally offended enough citizens to create a beneficial backlash , both historically and environmentally .", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ1GMB": "Jun 1, 2013 ... We eat them for breakfast... with butter, with jelly, with cream cheese, as a ... Lunch..pizza bagels, sandwiches, hot, cold..you name it. ... Share Your Stuff Tu... Jun 15, 2013 ... We will see if he is pleasantly surprised with lemon but I will surely have ... 2 Tbsp . coconut oil or butter, melted ... Enjoy this high protein, low carb dish f... the of and to a in for 1 is s on 0 that by this 2 you with i or it 3 be are as at from your all 4 5 not com more have an new ... Well, it's happening? ?he hottest weather of the summer is right when school ... I can't tell you how much I love reading through your menus every week, and I'm ... la... ... If you bake it in a pie pan, it's a pie, right? ... You could eat it for breakfast (because it's totally healthy and packed full of ... How Many Calories Do I Burn? You might be wondering how many calories you burn during a particular exercise. Instead, you should be trying to figure out how much you ...", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL03LO2": "What are the contents of the specific regions of the body? Your question is very vague... But anyway i have nothing much to do today so here it is from head to toe, outer to inner... HEAD: skin and accessory organs, platisma, facial muscles, nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, scalp, external ear, oral cavity, teeth, tounge, orbit of the eyes, facial bones, meninges, brain including the CSF and blood NECK: skin and accessory organs, neck muscles, nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, trachea, esophagus, carotid artery, jugular vein, thyroid gland, para thyroid gland, cervical vertebrae, spinal cord. THORACIC: skin and accessory organs, thoracic musles(anterior and posterior), nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, rib cage, lungs, heart, respiratory tree, esophagus, thoracic vertebrae, spinal cord. ABDOMEN: skin and accessory organs, Abdominal musles(anterior and posterior), nerve, artery, vein, lymph nodes, stomach, small intestine(duodenum, jejunum, ileum), large intestine, appendix, sigmoid, k", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26TJ8U": "You could try the marine corp fitness test http://scetc.tecom.usmc.mil/SecurityAssistance/general/pft.asp or you can get a trainer to measure your fat level with calipers to see how much body fat your have. Email me if you want a good air purifier recommendation and if you have other questions. I loathe my fitness.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMQJ7A": "He started this famous series in 1972 and so far has published 56 novels. His most popular literary work up to date has been the Saimum Series, a series which showcases literary fiction combining suspense, romance and morality within a historical context and setting. Till now, 56 books have been published in this popular series. Behind that novel combination is a purposeful effort arising in human motivation. This articulation would suggest that we are just beginning to understand what might be required for a more robust theory of culture and culture change, one that brings coherence across many disciplines and reflects an integrating elegance. Cultural history Cultural history combines the approaches of anthropology and history to look at popular cultural traditions and cultural interpretations of historical experience. Jacob Burckhardt helped found cultural history as a discipline. 'Cultural studies' is an academic discipline popular among a diverse group of scholars.", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP3LSW": "nullWhat are Dental Implants? Dental implants are small metallic cylinders, shaped like the roots of natural teeth, that are surgically placed into the jawbone as a substitute for the natural tooth roots. The material of the implants is usually titanium or other bone-like substances that are very compatible with the body. Dental implants serve as anchors to the new replacement teeth which are attached to the part of the implant that projects through the gums. While high-tech in nature, dental implants are actually more tooth-saving than traditional bridgework, since implants do not rely on neighboring teeth for support. Dental implants are so natural looking and feeling, you may forget you ever lost a tooth. Who should have dental implants, am I a candidate? Almost anyone who has lost one or more natural teeth can benefit from dental implants. The ideal candidate for a dental implant is in good general and oral health.", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C1W50": "I would reconsider invisalign and go with regular braces. It all depends on your pain tolerence. I had regular braces and my teeth ached all the time. I know if I could have taken them off, I would have to stop the pain. With invisalign you CAN take them off to stop the pain, but that doesn't help your teeth. I would say with someone your age just go with regular braces. I had braces when I was in my late twenties and my orthodontist told me that adults benefit more from braces than do kids or teens because your face structure doesn't stop growing and your teeth don't stop moving until you become an adult. So if you have a low pain tolerance - don't get braces. With both, you will have pain, with the invisible ones you may want to remove them to stop the pain. I have had braces before (removed- 11/29/05 and now wear retainers). They hurt, but after a couple days the pain subsided and I ate normally. After each appointment, you will have some pain. Good luck with your decision on br...", "3XUY87HIVPC028BGRQ1Q3X8WQ5CMMO": "p?", "3VQTAXTYN3JNWPCS9323GREWRSAUBY": "u can try www.earth.google.com", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NIGZR": "Your British Libraries UK London sell fake archives of newspapers published https://t.co/lDRijX5q2U UK citizens deserve better", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PY472": "Buy yourself a couple of good introductory books. The answers to your questions will only raise more questions. You need a book full of facts.", "3ZLW647WALT99IZDBQDRSPLSK9E23X": "CHORUS: I dont care, I dont care, What they may think of me, Im happy go lucky, Men say I am plucky, So jolly and care free, I dont care, I dont care, If I do get the mean and stony stare, If Im never successful, It wont be distressful, Cos I dont care. VERSE: Some people say I think Im it, But I dont care, They say they dont like me a bit, But I dont care, You see Im sort of independent, Of a clever race descendant, My star is on the ascendant, Thats why I dont care. CHORUS: I dont care, I dont care, If people dont like me, Ill try to outlive it, I know Ill forgive it, And live contentedly, I dont care, I dont care, If people do not try to treat me fair, There is naught can amaze me, Dislike can not daze me, Cos I dont care. Its a shame that you wasted your time and money on her, but use this experience as a valuable lesson and move on! Dont take her calls, dont let her suck you back in. Get out and...", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X45LX4": "Get out of your head, for your mind has been the keeper of the veil of forgetfulness.Go forth from your heart.Allow yourself to feel the energy in your body.", "3VMHWJRYHVE5QAI3JAZMJO4L08KFXU": "You must understand that none of this is going to happen fast or easy. Second, it is not just appearances. Your body is your dwelling place for the rest of this life. Most people emphasize the arms, abs, and pectoral muscles because they like the appearance. Upper body is really not as significant as most think. The larger muscle groups are more critical to your long term development and your health. There are some things that you need to take into account in your early training to prevent injury and get better results sooner. New muscle needs to develop 'infrastructure' meaning blood supply first. You should start with very light weight and high reps and increase in reps for a while. How long that is depends on your age and physical condition. For most people that would be at least 1 month. The other thing you should do is to strengthen your shoulder rotator cuffs. People who get injured there may not be doing anything much for a year. You can find exercises for that on the web. Be su", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9V7VH": "Well being that I'm living proof of both STD's. The difference between the two are that herpes, they tend to be red sores that have fluid in them (very contagious) and are painful if squeezed. You may develop rashes on your behind. enlarge lymph nodes in the groin area. Genital Warts, it depends on the person because as I know it, they are warts in your your private area that for me they don't hurt and there is a large amount of itching that is accompanied with it. Hope this helps.", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMWEA7": "The Letter N:  Narcissus  means Egotism    Nasturtium  means Patriotism    Nettle, means Burning  Slander    Nettle Tree  means Concert   Night-Blooming Cereus  means Transient beauty   Night Convolvulus  means Night    Nightshade  means Truth     For the letter A:   Abecedary ???? Volubility   Abitina ???? Fickleness   Acacia ?? ?? Friendship   Acacia (rose or white)  Elegance   Acacia (Yellow) ?? ?? Secret Love    Acanthus??????.. The fine arts   Acalia ???????????? Temperance    Achilles Millefolia ??.. War    Aconite(wolfsbane)?? Misanthropy    Aconite Crowfoot  Luster    Adonis, Flos ??.. Painful recollections    African Marigold ??.. Vulgar minds   Agnus castus??.. Coldness, indifference    Agrimony ????.. Gratitude   Almond (common)  Indiscretion, stupidity    Almond (flowering)  Hope   Allspice  Compassion    Aloe  Grief    Althaea frutex  Persuasion    Alyssum  Worth beyond beauty   Amaranth (globe)  Unfading Love    Amaranth(cockscomb)  Affection   Amaryllis", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6Y0XE": "If your periods were 4 days long and are now 7 days long,then 4 days is what your body has considered normal.", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0B86F": "oh god I miss her?", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606S7NZ": "There might be a little more in the near future. Most males are not fully grown until about 18-20 years old. They mature later then females do. This is just fact and not any personal opinion. The chances of you getting much taller then you are now are doubtful though. The only way for any future inches would be surgical and not advised anyway. Why aren't you happy with your height right now. Most females aren't much more then your mom is so that can't be the reason. Just take a look at your dad and everything he's been able to achieve. The future is in your head not your body unless you want to play pro ball of some type. Those jobs don't come with any guarantee that you'll be picked as one of the best anyway. Put more emphasis on the future and what you'll be doing even 5 years from now. I do hope you're considering college of some type. Most employment today requires more then a high school diploma unless you want a minimum paying job and that won't support you unless you're planning", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E8KGC": "Before the emancipation from serfdom ( 1817 in ) only noblemen , free craftsmen or people living in towns had surnames . Therefore , the oldest Latvian surnames originate from German or Low German , reflecting the dominance of German as an official language in Latvia till the 19th century . Examples : ( son of Peter ) .", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEB8GE": "Hello,   3 types of workouts I like to talk about when it comes to reducing abdominal fat. The first type that you may be already doing in this case are abdominal workouts. The 2nd type that a lot of ab seakers think of and it has some effect are cardio exercises. The most effective one that is not quite famous when people want to reduce abdominal fat are exercises which focus on your main muscles. Here is a video about what you should do and what you should not  http://www.youtube.com/watch?vyaNTq37c3...   Cardio has benefits but when it comes to losing fat it is not the best. Ab exercises will make your abs hard and shape them as best as possible. What gives you the best reults in most cases are the whole body training exercises and after building muscle you will be burning fat even without exercising. Also it is very important to follow a fat loss diet. Combining exercises with a good diet is one of the best available solutions.", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SXH3V": "When you are losing weight, you should exercise and diet together. If you exercise without dieting, you will get bigger appetite, which will lead to increase of weight, or muscle grow underneath the fat layer, and make you bulkier. If you diet without exercising, you will become flabby and will have excess skin. For diet, go wheat free. No pasta, pizza, bread and so on. And no food after 7 p. People achieve marvellous results with it. Depending on your initial weight, you can drop upwards from 20 pounds a month. If you don't eat wheat then you don't eat all those sticky, fatty goey cakes, you don't eat junk food, and you don't eat biscuits. But your diet is still balanced. It costs nothing, and you do not have to calculate points or to buy special meals or plans. For exercising, start with walking, and then switch to running/jogging. Running is the most efficient and calorie-burn exercise ever.", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G9W4Y": "You don't need new breasts you need a new  boyfriend.", "3VMHWJRYHVE5QAI3JAZMJO4L08NFXX": "ive tried these and they really work, i no that some are for other things but i didnt feel like going through them all, well i hope the help, good luck :) . The Anywhere Butt-Buster: Firms and tones your butt! How to do it: Squeeze the butt together and hold for at least 15-30 seconds per squeeze. Step-Up to a New You: Works your butt and thighs! How to do it: All you need is a chair or workout bench. The One-Piece Plank: Tones your arms, chest, back, legs, butt and abs! How to do it: a. The Two-Piece Plank: Tones your lower back and core! How to do it: a. Half-Seated Hip Circle: Firms up your abs, thighs and sides! How to do it: a. How to do it: a. How to do it: a. Tidal Squat: Tones your butt, thighs, and legs! How to do it: a. Say 'Good Morning' and Hello to a Great Core: Shapes your legs butt, and lower back! How to do it: a. Keeping knees slightly bent and torso. Sunrise and Sets: Works your butt, legs shoulders and abs! How to do it: a. Alternate Legs: Perform 10-12 repetitions on each leg", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NHRKD": "First problem: you're eating raisin bran.", "3KL228NDMVK5KAFRVBQFBFWV5E8GK8": "Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki Atomic Bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki 6 Aug 1945 - 9 Aug 1945 Contributor: C. Peter Chen This article covers the atomic bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. For details on the conventional bombing of Japan, please see the article Bombing of Tokyo and Other Cities . On 16 Jul 1945, while President of the United States Harry Truman was at Potsdam, Germany to meet with his Allied counterparts, long-waited results reached him: The Manhattan Project, the American effort at building the atomic bomb, successfully detonated the first bomb during a test at Los Alamos, New Mexico, United States. Truman, unwilling to risk the huge amount of lives that might be lost on both sides should the Allies invade the Japanese home islands, ordered the usage of the new technology. The scientists presented them with two such weapons, while the military sought uranium to produce a third. Target Selection Between 10 and 11 May 1945, Oppenheimer led a committee which ca", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J3P4T": "I am 27 yrs old and still battle. My dermatologist told me at 17, 'You'll grow out of it'. The best advise I can give you is to use a mild soap, and a good moisturizer. Then go see a dermatologist, they will definitely be able to help, and its not that expensive. It's about 50 to 80 for the visit. And just in the first visit they will be able to tell you a lot. Time will heal it but until then: Wash your face, stop eating animal fat and speak with a dermatologist. Board-certified dermatologists have the medical training and experience needed to determine the most appropriate treatments for each patient. Diagnosis There are several forms of psoriasis, and each form has unique characteristics that allow dermatologists to visually identify psoriasis to determine what type, or types, of psoriasis is present. Phototherapy can require 2 to 5 weekly visits to a dermatologists office or psoriasis clinic for several weeks.", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5TF9B": "At the ARIA Music Awards of 1989, 1927 won 'Breakthrough Artist - Single' for 'That's When I Think of You' and 'Breakthrough Artist - Album' for '...ish'. At the 1990 ceremony the group won 'Best Video' for 'Compulsory Hero', which was directed by Geoff Barter. In 1999 rock music historian, Ian McFarlane, described the album as 'brimful of stirring, stately pop rock anthems'.", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWJATT": "First of all when you want to lose belly fat, remember to also work out your back muscles too, you can just buy a pair of small weights, unless you want to build muscle like me, lol. Don't choose those 20 lb weights unless you can lift them! For the diet, you might want to go to a calculator website, or see your doctor before she does anything drastic. And you don't need exercise equipment to lose the belly. The situps that work the best for me are the rotation ones. more like crunches. You don't have to lift your whole body off the ground, its like alternating positions. You start with doing a normal crunch to your middle, then to your sides, and as you do your sides, touch your opposite knee to your elbow, or try if you cant you will eventually be able to do this. When working out your back muscles you can lean forward as if your going to touch your toes and lift the weights up to your chest, keeping your torso still.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082N7UT": "Id agree- - a combination skinwash would likely be best. And maybe some other products for oily skin... is your whole face oily and/or acne prone? Be careful washing around your eyes... the skin around your eyes is much more sensitive than the rest of your face and can become irritated and bruised... also pulling too much on your eyes and the skin around them can cause extra wrinkles and loose skin... it's kind of like a hair rubber band-- the more you use it the more stretched out it becomes... same principle.", "3UAU495MIIQ7FJ11D87PMBEVYRXUO6": "Yes this is very normal. Some guys don't start growing hair until later, while some grow hair when they are 12. Some, wont even grow the hair on their face believe it or not. My friend is 27 and has one chin hair lol, while I started growing hair around 16 but it was just peach fuzz then by 20 it was easier but still not very full so I had to keep shaving now I am 27 and I can grow a full beard but I cant grow a goatee because there are a few hairs I can't grow between the edge of my lips to my chin. Really bugs me because I want a goatee. LoL Then comes the hair on my damn back. ITS GROWING IN PATCHES. I really don't want hair on my back and it looks even worse that its in patches lol. Anyway, I'm sure your hair will come in soon just give it time. You reaching maturity doesn't always count when growing hair. Later from what I hear it will feel like your hair is not going bald but its just growing out the wrong places like your nose and your ears lol. Anyway keep your chin up man it'll come.", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP7GJ8": "it's a vid of a dentist removing rotting teeth and theRE ARE FUCKING MAGGOTS LIVE MAGGOTS IN THIS GUYS GUMS", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1T2APS": "do you own the cd to more then one song they play in the stands do you pick on band people b/c they cant do cool things like we can does your band director know more about your love life then that other person does have you ever been severly injured by your flag ( broken noses , ankles without skin , concussions ... ) -try to do damage to the people who touch your flag ( sinners ) when people back away b/c your twirling too close , do you tell them it doesnt hurt ...   after a while ...   have you ever broken an instrument b/c they just got too close when you were doing your routine have you ever applied something other then toothpaste to your teeth to help you smile ever been paid by a fellow band member to 'accidently ' hit someone during a show -esp on the way home when its dark and everyone is all loud and stuff Have you ever had to explain what a part of your uniform does/how to put it on to a non-guard person ?", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EY2H6": "The Souths economy started to collapse while the Norths prevailed.The North had more manpower than the South during the Civil War.However the war...", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10IKMI": "Extended release doesn't necessarily release the same amount for an extended period of time. Everyone's metabolism's different, and coffee, other medications, and even other vitamins can increase or decrease the amount available in your blood stream. However, in any vitamin it depends on how really the person needs them and accordingly how long he or she needs to use them.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2SO0W": "Try to be a rainbow in someone's cloud.", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HMHEL": "hemoglobin count? I SHOULD know this, but hmmmm. Opinion 2: Complete Blood Count (CBC) Guide Risks There is very little chance of a problem from having a blood sample taken from a vein. You may get a small bruise at the site. You can lower the chance of bruising by keeping pressure on the site for several minutes. In rare cases, the vein may become swollen after the blood sample is taken. This problem is called phlebitis. A warm compress can be used several times a day to treat this. Ongoing bleeding can be a problem for people with bleeding disorders. Aspirin, warfarin (such as Coumadin), and other blood-thinning medicines can make bleeding more likely. If you have bleeding or clotting problems, or if you take blood-thinning medicine, tell your doctor before your blood sample is taken. Results A complete blood count (CBC) gives important information about the kinds and numbers of cells in the blood, especially red blood cells , and platelets . A CBC helps your doctor check any sympt", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8PWB3": "Hit a new five rep max today on squat of 170. A 25 pound increase from my first five rep max a month and a half ago!", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TOAC0O": "I think you should write about someone who's thinking of writing a screenplay, but then can't decide what to write about so they ask other people. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking of writing a screenplay, but then can't decide what to write about so they ask other people. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking of writing a screenplay, but then can't decide what to write about so they ask other people. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking of writing a screenplay, but then can't decide what to write about so they ask other people. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking of writing a screenplay, but then can't decide what to write about so they ask other people. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking. One other person suggested that they write a story about someone who's thinking...", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMER7EA": "Must be there is a bad tooth, You cannot see it yourself better go to the dentist or ask somebody to look inside your mouth. The best one, the dentist will decide to extract or a filling.", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA90Z5NK": "Since calves are involved a lot in walking and posture, they tend to consist mainly of slowly twitch fibers, which do not tend to react to weightlifting as well as fast twitch fibers. The guys with the big calves tend to have a higher percentage of fast twitch muscle fibers. The best bet for getting bigger calves is to vary the number of reps that you do.", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK5SN7": "The money will be well spent going to a specialist. If you are worried about not being able to afford health care, there are clinics like planned parenthood that are there to help women in your situation. It won't be free, but definitely a lot less than a GYN office. Your symptoms should not be ignored, and it isn't in your head. Pain is your body's way of telling you something is not right, and the bleeding that you are accompanied with does not suggest anything good. I am not a physician but, it seems to me that your symptoms point to endometriosis- especially if you ever had cesarean sections which can lead to scar tissue. Unfortunately an ultrasound isn't able to pick up endometriosis and can only be diagnosed by a laparoscopy. If you have cysts or a mass that is causing the problems, those can definitely be seen without surgery. I am not trying to worry you more, but it is really important that you get yourself healthy for not just you but, for your family.", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCP0YH": "like my mom tells me he's missing the part of life. I'm 21 and I just started living on my own in the last 2 years or so. :-) hey that discrimination!i will like 2 answer that on my part.i feel like my husband took more controll of bcuz he moved me from philly 2 pottstown,i used 2 dance and sing and dress in my music video style clothes and now all i own is white t shirts and sweat pants,my hair has 2 b pulled back in a bun and i have long black hair.im not allowed 2 work or finish my last year in college.im not allowed 2 have friends or family over.he is jealous of every black person he see bcuz thats all i dated in the past not 2 mention he is white im puertorican -asian-black.used 2 b a striper but it was only 2 pay for nursing school.he accuses me of still loving my daughters father.what should i do i just want a 50 50 relationship im not jealous but he says he is dangerously in love.whats wrong with ur wife?sorry so long.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BPARJ": "If you don't like going to the gym try something else, like dancing, thai-box etc.Any kind of movement is good for you rather than nothing.good luck!", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK5NS2": "Swollen gums: Your gums are swollen because something is wrong. See a dentist who can examine you and tell you why. It could be from medications, , an infection or many other things. Infection ? Periodontal disease? So hard to say without an examination with radiographs. Please see a local dentist for treatment. Why 72 hours? : Not sure why 72 hours is important to you, however, if your gums are red, irritated and swollen, you should see your dentist asap. There is either a long standing gum problem or you may have an acute issue that can be resolved quickly. You probably can't treat this on your own. She's teething: Your post not say how old your little girl is. I'm going to guess that these are her primary . A bit of is perfectly normal when teeth erupt. All the best. See your dentist: If it is sudden then you may be developing a gingivla abcess, but more likely it is as simple as the need for a good cleaning. Get an appointment and take care of it.", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZDF8O": "I would not suggest this as a healthy lifestyle, but If you eat lots of fats and sugars together like a burger with ice cream or a soda, then you will gain weight. It will put pounds on in no time. Some may gain weight and some may not but i would rather gain weight than gain a baby that i did not want", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEM2G8": "Woke up bc of cramps and sore nipples ?", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1S4R1": "I seriously don't want to be the one who bugs you especially since you warned me not to, but I can't help it. As somebody who recovered, I tend to push this on people when I see them having the problems I once suffered with. Got puppies and the only reason I wanted to live was to see them live and now Ix27m getting worse again. Did that help? Sorry it probally didnx27t Ix27m useless I hate me i have one but i havent gotten the courage or motivation to talk to her. i dont really want to stop tho because its a coping mechanism and im currently going thru something. once its over ill seek out help probably the way i just recommended it. But we have to help you learn how to feel better without hurting yourself. Cutting is not right for you because it opens your body to diseases and the healed cuts leave scars that should not be on a woman like you.", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUSWRG": "So i would talk to them first.Also not recommended with some one with high blood pressure.Good Luck.", "3L60IFZKF3GSIG9U9W50JNS4SXHHH4": "Treadmill 20 minutes is all I do . You can do it ! Good luck ... ''  I am extremely obese . My starting weight when I started taking Topamax was 289.0 lbs . I weighed myself every few days . I started for one week taking 25 mg in the morning and 25 mg in the evening .", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0EIXQ": "difficult to tell, especially with wisdom teeth. Teeth growing inside the mouth usually produce swollen gums, slightly sensitive to touch, but that would be relieved if something cool is placed against it (if it were a gum disease/inflamation, the cool/cold would probably make it hurt more). The pain wouldn't be constant, as sometimes they hurt more when they are growing quot. insidequot. than when they are actually about to pop through (that could well happen when you chew on something and they just pop through with the last bit of pressure). the problem with wisdom teeth is that they frequently grow sideways (lying down inside the gum) or diagonally and impale into your molars. these cases require surgery to remove the wisdom tooth before it causes damage to your molar, gum and jaw. The dentist could only tell this by taking an x-ray. If the molar is growing sideways he can't even tell by simply looking into your mouth.", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMJLC4": "Spread coconut cream cheese frosting between layers and on top and sides of cake. Sprinkle top with 1/2 cup toasted coconut reserved from frosting recipe. Coconut cream cheese frosting: 2 tablespoons butter or margarine 2 1/2 cups flaked coconut 2 tablespoons butter or margarine, softened 8-ounce package cream cheese, softened 3 1/2 cups sifted powdered sugar 2 teaspoons milk 1/2 teaspoon vanilla extract Melt 2 tablespoons butter in large skillet stir in coconut.", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAXADC": "Eat healthy, exercise.Try to change ur meals from 3 to 2.breakfast and lunch, dinner usually is what makes you fat, cause you go to sleep after dinner, not right away tho, but still yeah.for breakfast, eat healthy, like toast, salad and an apple or any fruit you prefer.for lunch, sandwiches, salad, fruit beverages, like carrot juice, apple juice...........", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KXDVF": "Turtles are a little messy. I have one external filter and one submersible filter on my tank. Turtles as babies are more carnivarous.", "3Q2T3FD0ON6ZGM36L8WB7YZQQEVM38": "Go to www.akc.org  search for your closest local chapter of the breed's club. You may find a breeder that lives close to you that is a member. i think the name Poncho is good for a long haired chihuahua.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E5BTQ": "While Rapidly Digesting Whey Protein Is Desirable Immediately Before And After Exercise To Help Support Muscle Recovery . While Rapidly Digesting Whey Protein Is Desirable Immediately Before And After Exercise To Help Support Muscle Recovery , A Slower Digesting Casein Protein Is The Better Choice Between Meals And Especially Right Before Bed When Your Body Can Go For Hours Without Nutritional Support . Casein Proteins Thicken In The Acidic Environment Of The Stomach And , Compared To Other Proteins , It Can Take Longer For Our Gold Standard 100  Casein To Be Broken Down Into Its Amino Acid Subcomponents .", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPLAB5": "Reduced winds on Saturday helped firefighters gain the upper hand against a series .... marriage is a union between one man and one woman, as many Americans do. ... I need my job, I'm going to do what they say do,' she would be letting down?... 5 days ago ... Kim Davis, the County Clerk in Kentucky who has made national headlines for ... That stay was to expire when the federal court weighed in, which it has. ... Would you be okay with a County Clerk denying a ? ?ixed race?? couple a ... While the couple can apply for a license in another county, ? ?t would set a ... ?? 'm just sorry that she's interjecting her personal beliefs above her government job duties.?? ... Symptoms: Weight Gain, Bloating, And Much More. 10 hours ago ... Gay couples ask judge to hold Ky. clerk in contempt after she defied the .... There hasn't been much focus paid to the people having to work with this woman.", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRL10P": "You should instead indicate what you have accomplished and the results.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FE6YR": "Shining Diamond Blue Contacts is Bright  Vivid. All cosplay CircleLenses with power option:http://t.co/RPxBQPHaPA http://t.co/XfXWrrs1g2", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYSVMI": "A group can be felt most easily: In the neck (found on either side of the neck, behind your ears, or under your chin). Placing a heating pad (on low) or a warm towel on your painful lymph node may reduce the soreness. A slight enlargement and softness means the swollen lymph node is succeeding in the tough battle. It is severely infected when the swollen lymph node enlarges more than 1 inch across. In this article, lymphadenopathy is defined as lymph node enlargement, and only causes of neck lumps related to lymph nodes are discussed, as there are many other causes of lumps in the neck. Neck dissection The neck dissection is a surgical procedure for control of neck lymph node metastasis. Metastasis of tumours into the lymph nodes of the neck is one of the strongest prognostic indicators for head and neck cancer. To describe the lymph nodes of the neck for neck dissection, the neck is divided into 6 areas called 'Levels'. 5 The lateral neck dissection removes lymph tissue in levels I...", "3QGHA0EA0JY0OT1X43H4YFZTC8OBWH": "why are you cutting yourself? whether or not the cut will scar should be the least of your worries right now you need to talk to someone close to you to help you stop cutting yourself its a very unhealthy habit and it could lead to father things if you need someone to talk to then please feel free to email me i'm really good with advice and such annon311yahoo.com   Opinion 2: Hey there, I've been cutting since about two years ago... I recently carved my name Into my leg.. I have to say after a while all the people asking about the cutting or carving marks gets annoying and embarrassing.. I did one on my thigh too.. It's summer so eventually everyone will see it.. I know how you feel sweetie.. Please reach out and get some therapy or some help from your parents, church, ect..", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONVZH9": "If you're in high school, you should probably do it in the locker room. Just slide it on quickly before you slide on your other equipment or shorts, etc. If you're wearing it already, you might get teased. However, some men actually enjoy wearing jocks all the time instead of underwear--if you do, that's fine, too. Well if you change into your jockstrap at home the other guys will know it's because you are too shy or afraid to change in front of them. They will assume it's because you have issues with your development down below, and that you are sensitive about it. The same will apply if you change in a bathroom stall or if you do the quot. towel dancequot. (that's wrapping a towel around yourself to change under it). It's kind of an open invitation for guys to tease you. You are better off just biting the bullet and changing in front of the other guys. Once you get used to it you will wonder what you were so afraid of. Locker room. be confident in your body.", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SGBD6": "meaning the only thing u can do with the photo is edit it for practice or depending on terms commercial use, you may not use the photo as is for redistribution or sell as your own, you cannot just do simple filters and call it your own or make it into a brush for adobe Photoshop or gimp or any other graphics editor. some if not most free stock images might come with that attach to them and i suggest you follow the rules of the person who the photo belongs to because the photo or image might be licensed under an agreement or copyright", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M3YVP9": "This page provides information on the eye condition age-related macular degeneration . Age-related macular degeneration ( AMD ) is an eye condition that affects a tiny part of the retina at the back of your eye , which is called the macula .", "3ZXV7Q5FJBMHNC78SE3Z5BJBZQYCFR": "2731. Skinny abs aren't real abs. Being a freshman in high school and having abs by default doesn't count. brotips http:/ ...", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ08RTJ": "Yahoo is going back on their word towards removing erotic stuff from Tumblr.", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA5PO5": "no they don't as their health care like canada and germany is better than the us. so now they don't. watch sicko it will tell you the truth about canadian and england health care and if you want to know about germany ask me i was born there. Opinion 2: Sometimes. People from every country have bad teeth, you just gotta look for them.", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JUOHY": "The Gulf of Mexico tank is a large 120,000 gallon tank in the aquarium with two full grown Nurse sharks and Bonnet-head sharks. Other fish such as, Atlantic tarpon, Porcupinefish, and a large Goliath grouper live in the tank. Periodically throughout the day, SCUBA Divers hand feed the sharks and fish for an audience.", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6NJKD": "If you're an Indie Gospel Artist  you have a CD out, we should talk. Text 'Indie Artist' to 337-214-4046. Promotions Marketing Radio", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYREKN": " Wireless Collections Dental Collection Solutions Having to handle unpaid accounts is probably one of the most difficult tasks a dental office administrator deals with and oftentimes interferes with the multitude of other daily responsibilities. Increased patient self-pays are only making the problem worse. Internally, theres only so much that you can do. People move, and your statements come back. You leave messages, and rarely get return calls. It doesnt take long before you feel like you are spinning your wheels and throwing good money after bad. You have enough to do without having to deal with a growing receivable aging report. Summit solves this problem with proven collection solutions that recover a significant percentage of this lost revenue at less expense than you could ever do it in-house. Better yet, your staffs valuable time and resources can be redirected to your current and insurance pending accounts. Whether you are a small sole practitioner dental practice, an ora", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK37ZJ": "Just make sure to change the straws as they become worn from the chewing.Good luck.Posted on August 17, 2008 Jean says: I have a 4 month old female kitten.", "3NBFJK3IOHGOA106T3I8IWD4PJIGOS": "If this were happening consistently it would be easy to correct. The fact that it is random suggests to me that the dog has an unstable temperament. Find a trainer whose repertoire stretches to more than bribing with treats.", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZGDTY": "Your symptoms will probably diminish a bit. I had extremely painful periods, with dizziness. Hot baths seemed to help, and also a heating pad on my back. Try taking a multi vitamin. Are you eating enough? Part of my problem was low blood sugar, which made the dizziness worse. If ibuprofin causes you problems, you could try a different over-the-counter pain med. I have to admit, when I went to college, I went on ortho-tricylin (a form of the pill), and it totally eliminated the pain and dizziness. It also cleared up my acne. It might depend on how you bring the topic up to your mom. If you tell her how terrible you feel, and see a doctor, the doctor might convince her that going on the pill is the most effective way to make your periods easier. If not...try my above suggestions, and hang in there!", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSDRMJ": "Finally, I find hard to believe that a car is included in the cost!Had you no other use for your car ?ever ?", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5M71Q": "Apparently, this brown nose coworker of mine thinks she's gonna find her pride at the bottom of a penis shaft.", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y6WI9": "Teeth grinding is a bigger problem that many people realize. If you grind your teeth, you will know the problems that it can cause: Grinding your teeth at night can cause a painful jaw in the morning Over time, teeth grinding can cause serious tooth damage, such as cracking of enamel Teeth grinding can keep your sleeping partner awake, causing relationship difficulties. How hypnosis can stop teeth grinding When you grind your teeth even when asleep, this is because your jaw muscle has got into the habit of remaining tense.", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPPEUK": "Acute injuries, by percentage: Ankle sprain 15 to 60 percent Thumb or finger sprain 10 percent Knee sprain or meniscus tear 15 percent -------------------------------- Overuse injuries, by percentage: Patellar tendinitis Up to 80 perecent Shoulder tendinitis 8 to 20 percent Low-back pain 10 to 14 percent Normal, everyday activities can lead to soft-tissue damage of ligaments, tendons, and muscles. These injuries may be the result of a single episode of injury (such as a sudden fall, jerk, or blow to the body), or as a result of repeated overuse. The result can be damage and pain.", "3A3KKYU7P3FW7K5UVS7DCVANO7QWMP": "I am actually a doctor and I administer and review UA/DS everyday. What you need to do STAT is go to CVS or GNC or some vitamin supplement place and buy NoFlush Niacin. Try to drink a gallon of water and take of the niacin everyday. If you stick to this you have a shot. Write me at mccmdyahoo.com if you want to know more about this or anything else. Seriously ignore all the other shit above, this will work.", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JMG61": "What is wrong with me ? ?I'm scared to try recovery for anorexia?What Wrong with me?", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O2AXV2": "The body responds to what is known as the SAID principle. Specific Adaptations to Imposed Demands. When you look at marathon runners, they are generally thin but actually have a higher body fat  than sprinters. This is an adaptation, when you run for long periods your body needs energy. If your exercise program has no variation your body adapts and begins to hold on to it's fat so that it has energy stores to be used during long runs. Running/cardio is fine, but mix in resistance training. Muscle burns more calories than fat. This doesn't mean you will get bulky, if that's a concern, but by activating more muscle fibers, your body will burn more calories, helping to lose weight. Circuit training can be a useful tool for this, you will burn a lot of calories, your heart rate will get up, and you will increase muscle. The key is variation most personal trainers, or at least good ones, progress your workout through different stages to keep your body adapting.", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV4ON8": "None - Cuttlefish have tentacles.Cuttlefish are marine animals of the order Sepiida belonging to the Cephalopoda class (which also include squids, octopuses and nautilus). Although the name suggests it, cuttlefish are not fish, but molluscs.", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ82VY4": "I would have to help it is in my nature.", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE19TD": "White blood cells (total)-5000 to 10000/c.mm.Neutrophils-60 to 70 per cent.Lymphocytes- 25 to 35 per cent.Monocytes- 4 to 8 per cent.Eosinophils-1 to 4 per cent.Basophils- 0 to 1 per cent.Please see the web pages for more details on White blood cell count.", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNEKRD0": "my right eye is twitching uncontrollably what the heck", "3MJ28H2Y1E6QU4BMC7ZHEZMFZA2O5G": "Why Am I Having My Period On The Depo Shot? hey i'm 19. ive been on the shot for about a year now. i did hear that you should get your period about once ...", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMXEA8": "Calathumpian Jump to: navigation , search This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page . This article needs additional citations for verification . Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources . Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (May 2009) This article may be confusing or unclear to readers. Please help us clarify the article  suggestions may be found on the talk page . (May 2009) A slave presenting her mistress with the calathus (Greco-Roman). Calathumpian, also spelled 'callothumpian', 'carathumpian' and 'calisthumpian', is a term that is used in a non-judgmental way to describe a religion or philosophy in its infancy. The description is of a relatively original belief, held by a small group, personally assembled, or not institutionalized. In can also be sometimes used as a non-specific example of a religious or political persuasion. Calathumpian (which may be derived from an apocryphal", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLGWGJ": "As noted , however , it is not simply in the field of religious studies that the discovery of Sumer changed the way people understand the world in the present . In their many inventions and innovations , the Sumerians lay the groundwork for so many advancements in the daily lives of human beings that , today , it is impossible to imagine life without these things .", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XO80D": "Life of an athlete: Finding random scars and bruises all over your body and wondering what they are from. Story of my life.", "3P6ENY9P79USEBKEFENLJZTJSATHIU": "Youre supposed to talk to your doctor about that.... I asked mine and he said with the type of pill I have, it's not all that safe to do. I have four white non-birth control pills. If you have birth controls pills that you take for three weeks and then have a week of white pills than you skip the white pills and start taking the new pack. BUT be aware, there are health risks your taking. Talk to your doctor about it before you do it. Just to be safe. Maybe ask about Seasonal birth control, you only have four periods a year but your more prone to break through bleeding.", "3QO7EE372OLV4W5BSUIY6QH7O78BQE": "You don't say what kind you have. Most aisian or oriental lilies do indeed bloom once a year. They look great for several weeks, and then you wait until next year. Daylilies usually have a longer bloom period. Each flower only opens for one day, but it will produce flowers continually for about a month. You don't say where you live - but if you live in a warm area, part-shade might help your lily. If you live in a colder area, they could do full sun just fine.", "3T2EL38U0MI2HZ8CXQAGVN8Z7AUQX0": "You have to re edit the song put a code ex: 001 to 050 then title and song artist, all same name in album  genre. just right click the song  GET INFO, if wont let you do to the edit, convert them into ACC VERSION by right clicking  GET INFO again.", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMMCLY": "yeah, i've read about it..but I love coffee! Hahaha", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMRKD1": "The following is a possibilty....Chancroid is an infection that initially is seen in a sexually exposed area of the skin. The infection typically appears on the penis but also occasionally occurs in the anal or mouth area. Chancroid starts out as a tender bump that emerges 3 to 10 days (the incubation period) after the sexual exposure.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52TYRI": "Evolutionarily speaking, many sexual desires exist because they help us propagate as a species. Breasts are used to feed newborn infants. Millions of years ago, men who were attracted to women with healthy breasts had better luck creating offspring who would survive. Those offspring were our ancestors, and we inherited this genetic predisposition to being attracted to breasts. Opinion 2: When a woman has breast reconstruction after cancer she has it in various stages, and has to go at least 3 months between the final stage breast reconstruction and the nipple reconstruction, so yes, although I'm not a man I have seen breasts without nipples!", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIKT58": "They can cause pain in the ear like you have an earache but I don't think they cause headaches.", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN165I5": "When I shaved down there (all my hair) I kinda got the same thing I got these red bumps and they where really itchy but they went away after a while but yours sound more serious you should go see a dick doctor or something   Opinion 2: Sounds like it's an ingrown hair! That can happen sometimes. If it doesn't start to feel better within a few days though, it might be a good idea to talk to give your doctor a call, just in case. Don't be embarrassed to talk to your doctor! That's what they're there for. And believe me, they've heard it all! Good luck! :)", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T63W140": "If you can move it without using your finger, no matter how bad it hurts, then it is only sprained and be thankful. I'd say a week or two for the pain to stop. It has been a while since I have nudged my toes though.. God I hate that. That is one thing I do NOT miss.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMEQE7G": "hey u can check out the www.planetpdf.com", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGTD1T": "did you get a bug bite? or a sting? maybe you did when you where sleeping a bug bit you, but to know for sure look at your toe and look for a little tiny red dot in the middle of all the redness. try soaking it in some hot epson salt water. if it gets to bad go see a doctor. hey.....maybe you have pink toe! like pink eye but on your toe lol. good luck. :) also put neosporin cream on it.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2U0OA": "vaccinating your dog for kennel cough is like getting a vaccine for the human common cold, i.e., useless ... kennel cough vaccine contains only certain strains of the disease and your dog must come in contact with that exact strain for the vaccine to have any effect ... and even if it is the correct vaccine for the right kennel cough, your dog will still get kennel cough, it might just be a shorter illness ... most healthy dogs that contract kennel cough will get over it quickly ... it is important to vaccinate puppies and a couple boosters but yearly adult shots i feel are detrimental ... my dog has not had a rabies shot in over seven years but last april her rabies titres measured showed she had enough antibodies still after seven years to fight rabies ... i personally would not use any place that forces kennel cough because clearly they are not educated and what else might they not be educated on ??? it has nothing to do with money, but yes, it does have to do with health ... and at", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMQDKT": "Hillary  Even favoring Joan, I have to go with Cleo who was a strong, intelligent woman who was an esteemed leader. Both were strong women and made good leaders.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBYOJ3": "It was an ACCIDENT... Besides, dogs are quite loyal. They don't give a crap... As long as you don't make a habit out of it, you're fine.", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9NNHG": "The 'dander,' or skin shedding, of an animal is more potent in causing allergic reactions than the animal's fur or hair. In addition to the skin sheddings and fur, allergic reactions can occur to the saliva and/or urine of cats, dogs, and horses. The scope of the animal allergy problem is enormous. These allergies are believed to affect up to 20 of North Americans and are directly related to the increasing popularity of pets, particularly cats and dogs. Cats The most well-known indoor allergy is probably due to Felis domesticus, the domesticated cat. The main allergen is a protein that is produced by the sweat glands (sebaceous glands) in the skin and appears in the skin flakes or dander that are shed from cats. The allergen is also found to a lesser degree in the fur, saliva, and urine of cats. Even with a past history of tolerance to cats, it is possible for a person with an allergic tendency to develop a sensitivity to cats after constant exposure.", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV3Y5VY": "Unfortunately, one of the occupational hazards of being a pitcher is the arm pain that comes with repetitively throwing a ball as hard as possible. If a pitcher throws long enough, arm pain and soreness are inevitable. However, there are steps a pitcher can take to treat the pain and make it less uncomfortable. Stretching Proactively prevent arm pain. It is absolutely vital for a pitcher to stretch muscles and get blood flowing to the arms before even touching a baseball. A standard stretch routine would include arm circles and arm swings, and stretches for the forearms, biceps and triceps. Increasing blood flow to the arm will allow a pitcher to not only throw with less pain, but also throw with more effectiveness. Using The R.I.C.E Method The R.I.C.E method -- which stands for Rest, Ice, Compression and Elevation -- is a very effective way of treating arm pain. Obviously, it is important for a pitcher to get enough rest so the arm can recover from the stress of repetitive pitching.", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEC8GF": "Remember when Kraft Mac  Cheese called for 3 tablespoons of butter instead of a 1/2 tbs? Those were the days.", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCFQJC": "Ok at 13 it is about a healthy lifestyle NOT dieting so I'm happy to see your questions are based around that and not quot. what diet will make me skinny. :) So here is answers to your questions: 1. Will you lose fat? most likely yes. Will you lose weight? Possibly not. Why you ask? The simple answer is muscle weights more then fat so if you are doing a lot of toning exercise (the kinds of exercises you need to burn fat in the areas you have listed) then it is likely as you burn fat you will gain muscle. So don't be dis-heartened if the scales don't reflect your hard work. The best measure fore fat lose is actually measurement. Get a tape measure and measure around your tummy (using your belly button as a guide) around your thighs and around your bottom. Do these measurements once a week this will give you a good indication of weather or not your exercises are working. Fat burning stomach exercises? The basics.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY51XJ": "Go to, www.webmd.com, you will find the answer there.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBVJOV": "Picture a string of beads - the beads are different sizes and shapes. Now, proteins'' are basically like a string of beads that could be a very long string or a short string. Non-essential amino acids are made by your body.", "3FJ2RVH25Z4VOKOTSZE1J2OEK1Q29G": "STUDENTS 25 OR OLDER TAKE VARIETY OF COURSES Job-related courses ............................. 40.1 million Personal development courses .... 38.9 million College or university courses ...........", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NE43Z": "lol now I want to go to Florida", "3ZVPAMTJWN1R7ESMLVZCCRI906YRG8": "The narcotic pain medication hydrocodone/acetaminophen was the most prescribed generic medication for the 12... http://t.co/k96ysqqXHN", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E68BMO": "My face gets all hot and flushed. It doesn't turn a bright red or anything, it just is really apparent that i'm either embarassed or constipated or about to have a seizure. But embarassment over my own stupidity or arrogance, i don't try to mask that because there's use defending me being wrong.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2RO0V": "Chiefly archaically and poetically, adjectives may follow their noun leading to the somewhat nonsensical The horse raced past the dreadful barn. The example hinges on the ambiguity of the of the word : It can be either a past-tense verb or a passive participle. Compare to an unambiguous sentence with the same syntactic structure: The car driven past the barn crashed. Unlike raced, the verb driven is unambiguously passive, thus eliminating the garden path reading. Sentence Initial likely partial parse Final parse The old man the boat. The man, who is old. Those who are old are manning the boat The complex houses married and single soldiers and their families. The houses (meaning buildings or families), which are complicated, got married to (each other and single soldiers). Single and married soldiers and their families live in the complex. The government plans to raise taxes were defeated. The government is planning to raise taxes.", "3PCPFX4U40OLHDHRXW4UPG8S35ZFQZ": "tacos  yeah ?", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V5WLPG": "What is your position exactly ? The league has always looked at all rules , including fighting , and will continue to do so . Our managers look at all aspects of the game and continue to do so year after year . There have been some changes in the past , like not leaving the bench , or third-man in , or instigating , or no tie-downs .", "3L84EBDQ370AMWBAL2BU97OOCVQKKG": "Still hopes for the khilafa who like 2 Umar. Brave,pious  trust. seekingforumar", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAYADD": "10 Ways to Stop Binge Eating in Its Tracks How to Prevent a Binge and Regain Control -- By Lauri Watson, Registered Dietitian Weve all heard the lunch room chatter about people's latest diets and weight-loss escapades. Many times, dieting can lead to out-of-control binge eating episodes in. However, these binges can also be on 'healthy' or diet-approved foods, too. Instead of defining 'normal' eating here, this article will focus on how to prevent binges and get back on track after them. To read more about whether your eating habits are 'normal' check out this three-part series on the topic by SparkPeople's behavioral psychology expert, Coach Dean. What is binge eating? Bingeing is an uncontrolled ingestion of large quantities of food within a short time period, often accompanied by feeling out of control over the eating taking place. So when does the occasional overindulgence cross the line into the realm of real binge eating? That isn't always easy to define. I have listed it below.", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4GFOQ": "Seven Songs for Malcolm X Seven Songs for Malcolm X is a British documentary film about the life of Malcolm X, the influential civil rights activist who was assassinated in 1965. The film was written and directed by John Akomfrah, with co-writer Edward George, and produced by Lina Gopaul. The Black Audio Film Collective, Akomfrahs London-based company, and Channel 4 Television Corporation were both involved in the production of the film.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06U966": "You say quot. mom, I'm an idiot, and I hate myself so much that I want to mutilate my bodyquot. There is nothing to quot. fixquot. because there is nothing wrong with you. Learn to love yourself the way you are because it doesn't matter how much you mutilate your body, if you don't love yourself the way you are you won't love yourself any more after you mutilate your body.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06R690": "Why not just put a large window in your house and mount the TV pointing out?", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IGZ35": "If anyone has suggestions, please help. ... Hi my French Bulldog of 14 months had a few fits very scary vet ... My dog started having seizures at the age of 2 and at that time little did I ...... Dash now has had one seizure in February. .... Within three days, he started breathing heavy, having trouble walking and of ... I asked the Vet to please give me my dog, as I was going to have to take him ..... S Crawford February 4, 2014 Oklahoma. You don't want your dog to get dehydrated. If your dog gets any more lethargic or seems in a lot of pain, I would take him back to the vet tomorrow. Just tell the vet that your dog is in severe pain and not eating or drinking water. You must leave no smell trace that your dog can find on any other part of the house or your dog may return there and think he is doing just what he is supposed to do. Remember again that your dog?? nose is much more powerful than yours is.", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP0215": "For half of the rats, the researchers provided feedback opposite of what occurs naturally: They puffed air at the left side of the tail when it twitched to the right, and they puffed air toward the right side of the tail when the tail moved leftward. The other half of the rats received air-puffs on the correct side of the tail. After just two hours of training, the rats that received the wrong feedback began to show a strange reflexwhen a hot laser touched the right side of their tails, they would often move their tails toward the heat source, rather than away from it. The finding suggests that the reflex mechanisms in the spinal cord records sensory information learned through twitches, says Petersson. Such a system may also be at work at longer-range movement control, from the muscles to the brain, he says.", "3JY0Q5X05J40IOJ85K50DN42YXQGG4": "I just put the bucket in the back of my van and let them sit on the porch until the ... The water stayed kind of murky, but I could still see to the bottom. ... A good idea would be to keep the tank in a place where it gets a few... Hope this helps P.S I forgot as tadpoles they eat algea, they need rain water or pond water without chlorine. If they are in a pond, just clean it out like normal. But don't clean of the algea, every year when I got tadpoles they just eat it all. The amount of water to be added is also important, and it should only be deep enough to cover them about half way. Bullfrogs need something to get a grip on, so it is a good idea to have small stones or pebbles in the bottom. It's not like I chose to have a tadpole in my house? ?t just sort of happened. And don't get me wrong, it's not, like, hiding in my toilet or something ?? it's in a tank with all the ...", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5DO6W": "You shouldnt be able to push your retainer out with your tongue. But it IS normal for your teeth to not feel tight when you first get your retainer, since your teeth havent moved since you got your braces off. And a permanent retainer is a small wire they put on the back of your teeth.", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF51EWK": "if you've never read Bridge, you should read that.", "3SV8KD29L4Q5BRAWL3E4WMC1G40KZZ": "Some adults do have plagiocephaly, however it's not a common sight. Those who do often hide any gross deformity by having a good head of hair. If you want to find out how your head is shaped, you could shave your hair and have a look. Skull x-rays may or may not be helpful. A CT scan is surely overkill!", "3PR3LXCWSFXWP0RQGOZU9SIAXATX9O": "The NBFS provides information on bird seed and bird feeder preferences, and provides bird feeding tips and a guide to better bird feeding. Daily operations of the NBFS are performed by the staff of Wild Bird Centers of America in Glen Echo, Maryland, and supported by Wild Bird Centers of America, Inc. In 2008, a three-year, one million dollar study of bird seed and bird feeder preferences in the United States and Canada was completed. The study known as PROJECT WILDBIRD was coordinated by Dr. David Horn and Stacey Johansen at Millikin University in Decatur, Illinois, and funded by the Wild Bird Feeding Industry Research Foundation.", "375VMB7D4JHB2VFCTI4VSEEL0I0DIH": "you can tell a horse to jump by pressing your legs against his side. make sure not to hit his side quickly, because that will just make him go faster. so press your legs and keep them there until the horse has finished jumping", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZB8FF": "If you've been exercising religiously, but notice that your belly fat and that number on the scale won't budge, you're most likely not a happy camper. Excess belly ...", "3X52SWXE0X3JYYT3I3DZ9Z5BUTPCWQ": "You are more likely to be killed by a champagne cork than by a poisonous spider. The name Wendy was made up for the book 'Peter Pan.' The 3 most valuable brand names on earth: Marlboro, Coca-Cola, and Budweiser, in that order.", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QWY7G": "It works well and it's natural.I hope this helps you!Good luck!", "3R5LWXWHR06B4AEYUU54194X1NNGXX": "Are the number of prawn legs the same as lobster legs? Bunnie Bones Answer All prawns and shrimps are crustaceans, which are mostly aquatic animals with a hard skin (an exoskeleton) over a segmented body. Crustaceans belong to the subphylum Crustacea. They are like insects, which also have an exoskeleton, but differ in usually having many pairs of legs, instead of three pairs. The Decapoda, the group of Crustacea to which all prawns and shrimps (and lobsters and crabs) belong, have five pairs of legs on the main part of the body, plus five pairs of swimmerets on the abdomen or tail. It is the muscular tail that is edible. The classification of the Decapoda is very complex, even to a carcinologist (a scientist who studies Crustacea). Your Biological Info!!! Frogs' legs and prawns? OK, this question is a bit crazy but bear with me. I bought some fresh prawns from a supermarket. On my way home, I suddenly remembered that I had seen some fresh frogs' legs being sold at the same supermarket", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIWUI9": "This page is really just an introduction to the wonderful world of amphibian care , so have a look at the further reading to find extra information on topics on this page , and to find out about things not discussed on this page , like breeding and outdoor housing . They also provided some of the information for this page ! What kinds of amphibians can I keep as pets in NZ ?   ) It is against the law to keep any of the native frogs . There are a few people in New Zealand who are allowed to keep native frogs , but these people are native frog specialists who DOC has given a permit to .", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMMLC7": "Are you still breastfeeding? If your breast is hard AFTER a feeding, it can mean you have a blocked milk duct which can lead to infection. I would call your doctor or midwife for the best treatment, though I have found warm water, continuing breastfeeding, and massage to be the best solution for a clogged duct.If you aren't still breastfeeding and you have hardness in your breast, I'd get to a doctor right away.Good luck!", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPR1LT": "I'd give it about an hour after your workout to allow your body to settle down. The best way to a flat stomach is running followed by crunches. Yes, because I have been doing ab exercises everyday for almost 2 weeks (maybe for the same reasons as you) and there is a noticeable difference, especially in definition.", "3NRZ1LDP7W46MI7CYVJCS3Y0AE8PZ7": "Its up to you but the pharmacist will be able to go through the best options for you and you can then decide.Good luck!Source(s): Nox  You probably have a yeast infection/vaginal infection.", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPG9AS": "In fact , in another study in , 22 percent of healthy men under age 30 reported taking an erection-enhancing drugsildenafil ( Viagra ) , vardenafil ( Levitra ) , tadalafil ( Cialis ) , or all threerecreationally . See how his penis size , porn use , ideal number of romps per week , and more stacks up compared with the average man . Jillian Michaels Gets Hilariously Real in This Behind the Scenes Video  I 'm miserable , I 'm furious , and all I want to do is go home and have a margarita ! ''", "3X7837UUADW8CXK31DHHY9JTWB6J6B": "An exact noun is sometimes known as a specific noun. Here are some examples of general nouns vs exact nouns: girl Joan country Spain language English", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDVJW8": "well you've been taking the pill for so long your body is bound to change, you ll have some changes in your mood and with your weight and because your system is so used to 'controlling birth' it will probably reject it at first so yous should just keep trying!", "3PCPFX4U40OLHDHRXW4UPG8S35XFQX": "Tennis elbow is pain in the elbow area caused by mistakenly using your arm, instead of your legs and body, to create power. The term tennis elbow has been widened in recent years to include pain in the forearm muscle which reverberates pain into the elbow area. In fact, these days most tennis elbow occurs in the forearm much more often than in the elbow itself.", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61H98P": "We didn't take showers after gym. I don't think anyone took gym seriously enough to need to take a shower afterwards. You could try to schedule it for the end of the day, that way you could go home and take a shower there if you don't want to at school. At my school, only athletes who had really intense practices early in the morning took showers. We didn't have community showers either. Our showers were like bathroom stalls. Everyone had their own shower and you couldn't see anyone. First off we don't much take showers together, that's more a stereotype. Most of the time we just go home and shower. Like after gym, i'd just wait till I went home before I showered. No one took a shower after gym or practice. So I wouldn't really say boys take showers in the USA just to do it, but out of safety procautions and if you don't wanna stink. In gym class almost no one wears a jockstrap.", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GPQY7": "sorry but you can't lose weight in one specific area without working the whole body. to lose fat, you need to do aerobic exercises : walking, jogging, biking, tennis, swimming, etc. something that will get your heart rate up. A couple of common questions here amount to How do I lose weight,'' or more specifically, How do I lose abdominal fat?''", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK8NS5": "toads and frogs eat bugs grubs and insects. they even sometimes eat fruit, crickets, rolly pollies, different kinds of worms, and flies, try little little fish too.", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUMH73": "People who took out hospital cover before this date and maintain it will pay a base rate regardless of their age.", "3V8JSVE8YYO2K18HTV1IKKQUQDZEYH": "Make sure you don't need surgery. If not it should take 6 to 8 weeks before you can start walking normally on it. I broke my little toe once.", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGSSCQ": "These costumes are often sold online, but also can be purchased from dealers at conventions. Japanese manufacturers of cosplay costumes reported a profit of 35 billion yen in 2008. A number of individuals also work on commission, creating custom costumes, props, or wigs designed and fitted to the individual some social-networking sites for cosplay have classified ad sections where such services are advertised.", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GMYQC": "Yes, the Art Institute of Dallas. animation? Animalism : The vague yet often referred to concept of animalism is used by Orwell to signify the generic view of socialism.", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481T2BQ": "Those look legit, skinny abs are wider, they crease in the right places but there is no tone of the actual abdominal muscles in the center. Opinion 2: thats what body builders do too, they dont have abs all day, it takews felxing, unless your shkin is soooo thin and your abs are soo built, takes a lot of work, if you have abs that can show while flexed your good ace! mine are pretty,   Opinion 3: Once your body is around 10-15 body fat, and you have a good base of ab muscle, it will start to show through. The lower your body fat and the more muscle on the abs, the more you will see them. Skinny people without abs probably don't have the amount of muscle necessary to show up. Everyone has those muscles, it is simply how little fat is covering them, and how big they are that determines if they show. Good luck.", "3OZ4VAIBEXDTRNZ42LPPA1ZSD4XJV2": "You could get pregnant here or there, You could get pregnant anywhere. You could get pregnant on a house, You could get pregnant with a mouse. You could get pregnant here or there, You could get pregnant anywhere.", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA3LYE": "I like pillows.. --", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE85X3": "A lot of doctors are still living in the dark ages of diabetes treatment - their education was more than 15 years ago! They haven't time to update on the newest methods of treatments. Lyrica and a couple of other pain meds help some people to cope with the neuropathy, but that won't ever go away!! If you have access to hot tub do some of your exercising in the hot tub. That really helps to ease the pain a lot. Living uncontrolled for a while is what did it to you! Mine got much worse, but when I had lived controlled for about 5 years, it got easier to live with. Life is not over! It is just beginning! You must figure a way around the pain of the moment. Check with the doctors about the breathing problem, that could be heart disease!! Do it now!", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1QJNG": "The difference in the weight is the weight of the water occupying the the volume of the bowl. Using the density of water ( 1 gram / mL, roughly), so grams of water in the bowl in equivalent to volume of the bowl in mL or cubic centimeter (cc). Well, the average banana has about 105 calories, the yoghurt (if it is totally fat free), about 70 calories in a 175g serve, the soup... it all depends. But perhaps about 200 calories a bowl. Not many! It needs to be mixed with a little bit of water before being added in order to ... bowl with the gelatin in a small saucepan filled with an inch of water over ... And obviously, how much gelatin you use per cup of liquid affects how ... Otherwise, you'd say it 'can't be bigger than LWH.' So that implies someone, somewhere will be judging it like in a science competition. That means they'll put it in water, not just weigh it and measure it.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FUQ31": "nullIf this is baby tooth then it's most likely going to come out. However, if it's your adult teeth, then: That has happened to me once. It worried me, obviously, but I was sure to avoid anything with high amounts of sugar, avoid tough foods that required a lot of chewing, and wash my mouth very thoroughly. It seemd to 'seal up' again within 4 days. Don't know why it happened, but I know that any looseness in that area can expose the underlying tooth bed. That's why I was very careful with my intake, etc. Seemed to work for me. Give it a try. Don't stay up at night worrying about it, but on the same note, don't forget that it's there. Don't wiggle it if you can avoid it, and let it fix itself.", "3OWZNK3RYLNT8CCWQA9SFYBSXM2U21": "Didn't they teach you about sex education in school? This is stupid, I'm sorry but you need to have the ejaculate go inside you, not on your outside or anything like that. If you take a shower and wash the sperm off now how can it stay alive on you? It's not glue!", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO76XEV": "It can be hard to tell the difference! Unless you are having some other symptoms, I would not consider that you lymph nodes are in danger. The lymph nodes will swell when they are fighting an infection - I would not worry unless you are having other symptoms (such as sore throat, runny nose, aching ears, body aches) or if your lymph nodes are swollen in OTHER places of your body...under the arm-pits or around the groin area, or if the areas around your neck and jaw are extremely sensitive or painful. If you suspect your lymph nodes ARE swollen, I'd go see a doctor right away.", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX64AV": "Divorce of parents Extreme life events such as a death of a friend or relative.", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OELG2L": "And I hope Ill come to you! !I am so happy!But I dont know that I am coming or I am not coming!", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NGKR5": "bill gates - The world's richest person for the seventh consecutive year--58 billion", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9EPFJ": "OH, it happens sometimes. BUt imagine I had it once half a year! Thus, you can be an artist.", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HNEHJ": "relax feedback Done for you fat loss meal plans: Best-selling Empowered Nutrition Meal Plans To Make Fast, Easy http://t.co/3mBTSNXHQH", "3U74KRR67MJAXLM0COH22QSOP3HTNV": "The question is, do its masters still have the authority to contain it if the ... Moscow ready to supply weapons to Iraq to help fight ISIS ... and just plain intellectually laziness on part of the viewing public granted the MSM a licence to lie. ..... the Confederacy was an independent nation in 1861-65, before that .... American flag over government institutions that support everything it ... Good question. ... Let me say this, it's probably here too, the CBF is part of OUR history?... Joe Cortina: It is the anti-American act of the Government's power to ..... to exploit the question of slavery and thus dig an abyss between the two parts of ... Before all of this happens, please consider helping me REACH OUT TO ... Historical References on Underground Chemistry 'No One Expects ... 'Please e- mail me the answer to my Stupid Question.' ... http://www.usdoj.gov/dea/pubs/ pblist.htm the U.S. DEA ... FAQ at hyperreal.com has a good chemistry section...", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811BK9J": "she had two malting seasons, I have been saving her hair to make a pillow because it's so soft lmao", "3V8JSVE8YYO2K18HTV1IKKQUQD3EYL": "Ridin down at the Rapids a few weeks ago. Augusta Georgia Augustageorgia rapids savannahrapids https://t.co/8BVjYhKJcX", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2G1TZ": "He did well considering how poorly prepared he was. The poor soil in the Sydney area was a big issue, meaning the first crops the settlers/prisoners grew failed. Phillip had to treat the convicts well, and offer them incentives to show enterprise, in order to get the colony producing and expanding.", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMPT43": "O good luck o because my mouth needs.spacing", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8M1HQ": "What you create with the addition of -er or one if its variants (-or, -ist etc...) is called an agent noun.", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481RB2X": "Average width is between 5 and 6' Colors   Opinion 2: ummm. it should have some meat on it. but if u have alot of meat. you need sorta longer penis. so if ur small and you know it. dont worry about meat. but if u got the big penis. hope that thing is meaty lol. Opinion 3: Circumference is on average just under 5.5 inches d  c/(pi) therefore about 1.75 inches thick is average", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1E0ANV": "Nietzsche once said, when you pee into an abyss, the abyss also pees into you.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54JEB4": "Dear Tulisa, You can compare the color of your teeth, as your Milk Teeth are whiter (hence the name) than your permanent teeth.If your Dentist gave you a Temporary filling and had no plans to make it a Permanent one, then it is very likely they knew that it was a Milk Tooth and were waiting for it to fall out. For those who are young (under 12 or 13 years old) and if they haven't hit the tooth lately, then it's probably a baby tooth. 55, 65, molar, Premolar, 24. then 18, 28, Wisdom Tooth  17 years old. you said ( There's my front top two teeth Then on the right there's one next to it) So that will be the front top two teeth are  51  61 names are Incisor from age 7 months to 7 years old Baby tooth out/Adult tooth in. the next to it to the right is  62 to the left of it is  52 names are Incisor, Baby tooth out/Adult tooth in, 9 months 8 years old. So my best advice is to see your dentist if it is hurting you so much I would do whatever to go see the dentist . Good Luck Best Wishes", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GE0HK": "Biopower.. Cooking fat needs pre heating as mostly it is solid at ambient temperature.. Therefore it won't flow thru the pipes. But generally with some good design then biopower could be as reliable and just as quick to start up as fossil fuels. It all depends how you generate the electricity.. Steam turbines are more efficient than internal combusion engines and depending on the cost of fossil fuels could be equally as cheap.", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA900N53": "Maybe i need something to fertilise me so i'll grow a bit more lol.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OF0UK": "Immunization is the same as inoculation and vaccination in that inoculation and vaccination use a viable infecting agent like immunization does. Immunization is just the general term for vaccination and such things as what you gain from these process. When the human immune system is exposed to a disease once, it can develop the ability to quickly respond to a subsequent infection.", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G4SDQ": "My dad's friend just purchased a small dog. He said that the dog will stare at the ceiling, fall back, and act like it's having a seizure... I know low blood sugar could be the issue, but what else could it be if not that? (They took it to a vet and he gave it a pain shot that worsened the attacks. They are taking it to another vet today, but I want to see if I can find out anything to help.)", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZFF8Q": "I would think that if you were going to have hair on your chest that it would have grown there by now. You should consider yourself lucky to not have hair on your chest. Some men don't get hair on their chest at all and some men get hair on their chest after 40.Sorry don't know how to tell you to grow hair unless you buy vitimins for hair growth from the pharmacy. (yes they have vitimins for hair growth) Give it a try,it couldn't hurt and maybe you will grow more hair and hopefully where you want it to grow.I can't say for sure it will work,but maybe worth a try. Rinse and condition your hair after swimming. Never use rubber bands on your hair. Wear your hair up whenever possible. Avoid bleach, hair dyes with mettalic salts . 25. Wet set rather than blow dry hair. If you want a man with no hair on his chest, then why don't you just date twelve year old boys? The grossest, when a guy shaves or waxes body hair, and it grows back in... and it's all red bumps like in-grown hairs, and it'...", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHUDNX": "You may need a bigger size elastic, maybe try not opening your mouth as big as you can. Wearing your elastics like that creates a tight bight so you won't be able to open big. I would say that shifting calories is a way to keep your body losing/gaining weight.", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9KAH9F": "Good luck  Rectal prolapse normally describes a medical condition wherein the walls of the rectum protrude through the anus and hence become visible outside the body.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FW3QG": "Super post from on donating bone marrow. Not as tough a procedure as you'd think. http://t.co/oPcMxFz70D marrow", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGFC1Q": "I'm curious as to why you are going to bed at 8am. I'm curious as to why you are peeing in your pants. I'm curious as to why the moon left and the tiger appeared. I'm curious as to why my cat loves me some days and hates me on others. I'm curious as to why people talk about intellectuals like that is a bad thing. I'm curious as to what the barometric pressure has to do with how I feel at night vs. the morning. I'm curious as to why all religions can't accept that they all ultimately have the same HOPE therefore it is not worthy of fighting a war over. I'm curious as to why America feels 'entitled' when in truth we are more of the 'new kid on the block' in comparative years. I'm curious as to how our children would run this country if given the chance. Im curious as to how much damage we do to our children rather than good. I'm curious as to how a robin's egg knows when it is time to hatch. I'm curious as to why all the good tv shows come on Thursday nights and nothing worth a darn c...", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD498X8": "There are more influences in Spain than in Portugal. In Portugal we kept some agriculture tools (that are now obsolete, ofc), some town names and not much more. We got rid of them more than 800 years ago. And the North of Portugal got rid of them almost 1000 year ago. The percentage or Arab descendants is also very low, maybe 5-10 (including mixing).", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NJGZS": "you shouldn't feel anything different, it could be gas, you may be extra aware of your insides because you know you're preg. See the doc if you're worried. Good luck, and congrats!", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVPV05": "Write about something that will be easy for you to write about... yourself, your family, a vacation, sports, hobbies, anything that can put passion into your essay or novel. I always found writing about things I was involved in to be the easiest... I wrote my college essays on helping my grandfather who had just been diagnosed with a detoriating muscle disease... I wrote about how I helped him in his wheelchair, fed him, changed him, took trips in the handicapped van my grandparents purchased and always let him eat apples because they were his favorite. Things like that...... something that hits close to you so that you can add alot of feeling and adjectives into your essay.", "391JB9X4ZY65CKBD6EOAOKGS10HKMH": "Given your answers (A, B, C, D, E) the most close one is B.However, I don't agree with any of them. Because 'automatic stabilizer' means the economy stabilizes by itself, and the dificit is zero, too. It takes long time, that's why fiscal policy helps the economy to 'stabilize' faster and it causes the deficit to increase or decrease.The reason why question B is close is that one must assume that governement spending must be fixed, while less taxes are collected. However, we would expect the governement spending to decrease if the economy is contracting.", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E6BBMR": "The reversal is no longer a non-elective surgery here in Canada which means we had to hand out 3000 to a doctor and hospital to have this done.", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI1HF3": "It could be a mild eye infection or a foreign body in the eye that doesn't go away. This could cause a discharge happening all night long that covers your eye in a milky film. That would explain the going away part and the fact that it's only one eye. Actually going to an eye doctor is not too bad. Eye doctors always know what's going on with your eye. Go to make sure you won't lose your eye or to rule out something worse. Check out their cell phone history when they go to bed. Keep a KEEN eye out for it. I hate having to play babysitter myself, but you simply have to know what's going on in a marriage such as a potentially dead one. The bottom of the eye socket is very thin and can break easily for many reasons. A fracture could cause abnormal eye positioning. I'd try going to your general practitioner and telling him what's going on. If it is a fracture, they can remove the bone and simply pop the eye into place with a simple surgery. If your eye still looks funny, then head off t...", "3P6ENY9P79USEBKEFENLJZTJSAVHIW": "Come check us out ! Well I went out walking BF for a couple of miles today . After a short warm-up , I did n't really feel any pain in my left calf . Since I did n't feel any pain , I ran for a short distance 3 or 4 times during the walk . The most I felt was maybe a slight bit of soreness , and my left calf muscles felt a little tight , but no pain .", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIUUI7": "Photo: Physical Fitness Tips Anyone Can Use To Live Better -  Source: Fitness Universe Fitness is not... http://t.co/8sU06wmOO6", "3M47JKRKCXZJSGOKA9KQ9JAFG0886C": "Aquarium Cleaning Sponge Brush Green Algae Scraper Cleaner for Fish Plant Tank http://t.co/vvRduH2rMi http://t.co/x4YosFN9on", "3I7KR83SNABQ50SJH5K5JYA811DK9L": "This is what has helped me (be sure to consult your Doctor to make sure any medication is right for you) Relpax ( Out of all the migraine medications out there this one helped me the most) combined with Topamax,Neurontin, Skelaxin and Paxil for depression. My doctor put me on a daily medication called Topamax it a Beta blocker, its is commonly prescribed for migraine sufferers who don't respond to Imitrex or Maxalt. Topamax is a medication that had to be taken daily, and can not be missed. The Topamax is to prevent migraines, the Toradol would be taken in the case that one was already in progress. These are the only two medications that have given me any relief. I too suffer from migraines and for 13 years I tried everything and nothing worked until the doctor put me on a medication called Topamax. in pm and for the past 4 months since taking the medication I have not had a migraine, not even a slight headache. Please talk to your doctor about this medication...it works wonders.", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJ0LA4": "Have you had a test for syphilis if memory serves me right the bumps (postule) on the back of the throat is a symptom or was that typhoid anyway get this checked out sounds like an STD. some of the symptons may not show up in your wife for several months and she may already be exposed and carrying whatever you got. 'I have lots of little bumps (almost like goosebumps or whiteheads) on my penis. Colin Small bumps on the penis can be a few things. These whitish bumps appear on the glans (head) of the penis or along the edge of the glans in many guys. If you are or have been sexually active, bumps on the penis may be signs of sexually transmitted diseases (STDs). Another STD, genital warts (HPV) can show up as bumps on the penis. Some other STDs, like syphilis, also can show up as painless ulcers on the penis. If you are or have been sexually active, bumps on the penis may be signs of sexually transmitted diseases (STDs). Another STD, genital warts (HPV) can show up as bumps on the...", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSERMK": "Its when an artist is struggling with making art. Like they'll mess up a lot while doing it. Or, they can't get any ideas for what to make. Either one of those would be considered artist block. I'm having the latter of it right now. I haven't been doing well in my art lately and been struggling,  hehe. And I guess artist block is the same as writer's block..only that it involves art, not writing hehe. Hope this helps. Good luck with your art and do your best. If it becomes too stressful, take a break  You'll do fine though and you will make it. I wish you the best!", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPIKPTP": "No you cannot as Invisalign does not fix bite problems as well as braces does. I have a mild overbite and Invisalign and my dentist told me that I will still have an overbite after my treatment. He said if I was eally concerned about the bite that I would go with traditional braces and an appliance to fix it. It sounds like your othro is on the right track by the treatment you already have as that is what my dentist/ortho recommended for me. Opinion 2: Here is, On occasion when yawning or eating, the FORSUS can become detached. It is easy to put the two parts back together eliminating the need to come to the office. Compress the coil spring portion that is attached to the upper arch, pushing it as tightly together as possible. Open your mouth wide. Take the stiff lower pole, attached to the lower archwire, and place it inside the center of the upper coil spring. Release the coil spring and then open and close several times to ensure it is attached properly to the pole.", "3VDVA3ILIDD3E9T5N1KX600WW86G13": "Read the Patient Information Leaflet if available from your pharmacist before you start taking niacin and each time you get a refill. If you have any questions, ask your doctor or pharmacist. Take this medication by mouth with a low-fat meal or snack as directed by your doctor, usually at bedtime. Taking niacin on an empty stomach increases side effects (such as flushing, upset stomach). Do not crush or chew extended-release tablets. Doing so can release all of the drug at once, increasing the risk of side effects. Also, do not split the tablets unless they have a score line and your doctor or pharmacist tells you to do so. Swallow the whole or split tablet without crushing or chewing. Niacin is available in different formulations (such as immediate and sustained release). Do not switch between strengths, brands, or forms of niacin. Severe liver problems may occur. The dosage is based on your medical condition and response to treatment.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OG0UL": "mydol hot bath and a heating pad", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JI8Z4M": "I take good care of my children and they have an adoring father, ... And speaking of pot, I honestly don't know how I'm going to through these years .... Because I do I love them dearly, and I am pretty sure I am just have a 13 year l... I don't think you'll find anyone who agrees with you on this one, sorry. How exactly do you think it's fair to take away a person's rights just because they are a teenager? I will take every thumbs down you want to give for this and take it proudly. Personally I think that time outs don't work. When 'punishing' our kids, we must do what makes them realize that what they did was wrong. It's hard to say what to do when they actually get to the point of where your child is at now... I do suggest you get a private lesson for your daughter just to be sure she gets close supervision. That way you won't need to worry as much and the instructor will take special care to prevent your daughter from getting scared during her lesson.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PW81I": "Sign up to receive WebMD 's award-winning content delivered to your inbox . Alright 2 days ago I was walking and a bee decides to sting me on the bottom of my my middle toe and I have never been allergic to bees . One day after words my toe starts to swell up and is itchy . Did n't think anything of it .", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160OM81": "I don't know :(", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8ZPE1": "Finally , our HON Certification is verifiable proof that our quality , accuracy and integrity standards are worthy of the highest grade by an independent Internet review board , Labiaplasty ( labia reduction ) and other female cosmetic surgical procedures including Vaginoplasty ( rejuvenation or tightening of the vagina ) have become widespread as social acceptance of these cosmetic and reconstructive procedures moves toward the mainstream .", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIXUIA": "The nine-day exercise marked the biggest land deployment of British military personnel in India in many years. The exercise, according to NATO sources, is a joint and multinational live-exercise, involving more than 50,000 service men and women from 15 of the NATO member states and 10 Partnership for Peace (PfP) countries. Iceland did not take part in the exercise. CHICAGO (AP) -- Combining weight loss and exercise lowers blood pressure more effectively than exercise alone, according to a new study. The study of 133 overweight men and women with untreated hypertension found that about an hour of exercise three to four times weekly for six months reduced blood pressure, and weight loss lowered it even more. One group did aerobic exercise including jogging, resulting in an average weight loss of less than 4 pounds the other combined the exercise with dieting, attaining an average weight loss of about 17 pounds. The average reduction in the exercise only group was 4 points for both re...", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179C5FC": "you probably have a lot of muscle mass and are built solid. don't worry about it. I don't think you are too skinny.", "3QQUBC64ZECHE2VKHYIZRTDU2ZANXD": "Your baby will give you clear signs when he's ready to move beyond liquid nourishment. Cues to look for include:  Head control. To eat solids, your baby needs to be able to keep his head in a steady, upright position.", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FZ5PF": "In fact, all those who now use Gandhi as a stick to beat the Sangh parivar with .... It is time we got out of binary thinking: good and evil are not .... Today, Narendra Modi is arguably the most popular leader of the country. Being the son ... great many people who worshipped and followed his every move. ... forever be known as one of the greatest men who ever lived, while Hitler is what ... power, but each used it differently one for good, one for evil. Starting with a field of 96 of the history's best leaders, Live Your List Nation will ... the top match-up? ?hich will determine the greatest leader of all-time! ... a Moment Maker ?? You Can Live Your LYL 053 - Be Like Ben - The Live Your List?... glad to see more people are figuring it all out! The big question here is: Where will this all end? Some words of wisdom from one of my favorite ...", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL04OL6": "Of course the MAC line..but you can also try MARY KAY she does have a line for the sisters and her makeup isn't heavy like her FASHION FAIR  rival. Good Luck.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXSDJW": "Yes, you have already explained the mix of races in his family. So he's mixed-race. But everyone on earth is mixed-race if you go far enough back in their ancestries.", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G5SDR": "68 grams (14). The ratio of an eggs fat content comes close to meeting the dietary proportions currently recommended as: -1/3 saturated, 1/3 monounsaturated and 1/3 polyunsaturated. The egg yolk contains the following: all of an eggs vitamin A, D, and E. almost all the vitamin B12, choline, folic acid and vitamin B3. 76 of the biotin, 73 of the inositol, 50 of the niacin, 93 of the vitamin B6, 42 of the riboflavin, 90 of the thiamin 44 of the proteinand substantial portions of the eggs mineral contentSource: The American Egg Board Source: USDA National Nutrient Database for Standard Reference When can I introduce Eggs to my baby? Eggs, particularly the , are one of the top 8 of all allergens. Most pediatric resources agree that egg yolks are fine for the non-allergenic baby to eat when baby is around 8 months old. Please keep in mind that the egg whites should not be fed to baby before 1 year old.", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26VJ8W": "It's never too late! I've known people who have retired from civilian jobs in their 60's and THEN started successful acting careers. Other cities worth considering maybe : Toronto and Vancouver are the strongest places in Canada, London in the UK and Melbourne in Australia (with Sydney coming in 2nd).", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJGJTL": "could just be break through bleeding. i wouldnt get a test until after a missed period , be way to soon. i think youre probably fine so dont stress until you have something to stress about.", "3UZUVSO3P7T2QKJ3ASD7QP3NH3NME1": "Angels are territorial, and the inch per gallon ryleDOES NOT WORK for fish like these - this inch per gallon stuff is ignorant fish keeping, while smart people use research and common sense instead. At best you can fit one mated pair, If you try to do 6 of them I promise you only one or two will survive to adulthood anyway. Opinion 2: i want two angelfish but not sure how many can go in it... July 25th, 2010,01:26 AM tyspot1000 how many angelfish can go in a 30 gallon???? i want two angelfish but not sure how many can go in it July 25th, 2010,01:31 AM bassbonediva Two angelfish in a 30gal tank (especially if it isn't a tall tank) would be pushing it, IMO. Angelfish get to be 6' long and up to 10' tall, so they need taller tanks in order to be happy. I personally wouldn't put a pair of angelfish in anything smaller than a 40gal tall tank. July 25th, 2010,03:20 AM darrellg1 Hello Tyspot1000 ive found some information about the amount of angles you can keep per gallon in your tank go", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2T0O9": "do so regardless of whether the candidate took the SAT or ACT  however , some colleges accept the ACT in place of the SAT subject tests and some accept the optional ACT Writing section in place of a SAT Subject Test . Most colleges use ACT scores as only one factor in their admission process . A sampling of ACT admissions scores shows that the 75th percentile composite score was 24.1 at public four-year institutions and 25.3 at private four-year institutions .", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE4T90": "A cats personality is more likely to change negatively when she's in heat and raising litters, than if she's spayed. Cats go in and out of heat over and over when they aren't bred, and can lose weight and condition from the stress of heat cycles. Cats in heat and pregnant cats can become moody and irritable, and so can a mother with kittens.", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX63A5": "After the War (novel) After the War is a novel written by author Carol Matas. The graphic descriptions of violence, especially against children, may be too intense for readers under the age of 12. The author notes that, 'no character is modeled after one specific person I read about, rather my characters are modeled on many different people I both read about and interviewed. 'She said that, between 1945 and May 1948, some 69,000 Jews traveled to Mandate Palestine and entered illegally. An optimizing task is focused on quality, seeking a correct or optimal solution. Conjunctive tasks are tasks requiring all group members to contribute to complete the product. In the YA novels, 'She explores the darker sides of growing up: dealing with parent's abandonment through death in 'Tell Me Everything', abuse by a stepparent in 'What Jamie Saw', sibling incest in 'Bee and Jacky' and a political-inspired tragedy in 'Many Stones'.' 'Many Stones' was inspired by the murder of Amy Biehl.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXY206": "Maybe because your weak and or you don't eat enough everyday eat protein to help dizziness and also drink more that eight ounces of water every day To help the black spots maybe get some rest or put a bag of ice on the back of your neck", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIMT5A": "Your leo probably has some time of parasite. You need to take her to the vet so that they can help get rid of the problem. When you bought this gecko you took on the responsibility of her and if she needs treatment it is up to you to get it for her. Don't worry, he won't let himself starve. Second possible reason is, if he is housed with an adult gecko, that the adult is eating all the food before he has a chance to. Geckos can dominate over another gecko and cause the other gecko to not eat. It's a common misconception, no one should ever use sand with leopard geckos though. All you have to do is look up 'leopard gecko necropsy' on google and tons of hits come up of impacted geckos (not for the weak of mind though). You should start to worry if she hasn't eaten in 5 days or more but if she has before hat it's not a big deal, if you want her to start eating you should try feeding her mealworms all lizards love those!", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6TLJJ": "It's normal to have those. It's just a larger piece of your uterine lining being expelled from your body.", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX0WNP": "this all depends on your past history of THC use. Your body builds stamina to drugs and stores them differently. For example if you are over weight, you will show traces of THC much longer. Since you are not particularly heavy, I wouldn't see passing this test to be a problem. But like I said it depends on how much you smoked up until the clean month. Opinion 2: Depends on the type of test Hair or blood test you are screwed! if piss test drink alot of water and hope that your pee is diluted enough to get a negative answer. Depending on your use of the drug determines how long a good urine test can detect it. it ca be any wear from 1-5 days for a low user to a month for a heavy user.", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M32VPD": "Space them as far apart as possible in the room, but equal distances from where the dog will be sitting before the start of the test.Bring your dog into the room.Have your dog sit as far away from the containers as possible.", "3RBI0I35XE1ZA3SK4BKM1TMXZO93YF": "Your body stores excess calories as fat, ...moves nutrients through your body, ...Read more Positive: 10  Show more results Learn about Carbohydrates, Proteins, and Fats symptoms, ...", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWTU52": "What Is Psychosis? Psychosis is a serious mental disorder characterized by thinking and emotions that are so impaired, that they indicate that the person experiencing them has lost contact with reality. People who are psychotic have false thoughts (delusions) and/or see or hear things that are not there (hallucinations). These are referred to as positive symptoms. negative symptoms like loss of motivation and social withdrawal can also occur. These experiences can be frightening and may cause people who are suffering from psychosis to hurt themselves or others. It is important to see a doctor right away if you or someone you know is experiencing symptoms of psychosis. Psychosis affects three out of every 100 people. It is most likely to be diagnosed in young adults, but psychosis can happen to anyone.", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1GKQ6": "Gingivitis is completely reversible. I might take a couple of weeks of brushing, flossing and visits to the dentist. And don't worry, gingivitis is not phenomenal. It's just because of the build-up of plaque that makes your gum open slightly. Just continue to do what you are doing and it will go away. And no, Grandpa Walleye. If the gum slit is deeper than 3-4mm, then it would not be gingivitis. It would be Perioditis, which can't be completely healed.", "3FCO4VKOZ4BJ5HCG6MBI776XMEQ7E9": "Here's an answer to your question and some other information you may find useful. Average Life Span: 10-13 years  Average Weight: Male 110 pounds, Females 90 pounds  Color And Coat: Coarse flat coat, black in color with rust markings on cheeks, muzzle, chest, legs, above eyes and under the tail. Typical Health Problems: Rottweilers are generally healthy. The more frequent health problems found in the breed are: hip displaysia, rupture of cranial cruciate ligament, cancer, heart disease, enthropia eye conditions. Owner Level: For experienced involved dog owners  Personality: Rottweilers are a German breed so they tend to be of a serious nature. The ideal Rottweiler is quiet, even-tempered, obedient, easy to train, faithful and brave. This breed should show a strong understanding of what is right and wrong if trained and guided by a responsible and involved owner. This is a physically strong breed that will leap to the defense of the ones they love.", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DUAOSI": "Causal closure has stronger and weaker formulations. The stronger formulations of causal closure assert that: 'No physical event has a cause outside the physical domain.' - Jaegwon Kim.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGQBYI": "Thymine is also known as 5-methyluracil, a pyrimidine nucleobase. In RNA, thymine is replaced by the nucleobase uracil. Thymine was first isolated (from calves' thymus glands) in 1893 by Albrecht Kossel and Albert Neumann.", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6ERHA": "I just get so caught up in Gnostic Christianity that I don't have the focus to explore Sumerian culture and wisdom", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA4JF9": "The beginning of Of Mice and Men has some fantastic imagery.", "39O6Z4JLX2VUM74TJP4Q1A77O28XV0": "In some cases , the symptoms involve the respiratory system , with coughing , sneezing , and/or wheezing . Sometimes , there may be runny discharge from eyes or nose . In other cases , the allergic symptoms affect the digestive system resulting in vomiting and diarrhea . It 's best to get your dog tested and determine a course of action of any allergies .", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNQYTV": "Oh yes I agree 100 if women are made to keep them covered then so should a man. And no I am not just saying that because I feel women should expose their breast. But I can say that if they do I won't be turning away P", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6CHRY": "Capturing personality in a portrait takes is attention to detail, and genuine care about your subject as an individual. For examples of  symbolizing identify to show specifics of personality just look at how movie stars change their posture, clothing and costumes and props, and facial expressions in different background settings and lighting conditions to accurately communicate the characters personality. How would an actor playing a drug addict dress? what would his posture be like? grooming? clothing? what props would be in his hands? where would he be? (background)  What are the colors and lighting like? (dark, bright, intense?) As a painter what artistic style best matches the drug addicts personality? frenzied lines? soft lines? dull washed out depressed colors? super bright agitated colors? What do you want to show in your addict? For example, are you capturing the extreme arrogance and excessive jubilation of the high of the addict, or his desperate depression? Ho", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUIM1H": "Not really sure what this is asking, but his discography is listed on the site below...", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FEY6J": "the highest approval rating he received was 47 (with a disapproval rating of 50) during the january 22 to 25 period conducted by Cook/RT Strategies. the worst rating he received so far was a 33 approval rating and a 57 disapproval rating conducted by Pew during the March 8 to 12 period, and a 60 disapproval rating (and a 37 approval rating) during the march 6-8 period conducted by AP-Ipsos and march 10-12 conducted by CNN/USA Today/Gallup (36 approval rating). methinks that the republican party is very popular in the central-midwest regions of the US, where bush focused on the issues of family values and security (antiterrorism)-- issues that strike the heart of the people there. If you have any other questions,or issues, let me know. I will tell all, I have been through about every custody and child support issue known. Investment from Liaoning's 15,535 foreign-funded enterprises recorded 984 million US dollars in the period, up 69.7 percent from last year's corresponding pe...", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5CO6V": "Roughly.... how many CALORIES in a Peanut Butter Sandwich....? ... However if you use more, there will be more calories. Richie E  7 years ago . 0.", "3UEDKCTP9VOMRH4Q28ML52J26BN7KU": "Anosmia 'Definition The term anosmia means lack of the sense of smell. It may also refer to a decreased sense of smell. Ageusia, a companion word, refers to a lack of taste sensation.", "3J94SKDEKINZQ7KXMYL135AGVWWD59": "its important to let your doctor know of additional self medication, though marijuana has not been proven to effect other prescription drugs they will never know if alternative pain medication works. Its important to give other meds a try this may mean coming off the weed to see if other meds work. Unfortunately though medicinal marijuana has been documented to relieve pain on many scales it is still not legal in many country's and states and so its important to give other pain relieving meds a chance. Be honest and open to other meds. No one can force you to take a drug test so its your call at the end of the day doctors can not report you to the police as they have a duty of care and have to conform to the data protection act", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF8F72": "About Us FIND YOUR LAST NAME Our database contains 49,352 last names from Smith to Smiley and Aaron to Zywicki. Where does yours come from and what does it mean? Lastname Statistics", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0W2ME": "well, if you feel he is the best boyfriend you ever had then why try to loose that... you need to stop being selfish and insecure and try loving and holding on to your good thing... good men is hard to come by and if you have someone good why risk loosing it... you say you cry every time you try to break up with him well, it's because you know that's not what you really want...", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRH10L": "Strength training (even minor strength training, like sit-ups) won't help you lose belly fat. Cardio, especially running, and a healthy diet are the only way to actually lose fat. Sit-ups/crunches will build muscle, but you'll still have a layer of fat over them and will actually make your stomach larger.", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATY5AY": "Apply the Heading 1 style to that paragraph. The easiest way to apply the Heading 1 style is to click the Style box on the Formatting toolbar and choose Heading 1. In the same way, apply the Heading 1 style to other major headings in your document.", "3UUSLRKAUL1EDBYGAR0Y1POCM2P7DG": "aw see that's why I want another doggy. I want a beagle hella bad lol", "3OWZNK3RYLNT8CCWQA9SFYBSXM02U7": "They are part of the , which carries fluid ( lymph fluid ) , nutrients , and waste material between the body tissues and the bloodstream . , the body 's defense system against disease . The lymph nodes filter lymph fluid as it flows through them , trapping bacteria , viruses , and other foreign substances , which are then destroyed by special white blood cells called lymphocytes .", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V5XPLL": "girlz watch porn to have more experience, to learn new position to empress their partner guys watch porn to masturbate I can't tell you why, but I say watch porn with him learn news sexual things, it can make things interesting. Masturbate for him, leave him satisfied so he don't have to masturbate himself. Not to mention he's a man most guys masturbate anyways weither they have a girl or not. Not only is it perfectly ok for men to masturbate, it's ok for women too. I've said it before though, it's been PROVEN that people who masturbate experience a more fulfulling sex life WITH THEIR PARTNER! If the pictures/porn offend you or make you jealous, why don't you let your husband make pictures/porn of you and him? My ex-husband said he didn't masturbate. My guy now admits he did it a lot before me and still does sometimes since we've been together. He likes nothing more than the thought of me masturbating, esp. catching me do it. Otherwise, loosen up, learn, and enjoy what you discover!", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6W0XC": "You can always eat more calories than you can burn. When it comes to burning fat, diet always trumps exercise. ?? There are only two nonsurgical things you can do to sculpt your body and they are (1) add or lose fat and (2) add or lose muscle. Too much body fat is not good for your health, and belly fat is the worst. ... While you can't control the buildup of belly fat, your lifestyle habits can influence ... Once ... If you need to know how to lose fat, read my answer about how to lose fat --- http://answers.yahoo.com/question/indexyltAs615QJM4X3ID905qmmlXty6IXylv3?qid20111028185603AAVcP4D Good luck and good health!! Well, fat weighs a bit, so if you want to lose fat you're weight is going to be going down too. To lose weight, you have to diet and exercise.", "3SCKNODZ0XENZNPTZLE1XU0606VN7I": "4 days ago Full Advert Details Pets Age : 13 weeks, 1 day old.", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X47XLI": "Beginning in the summer months, bears gain as much as 30 pounds of weight per week, reports PBS Nova Online. When winter hibernation begins in October, bears are potentially 480 to 500 pounds heavier due to their gradual summer weight gain, which lasts about 16 weeks.", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G7W4W": "That is just amazing. I don't think I'll ever complain about work again. Thanks for that.", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65TPKJ": "Although generally concerning heterosexual relationships, men's romantic fiction also includes gay romantic fiction, romance dealing with love between men. The genre of 'lad lit' also has somewhat similar connotations. For example, the novels 'Belinda' by Anne Rice and 'Northern Lights' by Nora Roberts are both told from the male protagonist's point of view.", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUSAJO": "Depends on how that person is. On average I would say 50-100 dollars for a combined gift. 100 Wilt Chamberlain 81 Kobe Bryant 78 Wilt Chamberlain (3OT) 73 David Thompson 73 Wilt Chamberlain 73 Wilt Chamberlain 72 Wilt Chamberlain 71 David Robinson 71 Elgin Baylor 70 Wilt Chamberlain This covers all 70 pt games in NBA history. Wilt did it 32 times himself, more than everyone else in the history of the league combined (24). 4 anni di richeste(..ehm... Combined the gift and get the couple one big or good gift. Kobe's recent 81 pt explosion marked the 56th time a player has scored 60 pts in an NBA game... You'll see Chamberlain's name all over the 50 pt game list, as he actually AVERAGED 50.4 pts per game in the 1961-62 NBA season. The following year he averaged 44.8 PPG.", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X46XLH": "Three Year Old Boy Cured For Premature Puberty by Brain Operation http://t.co/wNwwiXiEGc via", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6DRH9": "I randomly get emotional breakdowns..", "3GKAWYFRAPR3JH2G6DUF1BFXMWXDPV": "There are two ares you need to review carefully.First be sure you have not started any new medicines or herbs since the time the problem began. You could be having a medicine reaction or one caused from mixing medicines or medicine and herbs. Certain herbs do not go well with some medicines and even other herbs. A pharmachist may be able to help answer quesstions or some in-depth research of what you are taking and their possible inter-actions with other medicines.Secondly, (if the first part does not help) you need to be more aggressive in finding out the problem. Panic attacks are a problem, but they are only a second problem not the main problem. Don't let anyone try to fix the panic problem and leave you with the real root problem. My mom and aunt both had this problem. It took about year of going to specilists to find the root of the problem. Several doctors claimed one thing or another and gave them medicine, but it did not fix the problem. That is because most...", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA1LYC": "im 5'4'' 110 lbs. im 34 B or C (i can wear both) i guess im rather skinny ey?", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605OHDV": "It's ok to be you There's nothing wrong with I. You are asked to develop your point of view on the issue, not give a straight report of the facts. This is your opinion, so feel free to give examples that are meaningful to you, even ones from your personal life or experiences. Formula for success There are no shortcuts to success on the SAT essay. You will not receive high scores on your essay just because it is long, or has five paragraphs, or uses literary examples. Process of elimination Eliminate the choices you are sure are wrong when you are not sure of the answer. Make an educated guess from those that remain.", "3ICOHX7ENC95N6CWLNQ9SSWAE0NE0J": "Roaring with laughter, I too wish 'God bless you, go ahead', .....hahahaha.......keep posting such good jokes...LMAO", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYQEKM": "'Bend your left ear down towards your left shoulder and then your right ear down towards your right shoulder' to test for pain free cervical spine lateral flexion. Now test for stiffness or pain flexing or extending the cervical spine: 'bend your neck forwards to try to touch your chin against your chest.' 'bend your neck back to lift your chin.'", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJYALR": "Mostly just stuff my grandmother had. Some handmade quilts, a set of ivory handled knives, that sort of thing. She came to me in a dream years ago, and told me to 'use the old tools'. I'm sure she wasn't referring to her 60 year old quilts or her 70 year old knives...but still I keep them. Powerful wonders they are. I'm not a witch per se...but some family treasures are infused with energy. I also keep a Gold ring, which has another story behind it all together. (it's white gold, very heavy and an important piece in my life). ----interesting question by the way, thanks for asking.", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBM5Q7": "for example, i'm 50 english, 25 german, 20 welsh, and 5 blackfoot indian. i also think most orientals and blacks look alot alike too. They can make the colors darker or lighter. Adding white to red, for example makes pink. Colloquially it refers to British citizens or residents whose parents are of two or more different races or ethnic backgrounds. Analysis of census results shows that, in England and Wales only, 237,000 people stated their ethnicity as Mixed White and Black Caribbean, 189,000 as Mixed White and Asian, 156,000 as Other Mixed, and 79,000 Mixed White and Black African. The estimates for mid-2009 for England only suggest that there are 301,300 people in the Mixed White and Black Caribbean category, 127,500 Mixed White and Black African, 292,400 Mixed White and Asian, and 235,500 Other Mixed. The census forms in Scotland and Northern Ireland did not include sub-groups, but rather single categories: 'Any Mixed Background' in Scotland and simply 'Mixed' in Northern Ir...", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ110FM": "dont worry it will grow back, it always grows back next time dont let your friend cut your hair  if you get it down, then you should be able to begin cutting yourself. well im always cutting myself, so i just take it easy, and don't rush, and always moisturise, because it makes your legs smoother, for the next time you shave!", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RW6CJ": "The Cask of Amontillado : Why your mother never wanted you to get drunk at Mardi Gras''  Edgar Allan Poe's The Cask of Amontillado'' The Cask of Amontillado,'' which first appeared in Godey's Lady's Book in 1846, is a classic example of the use of an unreliable narrator. My suggestion would be for you to actually read some of Poe's work - The Cask of Amontillado, Fall of the House of Usher, The Raven, Murders in the Rue Morgue.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OE0UJ": "Yes you can use hand wraps under your MMA gloves for training but you have to be smart about your approach to this. First let me add that for heavy bag work you should use a boxing or bag glove with wraps underneath for the majority of that because MMA gloves don't offer good protection and over time you will probably damage your hands if you always just use MMA gloves. Some hand wraps are shorter and narrower and this facilitates using them under a MMA glove better than what you might wear under a boxing or heavy bag glove. Having two or three sets of hand-wraps is not a bad thing and many MMA fighters do for the purpose of washing and having clean ones and one set will be shorter and narrower for fitting under their MMA glove better. Fighters will also have a set of over-sized MMA gloves sometimes for this reason as well for better accommodating hand-wraps but not everyone has extra gloves or can afford multiple sets of different size and different gloves for all this. Using", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB5XP8Y": "This is one of the most commonly asked question on yahoo answers, Please read this, at the bottom it has info on penis enlargement Just about every guy wonders how he measures up in the down-there department at one time or another. Heres the lowdown for any guy whos ever worried about whether his penis is a normal size. Theres a fairly wide range of normal penis sizes - just as there is for every other body part. In addition to size, guys also wonder about other aspects of how their penises look, such as whether the skin covering the. Penis size is an obvious example. This applies to height and weight, size of hands and feet, and, yes, also to penis size. But not all woman can take the same size of penis. Penis size: What's normal, what's not? When you were a boy, a locker room bully may have taunted you about the size of your penis. Most likely, your size is perfectly normal. Average penis size is the same in both gay and straight men. http://www.mayoclinic.com/health/penis/MC00026", "30Y6N4AHYPUOVUIVJ5Y466FCNENDRP": "I'm not sure if your period comes the same exact day every month, but even if it does, it is okay to be one day late. You only need to start worrying if it's like 2 weeks late. I've had scares before too, and it sucks. its not serious . my period was late 6 months and i didn't have sex it just means your body is relaxing and taking a break and your just not making enough blood yet . thats all so dont worry if its a month late go to the doctor. Following taking IV antibiotics last year my period was off for the next three cycles, the doctor said between the dehydration, strange diet, and antibiotics associated with my hospital visit, it wasn't unusual to be late each month the way I was. It's alright, calm down. Since you're only 13, I'm assuming you haven't been getting your periods for very long. When you're younger and this stuff is new to you, your cycles are usually irregular.", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB38B0E": "Move the pond. I had a couple of birds to drown in my grandson swimming pool,just a kids pool in the back yard. I also have a Koi pond in my back yard and the birds love it but the older birds outside just get in the waterfall and birds learning to fly might drown. Opinion 2: What a great sized aviary. At times I have had budgies, cockatiels and even a very friendly galah in the same aviary. They all lived happily together as long as I separated them when breeding. So, if you like parrots, I would suggest cockatiels, budgies, bourke's parrots, elegant parrots, red-rumped parrots or any parrot of similar size and type. They have similar needs and a similar diet.", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2SST9": "Body fat measurements and the measuring tape are recognized as  superior methods for measuring 'weight loss'. When one declares that they want to 'lose weight', what they often mean is that they want to lose fat. So, now that you've had your body fat percentage measured, what does the number really mean? Understanding what your body fat percentage means can help you set goals for achieving a healthy weight.First, your body fat percentage is simply the percentage of fat your body contains. If you are 150 pounds and 10 fat, it  means that your body consists of 15 pounds fat and 135 pounds lean body mass (bone, muscle, organ tissue, blood and everything else).A certain amount of fat is essential to bodily functions. Fat regulates body temperature, cushions and insulates organs and tissues and is the main form of the body's energy storage. The following table describes body fat ranges and their associated categories:General Body Fat Percentage CategoriesClassification Women ( fat) Men ( fat", "38XPGNCKHTY3O5GJZE2L4ZA9V73V4J": "House Dust Mite Allergic Reactions And Symptoms Of Dust Mite Allergy http://t.co/1tRPtSdRND", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5952U": "If it still hurts you can use the aloe. Snap open the leaf, remove the inner goop, and apply the gel to your burn. Since it is open now, it does run the risk of infection. For little raw burns like these, I usually tell people to keep it covered with antibiotic during the day, and leave it open to air at night when you are sleeping. It keeps it protected during the day, and lets it dry out and develop a scab to begin healing at night. I especially like the new Neosporin spray- it's not nearly as goopy as the ointment, and lets everything breath a bit. Best of luck-", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JN6GS": "This is a very good blog, a beginner's guide to abnormal psychology. Short, clear and simple  and you can even post your question and contact the author regarding particular subject you are interested in, for FREE http://sensitive-psychoworld.blogspot.com/  Emotional.", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4EOFX": "O.K between your friend and the first answerer, we almost have it right. We need to separate three different aspects of ancient roman life, and then see if we can relate them : 1) The Roman Triumph - this was not simply a parade. While it is true as the dictatorship (in terms of one man ruling) established by Julius Caesar, solidified by his great-nephew and heir Octavianus (he was given the title Augustus meaning increaser/protector by the Senate after he had restored the Roman state from almost 30 years of civil war,) became, as time went on, increasingly royal,'' and some emperors (like Caligula or Nero) tried to use the imperial cult'' or worship of the imperial genius (spirit) as a way to unite the growing realm and counteract the decline of traditional Roman religion, neither Julius, Augustus or any of the other holders of the imperial office through to Marcus Aurelius ever thought of themselves of a god.''", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XP80E": "I did biofeedback in the 90's to help with chronic pain from Reflex Sympathetic Dystrophy (RSD-a form of nerve damage in my upper extremities). It does take some training, but if you keep up with it, you will be able to do it without the use of the machine as a way of telling you if you are doing it correctly. While it didn't work terribly long, it would give me about an hour of being relatively pain free. which for me, that was a very welcome break. If you are seeing a Psychiatrist or Psychologist, ask them for a referral to someone who specializes in Biofeedback training. It is well worth trying. Good luck to you. I hope this helps.", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHC973": "65 is the age to be officially a Senior citizen as far as the US government is concerned. But as far as AARP is concerned 50 is the minimum age requirment to join their organization. AARP is the American Association of Retired People.", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKSN1I": "You need to seriously evaluate your common sense. A stray dog licking you means he trusts and likes you. Quit letting anxiety make it anything more. If concerned, wash your hand with soapy warm water. End of story.", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8WEPN": "You want know how to permanently Cure Your Acne/Pimple, end the breakouts, regain your natural inner balance and achieve the lasting clear skin you deserve? Free Presentation Reveals 1 Unusual Tip to Eliminate Your Acne Forever and Gain Beautiful Clear Skin In 30-60 Days - Guaranteed! - http://acnetreatment.biz atural-6.html The video presentation shows you some unique and rare tips on How to Eliminate Acne and achieve perfect clear skin in as little as 7 days! This is based on the latest scientific research on how to stop the actual CAUSE of Acne. You can start using this powerful system RIGHT NOW to get the clearest skin you've ever had! - http://acnetreatment.biz atural-6.html And if you also have any Blackheads, excessive oiliness and hyperpigmentation Marks or Acne Scars, then the moves highlighted above will help remove most of these acne related symptoms while restoring your energy and vitality and dramatically improving the quality of your life.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNMRLG": "Things get so difficult when it happens from eating a cereal which was  safe '' for us for many years , and I 'm feeling particularly guilty about not keeping up with the Kellogg 's thread when it was a  front burner '' issue . Oh , almost forgot . Our General Mills cereals are Plain Cheerios , Lucky Charms , Wheaties , and Total Raisin Bran . There are a couple more , but I ca n't remember them right now . ryan 's mom : I have to admit that I do the same thing you do when I do n't cook dinner ! I am also nervous about reactions close to bed time , not just related to cereal ...", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKMVCY": "Because it still occurs today.It is the process of separation according to the colour of a persons skin.7 people found this useful Edit Share to: Loading Video Content...", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N7VSR": "I feed all my fry liquid fry food and flakes ground up really fine so they can eat it. You don't have to worrie about the male eating the fry it's the mother you have to watch for she is the one that will eat them. What you can do is look around in the pet stores in your area and ask them if they have tank dividers. Put that in your tank I would give the fry about 1/4 of the tank then let them loose in the area you have blocked off from the parents and they should be just fine and that leaves them lots of space to grow. When they get bigger you can then let them out to swim with the parents. I would wait till they are starting to get colour and you can tell the sex then put them in with the parents. Hope this helps", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2E8PX8": "I am surprised your dentist didn't advice you on this when you were in there last. Your gums are receding and it doesn't correct itself. You see a periodontist and have gum surgery. They take tissue from the roof of your mouth or inside your cheeks and replant it on your gums. You can lose teeth and jaw bone if the problem isn't corrected. I have no idea how severe your condition is, that is something you need to see your dentist about. I had it done two years ago. I put it off for a long time because of the expense but I finally had to do it. It is painful, but I survived and my gums are nice and healthy now. If you do it early, your experience may not be as bad and at 17, your parents should have to pay for it, thats a bonus! Good luck.", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XQ087": "In 5 Holden describes Allie. In 14 Holden talks about not letting Allie go get his bike and come along. In 22 Holden talks to Phoebe about Allie a little. In 25 Holden starts talking to Allie when he's crossing streets.", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUTAJP": "hyperthyroidism, pregnancy, normal adolescence, parasitic infection in bowels, elicit drugs e.g. cannabis, psychological disorders e.g. mania, or in my experience emotional stress can cause such a problem. If you are always hungry, take a look at what you are eating. Yes, you should eat more if you're not even feeling hungry at all.", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481R2BO": "Try to do exercise videos from boot camp and Rebecca Louis or try to lie on your lower back and lift your shouldr and head and put your hand around your head like a sit-up and move your legs like your rigging a bicycle", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQMREU": "The gestation period for a cat is 57 to 69 days. Most cats will give birth at around 63 days. Make her a nesting box somewhere out of the way and dim lighting like a closet or something. I'm sure she will be just fine. Resist the attempt to help her if you can, just watch. That is if you happen to be there. If she does need help I would call the vet. If you have to cut the umbilical cord, don't cut it any closer than an inch from the belly otherwise it will cause fatal infection. Most cats are pretty good at doing this themselves though.", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1W3RF": "Kennel cough is a term loosely used to describe a complex of infectionsboth viral and bacterialthat causes inflammation of a dogs voice box and windpipe . Its a form of bronchitis and is similar to a chest cold in humans .", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN14I5G": "My life is really bad with dealing with this and I need help soon ! Thank you and God bless ! -- Mark I have a scar underneath my lip from a car accident and have stitches going across my nose and a scar on my eyebrow . it is so noticeable to me . is there any treatment anyone knows of to make these scars go away without surgery ? My wife has bad knees . She 's been taking the Dr Powers Joint Support  Vitamin B12 for 45 days . She said that she could tell a difference after about three weeks , the pain seemed to be less .", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA965A": "Healthy foods are very easy to implement into your every day diet, the problem is that the stigma is that healthy food is 1) expensive and 2) not as great tasting. This is incorrect on both levels. Eating healthier is not only less expensive in the long run, but with the right foods, eating healthy can taste amazing. I, for one, love food. I enjoy the taste of good food. When I made the decision to eat healthier, I was saddened by the idea of losing out on my favorite foods. Then I learned a couple valuable lessons. First, there are so many delicious healthy foods. Some of which have become my new favorite foods to eat and I even created a recipe list of those foods for others. You can view them at www. Second, you do not have to give up your other favorite foods entirely. For my workout programs, I allow 1 to 2 cheat meals per week. This allows me and my clients to enjoy their favorite meals and still lose weight and get healthy.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXQJD0": "5 foot 7 inches.just over, but not 5' 8''. I'm 5' 9'' and stopped growing at 12 there is no way to tell over the Internet how tall you are going to be (a doctor could only give an estimate)  From my observation tall people have tall mums not dads.", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN135I2": "Mr Keevil , who is co-ordinating the dogs ' homecoming celebrations , said :  Two hundred years ago , Sir Walter Scott brought the Dandie Dinmont Terrier to prominence and today , 200 years later , we are extracting his help once again to create awareness of this lovely little dog and , hopefully , save it from possible extinction . '' From 23 to 24 February , the gathering of Dandie Dinmonts and their owners will visit the three historic houses which played a part in the breed 's creation , including Abbotsford and Bowhill , where they will be greeted by the Duke of Buccleuch , who owns an original painting of Old Pepper .", "3FK4G712NXY6YY1QVKTYRF68AJESSK": "Good luck!Nayantara Kar Hi A friend of mine has given me your mail id and asked me to seek your help.I am female, age 26years , weigh around 63 kgs and am 53 tall,quite an over weight right!", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN37904": "For good bones, try Antler Chews. They are natural and dogs love them. And they don't splinter.", "3I7SHAD35MUHH54TNKZ1KFB6VGLM7H": "An initial assessment includes a comprehensive history and physical examination by a physician , psychiatrist , psychiatric or psychiatric physician assistant . Biological tests should be performed to psychosis associated with or caused by substance use , medication , toxins , surgical complications , or other medical illnesses . should be ruled out , which can be distinguished by visual hallucinations , acute onset and fluctuating level of consciousness , indicating other underlying factors , including medical illnesses .", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYHJR6": "Stars in eyes : Fortification spectrum is more commonly known as a visual migraine To contact Dr Scurr with a health query , write to him at Good Health Daily Mail , 2 Derry Street , London W8 5TT or email drmartin  dailymail.co.uk  including contact details .", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW76ZEW": "06:00 Temp: 66.0 F Wind:SSE 13.4 G 23.7 Hum: 26 Bar: 991.0mb SteadyRain: Today 0.00', May 0.95', 4.69' yr. txwx", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LS7PU": "today's world is full of idiots that think they know what makes others happy...but the only one that know that for sure is you...of course i love thick women...but at the same time i love all women...i after years of being trapped in the dark, learned what true beauty is...and it's not even on the outside for everyone to see...we can only see that true beauty of each person by learning to see the inner person...and if you're anything like me...i can find the sexy in any woman...", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WWXR8": "Always feeling nauseous always feeling nauseous and tired,why am i always feeling nauseous,always feeling nauseous and dizzy, always feeling nauseous after eating, always feeling nauseous in the morning more....Search resultsWhy do I always feel nauseous? Dec 7, 2007 Best Answer: there are multiple reasons that you could be nauseous. More results from medhelp.org  Always feeling nauseous I have a problem with feeling nauseous all the time. Why Do I Always Feel Sick? - Cause of Chronically Feeling . ezinearticles.com/?Why-Do-I-Always-Fee. - Cached Why Am I Tired All the Time  Nauseous? eHow.com Why Do I Feel Nauseous Before I. - Cached Why Do I Always Feel Nauseous at Night? 3 Main Causes This is not really an uncommon question. ezinearticles.com/?Why-Do-I-Always-Fee. Always feeling nauseous related searches: always feeling nauseous and tired always feeling nauseous after eating why am i always feeling nauseous always feeling nauseous in the morning always feeling nauseous and dizzy", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZUP1H": "Philosopher Herman Nohl sorted Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel? ?s manuscripts into five groups : ? ?Folk Religion and Christianity?? ( ) , and several fragments including ? ?The System Fragment of 1800?? ( ) . This arrangement of Hegel? ?s unfinished works may not have pleased the philosopher .", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHJ1RM": "eating food fixed it   Opinion 2: Short retell of Early Settlement in Australia Category", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EQHLB": "I have anxiety but haven't survived it but I survived depression.", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JIDZ4R": "I know a young man whose parents brought him here when he was 4 years old. His parents came legally and brought him. When he got older he had to file for his citizenship himself.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K5PYH": "I don't know :(", "3SZYX62S5GYJ9YJNVLIF3D0K9LS577": "Probably Tylenol 3 (has codiene) for the first day or two. Lots of soft, cold food (ice cream, etc) and then just regular tylenol for 2 days after surger. If they attach wires on the same day as surgery, the area may be tender for 10-14 days. As far as the impacted canine tooth it didn't really bother me that much, but the roof of my mouth was really swollen and sore at first, and the right side of the roof of my mouth is still like twice the size of the other side 6 months later! I just have the syringe about a half inch above the extraction to squirt the water into the sockets and it still works fine. No need to shove the syringe all the way into the sockets. Hope you feel better and have a speedy recovery. Dec 1, 2008 ... My last walk in Lighthouse Field for this Esteemed Year of 2008. ... That one would have been the obvious choice for dramatic flair, but .... Spoiler Alert right now!", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYESXQ": "unfortunately nothing is working and the doctors are baffled . m 17 . About 3 days ago my tibia felt like it was numb , the feeling has not gone away but it has grew.the numbess is still on the front side of my leg , but has grew from my ankle to right underneath my knee . I ve looked online and hAve gotten nothing and my local clinic Is bloody hopeless and would look at me like I m stupid if I were to try to explain to them the problem .", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E7CRK": "I just came into possession of an old oil painting that my uncle was given during WWII for helping a Jewish family get to the French Underground. It has a monk walking up a hill to what must be a monastary. The monk is dressed in white and the building is white--the background is heavily treed. The artist's name is not readable--I have been told that it supposed to be from the 15th or 16th century. It has spent more than 60 years in a very large safe deposit box (it is not framed). What should I do to properly care for it. Asked by Leslie1018 73 months ago  You can preserve it by enclosing a wood  glass framing. Sources: It is my opinion PNParamasivan 73 months ago Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. Please sign in to give a compliment. Answer from newuser56392381 Grandma's old painting sells for over 600,000 Family puts unsigned work up for auction to pay for UC tuition, is stunned by res", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GQYQG": "The National health care plan does not include dental.", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSEMRF": "You are confusing donating marrow with having a bone marrow transplant. If you are DONATING bone marrow, they will do it one of two ways. IF you donate actual bone marrow, you will be under general anesthesia and they will use a needle to pull bone marrow from your hip bone. Most 'bone marrow' donations today are actually donating the peripheral blood stem cells in the circulating blood, not marrow. There is NO chemo involved in bone marrow donation. That would actually be counter productive, because. Bone marrow is inside of several bones, and its a spongy sort of tissue. For the donated marrow to be able to come in, engraft, and start to grow inside the patient, all of the patient's bone marrow MUST be removed. The patient is essentially in the hospital for 3 months (usually at 6 weeks the patient can check out, but they still have to be seen daily in the clinic, and many are there all day, so essentially they are still in the hospital), and it takes a year or longer to 'fully' recover.", "3XD2A6FGFNSOTJ5RMET7AK1IIVR9SS": "My son is into body building. I'm not sure it's the healthiest thing to do, but my brother-in-law is a body builder and competes, and wins competitions so my son idolizes him. My son doesn't compete, he just wants some muscles and abs. You don't need to get into competition if you don't want to go that far but there are things you can do to help build your muscles/abs. Here's what you need to do. First of all, your diet will really help build those abs, in addition to your weight lifting workouts. You need to pay attention to your diet. You really need to have a high protein diet. Here's what you should eat: For breakfast you can have a bowl of oatmeal and a half of banana or you could have maybe 2 scrambled eggs. If you need more eggs, separate the yolk and only use the whites. If you eat a piece of toast, make it whole wheat or whole grain. Between meals, try a protein bar or good protein shake For lunch eat a salad with chicken or fish. A good snack between meals might be some pe...", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPNBA8": "Men don't. Women are born with a set number of eggs. Men never stop producing sperm.", "3X7837UUADW8CXK31DHHY9JTWB2J67": "see a dermatologist", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBT82VV": "I swear to drunk i'm not God!", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT4ZMFG": "I suggest that your make an appointment with your family doctor. Explain the symptoms and receive a physical exam of the affected areas. The doctor may also run blood studies to rule out nutritional deficiencies. Discuss the possibility of being referred to a sleep doctor. I strongly suspect that you may be affected by the conditions called restless leg syndrome and periodic limb movement. These disorders may begin in childhood and slowly progress as we age. There may also be a genetic component associated with the conditions. Check with other family members to see if they also share your symptoms. The symptoms as you describe typically begin during the evening as you relax in bed. As you prepare to rest and during sleep, the burning feeling, muscle tightening/cramping, and leg twitching intensifies. It is difficult to sleep due to the uncomfortable sensations and you may suffer sleep deprivation. Symptoms may also occur while sitting during car rides.", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBWOJ1": "Best Way To Lose Belly Fat - exercises to lose belly fat best way to lose belly fat fast lose belly fat naturally - http://t.co/FBa3ME3TGY", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G84W5": "You are eating to comfort yourself. If you binge when you are feeling low,then you are eating to cover your emotional pain. You wont be able to stop until you talk to someone about how you are really feeling inside. Dont fill yourself with junk because you will just end up hating yourself more.When feeling low, instead of reaching for that chocolate, or chips, keep your hands busy, like paint your nails, or go for a walk. But really....at the end of the day, you need to address your emotions.I really wish you the best of luck, and dont worry - everyone goes through this at one time or another.", "3X7837UUADW8CXK31DHHY9JTWB3J68": "I looked up one morning and realized that I couldn't see the end of the hallway at school so I went to the doctor and they gave me glasses...And I have had them ever since.There is nothing to worry about...", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C05W8": "If it is a UTI then she can perscribe pills to help the pain and make it go away and if it is an STD she can help you cope and decide the next step. Remember if it is an STD, you can make it and they are controllable now. Just for the future....have your boyfriend tested....and btw...quit useing the withdrawl method...it doesn't work...you can still get pregnate or an STD from pre-cum!", "39KV3A5D185KF0HY7HVNWOACN52S7Y": "You can grow right up until you're 18-19 years old. Please don't listen to the idiots who post on here. At 15 it is highly unlikely you're done with puberty. Also, weight size and hormones affect size as well. Near your period, they'll feel bigger. (They are , they're swollen a bit.) If you lost or gained weight, your size will change too. Opinion 2: I'm sure everything will work out for you. You're not alone as people go through puberty at different rates. Also you're still growing and eventually you'll have breasts. You won't stop growing until you're 20. If you feel that that it's affecting your confidence, then just buy a padded bra for the mean time. Take care always and good luck.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS6BC8": "miley cyrus spotted in San Juan praying to la virgin Guadalupe", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXNUJN": "These almost always warrant a call to your doctor right away , unless it involves a very small area , such as the size of a quarter or smaller . Again , this is just redness , no blisters will form , and no skin is burned away . This does not require urgent care and usually doesn s visit . Depending upon your observations you may call your doctor during office hours and speak with a nurse just to be sure no follow-up is needed .", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDK70R": "Most animals use limbs for locomotion, such as walking, running, or climbing. Some animals can use their front limbs (or upper limbs in humans) to carry and manipulate objects. Some animals can also use hind limbs for manipulation.", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y21ZF": "Wikipedia ... The works are presented, on this page, in Author order. They may ..... Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche (1844-1900) Wikipedia Thus Spake Zarathustra (1883) PG Eugene ... Edgar Allan Poe (1809-1849) Wikipedia The Cask of Amontillado (1846) PG ... my 2436 first 2433 people 2410 new 2302 any 2299 should 2254 Mr 2251 may 2206 after 2162 now 2153 then 2149 very 2120 work ... Allan 56 devoted 56 AI 56 ... cask ... Keywords for The Engines of Our Ingenuity If you use Netscape or Microsoft Internet Explorer, pull down the Edit menu and use the Find function to search this file. Congratulations to the 2015 WAmmy Award winners (for questions and answers posted in 2014)! The WAmmy Awards are a fun way to recognize questions, answers ... Edgar Allan Poe. January 19, 1809-October 7, 1849. Nationality: American Ethnicity: English Birth Date: January 19, 1809 Death Date: October 7, 1849", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPTL1F": "i brought a 2 month old little girl kitten home to my one year old male and he HATED her for the first week. i called the vet almost in tears because they just werent getting along how i thought they would. the vet told me to leave them alone and they will learn eachothers boundaries and likes and dislikes. so i waited. they seemed to growl a lot like a horrible growl deep in their throat. they hissed they ran alll night and allll day. after about another 3 or 4 days of this it seemed to calm down. they soon began to chase eachother and tackle eachother and play fight. then they started sharing the same bowls and litter box. oh! thats important. makes sure they have seperate litter boxes and food dishes for a while until they are comfotable. it just takes time. its like having a roommate move i with you after youve been so comfortable on your own. it takes time to learn so just wait it out. things should get better. hope this helps!", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE0T9W": "In my opinion, it's great!", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEG647": "If you are talking about this: Rickets' is a vitamin deficiency disease of infancy and early childhood caused by lack of vitamin D. Rickets causes soft bones because enough vitamin D is not present to assist in calcium absorption. When enough calcium is not absorbed by the bone, it does not harden properly, and is too soft to support the weight of the growing body properly. Then I hope this is your anwser: Hereditary rickets is an inherited form of the disease caused when the kidneys are unable to retain phosphate.", "3XUSYT70ITZ0V0YWPSFPMAEPEOLD0O": "ur eyes would dry up", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XLI95": "That depends a lot on what, exactly, you mean by that. If you mean who was the first person in charge of a non-republic ancient Roman state'', then the answer is probably Julius Caesar. The Romans usually were able to beat back the Germanic invasions.", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVSQSS": "You cant have as much fun with a boyfriend, you always have to tell them where you are going, with who, and what are you gonna be doing. Then having a boyfriend just puts more pressure for you to do thing you dont want to do, like kissing and sex. He said my stomach could do with tightening up a bit. .... If it was me in your position, my new boyfriend would very quickly be my ex ...... my weight and id been picked on all my life, now i met my second?... Mar 11, 2014 ... (Sign up here to get Dear Prudence delivered to your inbox each week. ... advises a woman whose boyfriend keeps pressing her to shed pounds. ... he has expressed that he would like to see me lose some weight. Dude, if your guy is playing sports he will be more than able to be able to lift you. 140 pounds isn't that heavy either. I can lift a person at that weight and I'm not even that strong :p", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMR3TQ": "Go to the hardware store and buy a tube of liquid nails. When he closes his office door for a 'conference call', get the tube and fill in the seems between his door and the door jam. Don't touch it though or else your finger prints are left behind.", "3TTPFEFXCTICLRPDDDEWMW3EJJ26HT": "'You become responsible, forever, for what you have tamed.' Take good care of your pet!", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6XX0A": "See Target Optical Team Member for details. No contact lens delivery to Kansas or Arkansas.", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555A8P6D": "Ergonomics For Dental Hygienists Show related SlideShares at end WordPress Shortcode , Chiropractor, Clinic Director and Sports Injuries Author at Progressive Spinal and Sports Rehabilitation, P.C. Published on Mar 21, 2009 Ergonomic health implications as it relates to dental health professionals. This presentation reviews common causes of ergonomic injuries including carpal tunnel syndrome and tendinitis, ways to manage these conditions, and how to prevent them. ... Are you sure you want to Yes No Your message goes here Ergonomics For Dental Hygienists 1. Ergonomics: Health Implications for Dental Hygienists www.ProSpineRehab.com 2. Overview: Ergonomics and Health Implications for Dental Hygienists ulliIncrease awareness /li/ululliDecrease work-related pain and injuries /li/ululliHeighten productivity /li/ululliImprove musculoskeletal health /li/ululliIncrease comfort /li/ululliImprove quality of life /li/ululliExtend careers /li", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5E6OF": "mass ah .. serious shit I need to gain few pounds mann ..", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1EYANT": "The effects of adderall can be felt at different times for various types of people. Depending on your weight, body type, diet, ext..., adderall can affect you differently. It usually takes a little less than an hour if you're taking the generic version. If you're taking XR (Extended Release) adderall, which are more expensive, it can take effect earlier and last longer. I was diagnosed with ADHD in grade school but didn't start taking adderall until my sophomore year in college. Please note that adderall is a stimulant. It is also used as a prescription weight loss drug. When I used to take adderall, I sometimes felt as if I could concur the world. It did help with my studies and kept me focused, but it kept me up all night (frequently). After a year of taking it, I started to feel anxiety (a lot). Please use caution when taking this. I would not abuse this drug as it is perception only.", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOOH5L": "Make sure every woman on earth has control over her fertility.", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KXVDX": "yes indeed! i dont even know you, and i know you deserve wayyy better! its one thing to cheat, but its another thing to cheat with someone who is also your good friend. thats just wrong! i wouldnt forgive either one of them. just move on with your life, im sure you will be able to find someone else. theres plenty of fish in the sea and plenty of room to leave the bad ones. good luck.", "3J06WJ78HNI2IIZYJA38DPAM8RZVVU": "do you know where a 16 year old can get that Citalophram stuff? I know it didn't work for you, but it's worth a shot. 5 March 2015 at 06:37 GMT The easiest solution, for everything, is to stop caring. I'm 20 and I've been throught quite a lot to be telling you this. I was studying in 3D animation and had a pretty decent life until I got kicked out of my house. My parents never loved me since I was little and I guess they were tired of seeing my face. Right after, my girlfriend, that I've been with for 4 years, left me because I had no time for her. I couldn't even go to school anymore. I had to find a place to sleep and things to eat. It wasn't easy. Everybody started rejecting me and avoiding me. I had no one left. I spent many nights sleeping outside not eating a thing. Then I realized what was the most painful thing. loneliness. I tried to kill myself but then my parents decided to rent a little place filled with mouses.", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTJSF0": "Well first of all it shouldn't matter to a nice girl who really cares about you... And those who do care shouldn't be ones you hang out with..But yes girls realize it...everybody realizes it just the worst thing to do is bring attention to it. Because then people will notice it even more because you mentioned it. Also this stressing about it will cause more acne! So just try not to focus on it and if it really matters to you that much in this day and age there are tons of ways out there to solve the problem! Just be confident and dont stress! Because Confidence is always HOT!", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX4A4Z": "here is an answer from this website: http://www.mum.edu/TheReview/07-08/6-18-08.html1 Award-Winning Video Students Hired by Lynch Foundation Many students, including those who have won awards for their videos, have recently been hired by a foundation associated with famous filmmaker and University Trustee David Lynch to produce documentaries that will showcase the effects of the Transcendental Meditation program in the lives of students, artists, and others. Lynchs new film, tentatively titled Catching the Big Fish: The Documentary. Also being hired is Amine Kouider, who recently won a top award from the. And Zach Nichols is being hired to design and develop the website. In addition, the documentaries will profile students who practice the Transcendental Meditation technique, with a strong focus on those from the community. He sees DLF.tv as a portal to bring millions of young people in America and around the world to the Transcendental Meditation technique and Maharishis programs.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG545ZLH": "Types of Pet Birds Wildlife Pet Birds Since there are so many types of pet birds it is usually possible to find one that suits you and your life style  if you are willing to do some research. Simply walking into a pet shop and getting any bird that looks nice is not a clever way to go about. Some types of pet birds will for instance live for 50 years or more  are you ready for that type of commitment? Other types of pet birds are incredibly noisy (or adorably chatty, if you are the right person for such a bird) and can disturb their keeper as well as any neighbours. Some birds grow really big and require expensive cages or even aviaries, while others are so clever that they succumb to depression and lethargy in a boring household where they arent given any intricate puzzles to solve. There are also birds that must be kept in pairs or groups, especially if you plan on ever leaving them home alone. These are just a few things that you have to take into account when choosing a pet bird", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1JLBX": "Spread coconut cream cheese frosting between layers and on top and sides of cake. Coconut cream cheese frosting: 2 tablespoons butter or margarine 2 1/2 cups flaked coconut 2 tablespoons butter or margarine, softened 8-ounce package cream cheese, softened 3 1/2 cups sifted powdered sugar 2 teaspoons milk 1/2 teaspoon vanilla extract Melt 2 tablespoons butter in large skillet stir in coconut. Combine 2 tablespoons butter and cream cheese, beating until light and fluffy. Add eggs to apple mixture. Brown sugar glaze: 3 tablespoons brown sugar 3 tablespoons white corn syrup 3 tablespoons water Combine ingredients and boil for 2 minutes. Beat cream cheese at medium speed with an electric mixer until smooth. Add to cream cheese, beating just until blended. Yield: Makes 16 servings Apple Pie Cheesecake With Warm Caramel Sauce: Just like eating a caramel apple . Beat cream cheese at medium speed with an electric mixer until smooth. Add to cream cheese, beating just until blended.", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13G7RM": "woah, maybe a bit UNDER weight.", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QSNKL": "Yes ACWebMaster 98 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. ACWebMaster ACWebMaster Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVIFIW": "Seizure Alert Dog Gives Owner Warning 15 Minutes Before Seizure - Advertisement Seizure Alert Dogs are dogs wh- http://t.co/bEZ0U7rvpd dog", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1N8QC": "Sex is the most practical and funniest way of losing weight. 85 Calories PUTTING ON A CONDOM: With an erection....................... 6 Calories Without an erection.................... 18 Calories Getting up immediately................. 36 Calories Explaining why you got out of bed immediately......816 Calories GETTING A SECOND ERECTION: IF YOU ARE: 20-29 years old........................ 36 Calories 30-39 years............................ 80 Calories 40-49 years............................ 124 Calories 50-59 years............................ 972 Calories 60-69 years............................ Respondents were representative of the Norwegian male population in terms of marital status and education level. On another ite I read: The ARHP study reported that 62 percent of men 50-59 years of age, 52 percent 60-69 years of age, and 36 percent 70 years of age", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBGTE6": "It's so cold in Denver, the black guys penis's look like white guy penis shrinkage NFL", "3U74KRR67MJAXLM0COH22QSOP3INTQ": "a podiatrist is a good choice for your problem. if you would like to do some research ahead of going for visit, it sounds like you may have plantar fasciitis along with CT band syndrome. i have a great site for you to check out regarding foot conditions, myfootshop.com. use the source as direct link to site", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6MVTH": "Professional Website Designers Here. Email me req's at sharmaankush6655 andcontact me skype:web.studio45creations", "3FI30CQHVKH2UEMRDL400L0GO6TB6E": "The most important thing about fixing a broken leg is setting the bone so that it heals properly. With some fractures you can have a splinter of bone that can get into the blood system, clog and artery and seriously kill you. Xrays are needed and a professional to make sure the bone is straight and then put it into a solid cast that completely imoblizes it. Having said that, there are times when you simply can not get to a doctor and people will take matters into their own hands. If I was in that position, I would have to hope that it was just a fracture and not something that needed to be put back into position. Here's a link to WebMD.com with advice on home treatment for a broken leg:  http://www.webmd.com/a-to-z-guides/Leg-Injuries-Home-Treatment  Peace!", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4JOF2": " 30 of photos taken by 18-24 year olds are selfies, according to a recent Samsung poll. (via only 30 Really?", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082JU7C": "Often amino acids are spoken of in relation to human nutritional utilization.For humans, there are 8 essential amino acids and 14 non-essential amino acids that can be fabricated by the human body from the eight essential amino acids. There are twenty-two amino acids. The body does not manufacture the essential acids and does manufacture the non-essential acids Essential Amino Acids  Non Essential Amino Acids .. Essential Amino Acids are those which the body cannot fabricate from other amino acids. Non-Essential Amino Acids are those that can be fabricated by your body from the essential aminos. Amino acids combine into literally thousands of 'complex protein, amino acid chains'. The human body requires approximately 20 amino acids for the synthesis of its proteins. The body can make only 13 of the amino acids -- these are known as the nonessential amino acids. There are 9 essential amino acids that are obtained only from food, and not made in the body.", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF2XJG": "Scottsdale Musical Theater Company About Scottsdale Musical Theater Company: This local theater company is dedicated to presented the iconic Broadway musicals that everyone can enjoy. If you love musicals, you'll probably know the lyrics to all the songs at every performance! The shows are presented in their original Broadway versions, and every show features a full, live orchestra. Carousel, Guys  Dolls, Fiddler on the Roof and Man of La Mancha,Thoroughly Modern Millie and The Music Man are examples of productions undertaken by the group. Tempe Center for the Arts: That's where the performances take place. Here is a map to the venue. Scottsdale Musical Theater Company Phone Number: 602-909-4215 Visit Scottsdale Musical Theater Company Online: Get information about upcoming shows, auditions and backstage assistance at scottsdalemusicaltheater.com How to Get Tickets: All seats are reserved seats. Ticket prices typically vary between 28 and 40 each.", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT8BRD": "No time is good,a pregnant woman is the worst thing in the world,they are the biggest b!tches and it is all your fault,so I say leave the b!tch infertile and leave it at that,oh and use precautions safe sex is best,you dont need to make the world worse with more stupid kids on this planet,it is polluted enough. Have a nice day. Broken Box-Queens Of The Stone Age No Hard Feeling-Bloodhound Gang Pantera-Good Friends And A Bottle Of Pills The Rolling Stones-B!tch I Will Survive-Cake Spineshank-Forgotten Adema-Losing Close Friends Static X-Just In Case Type O Negative-I Know Your Fcking Somebody Else Deftones-7 Words Mindless Self Indulgence-B!tches Start Trouble-Chemical Don't know but he better get fucking going.", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBH9P9": "I don't know :(", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LVP7F": "The theory of evolution states that all things originated from one common ancestor. The research should continue because it is just a theory, therefore not fact. So anyone can say quot. Oh that doesn't matter, it's just a theoryquot. But for all we know it could be wrong.", "37AQKJ12TXM8SYRK9K3EBPYGEL5TTY": "In some cases eye twitching is more than a temporary nuisance. Some people have spasms that occur frequently throughout the day. Symptoms can recur for days, weeks, or even months. That can cause a lot of emotional distress. It can interfere with quality of life. In its most serious forms, which are relatively uncommon, eye can become chronic. It can cause persistent winking and squinting. If it progresses to the point where you have difficulty keeping your open, it can cause severe impairment. Sometimes, eye twitching can be a sign of eye conditions such as: (inflammation of the eyelids) Very rarely, it can be a sign of a or nerve disorder, such as: Eye twitching can also be a side effect of certain . The most common offenders include drugs used in the treatment of psychosis and .", "3GKAWYFRAPR3JH2G6DUF1BFXMWWPD6": "Ancient texts generally had to be regularly recopied in order to survive. Papyrus and even parchment are fragile materials. What was chosen for copying depended upon the current world view, and for much of the the post-classical period that meant religious texts. Not only were classical texts ignored they were often deliberately destroyed, erased and written over because they were pagan. This attitude was prevalent in early Islam as well as in Christianity. Sometimes texts were thought to be so important that they were treated as relics and never actually opened, just allowed to moulder in their fancy bindings. Even when texts survived they frequently described a society so different to Medieval Europe as to have little relevance, see the history of Vetruvius' 'de architectura' below, which was copied from about 900 AD onwards but only had an impact in the early 15th century. Byzantine and Islamic society were much more the heirs of ancient Rome. When pagan texts were preserved it w...", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHD7B9": "Richest person in Australia The number one position of the BRW rich list in 2006 still belongs to a Packer, but this year it is James packer rather than the usual Kerry Packer . Kerry Packer passed away at the age of 68 towards the end of 2005, leaving his son James to take the reigns of the Australian media giant, Publishing and Broadcasting Limited (PBL). The Packer billions have increased from last year's 6. 9 billion to 7. 1 billion in 2006, which is almost 2 billion more than second placed Frank Lowy.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXW204": "You get a puppy", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BR401": "Make sure they fit good in you butt and hips I know with a small waist and bigger hips it's hard to find jeans to fit properly try strech like denim they will fit nice and be comfortable. good luck sweetie but try the clothes thing I recommened and I promise you will look amazing Indonesian hip hop Indonesian hip hop is hip hop music performed in Indonesia. Hip hop music began to be produced in Indonesia in the early 1990s, with the first Indonesia artist to release a full-length hip hop album being the emcee Iwa K, who has released five albums to date. Other Indonesian hip hop groups and solos include Boyz Got No Brain and Neo. One key feature of Indonesian hip hop that is different compared with American hip hop is that the language used in Indonesian hip hop is more polite and does not use vulgar language, and does not often make references to sex and violence. Indonesian hip hop music is a youth subculture. Indonesian hip hop is often mixed with heavy metal. This is called hip-m...", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN050CGS": "Personally I would check out petfinder, local shelters, and rescue groups to see who is available in your area. There will definitely be dogs up for adoption that fit your needs! as far as breeds go perhaps an English Springer Spaniel or Golden Retriever? Opinion 2: Take this quiz from Animal Planet to see what dog breed would fit into your lifestyle. http://animal.discovery.com/breedselecto... ADD Goldendoodles and Labradoodles are hyper, hard to train and groom and generally a royal pain. That is why so many are in the shelters.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZLQVW": "Adolf Hitler, because he IQ was so brilliant which is compared to Einstein. his technique was and brain power was so tremendous than this 3.", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVUCZH": "Yes, you do. As you age, all of your hair starts to age, also.", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXLL0A": "By 1229 Frederick was king of Jerusalem. On his return he quelled a rebellion in Germany led by his son Henry, who had allied with the Lombard League. Seeing Frederick as a growing threat to papal authority, Gregory IX excommunicated him again in 1239 the emperor responded by invading the Papal States.", "3SBNLSTU6U3XXL4MTMSHS9HBWV5DZH": "As well as changing regularly make sure you're using the right absorbency. During the heaviest part of your periods you might want to use maxi-pads or overnight pads that are more absorbent. Wear dark pants and carry a sweater and spare underwear with you until you better know when to change your pads to avoid leaks, and try to feel when they're full. Use cloth pads - seriously. Some people think these are gross but they're actually far more hygienic than disposable pads as they keep you much dryer and cooler so prevent bacterial growth, see this article from sex education site Scarleteen - http://www. scarleteen. com/article/pink/e. Cloth pads are good for preventing leaks as they don't come unstuck or gather-up like disposables do, they have multiple layers, and you can add extra absorbent layers for extra protection. Lunapads - http://lunapads. com/pads-and-liners/regu. - see extra liners. Sckoon - http://www. com/pl00006. html - see multiple layers. Wear period panties too.", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0BIXN": "WeightLoss Program Speed Up the Weight Loss Process: Speed Up the Weight Loss Process http://t.co/fy87hDWbQp MileyCyrus", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVRQSR": "it's basically the funniest song. that and foxtrot uniform charlie kilo. it's so bad, it's good.", "3ZFRE2BDQ9CBVR93KMTTMGK3CDFXZ1": "Fiber, Fiber, Fiber! I've been researching b/c my hubby has them. You really don't sound like you need the Prep H if there's no swelling. You mainly need a diet change that's easier on the movements and there is also soothing creams near the Prep H in the pharmacy that with help. I also recommend Tucks and wet wipies, they are soothing as well. Hope you feel better soon!", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHG7BC": "Write about everyday things that happen to you. Even if you think that nobody would be interested in what you write.Life isn't always the most interesting. Write about trying to find something to write about, check into some things that may have been written in the past in different time periods. CowboysIndians, Shakspere wrote plays about the life and times,Egyptians used hyrogliphics, there is lots to write about. You can write about the question you asked and all the answers you get. Enjoy your task and learn from it.", "3L21G7IH47U300E5H763D07014XY1K": "1) No chickens wont lay at night they roost and rest some may sleep at times laying is done during the morning hours or middle of the day some may lay late into the evening. 2) It could be possible one hen laying in another area, but more than likey not since they follow suite if one lays in an area the others will also. 3)Yes STRESS is not good for birds and other animals as well, the birds will stop laying since they have been moved to a new enviorment and your home new changes for the birds. 4) Don't allow the dog to stress the birds out or chase them if the dog wants he could catch them and kill them . 5) Winter the coldest time of the yr the birds need a safe comfyy area to rest in with a heat sources like a heat lamp to put warmth in the coop/house/pen.Might want to put card board up around the coop/pen/house for a type insulation and then hang old blankets to help keep snow wind rain and breezes out and away from the birds.Place hay or straw on the floor to help with warmt", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQZLNO": "saints row and rainbow six:vegas.i recommend rainbow six because it has had good reviews and it looks awesome", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6RJLF": "He could be hurting and scared from constipation. First give him about two teaspoons of mineral oil. Also, if you have pureed pumpkin, this will help him move his bowels. Pumpkin works for both constipation and diarrhea. very rare but it does. It has to be regular pumpkin, not the kind used in pies. If you have a whole pumpkin, put a piece in the blender and puree it. That will work. Give him this in his food until. Also, dogs can use suppositories, but at this dogs age, I would have a vet administer it. If he continues this behavior tomorrow I would all the vet's emergency number. Dog's can also have enemas but again, I have never done one. I am just always really cautious and use the vet for these things. I do know it it Thanksgiving and it may be hard to find one, but there should be an emergency number if you need it. With the peeing part I am inclined to ask if you noticed any blood in it as dogs can also get bladder stones that cause a lot of pain. I really would like to hear how he is doi", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FS3QC": "If your fingernail is black with blood, you need to relieve the pressure. Use the smallest drill bit you can find - burn it to kill any germs, then use your fingers to rotate the drill bit (no electric drill!) on the back side of the nail until you break through the nail and relieve the pressure (you'll know when it starts to bleed). If the nail looks okay, skip the above. You may have a sprained or broken the finger. Most of the time, if it's not displaced (crooked or misshapen) buddy taping works. Tape the bad finger to the good finger next to it to keep the sore finger from moving. Take aspirin to relieve the pain and keep down any fever. If you have a persistent fever, or the pain doesn't subside in 48 hours, get to a doctor.", "39KMGHJ4RZ86WGX2DGRU73U6KZB00H": "Good breathing tips Practice breathing with the diaphragm by placing one hand on your upper chest and one hand on your abdomen. Visualize your breathing reaching down to your hand on your abdomen and moving it out slightly. At the same time allow your hand on your upper chest to quieten down and become still. Your hands act as guides to help feel your breath. In time you will be able to do this naturally. Your nose is your breathings best friend. Nose breathing warms, moistens, and filters the air for the lungs as well as regulating the amount of air you breath. You could say that the old adage less is more is an underlying principle of good breathing and your nose is good place to start. You might feel that you are not getting enough air at first. This will take 2-3 days to change if you practice nose breathing regularly. Indeed the aim is to nose breath all the time. Persevere and you will find that its the most natural way to breathe. as you were born to do so.", "3T2EL38U0MI2HZ8CXQAGVN8Z7AWQX2": "Answer: No, Bill Cosby is not a doctor. He is an entertainer, an actor.", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9ATAUN": "A daily discussion in our newsroom! haha", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1YR35": "Effects are used during live performances or in the studio, typically with electric guitar, keyboard and bass. While most frequently used with electric or electronic instruments, effects can also be used with acoustic instruments, drums and vocals. Examples of common effects units include wah-wah pedals, fuzzboxes and reverb units.", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9S03HK": "All rights reserved.WebMD does not provide medical advice, diagnosis or treatment.See additional information.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9CFP7": "he wanted all black people to reject their last name becuase there last names were given to them by white plantation owners when they were slaves. that way it was a kind of disconnection. this site has more info www.college.hmco.com/english/heath/syl...", "3QXFBUZ4ZKEJN6K3PPUHH25T757GU6": "All of them! ' Favourite Leopard Gecko morph ?", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26WJ8X": "The subject of a sentence is either a NOUN or a PRONOUN. ... word used to represent a thing (or person) by naming it: John, physics, girl, hobo, ... Steve and Mary painted the house and planted trees. ... For example, it does not make ... to pull out to full or greater length make by attenuating stretch: ... to sketch or to trace figures create a picture or depict by sketching. 39. to be skilled in or practice the art of sketching: I can't paint, but I can draw. List of Nouns - Our list of nouns has over 1000 nouns - common, collective, concrete ... along with kinds of nouns explained to help make reading and writing easier. ... an entire group of entities (examples would be the nouns village or women). ... Most women have to watch their figure (be careful not to get fat). 5 ... painting/model ... put a figure on it/give an exact figure ... Click on any of the pictures above to find out what it is called.", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NA43V": "well best part to massage are- soles of the feet, during prone position- shoulders when sitting- back when prone- head when suspensded by your other hand and your body.- butt when in prone", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJDJTI": "Sorry! Search on Yahoo...  that's all I can think of, Sorry again!", "31S7M7DAGGOK9LJF0B1NPYOZK8KTLW": "Masters and Johnson stated that a man suffers from premature ejaculation if he ejaculates before his partner achieves orgasm in more than fifty percent of his sexual encounters. Scientists have long suspected a genetic link to premature ejaculation. Doctors often classify premature ejaculation as either primary or secondary: Primary premature ejaculation. Causes Premature ejaculation is considered a psychological problem in some cases. The problem is common, and although you may feel you should be able to fix it on your own, you may need medical treatment to achieve and sustain a satisfying sex life. As long as it happens infrequently, it's probably not cause for concern. The problem can occur in all sexual situations, including masturbation, or may only occur during sexual encounters with another person. Doctors often classify premature ejaculation as either primary or secondary: Primary premature ejaculation. Causes Premature ejaculation is considered a psychological problem i...", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYOVME": "He looks like a dirty old man who needs some cigars. Opinion 2: Senior citizen? Perhaps if you're driving a DTS, but not if you're driving this one: http://www.cadillac.com/cts-v/gallery/", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6GRHC": "nullIwould recommend a protein shake and a peanut butter sandwich. If you don't have protein, make yourself a egg sandwich with whole grain bread if available. Also eat some fruit and a favorite snack to avoid being crabby and feeling full but not bloated.", "3W9XHF7WGKT9PF1XFBPMAYBKV8EKTJ": "Where you feel good is best especially since you are still young and growing. Now as for what is healthy....115-140 is what is going to put you at a healthy Body Fat percentage. Make sure you are drinking 8-10 glasses of water every day and eating lots of fresh fruits and veggies along with lowfat dairy and lean protein. Try to stay away from sodas, fried and fast foods. Limit sugar and sweets as well as other junk food snacks...try healthy snacks and you will be fine.", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIHX35": "Go Ask Alice is an excellent source for all your woman-having-sex-questions. Here is her answer : Dear Confused and Reader  2, It is normal for some women to bleed after having sexual intercourse for the first time. As long as the bleeding doesn't get worse, she should be OK.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MOYVNE": "Likr fr senior ditch day need to happen !", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY4X1E": "THEY ARE WONDERFUL!!! and there are many different styles and designs to use", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MOYNV6": "The majority of people in the colonies were subjects of the British crown and not actual British citizens. Those in native residence in the colony who were not nationals of another country, Britain included, became citizens of the newly created state upon independence, respective of the laws and statutes regarding citizenship of new said state. In other words, British citizens residing in the country would retain their British citizenship while British subjects of the old colony would become citizens of the new state.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGPBYH": "Usually, if you have a cavity you will be able to see (if the tooth is in the front or near to where light hits it) a dark 'hole' or spot in the tooth, and also if your tooth hurts or is really sensitive when you chew certain foods on the 'bad' side. Opinion 2: Only if they are so obvious that even you could see them. Usually you should go to your family dentist to have a complete checkup done IF you have not been having regular 6 month recall visits. The hard to see cavities will be between teeth which will require x-rays to detect.", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88LFZU": "It is perfectly normal, unless the swelling is very noticeable (then I would suggest you consult your doctor.) To reduce the swelling you may rest and elevate your feet, preferably above the heart line, a few times a day. Also you may monitor your intake of salt, sugar, yeast, and liquids (other than clear, cool, previously boiled water), and observe the reaction you may have to other foods. It may help to wear natural fabrics especially on your feet (wool, silk, cotton) instead of non breathing man-made ones, and to avoid shoes made of plastic or rubber. You may wish to wear one pair of shoes in the morning and change them to another pair in the afternoon, and please love your feet and select the shoe styles for comfort not for the current fads (high heals, narrow toes, and so on). Every bit helps. Be well!", "3NQUW096N661P6A125W6YYNNQ1FL9M": "Seismic data is transformed to elastic property log(s) at every trace. Deterministic inversion techniques are used to provide a good overall view of the porosity over the field, and serve as a quality control check. To obtain greater detail needed for complex geology, additional stochastic inversion is then employed.", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS4ZAX": "The points vary depending on your weight, the more you weight the more points you get per day.For example, a person weighting in at about 140lbs would get 29 points per day while a person who weights around 230 pounds would get 35 points.I hope this helps.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06T692": "' Yes At 11hrs MsCathyPhiri: Only slept 5 hours, but can't sleep, so up, working. I'll pay for this later...' I know right!", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6NOQR": "The rounds are signaled by the sound of a sad lounge singer singing a song that no one would ever want to hear in a bar fan that he has to throw shade while another HBO show is going through a down year to make his favorite series look better by comparison . But as we await the next one , 20th Century Fox has dropped a little treat : this viral teaser showing how the Ares 3 crew handled their isolation training prior to the mission that strands astronaut Mark Watney ( Matt Damon ) on Mars .", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM80EPR": "Take her to a hairdresser and ask them to layer it for you. She doesn't necessarily need to get it cut, but layers in long or short hair help with the thickness. A good hairdresser can help you.", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KWVDW": "Dr. Brundage at Aloha Veterinary Center is supposed to be great. Call them and ask what the cost will be. Aloha Veterinary Center 202 Holomua Street 935-7387", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWX1WO": "It will work. Look at the label, normally protein powders advise 1-2 scoops post workout. Bulking you want more calories but you only need upto 500 calories extra daily to your calorie needs and to keep it lean mass, you don't want to get fat just when bulking.", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNPTYP": "From Wikipedia: 'Potassium is vital in the human body and oral potassium chloride is the common means to replenish it, although it can also be diluted and given intravenously. It can be used as a salt substitute for food, but due to its weak, bitter, unsalty flavor, it is usually mixed with regular salt, sodium chloride, for this purpose to improve the taste. Medically it is used in the treatment of hypokalemia and associated conditions, for digitalis poisoning, and as an electrolyte replenisher.", "3S4TINXCC0LSJKSVDHQUHLM796NBO3": "Chris Brown going to Anger Management Class is like Me going to Weight Watchers Class ain't going to work !", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V0ZD42": "Yogurt is a great source of protein and dietary calcium. Dannon reformulated their Light 'n Fit Yogurt with Splenda for a great flavor. The new Light 'n Fit yogurts also provide calcium and vitamin D for healthy bones plus vitamin A, riboflavin, and vitamin B12. Also Available in a Yogurt Smoothie Light 'n Fit is also available in a 70 calorie, seven ounce smoothie. The product can be found in the yogurt. Dannon's Fitness Plan In an effort to provide tools to help Americans manage their weight, Dannon has collaborated with Carolyn O'Neil, registered dietitian and author of The Dish on Eating Healthy and Being Fabulous! to develop the Light 'n Fit Right Fit Plan - a balanced way to help lose up to one pound a week. The Light 'n Fit Right Fit Plan is a free online program designed to evaluate the user's BMI (body mass index), help determine a daily caloric intake goal, and provide corresponding meal plans. Light 'n Fit provides the meal plans and tools such as exercise and journal options.", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBV87E": "Posts: 3 I leave butt sweat marks on my chair at school. Hello. I have a problem and I need some advice... but first I should introduce myself, as I have just joined. My name is Alex, I am fourteen, and I am a very anxious and worrisome person (which I am guessing most of you are, too). And, yes, my profile does say 'hopelessly in love'. I wouldn't say 'in love'... but I would say 'hopeless'. Anyways, this is a problem that has been going on for a few months, and it is very embarrassing to me. At my school, we have smooth blue metal chairs, and often when I get up I leave an unsightly butt sweat mark. This doesn't happen every time, and never happens on any other chairs, but it does happen often at school. What I think is weird about it is the fact that I never am very sweaty at all. It just doesn't make sense that only my butt would sweat. I sadly discovered this through some fellow (of course, male) classmates. In homeroom during the pledge of allegiance, I sit in front of several bo", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6MTVF": "if the wood is pretreated for weatherization that can be very serious. The chemicals used are very harsh. (even a splinter from pretreated wood can cause severe infections.) Opinion 2: Seek medical attention immediately.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG547ZLJ": "It depends on what you will be doing while wearing the board shorts (by the way all board shorts are not lined, that is what makes them board shorts and not swim trunks) If you're planning to just hang around - Not necessary to wear underwear unless you are planning on sagging (no one wants to see your butt) With board shorts and swimming - Also not necessary unless you like having some support. But you might want to wear a speedo underneath (instead of underwear) so you get some support and just in case your board shorts slide down a bit. Also wearing a speedo underneath is better than wearing underwear because speedos are meant to get wet and underwear will just get soggy and uncomfortable.", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63S9U9Q": "I date only when I a ready to date, I never kiss on the fisrt dat and I dont kiss all of my dates. I don't put out for no one unless there is a real relationship first and I know the other person well enough. Needless to say, I can count my partners with one hand and I'm over 30.", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JRORYGTD": "When I was a little kid, (like 2 years old) I started talking but I then stopped talking until I was about 3. All my family members thought I was completely autistic and I'd never be normal. However, I got speech therapy and it didn't seem like I had any symptoms. But I'm 15 now and my parents were talking about me being autistic again. I have social problems but nothing totally obvious. I refuse to be the first person to start a conversation and I have difficulty answering personal questions. I hate change and I take the same way to my classes everyday, no matter how far out of my way I have to go. I also am extremely uncomfortable when people touch me. I will give family and female friends hugs but that's about it. In addition, I'm not sure if this is a indicator of autism but I can't picture or visualize anything in my head. However, I am also one of the smartest people in my school. I'm in advanced classes and I always get A's. Could I be a 'highly-functioning' autistic kid?", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K6H9B": "Primarily, it appears on the back and outer sides of the upper arms, but can also occur on thighs and buttocks or any body part except glabrous skin (like the palms or soles of feet). While KP resembles goose bumps, it is characterized by the appearance of small rough bumps on the skin. Unattractive more than anything else, it most often appears as a proliferation of tiny hard bumps that are seldom sore or itchy. While KP resembles goose bumps, it is characterized by the appearance of small rough bumps on the skin. Unattractive more than anything else, it most often appears as a proliferation of tiny hard bumps that are seldom sore or itchy. This is what I think you have. But I also have these red bumps. I hope you find the answer your looking for. While KP resembles goose bumps, it is characterized by the appearance of small rough bumps on the skin. Unattractive more than anything else, it most often appears as a proliferation of tiny hard bumps that are seldom sore or itchy.", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ75OWW": "one of the best things that I have found useful is a couple of tabelspoons of white Karo syrup in an 8 ounce bottle of milk or water.", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOH7T3": "From an evolutionary standpoint , why is it beneficial for men to have facial and chest hair ? Hirsute hunk : Does sexual selection prove hairy men are the epitome of male attractiveness ? From an evolutionary standpoint , why is it beneficial for men to have facial and chest hair ?", "3QGTX7BCHP02T8PTEGAYUXTJJE45ZY": "correct, no pre reserve parking is available.", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEIKH8": "Description Rotator cuff tear is a common cause of pain and disability in the adult population. Acute pain usually follows trauma such as a lifting injury or a fall on the affected arm. Surgery may also be considered if the tear is acute and painful, if it is the dominant arm of an active individual or if you need maximum strength in your arm for overhead work or sports. Acute pain usually follows trauma such as a lifting injury or a fall on the affected arm. Surgery may also be considered if the tear is acute and painful, if it is the dominant arm of an active individual or if you need maximum strength in your arm for overhead work or sports. Rehabilitation After surgery, the arm is immobilized to allow the tear to heal. Acute pain usually follows trauma such as a lifting injury or a fall on the affected arm. Surgery may. Rehabilitation After surgery, the arm is immobilized to allow the tear to heal. The doctor will advise you when it is safe to return to overhead work and sports activity.", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO78EXE": "If you haven't had a period in 2 months you might already be pregnant. In any case, see you Doctor. I had two period a month for years.", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXT1V8S": "1- turbinates  2- tonsils  4- mucosa  7- digestive  8- epiglottis  9- trachea  10- cilia  11- oropharynx? 12- bronchi  13- right mainstem  14- bronchiole  16- red blood cells  17- red  18- oxygen  19- carbon dioxide  20- cough   Sincerely,   A paramedic.", "3S1WOPCJFGRCPCDI7V0FAXB6D9UEJR": "The simple answer as to why it is 'forgotten' is that the dead don't talk. A more thorough answer is that it is not the death-toll of a tragedy that makes it significant but its sociological impact. The Black Death is remembered because it was a watershed period in peoples' trust if faith. The First World War is remembered because it was a watershed period in people's belief in martial glory. But what does the Spanish Flu Epidemic mean philosophically? Nothing. The artists, authors, poets and philosophers of the day had other thongs to dwell upon, such as the sociological impact of the spread of Trade Unionism, Communism, Fascism, Prohibition, Women's rights, Eugenics, the blues and jazz.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHIR1B": "No need to stress over this. I have hired a fair number of people and been hired a few times, and what works is to let them know that (a) you want to know their expectations and (b) you want to meet - or exceed - those expectations. The best thing to do is be straightforward, as in:  'I am really looking forward to my first day. What time do you start?' or, equally fitting: I am really looking forward to my first day. What time should I be there?' Sometimes the first day you need to be early in order to get your office situated, security badges activated, etc. Other times they want you in later so they can have things ready. There is no way of knowing unless you ask. The best thing, no matter what, is to be at least 15 minutes earlier than when they tell you to arrive. I must say that it is a very good sign that you are concerned about asking for your employers needs and your willingness to meet same. You will do well in the world of work.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BU404": "Stephens entitled Cowboy Up ! western photography fine art print 8x12 cowboy country by jwlter ,  18.00 Large Hand painted Cowboy Wall Art // If You Think I m Cute Now in turquoise // Nursery Art // Baby Shower Gift Cowboys and Their Horses  Art Country Canada - JAMES BAMA The World cowboy posters  ...   McBride - Cowboy Lassoing Cattle Fine Art Prints and Posters for Sale Old Farm Equipment and Scrap Metal Turned into Art  You Got to be Kidding Tom Sellick - The Last Cowboy - Southwest / Western Art Oil Realism Portrait Painting - Portraits Artist Rick Timmons sheriff printable  Black and White Sheriff Cowboy Hat Clip Art Image - black and white ...", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAKYZ76": "07416...07416 Franklin, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07417 Franklin Lakes, NJ  Primary County: Bergen NJ 07418 Glenwood, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07419 Hamburg, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07420 Haskell, NJ  Primary County: Passaic NJ 07421 Hewitt, NJ  Primary County: Passaic NJ 07422 Highland Lakes, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07423 Ho Ho Kus, NJ  Primary County: Bergen NJ 07424 Little Falls, NJ  Primary County: Passaic NJ 07428 Mc Afee, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07430 Mahwah, NJ  Primary County: Bergen NJ 07432 Midland Park, NJ  Primary County: Bergen NJ 07435 Newfoundland, NJ  Primary County: Passaic NJ 07436 Oakland, NJ  Primary County: Bergen NJ 07438 Oak Ridge, NJ  Primary County: Passaic NJ 07439 Ogdensburg, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ...07461 Sussex, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ 07462 Vernon, NJ  Primary County: Sussex NJ ...What area at Sussex do you want exactly", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV30V5Q": "get sushi rolls!", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP8GJ9": "The sex drive of most mothers (especially those with two babies) has got to be very, very low.I have no doubt she is probably exhausted.Good luck.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNO8RC": "Well, theres a few things that may cause you to be late. Periods usually only become regular once the hormones level in your body even out. I can take myself as an example. I got my first period Boxing Day (December 26) when I was 13, but didn't get my second period until June something (I forget the exact date) when I was 14, and my third period came around September of that year. I didn't actually have a regular cycle until the age of 17. The hormone levels in your body is what cause ovulation, and its the egg that dies and detaches itself from your uterus that causes the bleeding that we know as periods. Some women dont have the usual hormone levels (it fluctuates) and so they simply dont. But like I said, your monthly cycle usually changes the colour and thickness of it. I wouldn't panic because of it though, unless theres a clear and obvious difference. I also suggest talking to a woman youre close to, or someone who has been getting their periods for a while. Hope it helped!", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4D2ZU": "nullThis kind of situation can be very distressing and I am sure that it is painful. It is very likely that the nurse/phlebotomist hit a nerve in your arm. What is less clear is whether this pain will last. There are cases of permanent nerve damage from botched blood draws but it is not common. When you were researching complex regional pain syndrome (CRPS) you probably noticed that in the definition of the disorder, it states that the pain should be out of proportion to the injury and last longer than is expected for a particular injury. Also, CPRS can be excluded by the existence of conditions that would otherwise account for the degree of pain and dysfunction. One week after a nerve injury, I would not expect you to be back to normal. If the pain continues and especially if it gets worse, then I would be concerned. Usually, peripheral nerves heal themselves pretty well over time, but it might take a few weeks to get back to normal.", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQKERF": "kitten it's okay... Kitten maybe they kitten didn't kitten play it all kitten", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3BBWZ9": "Maybe because your weak and or you don't eat enough everyday eat protein to help dizziness and also drink more that eight ounces of water every day To help the black spots maybe get some rest or put a bag of ice on the back of your neck The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 2 of 5 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555AA6PW": "Many of his combination puzzles are in mass production by Uwe Mffert and Witeden. His 17x17x17 'Over the Top Cube' Rubik's cube-style puzzle is the largest of its kind Oskar van Deventer has also designed puzzles for Hanayama. He is the 2012 Guiness World Record holder for his 17x17x17 cube.", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4APM51": "Wow! Alot of answers and no other bothered to quote anything from the Bible? So the world will end in fire and ice.", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGP1DD": "In 357, 12,000 of the emperor Julian's Romans routed an army of 30,000 ... for decorative safety-pins.1 So while the barbarians had something to do with it, .... There are many more of these, and of a wider variety, than you might expect. ..... ... In 49 BC Caesar, who had held many of the highest political offices in Rome, marched ... but most recognized that under the so-called liberty of the Roman Republic, ... Augustus did not derive his power from any single office, but from the?... This Thesis - Open Access is brought to you for free and open access by Digital ... office of Roman Emperor changed so thoroughly over 500 years by .... Caesar Octavian, the trivirm destined to become the Emperor Augustus, .... single lifetime. Upon his death in AD 14, Augustus was declared a god by the Senate, to be worshipped by the Romans. His names Augustus and Caesar were adopted by every subsequent emperor, and the month of Sextilis was officially renamed August in his honour.", "3ZICQFRS31G00M9IL4HEJ10EKDBZZY": "if its meant to be  then it will work out", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W8OIQ": "5 ft 7 inchrite?", "3MJ28H2Y1E6QU4BMC7ZHEZMFZA25OX": "Very important to remember that!!! !Through your inner work, you and your flame will be reunited.lovelightmagic 22-25 Jul 12, 2012 1 Reply wow this is interesting, and im in the situation of twin within a marriage thing.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXW022": "He will go done in history as the greatest monster democracy stopped ever. People feared when the heard over a million people in Nuremburg shout HEIL ADOLF HITLER FUHRER OF GERMANY MASTER OF ALL GERMANS MARTYR FOR KILLING THE JEWISH ENEMY. He blamed the Jews for Germany's problems. He wanted revenge because the thought Germany was treated unfairly after the first world war. Hitler was a good leader in some ways but he lead his country the wrong way This man was Satan, himself for killing millions of innocent people. What are Jews do now they kill babies women's He is greatest leader in the world V42 Comments 2 Joseph Stalin Anyone who didn't agree with the communist ruling were sent to the Gulag or Tortured and executed. One survivor tells that a woman walked into a prison torture chamber and found her husband in a chair with his feet burned so the skin had been peeled off. Also his eyes had been gouged out and his lips had been cut off.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082MU7F": "Study Guides  Summaries of Edgar Allan Poe Stories. The following brief summaries are designed to quickly give readers an idea of what each story is about. Find something of interest then take a trip into Poe's imagination... Summaries are listed in alphabetical order, by story title:  http://online-study-guide.com/literature/edgar-allan-poe/facts-information.html  http://www.poestories.com/summaries.php  http://www.sparknotes.com/lit/poestories/  http://www.bookrags.com/studyguide-caskamontillado/  Edgar Allan Poe Study Guides Annabel Lee.. The Masque of the Red Death  The Black Cat The Pit and the Pendulum  The Cask of Amontillado The Premature Burial  The Conqueror Worm The Raven  The Fall of the House of Usher The Tell-Tale Heart  Ligeia To Helen   http://www.cummingsstudyguides.net/PoeStudy  Literature Summaries by Edgar Allan Poe  http://litsum.com/author/edgar-allan-poe/", "3X0EMNLXEPNPDY22XYU97XL4M3ZPV4": "Average width is between 5 and 6'  Colors", "31D0ZWOD0AX2XTVK5IONW96JTLM0A7": "Why life is pointless??", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNOTYO": "Anything under 50 gallons isn't big enough for angelfish AND your current fish. Angelfish are really happier in groups of 3 (or more), so you could get 3 angelfish, plus your current fish, for a 50gallon tank. Anyway, angelfish are wonderful fish. A 50 gallon long tank is far too big. We already have a 40 gallon marine tank, a 20 gallon snake tank, a 10 gallon spider tank, a ten gallon guppy tank, a 5.5 gallon baby guppy tank, a rabbit cage and a mouse cage. A bearded dragon is a bit large to fit comfortably on my son's shoulder. You can keep two angel fish in a 20 gallon tank. As a rule of thumb, figure that you need at least 10 gallons per angel fish. If you have a 20 gallon tank, for instance, and a pair or angels, you could probably have a couple of cory catfish, but not much else. Make sure you do not have any strong currents in the tank, as these will be hard on angelfish fins. You can keep a few baby angelfish in a smaller tank, but be prepared to upgrade to a bigger tank as ...", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ21SA": "Copyright Oktay Ortakcioglu/E/Getty Images One of the questions employees frequently have is about how much they will be paid for overtime hours. The answer is that depends on what type of employee you are and what federal and state laws you are covered by. In addition, there are some employees who are exempt from overtime pay regulations who do not receive overtime pay. How Much You Will Get Paid for Overtime Nonexempthourly employees covered by theFair Labor Standards Act(FLSA) must be paid overtime for hours worked over 40 hours per week. When an employee is entitled toovertime pay, the rate cannot be less than one and one-half times (time and a half) an employee's regular rate of pay. For example, if your hourly rate of pay is 10/hour, the overtime rate is 15/hour. In some cases, overtime may be paid asdouble time(working on a holiday, for example). However, in most cases, double time is an agreement between an employer and employee.", "3D5G8J4N5A2N5QV9EF3TC7M1B6JVTE": "WHEN TO RUN: Morning (before Breakfast) for weight loss Mid Afternoon for speed and endurance", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYISXU": "I love dogs, especially my dog. I have a 16 month old Bichonpoo. She is the most gentle loving dog. She is super smart and wouldn't hurt a flea. I have multiple sclerosis and she is so tuned into my illness. If I tell her I need to rest, even if she wants to play she put her toy down and rest with me. I have never owned a better dog.", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5725P": "What could be the problem?A:I need some more information from you.What is your current age?", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EOHL9": "ASSUMING OFFICE XP OR 2003 (maybe 2000) INSERT, select REFERENCE and then INDEX AND TABLES. Click the TABLE OF CONTENTS tab, select your formating and then click the OK button. well for most table of contents you only need one page, the page it starts on.", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYWE83": "An extension to your real life group of friends, interests and communities.What's new : see video Sign In You must be a registered Yahoo user to start a group.Sign Up The Amdavadi Group is a Public Group with 25485 members.The Amdavadi Group Public Group, 25485 members Primary Navigation Conversations Photos Files Attachments Events Polls Links Database About More  Back About Group Join Group 98 members, 186 messages added in the last 7 days Group Description World's First immigrants have roots to Westrn state of India, the Gujarat, as several generations ago, the Gujarati's left the country to sell Tejana (Cloves, Cardemons, Turmreic, Corriender, Cumin, Mustard seeds are a few to name).", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12HC7P": "You know how the put a little legend near the buffet trays? ('Scrambled Eggs') you should do that too... but put a funny anecdote below: 'SCRAMBLED EGGS' 'I woudn't eat them until I was 8. Though they looking messy' Or...", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51LYC7": "i bet she wants to get out and start a life, but wants to make intelligent decisions before she gets stuck in a situation in which she is unhappy. i bet she's depressed with society because she doesn't want to live or build a life in this country where greed and grease rule. or maybe she just has a chemical imbalance which causes her to think about justice and love combined with the injustice and hate of the majority in this world, which can be depressing..  caring too much sometimes puts people into paralysis. but it's always easier to say you don't care.. because chances are people are going to disregard your beliefs and tell you to think about you. which is the cause of these worldly problems in the first place. pace yourself, give time and love.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PU81G": "i had an inner ear infection that sounds similar to your symptoms.also shingles make you nauseous and fatigued... they prescribed for me meclizine for the dizziness and acyclovir for the shingles along with antibiotics....hope you get relief soon", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWR7MC5": "Kaplan Financial prepares students for professional accountancy and tax exams including the AAT, ACA, ACCA, and CIMA, and investment qualifications such as CFA, CAIA, FRM, IAQ, IMC and SII. Kaplan Financial also offers a range of postgraduate courses including MBA, MA and MSc, as well as management and personnel qualifications. Kaplan Financial was formerly known as the Financial Training Company, then as FTC Kaplan after its acquisition in February 2003 by Kaplan, Inc., a global provider of education and training services.", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBT72VU": "It's probably broken, or at least really sprained. My sister did the same thing. Best thing you can do is go to the doctor. If left uncared for too long, it can get worse. They'll know what to do. Broken fingers and toes are actually a pretty easy fix. Good luck! And be more careful :-)", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRNMD9": "I know you're joking, but aBeagleis abreedof dog, member of theHound Group. Beagles are scent hounds, that track game..", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MOLUC": "that's a hard one since everyone's style is different and not knowing what you like to read...but here are some of my suggestions: Steven King is a great fictional writer but for me is hard to read because he is so descriptive about every character that I get board. Robert McCommon wrote 'Swan Song'  http://www.robertmccammon.com ovels/swansong.html that to me is the greatest book written, but again, I don't know what you like :-", "3JMNNNO3B1260G11LAOTXMWPI292W4": "i dont no its getting dark now so the days nearly over maybe i might run around naked or go to the cemetary for the night cause im in Australia.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54JBE1": "lmfao cray TurnDownForWhat", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FDY6I": "In some cases, wisdom teeth come through the gums only partially or not at all (impaction). In some cases, wisdom teeth emerge normally and do not cause any pain or other symptoms. Wisdom teeth that emerge in a poorly aligned fashion may damage adjacent teeth. Impacted wisdom teeth Impacted wisdom teeth (or impacted third molars) are wisdom teeth which do not fully erupt into the mouth because of blockage from other teeth. If the wisdom teeth do not have an open connection to the mouth, pain can develop with the onset of inflammation or infection or damage to the adjacent teeth. Wisdom teeth likely become impacted because of a mismatch between the size of the teeth and the size of the jaw. The teeth can also remain asymptomatic (pain free), even with disease. There is no standard to screen for wisdom teeth. Wisdom teeth removal (extraction) is the most common treatment for impacted wisdom teeth. Wisdom teeth commonly affect other teeth as they develop, becoming impacted or 'coming i...", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPW1LY": "I spent a few hundred at first but now only about 75/ mo average.Hope this helps. :) Reply EvanJuly 4, 2013 at 6:50 pm Im 19 going on to 20 male in college and is now 6 months deep 24 /7 headaches and dizziness I was wondering was yours really bad in the beginning and Ive also noticed nutrition does help and how did you get tested for adrenal fatigue Reply Carrie SJanuary 2, 2014 at 4:04 pm Hi Carrie, Not sure if youre still checking this board, but Ive been suffering from constant lightheadedness/dizziness for months.", "3WJGKMRWVI7KPSTC1889HBGQNDICDG": "Hi This piece of info is from, http://www.women-info.com/en/brown-discharge-periods, I do hope you find something of interest in it, its a lot better than I could write. Brown Discharge between periods is one of common concerns of girls and women. Not all cases of brown vaginal discharge are cause for concern. Brown vaginal discharge between periods is most often associated with old endometrial tissues. Once you start puberty a white and/or clear discharge is normal. The vagina is self-cleaning. This same discharge increases the closer you get to ovulation and when you are sexually aroused. You can have this normal discharge for weeks, months or even years before getting your first period. It will also continue after you get your period. Sometimes you can have few times brown discharge before your first period. Your first period can look like this also. If your period is late you might get a brown, rather than red, discharge.", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3452YNS": "Your chances of getting a mainstream publisher to take your book range from slim to none. When people are losing their jobs and homes, they are not going to be buying books, right? So book publishers are up against the wall these days and are not taking a chance on anybody who is not a proven seller. On the brighter side, you can self-publisher your book. There are other sites that offer self-publishing, but all the ones I have looked at require you to buy 25 or more books -- which can run up into money! At Lulu, you don't have to pay them a cent unless and until you want a copy of your book. These. Nobody does. Here's what you do: Make a good copy of your book text. Or else you can create your own cover, or get someone you know who is good at art to do it for you. (Be sure to acknowledge such a person in your book.) Okay, after you have uploaded your text, then upload your covers -- front and back. Unless your book is pushing 500 pages, it should cost you under 10 to buy a copy. Good luck!", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6MKJD": "The plot? Man that is a very interesting question there. Wish that I could say something totally unique here but I am drawing a blank today. Sorry", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61K98S": "The Colosseum...errr wait, that wouldn't fit in my suitcase. I think I'd bring home a hot Italian guy who knows how to cook.", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JROHV": "Tagged: 0 Thread(s) Quoted: 0 Post(s) My son is 3.5 years old and during that time, his father has never laid eyes on him by his own choice. I told him that I was pregnant immediately after discovering I was we have spoken on the phone twice since then - once right after my call to him and another about 2 years ago. I have never talked about him to my son as he is basically a non-entity in our life - a sperm donor. I have been pensively awaiting 'the day' when he would as about his dad, but so far, he has not said one thing directly to me. A couple of weeks ago I was in a restaurant that we frequent often, where the waitresses have become close to both of us (birthday parties, exchanging gifts, etc. - close acquaintances, I suppose), and one mentioned to me a conversation they had when I was not right there. The waitress had mentioned her son's father to which my son replied, 'I don't have one of those.' She said, 'One what?' He said, 'A daddy - I don't have one of those.' (She tol", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPIJTPS": "answered this Normal And Pathological Vaginal Discharge My 4 1/2 year old niece has a vaginal discharge discharge which looks yellow and smells not very good . She weights 49 lbs . Just started going to kinder .", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN34901": "I dig up wild flowers from the roadsides, Why pay for what's free, from Wally World? An instant garden I reap from such, Sweet Williams,and all more absurd.", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLMVR1": "woooo! Put them in my face! noms all the nuts", "3L60IFZKF3GSIG9U9W50JNS4SXGHH3": "There were people on the top floor of the building , but it felt like they had never been seen . Being the sane me , I asked for a ball but was denied because it was too hard and the dream feeling was that this crazy people could hurt someone with one . Hence I asked for a soft ball , and a cook came in with loads of buns which were round and soft .", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFT3B2": "I don't think that an allergic reaction would show up as that many bumps in that area. I hate to say this, but it kind of sounds like it may be herpes. Outbreaks can happen anywhere in that general area and for many it is the anus. Did you just start having anal sex? It sounds like you need to go and get checked out to be on the safe side. Because you did not use any lubrication it brought on this uncomfortable feeling in your rectal area. The pans shield baked goods from the most direct hot spots on the ... I learned a fabulous trick when I accidentally sat in gum and then sat on ... of Elmer's glue (or any white school glue we're partial to Elmer's) on the ... I felt a small bump with my finger just inside my rectum. ... I never felt any itching or extreme pain- just mild discomfort (like the pressure .... of my penis with some very minor warm sensations in that area.", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDMF3X": "some people cut off one of their legs. That weighs about 20 pounds. It quick, effective, and you won't regain the weight later on.", "3UUIU9GZC5367WGU8OLG89S2YIJT57": "It measures the effect an earthquake has on the ground.", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ07TRK": "Is it everyday? How long has it been going on? My oldest daughter is 13 and started her period when she was 11, it is possible but I need more information to tell you for sure, I started mine when I was 10.", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LEISK": "These fantastic farm bull pictures capture the character of the biggest , meanest , and most valuable animal on the farm . Hi ! My name is Maria .", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26S8JI": "Blink of an Eye Blink of an Eye may refer to: In the Blink of an Eye In the Blink of an Eye may refer to: Blink Blinking is a semi-autonomic rapid closing of the eyelid. Blink speed can be affected by elements such as fatigue, eye injury, medication, and disease. Some animals (for example, tortoises and hamsters) blink their eyes independently of each other. Blinking also protects the eye from irritants. The orbicularis oculi closes the eye, while the contraction of the levator palpebrae muscle opens the eye. Also, when the eyes move, there is often a blink the blink is thought to help the eye shift its target point. This blink is the response of an external stimulus like contact with the cornea or objects that appear rapidly in front of the eye. A reflex blink is not necessarily a conscious blink either however it does happen faster than a spontaneous blink. Infants do not blink at the same rate of adults in fact infants only blink at an average rate of one or two times in a min...", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBXJOX": "Share your answer...", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN574IV": "I know weight watchers work, because I have lost 48lbs. I joined on 21 March 2007 and reached my goal weight on 17th August 2007. They have two diets to follow. One is the points plan and the other is a core plan. Points Plan you are allowed a number of points a day to eat any foods you like. Core plan is lean meats, fish , poultry, vegetables, fresh fruit, non sugary cereals, low fat dairy products, skimmed milk, beans and pulses, pasta, brown rice, wholegrains and potatoes, coffee, tea and sugar free beverages. Any foods out of the core plan you can use a point allowance of 21 points a week. Any exercise you take can go towards activity points as well. I followed the core diet and found this so easy to follow. I also joined a gym. I dropped 4 dress sizes. The results are absolutely amazing. I feel so healthy, happy and confident. Once you have lost the weight the challenge is keeping it off. So you have to carry on as you were when you were on the diet, but allowing yourself in mo...", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LASBX8": "Cockers have anal sacs that usually have to be drained every month to 6 weeks, usually when you have them groomed they express them at that time, what you need to do is place your fingers on each side of her rectum and gently squeeze. Its a smelly process considering what end you are working with, but its very uncomfortable for them as well. It can cause infections, and intestinal problems. If nothing is expelled then take her to vet, they can clean out her anal sacs and make you both feel better.", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJ9YZ8": "It's been hard for me to gain weight all my life,too. Sometimes I just snack because of lack of time. You need to take the time to eat full meals to gain weight. You won't be able to work if you don't take care of yourself. Is your boss keeping you from having lunch? If so, it is illegal for him to do that. Make time to eat full meals!!!! I gained 10 pounds while I worked for a company that insisted that their employees take 30min. for lunch. We had a Kentucky Fried Chicken store next door.", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0D2OV": "Hi there, To lose weight, the best thing is to do cardiovascular exercises like biking, jogging, walking at a fast pace...You are supposed to do them on an empty stomach in the morning or in the evening. The reason why we do it on an empty stomach is bcos u dont hav any food in ur body that it needs fuel to get energy for u to do that exercise.. Then, your body resorts to burning the body fat as a fuel. Do cardio for 40-45 mins 6-7 times a week. But, note this that cardio takes 30 and diet takes 70. So eat 4-5 small meals a day which contains low carbs, high quality protein ( lean read meat such as chicken breast, nuts ( they hav good fats which make u lose bodyfat and good for general health ), beans, turky, tuna ) and lot of vegetables ( dont eat junk food like french fries or McDonal food or stuff ). By eating smaller meals more frequently the metabolism become fast and it help ur body put in an anabolic state which is good for losing fat. And avoid eating sugary food , ...", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWOOAMT": "What about collecting a picture or two of some she took or someone in the family of something that means a lot to her and have them professionally framed? YOu could have a paragraph added beneath the picture, something that describes that moment. I also did a shadowbox one that held, little sentimental things in it like our movie ticket stubs, an old key chain, a dried flower I saved from him, etc..", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE7XI7T": "Fat belly fat belly fat belly... oooohhhh fat belly lol", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ08TRL": "being a professional i advise a comforting regiment of heat and ice, maybe some over the counter icy hot, and maybe you are overdoing it are you standing too much? dont forget to wear comfortable shoes.", "3BJKPTD2QCAVCJES5VYJBAXYQ09TRM": "How to tighten up loose skin? Not sure if I use the right word, but how can I tighten up loose skin? I lose my weight quite drastically and there's flabby part on my thighs, hips and under my arms. Rep Power: 1058 Got to keep on dropping fat. Post a picture and we'll tell you if its fat, or loose skin. Aug of 2010 - 330 lbs --- Never Forget Rep Power: 357 skin will tighten back up within the next year. I have heard of pills or some kind of lotion you can rub on your skin, don't know much more than that. Originally Posted by LulzYeah Not sure if I use the right word, but how can I tighten up loose skin? I lose my weight quite drastically and there's flabby part on my thighs, hips and under my arms. It depends on how much loose skin you have. To a degree, some will tighten up with time. Developing muscle tissue helps 'get rid' of the problem in realtion. However, if you have a lot, surgery may be needed.", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSKQD0": "'If my calves were any bigger, theyd be considered cows.'", "3GL25Y6843SBWKAK5X3ZEEOUX9WXMJ": "This is expected from age 8-14 with an average age of 11 but these are just averages really , so 7 does not seem vastly out of the normal range . Puberty would tend to be considered premature if it were to begin to take place before the age of 6 . I would encourage you to be open with DD and reassure and support her .", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTLSF2": "He would be fine as long as he was on the medication once they ran out he would have soft stools again . Now that I feed him twice a day and he My dog had black tarry poo and the Vet said he had a virus gave him some meds and now he is fine . The Dogington Post is proud to do for the dog world what other great online newspapers have done for the dog-eat-dog world .", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA8T0M": "The best 'training' you can get is just to do it. The Phoenix area has more community theaters than almost anywhere else. Here is a website that has current auditions. http://durantcommunications.com/audition... I don't know about Phoenix particularly, but you local parks and rec department probably has youth drama classes. Mesa has a lot of them, and a new batch of classes will start in May. Opinion 2: whatever you dont imagine everyone in their undies.. terrible idea tried this one once and couldnt stop laughing just get up and have fun good luck your obviously pretty if you have been doing these since forever so just wing it lol", "3PIOQ99R7YKPXY1PCT7C7MEQ8HQNUI": "2. That's by following the characteristics of the Prophet SAW ( Ali Imran:31) and by obeying Allah SWT and His Messenger SAW", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134M6FS": "The more you interact with your rat, the more the bond will form. It seems to take about a week or so for many rats to get used to their new home  family, although a few of ours have been friendly from the day we adopted them, 1 took a few weeks  1 poor girl simply hated anyone who wasn't another rat (this is rare  we've lived with lots of rats). Offer your rat treats, talk to him (or her)  spend time near the cage. Rats are smart, curious  social by nature, so your little guy should begin to relax  get friendlier soon. Btw, since rats are smart, curious  social by nature, please consider adopting a companion rat of the same sex. You'll have happier pets  twice the rattie fun.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F03WV7": "68.6K Shares FROM TIME: Supreme Court Rules Against Kentucky Clerk in Gay Marriage Case People 9.8K Shares The Best Fcking Guided Meditation You've Ever Heard 21.9K Shares How to Lose Weight Without Even Trying 146.4K Shares 9 Genius Ways to Burn Even More Calories Outside Women's Health 150 Shares At Under 50 Calories, This Treat Should Be in Your Freezer at All Times 14.2K Shares The Total-Body Exercise That Challenges Your Balance 1K Shares Healthy Travel Guide: The Poconos Shape 114.2K Shares Low-Sugar, High-Protein Lemon Raspberry Muffins 272.9K Shares Insider Training: Victoria's Secret Ab Workout 192.2K Shares 3 Signs That Your Relationship With Exercise Is Unhealthy HuffPost Healthy Living 15 Shares This 16-Year-Old's Gravity-Defying Moves Set a Guinness World Record 739 Shares How to Exercise Away Pesky Armpit Fat 20.9K Shares Refugee Dad Receives 170,000 in Donations After Pictured with Daughter Selling Pens on the Street", "31ANT7FQN80G2NPZ8U4RUQPENOQ5HB": "If you have colored ink, it goes in the tri color spot, you don't have to have black ink b/c it will print in black also with the colored ink, but will use more of it to do so. if you are still having problems, there should be a contact number for your printer that could help you or the manual may be able to tell you exactly what to get.. hope this helps ya...", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8ODG5N": "Abstraction (linguistics) The term abstraction has a number of uses in the field of linguistics. It can denote a process (also called object abstraction) in the development of language, whereby terms become used for concepts further removed from the objects to which they were originally attached. It can also denote a process applied by linguists themselves, whereby phenomena are considered without the details that are not relevant to the desired level of analysis.", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RT6CG": "You could be ovulating. Occasionally, women will feel pain during ovulation.It could also be gas or indigestion. It's easy to confuse menstrual cramps with gas/digestion pains. Feeling bloated can be caused by indigestion as well. Early pregnancy feels very much like that as well pains in your belly/feeling bloated. If there is any possibility that you may be pregnant, you can take a test especially if your period doesn't come.You may also be experiencing an irregular menstural cycle this month and could start menstrating soon or you might be experiencing pms. For some women PMS starts this early all though this is not very common.Personally, I wouldn't worry about your symptoms if it were happening to me and the pains were not very severe, but of course you can always see your doctor or call a 24 hour nurse hotline and see what is suggested.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12H7CK": "Jacket is pre-owend, could use some touch up wash or washed in general, there is some marks or spots, I'm sure able to get out in wash.Please see photos closely  feel free to ask questions.Thank you.", "359AP8GAGGI48JS2AV5NHJ6U12D7CG": "In the history departments of British universities in 2007 , of the 5723 faculty members , 1644 ( 29  ) identified themselves with social history while The  old '' social history before the 1960s was a hodgepodge of topics without a central theme , and it often included political movements , like Populism , that were  social '' in the sense of being outside the elite system . Social history was contrasted with saw it as the bridging point between economic and political history , reflecting that ,  Without social history , economic history is barren and political history unintelligible . '' While the field has often been viewed negatively as history with the politics left out , it has also been defended as  history with the people put back in . '' as the dominant form in the 1980s and 1990s .", "3ZXV7Q5FJBMHNC78SE3Z5BJBZQYFCU": "That was caused by not eating in the morning and not eating all day until supper time for about two months. It could be eating habits too, judging from my eating habits. You may toss and turn all night and not know it because you are sleeping. I do know lack of rest causes dizziness. anon309889 Post 5 I've had problems with dizziness and nausea. I feel sick and can't eat, which is not good. I just found out I have low blood pressure and a lack of vitamin D, but I couldn't stop feeling nauseated, so I went to the doctor again and they said I have vertigo and gave me medication for it. All of a sudden, my nose has gone dry and my ears have gone dry and I've always had bad earwax, but it has stopped. I don't know if I should be worrying about that. I made another appointment with the doctor and I'll see how that goes. Bostongal43 Post 4 I was diagnosed with BPPVertigo, labyrinthitis and severe tinnitus in 2005 at age 46. They said it was a viral infection.", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y31ZG": ", atrial fibrillation, supraventricular tachycardia, extrasystoles) , increased or decreased BP, and related symptoms. Cautious use recommended in patients with cardiovascular disorders (e. , coronary insufficiency, cardiac arrhythmias), hypertension, and those with sensitivity to sympathomimetic amines. May require drug discontinuance. Immediate hypersensitivity reactions (e. , urticaria, angioedema, rash, bronchospasm, anaphylaxis, oropharyngeal edema) have been reported. Possible acute bronchospasm. (See Paradoxical Bronchospasm under Cautions. )Possible hypokalemia, which may increase risk of adverse cardiovascular effects. (See Cardiovascular Effects under Cautions. ) Serum potassium decrease generally is transient and usually does not require supplementation. When used in fixed combination with other agents, consider the cautions, precautions, and contraindications associated with the concomitant agents.", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0R1JW": "voting starts at the age 18 because they are considered mature, responsible and can related to laws and voting for an official to run certain parts of the world.", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC5PWI": "actually you don't really necessarily stop growing until you're older maybe 20's about, as you grow older you'll continue to grow but more slowly...   Opinion 2: your doctor can best predict when you will be done growing..but for girls it is usually about one to two years after they begin their period. but dont give up! you may have another couple inches in you! just make sure youre eating healthy staying healthy. Opinion 3: no at 18 your done unless your a late bloomer   Opinion 4: At 16 you may still grow. If you were a girl, I'd say no. However, boys are known to have random growth spurts into their early 20's, but usually between 16-18 years old. Eating healthy and staying fit do help keep your body growing and doing what it should. Looks like you beat genetics and are taller than both mom and dad.", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ74WO3": "Oil painting was developed during the Renaissance. Also, perspective and naturalism marked Renaissance art. There are several ways in which the Renaissance departs from the Middle Ages, however one must remember that these changes probably had roots in the late middle ages.", "3NFWQRSHVECU4ONDU0ZIV24QXIQGF5": "Quote: Originally Posted by dakotamidnight No pus - his coat looks good and he is acting good  trying to clean the wound himself. Upon a 2nd look we think he might have been bitten  the skin there tore. It doesn't look infected though - just red from his muscle I think. We're going to rinse it with some anti-biotic wash that we have left from a former cat had abcess  FIV and see if that helps. The local vet won't take a payment plan - but she will let you do all the care possible to cut the costs. We're just hesitant to take him in partly because of the finances issue, and partly since he isn't up to date on his rabies vax religiously opposed - even for the pets and we're not sure how they would handle that. Be careful for fever and keep the area clean. Keep him inside if at all possible to avoid germs, maggots(if you are in a warm area), and reinjuring the area. As for the rabies vax, it is illegal in most states not to. I'm not sure how your vet would personally handle it but", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSD9DU": "Any dogs can get along but some breeds are a bit more territorial and innately aggressive than others. Not all puppies just 'get along' with each other. Chihuahuas are very possessive of their families and their houses. It is likely your dog would be threatened by another dog being brought into the house he thinks he 'owns.' German Shepherds are also possessive and don't always play well with others. If you do get the GS, I suggest you have the two dogs meet in a neutral place that neither think they 'own.' Otherwise, your little dog might go after the new one and some nasty situations could arise. Always be careful when selecting a GS. Be sure to go to a reputable breeder and check out the parents of the pup. Make sure they are friendly and that their hips look good. You also want to see the papers for both parents and make sure their is no cross breeding. GS's are very prone to health problems. They're great dogs but you just have to be knowledgeable about your decision.", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC1PWE": "you've got what you have got. learn to use it to the best of your ability. no medicine to make penis growing make thick and large.", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TEYGI": "Anything above 120 and you might have a problem. How bad is a blood sugar level of 470?'' 70 -100 are normal fasting blood sugar levels.", "3F6045TU7DM6O49SD8TGTPWSQ7299H": "This happens to me all the time between periods. It's nothing to worry about, but no, it's not your period! (unfortunately, lol) I also experience cramping up to a week before I start or even longer if I am stressed out as stress causes my period to be late. It has to do with hormonal changes and ovulation. Take some ibuprofen and a multivitamin and you should hopefully feel much better. :)edit As other answerers have said, you could also be pregnant! If you are sexually active and this is not normal for your body it's worth looking into. But i'm a virgin and I have these symptoms all the time, obviously i'm not pregnant, so it might not necessarily be that.", "391FPZIE4CKXN2FE9VCZ22HUM5HUHG": "The logo for the Royal New Zealand Air Force is a kiwi - a flightless bird. Unfortunate.", "3D1UCPY6GG7KVX12R7MS2GYV69A385": "Move out. Find someone to share an apartment with ( split the bills ). You can find a job if you look hard enough.", "3W9XHF7WGKT9PF1XFBPMAYBKV8ETKS": "Photoshop is difficult. And life sucks, you'll learn that for good eventually. But Guitars are hard to restring, I know a girl who's played Guitar for three years and I still restring her guitars. Itunes? That's an Apple product. Apple sucks. Don't blame yourself, blame Apple. Eat Chocolate. Chocolate makes everyone happy.", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3031H": "Check out these Christian rap artists:Trip Lee Tedashii Lecrae Knine The Ambassador The Cross Movement (The Ambassador,Phanatik,Tonic,T.R.U.-L.I.F.E. )Flame Pettidee Soul P. Lil' Irocc Urban D. Mr. Del Grits Thi'sl Verbs Sharlock Poems Everyday Process Canton Jones Andale' Oldhead Sharp Skillz Sho Json Da' T.R.U.T.H. K-Drama", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD47X8V": "Vestibular papillomatosis Vestibular papillomatosis (VP) is a cutaneous condition of the vulva, characterized by pink, asymptomatic, fine projections of the vestibular epithelium or labia minora. Vestibular papillomatosis is not transmittable or pathological. HPV will turn white upon a vinegar application test, and Vestibular pallimatosis will not. Additionally, HPV occurs in cauliflower-like clusters at the base whereas Vestibular papillomatosis does not. Unlike yeast infections, there is discharge associated with vestibular papillomatosis. The cause remains unknown, but the observation that the condition may clear with Minocycline turned attention to an infectious agent.", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NH2AVC": "If I sat in my car or a straight backed chair for more than about 5 minutes getting back up was painful and I d be unable to stand straight for a minute or so . The one place I was ok though was where I sit all day my office . I tried all sorts of chairs in years past but for the last eight years have just been sitting on a ball . It forces correct posture and lets me move around on it ever so slightly .", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0GIXS": "They will respond based on their own discomfort and not necessarily pick up on ..... I do not have any thoughts about their breasts, I just need to get away from ... If you take notice, you can see women looking at other women and men at other men. ... But one thing is for sure: male interest in breasts is not a cultural issue, any more than a ... Men and women differ in their sexual natures because throughout the .... Okay, I think we'd alrady addressed (1) with the suggestion that each ge... It's because of how our society so heavily sexualizes women. ... If you have breasts, you might think, ?? 'm not interested in showing my niplets ... And maybe if porn wasn't the main place that most men see breasts, they wouldn't be so sexualized. Yesterday's Guardian had an interesting article in its G2 section. ... But one thing is for sure: male interest in breasts is not a cultural issue, any more than a ... Men and women differ in their sexual natures because throughout the ....", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSHD92": "Why are Germans so cold? Don't they like to have fun? Why are they so mad all the time 3 following 12 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  Asking that is a bit like asking 'Why are all Americans so fake?' Americans will probably be outraged at that accusation because they don't perceive that to be the case at all. It is however how a lot of Europeans perceive US mentality. See the problem here? It is a cultural difference, that's all. Two different cultures with different attitudes towards interpersonal relationships causing a lot of misunderstandingsie. Germans are cold, Americans are fake. Most Germans are perfectly polite if asked for help, will give an adequate response but not elaborate with small talk or calling complete strangers 'sweetie' or 'honey'.", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW74EZ9": "For someone with a painful back strain that does not improve with NSAIDs or acetaminophen (Tylenol), prescription pain medications or muscle relaxants may be appropriate. If you have a severe Grade II or Grade III strain, your doctor may refer you to an orthopedic specialist. Depending on the severity and location of your muscle strain, the orthopedist may immobilize the injured muscle in a cast for several weeks or repair it surgically. Mild strains may heal quickly on their own, but more severe strains may require a rehabilitation program. When To Call a Professional Call your doctor promptly if: You hear or feel a pop in your muscle at the time of injury. You have severe pain, swelling or discoloration in the injured muscle. Your injured muscle is obviously weak or has difficulty moving compared to the same muscle on the opposite side of your body. You have mild muscle symptoms that do not improve after 48 hours.", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGPYB4": "Free for Kindle: Babylonian Laws: The Oldest Code of Laws in the World by King of Babylon Hammurabi: http://t.co/cUibMWE5b4 ebblitz", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY6E22": "If you contact a local agility or obedience club in your area, they will make good suggestions for your to persue. They will recommend trainers they have worked with themselves, trust and know are good trainers from this personal experience. Our trainer goes all the way to Obedience competition training classes, which really fine tunes a dog, even if you aren't looking to compete and we only pay 50 for a 6 week class.", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0QJ1D": "Just watching the K'Roo's play.", "3YLPJ8OXX8BVSULEZT33SK7UBID4XX": "It's all in the weight you gain. Those things are basically sugar and other carbs, with some protein thrown in. You might balloon up, but if you're not working out it's not going to be what you had in mind. Lots of whole foods like meat and eggs and whole grain breads and pastas are a better way to go, but I still throw a shake in sometimes for a quick snack. I'd stick to protein powders rather than the mega-mass type mixes.", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTXENT": "Several local municipalities in Alabama are participating in the statewide effort to bring awareness to Several local municipalities in Alabama are participating in the statewide effort to bring awareness to Scientists think there may be a way to delay the onset of a common memory-robbing disorder.New research suggests avoiding middle-age weight gain can help delay the onset of dementia.A new study revealed the age of onset varied according to adults weight at age 50.Study participants were 83 years old when diagnosed with Alzheimer's.However , the study showed Alzheimer 's set in about seven months earlier for each increased increment of the participants ' body mass index or BMI.The National ...", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F2ZJH": "Ouch. Trying putting ice on it. It will reduce the swelling which probably is causing the pain. If you don't have an ice pack put the ice in a Baggie and put it on your wrist which should have a thin towel on it from protection. If it isn't better by tomorrow call your doctor before it gets worse. Good luck.", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ7SP4": "A BANNANA and I like the extra 'N' I added... its makes them taste better lol", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN3609U": "Hi I get anxiety attacks at times before they use to be almost everyday and I was scare to death because I felt my heard was coming out. First, dont place a bag on your head that is a terrible thing to do. What you need to do is: 1. Also do you have alot of excersize in the day?! if not you should get more as it uses up the adrenaline and if you have very little adrenaline you wont get as bad a anxiety attack or maybe none at all. Hope this helps you. What i do is i wait until i'm really tired before I go to bed, because if i'm going to lie awake i think too much, and get stressed out. Do something you find really relaxing before bed, like having a long bath. I can totally sympathize with you and understand how frustrating this can be. The worst part is the anxiety you can get from worrying about the anxiety you might get when you go to bed! It's crazy, isn't it??????", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVQ0VB": "I split up with my boyfriend just a few days before and had sex on the 7th November with somebody else but just once . The last time I remember being on my period is August and I think in September but they have always been sketchy . I had my scan late on but both of them were July 10th .", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GLU1H": "raisins are way more concentrated than grapes. Injested at high quantities it can cause kidney failure and the dog will die a painful death thus induce vomitting is recommended - small doses you probably would not see any affects but that doesn't mean it's ok for the dog - remember to keep all food out of reach of the dog.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q1YDYN": "Quite right. Wont be buying any of their rivals either.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSJG3U": "Fact: The richest person in history AND the richest fictional character are both African kings. images via http://t.co/Kbxluk0K0P", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEED462": "Not for weed, but if you have used any other drugs you can fail.", "3VW0145YLYAA105VOTOYN5GFMBJMJM": "Kill them with kindness.", "3IYI9285WSYXSET4B4UKK9B3SXFCJU": "So then why do u ask? Because there's stupid ppl like me who are bored and have nothing better to do with their time...so they answer a question and feel that they have made a difference...haha.", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G476Q": "I also have anxiety aand I get these paranoid thoughts too like because I feel dizzy or something I might have a brain tumor or whatever. I am a health nut and a hypocondriac and here's you're problem. I imagine the pains only last for minutes. If you were experiencing chest pain for several hours or for the entire day then you would have to. I've had the pains you describe and so has everyone else it occasionally happens, if it persists for hours and every day then you have a problem. I suggest working ouot too as this also helps. I tell myself that almost everyday and even though almost every day I felt like I am going to die for years now everytime I go to the doctor nothing is ever wrong. In response to the acid reflux comment, I also have acid reflux and acid reflux has nothing to do with your breathing. It causing burning in your chest due to acid comming from your stomach to your espophogus. If you burp and it burns then you may have acid reflux, breathing has nothing to do with it.", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F0ZJF": "If you have a book that is a personal favorite and would like us to add it to this list , please email us at with the details and we will try to get it added . Goodbye , Friend : Healing Wisdom for Anyone Who Has Ever Lost a Pet Saying Goodbye you Your Angel Animals : Finding Comfort after Losing Your Pet Good Grief : Finding Peace After Pet Loss : Personal and Professional Insights on the Animal Lover 's Unique Grieving Process Blessing the Bridge : What Animals Teach Us About Death , Dying , and Beyond When Your Pet Outlives You : Protecting Animal Companions After You Die When Your Pet Dies : A Guide to Mourning , Remembering and Healing he Final Farewell  Preparing for and Mourning the Loss of Your Pet Forever Friends : Resolving Grief After the Loss of a Beloved Animal Loving and Losing a Pet : A Psychologist and a Veterinarian Share Their Wisdom When Only the Love Remains : The Pain of Pet Loss Remembering Candy : Helping your child cope with the loss of their own pet .", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCFJQ5": "Kennel cough is a name given to a number of different respiratory viruses just like we use the term 'cold' but it really is a number different viruses. The Kennel cough shot protect dogs for a number of those viruses but not all. Just like the 'cold' it can be spread by contact with items that have been contacted by individuals that are infected. The virus does have a limited life span out side of the Warmth and moisture conditions where it thrives the best. Therefore if you are going to visit it would be a kindness to have minimal interactions with your dogs and their toys after you shower and dress in clean cloths and and before you leave the house. I always remove my shoes when entering the home of a friend that raises puppies because the parvo virus and other viruses can be transmitted on the shoes.", "3ZCC2DXSD720Q6P8TWDCRNIA8P6YYI": "Mar 5, 2008 ... Get the biggest goldfish tank you can afford and fit comfortably into your house. .... I have a 5 gal tank and I just want to know how many common, regular .... can you please advise whether we can keep goldfish angel fish together? Under the right tank conditions, those who enjoy keeping angelfish can .... and a little bit of prodding for them to feel comfortable enough to produce fry. ... clean 1 gallon (3.8 L) tank with an airline feeding medium-sized bubbles into the water. You are already a bit overcrowded. If you intend to keep the Angelfish until adulthood, only 3 or 4 adults can fit in a 45 gallon tank. The Serapes really don't take up that much room, but adult Angelfish get territorial and feisity. Examples of these fish include Dwarf Angelfish of the Centropyge ... an aquarium , but without them you can't make many decisions on your own. .... what fish will fit comfortably into a 125 gallon tank as compared to a 180 gallon tank.", "3E6L1VR4XWKS7VY7INQWJBR134LF60": "You feel better when you're eating food that retains nutritional value.", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OC6AI": "The perfect French doesnt spring fully formed from the whelping box. Hes a product of his background and breeding. Previous: Next: What You Need to Know About French Bulldog Health All dogs have the potential to develop genetic health problems, just as all people have the potential to inherit a particular disease. Run, dont walk, from any breeder who does not offer a health guarantee on puppies, who tells you that the breed is 100 percent healthy and has no known problems, or who tells you that her puppies are isolated from the main part of the household for health reasons. A reputable breeder will be honest and open about health problems in the breed and the incidence with which they occur in her lines. The French Bulldog is prone to certain . Heres a brief rundown on what you should know. These small, flat-faced dogs are prone to a couple of conditions. One is called brachycephalic airway syndrome.", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIXIUY": "Aim for 3 more days ! You are one of 31  of Americans who do n't floss daily , but you 're well on your way to making a positive impact on your teeth and gums . Regardless of how well you brush , plaque still forms between your teeth and along your gums . Toothbrush bristles alone can not clean effectively between these tight spaces .", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4GE9U": "The good thing is m hoping that means I get to see Grandma again . That would be so awesome ! s interjection : Please do NOT tell Dolly that cats are actually what she knows as t figure out yet , although I do remember back when I was a pup a really nice person named Randy who used to let me jump all over him , so maybe that m pretty low maintenance and adaptable .", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ245M": "Here is a link to WebMD that deals with tooth grinding. It could be a sign of something serious. Click the link to learn more. Hope it helps. Sincerely, Terry", "3Z56AA6EK4YYD5QO4AU9E1BA050M6H": "I just feel the need to point out that The Lord of the Rings is a single epic novel, not a trilogy. It was only divided into three sections for publication convenience. And I haven't read A Song of Ice and Fire yet, but it is next on my list (I'm moving through Tolkein's works now. ) However, I have heard that it is quite complex and has adult situations. I'd say go for it anyway, unless you are sheltered and the mention of sex is going to baffle and confound you.", "3ZG552ORAM2TLR1WV0JXBKDBBT92VW": "I have my 1st pain management apt next week. I have scoliosis, bone spurs, TMJ and muscle burning/pain and migraines. I have been smoking pot in order to eat, sleep and for anxiety, I previously had a prescription when I lived in California (Washington now). So my question is should I tell my new Pain Management Doc about smoking pot? I currently take 2 5/325 norcos a day and 1-3 5mg flexaril. I DO NOT smoke pot during the day unless my pain is a 7-10 and I never smoke and drive or work but I smoke at night otherwise the pain keeps me up all night. I understand that the Doc may want me to quit but do you think that if I tell him on the first visit he will give me a chance to quit or will they bar me completely? Im a military wife, 28, perfect record and going to school. No kids. Please don't lecture me about the dangers of marijuana and pain management.", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N6SVN": "Hey there my friend. So after about eight or nine months of absolute torture within my own mind and having no family to run to but my mom who was just. But then I thought to myself 'well, you know you were born with the ability to draw, and you play guitar in a band, and you have dreams...' And thats where it hit me that regardless of what happens I cant afford to give up. I know I ramble a lot, and parts of this were probably very confusing and stupid, but what I ask is that you believe. I have seen some crazy doctors in my day, and some feel that they 'know' what I should be on, next thing you know im in a rage and have no control over my thoughts or actions. I am proud to say that I am a Renegade doing my best to help others that are in need, because sometimes I have a voice that someone else may not be given the chance to, so I will do my absolute best to speak out on their behalf and change what I feel is 'wrong' for a better tomorrow. I agree that the rain is very depressing.", "36U4VBVNQOBACWTH50OTG6J09EIRUD": "My leopard gecko hasn't eaten, and poops weird?! My leopard gecko hasn't eaten, and poops weird?! LOG IN TO CLOSE THIS AD  Hi all, I've recently become the proud owner of a baby leopard gecko (about 4 months old). I got her on June 2nd at a reptile rally in Petco (not the best place, I know, but they take good care of their animals in this one.) For the first week and up until two days ago, she's been regularly eating 1-3 medium superworms. She'd poop normally and everything. But lately, she hasn't been eating for the past two days(she ate a pretty big superworm that had just shed the last day she ate), and a few minutes ago, she made a mushy poop (normal coloring though) with a puddle of liquid (I'm assuming and have read it's normal to have some) surrounding it. Her poops have been slightly smaller than usual, but she poops daily. Is she alright?? I house her on repti-carpet/paper towels, she has two hides with moss-one on the cool side (about 80 degrees) and one on the warm side(i", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWWRZ1": "You would be hard pressed to increase 10-20 lbs per week. Your body needs time to recover for any substantial gains. Your best bet is to lift (with a spotter) more than your max every time you work out. Read this article to find out how I doubled my squat from 175 to over 350 pounds ... I'll talk more about why I started below my true max in a little bit, since I think it ..... Mar 13, 2014 ... While there are many one-legged squat moves to choose from, my ... for you, if you struggle to improve a barbell back squat, is to try the pistol squat. .... It took my bench from 220 to about 280 in around 2.5-3 months. I'm pretty seasoned so that was a huge jump. Here is an example of my full body strength workout. Trust me on the work out type. I went from a 340 1 rep squat to 385 in about a month switching over to this workout style. Good luck my man.", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZK9VW": "Love pills, sex pills, E-pills, go pills, drunk pills, peace pills, pep pills, L-pills versus the slow kill.", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE64OQ": "It can't be done--you cant manipulate your bones like you can your muscles and fat because bones are static. If you think your hips are too wide, try working on making your shoulders wider as that will make your hips appear proportionally smaller. Opinion 2: yeh just pop down to your organ doner in your local town they shud be able to fix u up with a nice new pair of hips :) ) lol   Opinion 3: ab exercises perhaps. pilates is good for making you slimmer. you can do pilates that concentrates solely on abs http://www.youtube.com/watch?v84yCmEfs... try that ", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE73B9R": "The doctor said that everthing looked great and to just let everthing take its course and try not to worry. So good luck!! posted 02/15/2008 by a BabyCenter Member Report answer Was this answer helpful? Yes  No Thank you! 21 out of 21 found this helpful I had some blood (red) and then brown at 6 weeks. I went to the doctor and he checked my blood and gave me a sonogram- everything was fine. The doc said it could be implantation bleeding. posted 09/04/2007 by noraflynn13 Report answer Was this answer helpful? Yes  No Thank you! 22 out of 24 found this helpful Six weeks today and I have brown spotting with traces of red, no cramping. Since it is out of my control, I am trying to put it out of my mind. However, that is easier said than done. It is very comforting to read the other posts here, since some people have had similar symptoms and everything still worked out. posted 11/02/2011 by MurphyNY Report answer Was this answer helpful? Yes  No Thank you!", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDG70N": "Look to your diet and sweat it off This is the classic problem people have with abs work out. You need to spend your time on your diet and your cardio now so that all the hard work you have put into toning your abs will start to show through. To do this: nbsp. Diet - cut out all junk food and all refined carbs. So no more white bread, white rice and white pasta. , nbsp. only eat fresh and unprocessed foods. Lots of fruit and vegetables and drink plenty of water to fill you in between meals. Look at your portion size. Every meal should be able to fit into the palm of one hand. Are you possibly overeating? Exercise - Running, rowing machine and jump rope are the fastest way to burn the fat from all over and including your stomach. Do this for at least 25 mins 3/4 times a week and you will notice the difference very quickly I guarantee it. Sources: http://instantfeelgood. blogspot. com/2008/06/lose-fat-roll-above-your-jeans-part-1.", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAKZ7ZF": "Please register your interest on the Discussion Board.Good luck with your book!! Buy the Book: Want to Discuss?", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JSHOP": "Do so with the combined help of a psychiatrist with a specialty in addictions and a therapist. Depression in a common sequelae of meth. An antidepressant may make it easier.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54LBE3": "The ovaries produce, store, and release eggs. Eggs from the ovaries reach the uterus through tubes called fallopian tubes or oviducts. Eggs develop from these cells. At birth, each ovary has about 400,000 oocytes. An unfertilized egg lives for about 24 hours after it leaves the ovary. Most women produce eggs until the ages of about 45 to 55, when the menstrual cycles become increasingly infrequent and then stop. Your ovaries are just like the rest of your body - they will eventually age. The eggs inside your ovaries will become older and more difficult to fertilize. This is because egg quality declines as you age. Usually each ovary takes turns releasing an egg each month however, if there was a case where one ovary was absent or dysfunctional then the other ovary would continue providing eggs to be released. There are two extremities to the ovary: The ovary also contains blood vessels and lymphatics. If the egg fails to release from the follicle in the ovary an ovarian cyst may fo...", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4FZ2T": "You can use a semi-colon to combine two related sentences this way, you can connect your ideas without separating them with a period or conjunction. Their study, published in the British Medical Journal, monitored 237 smokers aged 22 to 66 over a six-year period. Volunteers were split into groups and given either a patch and a nasal spray, or a patch and a dummy placebo spray to help them stop smoking. They found the most effective way to stop smoking was to use a nicotine patch for five months in conjunction with a nicotine nasal spray and then continue to use the spray only for a further seven months. Kylie's Non-Stop History 501 Kylie's Non-Stop History 501 is a compilation album by Australian singer Kylie Minogue. The album contained clips of most of Minogue's songs released during her PWL period plus the Techno RAVE Mix of 'Celebration'.", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WXRX3": "The director isn't embarrassed, mainly due to being blind drunk.", "3MZ3TAMYTLL535YHBJZFX3VPFJTRI3": "see insideThis is a bit of a long shot, as you didn't mention the age/purpose of the book, but this is one of the books about inventions with lighnting in the tilte: How Ben Franklin Stole the Lightning (Hardcover) Price: 12.40 Reading level: Ages 9-12 Hardcover: 40 pages Publisher: HarperCollins (December 24, 2002) Language: English ISBN-10: 0688169937 ISBN-13: 978-0688169930 Other books about inventions: Draw the Lightning Down: Benjamin Franklin and Electrical Technology in the Age of Enlightenment by Michael B. Schiffer and Carrie L. Bell (Hardcover - Oct 14, 2003) Buy new: 35.10 Understanding Lightning and Lightning Protection: A Multimedia Teaching Guide (RSP Bird) by Tibor Horvth (Paperback - Jul 11, 2006) Buy new: 75.00 Lightning: It's Electrifying: It's Electrifying (All Aboard Science Reader) by Jennifer Dussling and Lori Osiecki (Paperback - Sep 16, 2002) Buy new: 3.99", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHVSRW": "so i get this ringing sound in my ears every 3 weeks or something.. And i know it is often tinnitus or some ear infection but im too scraed to face it.. So i choose to ignore it :( today in the evening the same thing happened in the right one.. And now it feels numb and heavy.. I dont know why.. I cleaned my ears too.. Is it because of headphones? I listen to music on the lowest volume!! Im really worried.. I realized my voice sounded different at the later part of the day too..", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOE7T0": "People can. I don't think it would taste very good though.", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX380QE": "Swimming is a great way to tone up, however, it's not a great weight loss activity. If you want to really start burning calories, I would recommend running or aerobics 5 times a week for over 20 minutes. When you are doing aerobic activity (no stop and go continuous) you are burning carbohydrates for the first 12 minutes. After that time you start burning calories. I used to be a swimmer, and I would like to get back to it. I really applaud you for 3 times a week for an hour.", "3OEWW2KGQJ9LYHQFRDH0CBA7CR1ODP": "RT: ' Oil Kings win 4-2 and become first team in history to win game 7 of WHL final on the road.'", "3CZH926SICCMMUUX4ODB4VMNVC04EM": "In my opinion, you're 'off the hook' morally and legally. They took responsibility for your dog. They gave it a bone when you told them not to. If they were watching your dog and he got out and bit a kid, they would be responsible, not you. I think it's the same thing. BUT! I would feel guilty too. I also wouldn't want to lose a friendship over it. I don't know, maybe splitting the bills is fair.", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0QC44": "parents: its just roleplayer grandparents: its just roleplayer sooman: its just roleplayer bts: its just roleplayer me: YOU KNO", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y1Z1C": "The HOA attorney should be able to help with it.You don't say what State you are in, but I am only licensed to practice law in the State of California.Good luck.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKDQH9": "I just put names  meaning on the search the web space and got this as a first page of 9,500,000 hits. Find the perfect baby name in our database . Find the best name for your baby in our database of 16,000 names. ...makewayforbaby.com/babynames - 16k - Cached Baby Names Meanings. names meanings. Top ten baby names, baby animal names . mexican baby names. baby girls names. baby names by meaning. mexican baby names. mexican baby names ...users.aol.com/bibjilli1019/baby-names. - 23k - Cached Baby Names Meanings - Boy And Girl Names Baby names meanings and origins for boys and girls. Search by gender, ethnic origin, and meaning.www.weddingvendors.com/baby-name. - 24k - Cached First Names and What They Mean Type in a first name to find it's meaning.www.zelo.com/firstnames - 19k - Cached SPONSOR RESULTS Meaning of Baby Names www.Parents.com - Search Over 25,000 Baby Names Including Celebrity Baby. Save 20! www.growingtales.com Name and Their Meaning Find great deals and save. www.Dealtime.com/jewelr", "3OJX0UFJ0Z548WXVBJO7PLJ63SBU9S": "Sign up to receive WebMD 's award-winning content delivered to your inbox . WebMD Symptom Checker helps you find the most common medical conditions indicated by the symptoms bloating or fullness , constipation , distended stomach and pain or discomfort including Constipation ( adult ) , Irritable bowel syndrome , and Constipation ( child ) . There are 83 conditions associated with bloating or fullness , constipation , distended stomach and pain or discomfort .", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9E42O": "and ether way I'm not good at coping at this stuff", "3VMHWJRYHVE5QAI3JAZMJO4L08NXFF": "Well, how was your appetite this month, are you low in iron? you should get your blood ck for iron, you maybe a bit anemic (low iron levels). Bodies that do not have enough iron in them cannot produce enough blood or oxygen, so sometimes the body has to use quot. emergency supplyquot. and therefore it can skip menstruation. Also you get your period almost every 21 days , give or take. By now your menstrual cycle should be right. since you had it when you were 11. Don't worry, and don't panic. It can also mean that it maybe inherited? Your mom may have irregular periods also? but before jumping the gun, go to your Doc ans see if you can get a blood test to see your iron levels, the Doc will probably make you take iron pills and vitamins on a regular basis.", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4H9EQ": "ohhhhhhhhhhhh makes a whole lot of sense now", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGXSUY": "Numb leg numb leg numb leg!! OW FUCK", "3RWB1RTQDJLR2M6PP5JZFJ1WB518PL": "I like my home and city. But all things can do with a bit of shakeup now and again. Me, where I am is where I wanted to live.", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1HBKN": "I am not sure about Cali, but I know that in most states local colleges and High schools offer satellite courses for adult ed. Try contacting your school districts for info relating to continuing education. I am almost certain that if you are just looking for the intellectual 'pick me up,' that you could audit classes at a community college..most times for a very small fee or even better free! Hope this helps!", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFVB3C": "Well if it pinched u super hard then yah, anyone could get a bruise. But, some people have very fair skin that will bruise easily. So,. When you first get a bruise, it's kind of reddish as the blood appears under the skin. After 5 to 10 days, the bruise turns greenish or yellowish. Some people bruise easily, whereas others don't. Why? Bruising depends on several things, such as: -how tough the skin tissue is -whether someone has certain diseases or conditions -whether a person's taking certain medications -Also, blood vessels tend to become fragile as people get older, which is why elderly people tend to bruise more easily. steps u could try to help get rid of the bruise faster is to 1. In other words, if the bruise is on your shin, lie down on a couch or bed and prop up your leg. This will slow the flow of the red blood cells to the bruise because more of the blood in your leg will flow back toward the rest of your body instead of leaking out into the tissues of your leg. I hope i helped!", "3OZ4VAIBEXDTRNZ42LPPA1ZSD4XVJE": "Only the Wacom Cintiq models have a screen. These are very expensive, more expensive alone than most computers. With regular Wacoms (Bamboo and Intuous), the graphics tablet is only an input device - without an integral screen. These graphics tablets are not just a 'cool mouse' - a graphics tablet has pressure sensitivity, and there is a 1 to 1 correlation between the pad and the screen you are using. A graphics tablet is therefore much more controllable than a mouse. The Intuous and Cintiq ranges also have additional tilt sensitivity. You can't use GIMP on an ipad. An ipad isn't a computer. GIMP only runs on. Also iPads don't have pressure sensitivity, although they do have touch, there is no way to get hard and soft strokes like you can with a tablet. Image editors on iPads are fairly simply programs, nothing as complicated as GIMP can run on an iPad. If you have a computer, and one of the regular Wacom tablets and GIMP, then your luck is in - because GIMP is compatible with Wacom tablets.", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPCR08": "Answer this questoin first: What motivates your travel? I think that it all depends on what motivates your travel? You can visit Switzerland any time throughout the year. Summer lasts roughly from June to September and offers the most pleasant climate for outdoor pursuits. Unfortunately, you won't be the only tourist during this period, so prices can be high, accommodation hard to find and the mainstream sights crowded. You'll find much better deals and fewer crowds in the shoulder seasons of April-May and late-September-October. At any time, as you travel around the country you'll hit many different climatic conditions. The continental climate in the Alps tends to show the greatest extremes between summer and winter. Mid-August to late October generally has fairly settled weather, and is a good period for hiking trips.", "3VAOOVPI3ZQWQ8BAR2ZW37EIQVWLLJ": "Through Stipple Network, the photos are open to use by website publishers, who are paid by companies with products in the photos. Consumers can then click on the products tagged and buy them. Stock photography is sometimes called a photo archive, or just stock photos. Royalty free stock photography offers a photo buyer the ability to use an image in an unlimited number of ways for a single license fee. If the advertiser decides to use the image, the rights to use the high-resolution image then can be negotiated. Some photographers fund their own photo shoots, or develop imagery in cooperation with an agency, while others submit photographs originally produced as part of editorial (magazine) or commercial assignments. International professional stock photography organizations include the Stock Artists Alliance. Can Stock Photo provides 19 million images to customers, provided by 38,000 photographers and artists worldwide. Can Stock Photo receives 25,000 contributor submission per day...", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605LHDS": "My feet are getting heavy, and I've lost feeling in my toes. What is that odd sensation in my stomach - like rocks weighing heavily?? My back is stiff, so I try to move.", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBKQ5Q": "Here's a quick sandwich idea that makes a terrific breakfast, lunch or anytime pick-me-up. It features cinnamon raisin bread, honey-peanut butter cream cheese and crunchy apples....yum! ingredients 1/4 cup reduced fat peanut butter, smooth (creamy) 1/4 cup low fat cream cheese, softened 1 tbsp. honey 8 slices Pepperidge Farm Raisin Cinnamon Swirl Bread 2 cups thinly sliced Red or Golden Delicious apples directions Stir the peanut butter, cream cheese and honey in a small bowl until the mixture is smooth. Spread 2 tablespoons peanut butter mixture on each of 4 bread slices. Top each with 1/4 of the apple slices and 1 remaining bread slice. Cut each sandwich into 4 squares. For a healthful twist, substitute Pepperidge Farm 100 Whole Wheat Raisin Cinnamon Swirl Bread for the Raisin Cinnamon Swirl Bread and soy nut butter for the peanut butter. ", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPHEC9": "Aren't hip replacements Granny Land?' Each year, about 200,000 Americans undergo hip replacement surgery. Hips are designed to last a lifetime. I dread doing the other hip.' And I can replace both your hips in one surgery.' He'd replace the second hip three to four months after the first. Aren't hip replacements Granny Land?' Each year, about 200,000 Americans undergo hip replacement surgery. Hips are designed to last a lifetime. I dread doing the other hip.' And I can replace both your hips in one surgery.' He'd replace the second hip three to four months after the first. I was 4 days in the hospital for each hip. I was pleased with my care at the hospital (in a small midwestern city). For the 2nd hip, I actually asked for general. I hired him to fix my hips and he did that. I am not that young but if having ceramic would make it more likely that my hips will outlive me, I might even pay extra for it. Other matters: I could drive at 5-6 weeks after each hip.", "341H3G5YF0C3Y13SHA4MD2XS26Y0ZD": "Sorry, but the names you have listed suck and in no way adequately represent names given to the members of these species. I would love to help you, but it would go against everything I believe in to do so. Unless you give realistic names to the characters of this lay that you are weighting, I can not help or allow anyone else to help.", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUSJAX": "Interesting Questions, Facts, and Information Philosophy Page 1 - Page 2 - Page 3 - Page 4 - Page 5 - Page 6 - Page 7 - Page 8 - Page 9 All content is (C)opyright 1995-2006 FunTrivia.com. Content may NOT be copied, reprinted, or distributed without our written consent. Feel free to link to any page you wish. While we try to keep trivia as accurate as possible through a regular volunteer editing process, FunTrivia cannot guarantee the validity of the information found here. FunTrivia offers no professional advice, and you take all responsibility for your use of anything contained herein. Feel free to send a note to a particular item's author for further details or source information most of our authors love to hear feedback about their work.", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE7Y7IJ": "One reason is the refresh rate on the monitor. instead of a steady picture, it is always flashing so fast you can't see it. This is one reason why watching tv on your computer is harder on your eyes than on an actual television.", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGT1DH": "I hope this works!I have been on birth control for over 5 years, but that has only made my breasts feel fuller, no increase in cup size.However, I have uneven breasts (right is fuller/bigger).", "3B9XR6P1WETEI91YX4YP9P5LACEJBT": "Not as tall as she looks. I was watching her show and her most current one had short models. She used pronouns quot. ourquot. , quot. usquot. and quot. wequot. when referring to short models so it seemed she included herself as a short model. My guess is she is about 5'8 or 5'10, which is short for a model.", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TEGY0": "UFO's: I dont know God: if he doesnt exists how does I. I mean I believe in God. Fate: yep The Holocaust: I dont know Demons: I dont know Magic: 50 50 Santa Claus: when I was kid Big Foot: are you joking True Love: I dint find yet. After you are pregnant it wont do that.. The reason you have a period is to prepare the uterus for impregnation of the egg. When you dont get pregnant the lining that got all soft and mushy sloughs off and thus the cramps and bleeding. Once you are pregnant it doesnt do that. It will straighten out, but it might take some time. Its a giant pain because it can just show up when you least expect it!!! It also can vary in intensity, extremely heavy one month and painful cramps, and then be lighter the next month. What you should really be thinking of is talking to your mom or the nurse or school doctor. Please don't forget that your mom was once a teenager too, and she's gone through this herself. It's totally embarrassing, I know, but give it...", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONYHZU": "It depends how many gerbils you have I'd say about 3 months if you dont waste any and you have lets say 2 gerbils. They tend to eat only certain seeds like sunflower and others they just leave, some manufacturers fill up the bags with things that they dont like. Opinion 2: how many times a day do you feed it?", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EJ63L": "Updated October 29, 2014. Itching is a common reason for people to see an allergist. Many of those with itching have a rash, others do not. Some people suffer from itching for many years, while others have symptoms for only a few days or weeks. So, what causes an itch to occur? Why do some people itch from head to toe, while others itch only in certain areas? If you, or someone you know, has a problem with itching or a rash that won't go away, read the following articles, then see your doctor. You too can be itch free in no time! Read more: Nuts and Bolts of Itching How to Control Itchy Skin Types of Allergic Skin Rashes", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW72ZES": "not in profile! but face forwardyou can use shading with a dark eyepencil on either or both sides of the nose, which will make it look more narrow. The rest will depend very much on how you wear your hair. Wearing it down will tend to drag down your features more. The other thing to do is play up what you feel are your best points, smile, white teeth, nice lipstick, eyes, more eyemakeup means people will see the nose less, and so on. Good luck!", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWQU5Z": "Stab a pillow with knife when you feel like doing it, that's a friends advice for me when they found out i cut myself, don't do it, it's a habit for me now but im not depressed or anything, my arms have thickened over time so i don't draw blood or anything. Don't cut yourself Your only 13 Romulan Its hard to keep sharp things away thats rubbish advice:)", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE759BR": "your period should have come by now. go to your doctor to be sure the pill worked. If it didn't, you can arrange for an early abortion.", "33TGB4G0LPFF9F04EU4B0SJMRHUTXI": "For angels, you will need a 29 gallon tank for a single fish or a 40-55 gallon for two or three angelfish.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNNLRB": "Use these cues as the starting points for your design.", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYJRJG": "i think what u asked was 'cirrhosis' if im rite. Cirrhosis is characterized anatomically by widespread nodules in the liver combined with fibrosis. The fibrosis and nodule formation causes distortion of the normal liver architecture which interferes with blood flow through the liver. Cirrhosis can also lead to an inability of the liver to perform its biochemical functions. To understand the pathophysiology of cirrhosis, the normal anatomy and physiology of the liver must first be briefly reviewed. increase your risk of cirrhosis 10 fold and increase your risk of liver cancer 6 fold. 2) smoking increases your rate of cirrhosis and liver cancer (duh!) Cirrhosis is characterized anatomically by widespread nodules in the liver combined with fibrosis. The fibrosis and nodule formation causes distortion of the normal liver architecture which interferes with blood flow through the liver. Cirrhosis can also lead to an inability of the liver to perform its biochemical functions", "3EFNPKWBMSM2D8WZW39D91SDNBY30I": "I get extremely itchy skin, so difficult not to scratch even though I know it's really bad for me WinterSkin", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SJDBB": "Mark Moraghan Mark Stephen Moraghan (born 27 January 1963) is a British actor and singer. He has appeared in many British drama series including 'Peak Practice' and 'Heartbeat'. He started his acting career in 1978, when the BBC held auditions in his high school for the TV play 'Lies', and he was selected to play his first role. His first introduction to music was as a backing singer and percussionist in the Liverpool band Personal Column in the late 1970s. Since 2013, Moraghan is the new (and current) narrator of 'Thomas  Friends', succeeding both Michael Brandon (for the US) and Michael Angelis (for the UK). The best way to START acting is to get involved with plays. After this, send your information to an acting agency- Acting agencies won't automaticly accept you - it takes patience and time, usually a week, and they'll contact you if someone wants to be your agent- unfourtantly-you don't decide. He went 167 with a 3.83 ERA in 27 games (19 starts) that year.", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCHQJE": "i have them too on the lower of my shaft.. dont worry mate they will fade over time.. im sure your girlfriend wont care .. if shes never seen a dick before then she will assume its normal anyways :) its completely normal", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QVY7F": "Weirdly Crystal has gone off Weetabix recently, but her furbro Harrison loves them too!", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555AB6PX": "Okay maybe I'll put one of them on my list. That one seems like the best. Another option would be Philosophy of Life and Death :", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY5E21": "Copied, pasted from source sites: --------------------------------------. 11 - Over a small baked potato, spoon 1/2 cup of salsa and 2 Tablespoons of non-fat sour cream. 12 - I really like this one: one rice cake thinly spread with fat-free sour cream and sprinkled with 1 Tablespoon of crumbled blue cheese. 19 - 1 slice of reduced calorie bread spread with 1/4 cup low-fat cottage cheese mixed with 2 Tablespoons of applesauce and sprinkled with cinnamon. Baked apple (microwave an apple stuffed with raisins and sprinkled with cinnamon top with 1/4 cup fat-free vanilla yogurt)  20 reduced-fat tortilla chips with 1/3 cup salsa  Fresh fruit  1/2 cup sorbet  Chunks of fresh fruit with fat-free yogurt 'dip'  Celery stuffed with peanut butter  Three cups popcorn (use reduced-fat microwave)  1 cup fat-free yogurt, fresh fruit in season  1/2 peanut butter sandwich  1 serving cold cereal with skim milk  Handful animal crackers  1/2 cup low-fat cottage cheese with fruit", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPUL1G": "I have this problem also, all the time for years now and take Furosemide and Hydrochlorothiazide for this but I am also having to really lower my intake of sodium and get a lot more exercise. Too much salt and not getting enough exercise WILL cause swelling and numbness and tingly sensation in feet, ankles, legs, face, hands, and fingers. Also, a pinched nerve in the neck and/or lower back will cause this as well. I cannot sleep on my back without waking up with my face, eyes, hands and fingers swollen, numb, and tingling and this is because I have had 3 herniated disks in my neck and even with epidural shots in the disks to take the swelling off the nerves, the pressure of sleeping on my back causes the disks to press against the nerves which will cause all the swelling and numbness. The major thing though is the salt intake amount and lack of exercise.", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYOMV5": "NOT EVERY STD ORGINATED FROM ANIMALS DUMMY.", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EPHLA": "Here's a question: why have I only seen women patients at the TMJ doctor's? Do men in DFW just not have jaw problems?", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555A9P6E": "Foregut structures tend to present with upper abdominal pain, midgut with peri umbilical pain, hind gut lower abdominal pain TweetAnatomy", "3MG8450X2O8P0JD2S8K4BBJL8WSUPM": "Please be aware that to practice Reiki you will need to receive an .... shall not come back they should come and get his body. ... the tooth was healed, the swelling gone and no pain was felt. .... above the area instead of directly on the person.", "3UYRNV2KITXRZ1UC9Q67BUW1BQ1N85": "But difficulty swallowing is a common anxiety symptom, especially during anxiety attacks. What other symptoms are you experiencing? Let us help: ...", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H793V8": "Playing video games for many hours over a long period of time can affect the vision.", "3T6SSHJUZF8SA6VYLW56JBUYSNCIIS": "A baby bearded dragon should be fed LIVE food twice a day (morning and afternoon) and you should let them eat as many as they wish in the space of 5-10 minutes. Live food needs to be dusted 5 days a week with calcium dust and nutrobal or multi-vitamins on the other 2 days. Fresh greens should be provided daily - mustard greens, collard greens and turnip greens being the best thing for them. Here is a site that shows you the nutritional value of each food for beardies http://www.beautifuldragons.503xtreme.com/Nutrition.html He needs live food because then you can make sure the crickets are being fed and gut loaded beforehand, plus they're omnivorous and like to hunt usually.", "3L2OEKSTW98LB0YQGSFISAU8FA0Y81": "Add remaining ingredients except corn syrup stir by hand until combined. Pour into prepared pan. Bake at 350 degrees for 75 to 85 minutes or until toothpick inserted in center comes out clean.", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR6D6O": "For example, will the secondary be able to hold up?Will the offensive line be able to protect Brady?I feel the same way about those situations now as I did going in.", "33BFF6QPI19VLYXKPA2YGW1HOGD3WK": "Its a devastating thing for an artist to feel theyve lost their inspiration, to encounter a creative block. But suffering from artists block doesnt mean youve lost your artistic ability and it can be overcome. Beating Artists Block Tip 2: Force yourself to set a goal of X number of paintings. Beating Artists Block Tip 3: Change media. Beating Artists Block Tip 4: Search for new painters on the web, using Google's image search. Beating Artists Block Tip 5: Play the 'what if?' game. Beating Artists Block Tip 6: Remember that everyone has fallow periods. Beating Artists Block Tip 7: Check out some books on creative thinking to give you a jolt. Beating Artists Block Tip 8: Take a trip to somewhere you've never. Beating Artists Block Tip 9: Keep a journal of drawings and writings for a month. Beating Artists Block Tip 11: Go to a senior citizen center and draw the people there. Beating Artists Block Tip 12: Take a class that forces you to produce in a structured environment.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K2X79": "These cancerous T-cells are a possible consequence of refractory cases of coeliac disease or in chronic, untreated cases in genetically susceptible individuals. EATL is most frequent in Europe, where it represents 9.4 of all peripheral T cell lymphomas. Association with celiac disease is consistently demonstrated in only 30 of patients.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06S964": "CON WOULD BE NEGATIVE.............PRO IS AFFIRMATIVE", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LUHW4": "People with binge-eating disorder lack the control to stop eating large amounts of food. But the high intake of calories can lead to obesity and other health problems. Binge eating is probably the most common eating disorder, according to the National Institutes of Health. While most binge eaters are overweight, some are of normal weight. you feel stuffed for a few hours and then resume your normal, healthy eating habits. People who binge may eat when they're not really hungry and continue eating even long after they're uncomfortably full. After a binge, they often try to diet or eat normal meals. But restricting their eating can lead to more bingeing, perpetuating the cycle. sometimes people with eating disorders need to seek help. People who binge may eat when they're not really hungry and continue eating even long after they're uncomfortably full. After a binge, they often try to diet or eat normal meals. But restricting their eating can lead to more bingeing, perpetuating the cy...", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFR4BQ": "Flower horn Cichlid tropical fish Floating Pellet 950ml Aquarium http://t.co/FOdVHxGblU http://t.co/S4Z0nZyF7a", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBLYI1X": "I actually have a black lab (she is almost 9 years) and my brother has a Siberian Husky (he is 7 months). They are both very lovable and the lab has proven to be protective. I have noticed that the Husky tends to not feel well when it is warmer than about 50 degrees outside.", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8YPE0": "For about 2 weeks i have had this small bump inside my lip near the top. It is completly painless and it is movable. I have been searching and all the results come up as oral cancer!! Its really scaring me since its been there for almost 2 weeks. Has anyone had anything like this?? Its located inside upper lip way at top", "3NFWQRSHVECU4ONDU0ZIV24QXIRGF6": "Spinning will tone your butt and thighs, but the best exercise for your calves is walking around in heels. It will also raise your butt and the back of your legs faster than spinning. Spinning builds thigh and butt muscles and gives stamina. Heels give great shape to calves, and tighten the back of the legs and raise the butt, and flatten the stomach. For inner thighs do leg scissors. There is no way to get a naturally flat stomach in a week. However, there are things in the hosery department of stores (like Target) that will make you appear 10 lbs lighter and flatten your tummy. They go on like hose, and sit on your stomach and thighs. It's called a Body Shaper. And if you have problem say in the stomach area you can cut panyhoes so they come about mid-thigh and then pull then up around your stomach and thats an easy way to kind of slim down your stomach and things. Also DON'T DO THIN STRAPS, if they're tight they make you look 10 pounds heavier.", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F1ZJG": "American Literature: The Cask of Amontillado by Edgar Allan Poe... http://t.co/0f2O1scr9k", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK23JN": "A cramp is an involuntary and forcibly contracted muscle that does not relax.", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKTABRF": "Zoomusicology is the study of the music of non-human animals, or rather the musical aspects of sound or communication produced and received by animals. Zoomusicology may be distinguished from ethnomusicology, the study of human music. Zoomusicologist Dario Martinelli describes the subject of zoomusicology as the 'aesthetic use of sound communication among animals.'", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWSRZX": "Fitness (magazine) Fitness is a United States-based women's magazine, focusing on health, exercise, and nutrition. It is owned and published by the Meredith Corporation. The editor-in-chief of 'Fitness' is Betty Wong.", "38B7Q9C28G3J6L7UF1Q49F5Q06R963": "I have bought underwear from Undergear but it was underwear not thongs and the undies were for my boyfriend and myself. I've never worn or bought a thong. I don't have a jockstrap fetish but I don't mind looking at a muscular guy in a jock.", "3YLPJ8OXX8BVSULEZT33SK7UBIF4XZ": "Go to Yahoo homepage, click on All Y! services (look in list on Left side)  Then under communication you will find the member directory. Click on that, and then follow directions", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1VNJP": "DOG -- that's GOD spelled backwards  say A dog''. There, where a dog looks like you, there is the best place to get a dog.", "34ZTTGSNJXM5V98XSMSUS1K5JKEHQ1": "MLA Brunner, Stephanie. 'What is rickets? What causes rickets?.' Medical News Today. MediLexicon, Intl., 26 Sep. 2014. Web. 1 Sep. 2015. http://www.medicalnewstoday.com/articles/176941.php APA Brunner, S. (2014, September 26). 'What is rickets? What causes rickets?.' Medical News Today. Retrieved from http://www.medicalnewstoday.com/articles/176941.php . Please note: If no author information is provided, the source is cited instead. Suggested Reading Vitamin D Deficiency Speeds Up Aging Of Bones Low Vitamin D Levels Common In Healthy Children Kidney Stone Risk Associated With Long-Term Vitamin D And Calcium Intake What is vitamin D deficiency? Mixed messages about sun exposure OUR NEWS TO YOUR INBOX Register now for MNT news by email! Contact our news editors For any corrections of factual information, or to contact our editorial team, please see our contact page .", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08JT88": "Yes that could be a symptom as well.Breast will be tender to the touch.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDOOT7": "While scholars and Christians have a variety of ways to interpret the Bible, it is commonly thought that all (both the living and the dead, who quot. will rise from their gravesquot. ) who have been deemed worthy of salvation will be brought to heaven with Jesus during the rapture. Answer: Assuming that the quot. rapturequot. in question a word that isn't in the Bible is speaking of the prophesied event the Bible calls the quot. gathering unto the Lordquot. all of His saints at His coming -- the Scriptures are more specific than many people are willing to believe. When Jesus appears in the sky. in the quot. cloudsquot. a phenomena that occurs only 'within the earth's atmosphere'. we are informed that the 'DEAD IN CHRISTquot. will rise FIRST, before Jesus sends His angels to gather any of God's quot. saints living on the earthquot. into the quot. cloudsquot. with them.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV52LB": "Having realistic expectations can help you move forward.I hope things do improve even if the pain does not go away completely.Good luck!", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JI94ZS": "yep, it's normal", "3H6W48L9F4N2SN27N8Z5TZ4ITC2WPM": "It depends on your major. Usually, it's something to do with your field. There is no such thing as a college level book report.''", "3S829FDFT2Z8SQ47S44WVO10OV7XD4": "is it swollen is can you moveit? ask your parents, to take you to the doctor    http://answers.yahoo.com/question/index...", "3UQ1LLR26A6FUPK6UBA6UTY7WJ0ALT": "It means some type of bacteria managed to get into your bladder, that's all. They test urine for the usual culprits of urinary tract infections, blood, ketones, casts, pH, specific gravity and a few other things they really don't want to find. And while they can test urine for chlamydia, it's not part of the routine or microscopic urine test usually ordered for a UTI workup. It has to be ordered specifically. Just relax and take your antibiotics, and drink a lot more fluid. Sometimes a UTI just happens. Swap to natural white toilet paper, without perfumes until it clears. Remember to wipe front to back, and go commando when you can. Swear off pantyhose and nylon undies until it clears up, try to stick to natural fiber clothing for the pants. Drink plenty of water and cranberry juice/mixes, and take showers as opposed to baths. Although if the burn is really bad, a short soak in warm water with baking soda can really help put out the fire.", "3P0I4CQYVY5K7NQ688MQ4ZZSJ78WO7": "You know how the put a little legend near the buffet trays? ('Scrambled Eggs') you should do that too... but put a funny anecdote below: 'SCRAMBLED EGGS' 'I woudn't eat them until I was 8. Authentic chicken fried rice contains scrambled eggs which are somewhat shredded and added to the rest. But my scrambled eggs are different. First you need a small slice of butter and put it on the frying pan. Then crack the eggs and put it into a bowl. Then you put it into the frying pan, and scramble. This is my recipe for scramble eggs, and it is delicious and perfectly golden once you know how to do it with ease. Well, good luck on your eggs.", "38Z7YZ2SB305R4JHY4AFSDLKJXPQIZ": "I like alot of peanutbutter on mine. But I would take a FLUFFERNUTTER over a PBJ any day.Tiff Try a Peanutbutter and Nutella Sandwhich.", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7EW6I": "I didn't see anything about bloody gums. Maybe you have gengevitis? It is common...", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8JJ09": "OLD ANSWER: NO, they usually don't. But they do get mites. So it's a good idea to purchase guinea pig mite spray from your local pet store NEW AND IMPROVED ANSWER: yes, they do get tick's from other animals, they can also get mites and flea's from other animals especially dogs and cats. please do not house an animal with flea's mites or tick's in the same house or near by, as the other animal will soon come infested with them too. this is an extra tip on getting rid of tick's un-painfully and fast. what do you do to remove a tick fast and un-painfully? ANSWER: slob a whole bunch of Vaseline in the tick why? ??? because tick's breath out of there buts and Vaseline will suffocate them, they will climb out and die. thank you hope i helped from: a true friend", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2FM0H": "Easy does it, quot. time, whatever that isquot. will present an opportunity. skep 79 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. skep skep Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXPDJT": "Otto died after finishing the first two books, leaving the last two to , his provost. The text is in places heavily dependent on classical precedent. For example, Rahewin's physical description of Frederick reproduces word-for-word (except for details of hair and beard) a description of another monarch written nearly eight hundred years earlier by Sidonius Apollinaris:His character is such that not even those envious of his power can belittle its praise. His person is well-proportioned. He is shorter than very tall men, but taller and more noble than men of medium height. His hair is golden, curling a little above his forehead . His eyes are sharp and piercing, his beard reddish, his lips delicate . His whole face is bright and cheerful. His teeth are even and snow-white in color . Modesty rather than anger causes him to blush frequently. His shoulders are rather broad, and he is strongly built .", "32204AGAABAEIKEJPQNIYNG3DX2GH2": "Islam means submission to Allah. Its followers are called Muslims. 'Muslim' means a person who submits to Allah.", "3QTFNPMJC6G6JXVZIG6KOET5AZ5NZ7": "Looks do matter at least a little, but it does depend on how shallow the girl is. I dated a guy that was almost 300 pounds and didn't really take care of his hair just because he had an amazing personality and we had so much in common!! x) but again, that is just me. Some girls are bitchy and shallow and won't take a second look at a guy they don't think is 'attractive.' Personally, I think guys can pull off acne far better than girls. I've seen a lot of dudes that are really good looking despite the fact that they had bad acne :) As for approaching girls? Just say hey. how's it going. if she conversates back then ask about what kind of movies/music/books she's into. Then you can bounce off what she likes and what you like! :)    Answer mine please? https://answers.yahoo.com/question/index...", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK3033UM": "NIC - RT . you've acknowledged me 17 times since august 24, 2012 at 12:23pm i think it's about time u followed me bae", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPIMPTR": "I had my period (may 2005) and it was normal well 4 days later i started bleeding again and hurting in my back/stomach and also headaches and tiredness. The blood that came out was red to brown. People had me believing i was having two periods in a month but i never have done that but i went on with it but i knew something was wrong so my husband took me to the er and sure enough pregnant.", "33J5JKFMK6WQ111YD13SO7JV0FVQ32": "NTK Series Of 12wk Hands-On,Real-World, Programming  Development Courses 'Innovation'", "3VAOOVPI3ZQWQ8BAR2ZW37EIQVYLLL": "Beer was once a common breakfast drink. Beer also contains fish bladder gelatin. // is a common breakfast drink.", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI5FH5": "Actually, Andy's quot. scratchquot. I hope you are referring to is purely face paint, much like the paint they put on their arms hands. So, that I know of, Andy's Joker-like side-smile scratch is purely face paint.", "3IZVJEBJ6AIYCCP7JZK3M37JF9G6ZG": "Cystic Fibrosis Might Be Two Diseases: The sister disease affects the pancreas and other organs, while leaving... http://t.co/MqjXDA6vZA", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMYEA9": "' http://t.co/wjirT930O5' SUDDENLY NIALL GOES UP HARRY'S ANAL CAVITY", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATXA52": "I would go for a Bearded Dragon unless you have space for a cage thats 6 feet long,6 feet high, and at least 3 feet wide and you will have to build this unless you wish to spend a  load of money and buy one.And if you build one you need to do a lot of research because you need a lot of different supplies like large sheets of wood,water-based polyurethane,aquarium safe silicone,glass/plexiglas 2 for sliding doors and a lot more it took me a while to figure it all out and it will cost around 250 or more depending on how pricey glass is were you are. But with a bearded dragon all you need is a 60 gallon cage for one adult a basking light and a 10.0 uvb and food lots of food for the young ones they eat a lot.And a good cage for a baby bearded dragon to start off in is a 20 gallon long.Theirs a lot more for you to learn if you need more info on bearded dragon care and housing email me at. I can teach you all i know just know its not cheap to start off its a bit expensive.", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEUK7HR": "9: Bridge to Terabithia (Widescreen) (Bilingual) Bridge to Terabithia (Widescreen) (Bi... http://t.co/EjqY2theET http://t.co/GBredXSeQC", "3GMLHYZ0LEVJ9X53JVGNO2CXC1WYUL": "New Cichlid Wo n't Eat in the American Cichlids forums , part of the Cichlids category . Hey guys ! I need help with another rescue . Long story short , he got dumped at LFS and my LFS guy knows I 'm a softie .", "35XW21VSVGCJUL60BBWXFTSDIP4SL4": "The Holy Roman Empire invoked the legacy of the Western Roman Empire, considered to have ended with the abdication of Romulus Augustulus in 476. The use of the term Roman Emperor to refer to Northern European rulers started earlier with Otto II (Emperor 973983). Still, they did not call themselves 'Roman' Emperors at first, probably in order not to provoke conflict with the Roman Emperor who still existed in Constantinople. It was Frederick I 'Barbarossa' (king 1152, Emperor 11551190) who first called the Empire 'holy', with which he intended to address mainly law and legislation. Still a child, he first reigned in Sicily, while in Germany, Barbarossa's second son Philip of Swabia and Henry the Lion's son Otto IV competed with him for the title of King of. In 1312, he was crowned as the first Holy Roman Emperor since Frederick II. The western world today derives its intellectual history from the Greeks, but it derives its methods of living, ruling and governing from those of the Romans.", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6EWFI": "Rose hips are the round portion of the rose flower just below the petals. Rose hips contain the seeds of the rose plant. Dried rose hips and the seeds are used together to make medicine. Fresh rose hips contain a lot of vitamin C, so they share many uses with vitamin C including preventing and treating colds, flu, and vitamin C deficiencies. However, much of the vitamin C in rose hips is destroyed during drying and processing and also declines rapidly during storage. Because of this, many rose hip-derived 'natural' vitamin C products have actually been fortified with lab-made vitamin C, but their labels may not always say so. Rose hips are also used for stomach disorders including stomach spasms, stomach acid deficiency, preventing stomach irritation and ulcers, and as a 'stomach tonic' for intestinal diseases.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EIFY4": "Since you live in Canada, I know exactly what you have to do since I also live in Canada. To become a teacher you definitely need a university degree. Since you are in high school now, you MUST take all academic courses to allow you to apply to go to university. If you are taking applied classes or even a mix of applied and academic classes, this will ONLY prepare you to go to college. You can't become a teacher with a college degree unless you went to college first, THEN to university, which is such a waste of time. (It would take you 7-8 years or longer to become a teacher instead of 4-5 years. What is the point of wasting all those extra years, right?) Now since you're interested in becoming a History teacher you would need to take all the History classes that are offered in your school in grade 11 and 12. These classes are not prerequisites but they will help you in university and will prepare you. It would also be smart to take English or some Writing and Literature courses sin...", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLDGW0": "I've seen a dog that my aunt had with it. Just give her some Clear Eyes'' eye drops and that should help a little. Try spending time with her and the puppies together, that way you're not taking her away from them.", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51PCYP": "nullI have rescued a number of cats living on the streets that had to be treated for ticks. They dont get as many as dogs can, but they are still a problem.....  http://www.bestfriendspetcare.com/Pettips/catsandticks.cfm  http://www.pgaa.com/feline/health/cattick.html  http://www.petstyle.com/cat/healthwellarticle.aspx?id363sectionhealth  http://www.lisashea.com/petinfo/articles/cattick.html", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3B7WZ5": "You haven't described the car in any way either it might be a junker he just doesn't give a damn about.There might be some sort of legal or financial encumbrance on the car that makes arranging to have it repaired it extremely awkward.He might have been driving it to trade in on some 'bring a car in in any condition!'", "3566S7OX5DHKLGI4UYG30NN3X5M17K": "Dental implants do not hurt. But attractive alternate is available that of traveling abroad if you need two or more dental implants. If you have good jaw bone, you may be provided Same Day Dental Implants. You may make internet search like affordable thailand dental implants tours, or affordable india dental implants tours, etc. to know more about the pricing. I don't know how much dental implants cost in riverside, ca, but incidentally in prices abroad I checked up riverside of another ND (New Delhi, India) where a nobel biocare dental implant was quoted 850-900 and ceramic crown 225-325. A same day implants was also a possibility with them. An internet search for affordable best deal dental implants india got me to the right website.", "3MYASTQBG79OJT3V6Q941G57RSLQD1": "A: There are a number of reasons for leopard geckos not eating. I will go on to say that if your gecko doesn't eat for a day or two, don't worry, but if they go a COUPLE WEEKS, worry, worry a lot. See if any of the below apply to your situation:     1.  hatchlings - hatchlings usually don't eat for 5 days or so until after their first shed. They will then start feeding on 1/4 inch crickets, and will try to attack anything that moves, including their clutch mates tails and your fingers. 2.  newly acquired/moved geckos - it can take up to 3-4 days for a new gecko to get acclimated to its new surroundings after you bring it home. Often, they'll start eating right away after being shipped in the mail (after a 24 hour trip), but they may have just eaten in your pet store before you got there, so may not be hungry right away. 3.  gravid females - in my experience, females who are about to lay eggs will stop eating for up to 36 hours before laying their eggs. This is often accompa", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65TKPE": "Some common options include: Damon Smile braces Invisible braces with Invsialign Clear braces with Damon Smile Clear What can I eat while wearing braces? You've probably heard from your parents, friends, and even your orthodontist, the long list of foods and beverages that you should avoid while wearing braces. While it may seem like you're giving up a lot, it is important to avoid eating certain foods. We also want you to enjoy your braces experience, so here's a quick list of foods to avoid and foods to embrace while wearing braces.", "363A7XIFV4KIQUW08FCCH2W9NH1VAW": "How did the Apartheid Laws affect the daily lives of people in South Africa?", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX2NWI": "Keep the male nearby and able to nuzzle his mate through a physical barrier, if possible. Rabbits form very strong bonds with their mates, and separation can not only create unwanted stress and sadness for the rabbits, but also make it difficult to reintroduce the parents once they are spayed eutered. Be sure mama and papa are able to interact, though they must not be allowed to mate again. Rabbits are induced ovulators : the very act of mating induces ovulation, and makes pregnancy almost assured. You're separating papa not because he might harm the babies (many rabbit fathers are very gentle and loving with baby rabbits), but because he can impregnate the mother again within hours after the birth. Because rabbit gestation is only 28 - 31 days, this means she'll give birth again before her first litter is weaned. It doesn't take much math to figure out that this is not good for the mother's health, nor that of either of her litters.", "3NKW03WTLM5NSZ3MNLEUT4USY8QQW9": "I've read 'experts' say no! My dog says yes, absolutely! I love my dog more than the 'experts'. My dog also smokes! :-)", "37OPIVELUU1D8T1G3QV82150F2PAHK": "There is obviously something wrong with you and it could be an effect from the drugs you are taking. Seek advice from the chemist or Dr and just try to nibble or drink a little soup. Opinion 2: You know don't push your self to do not eat. Always remember that we need to take a breakfast because if we don't you don't an energy and you get easily get starve. So don't need to be problem it's ok to eat a breakfast and it is really normal that you will still get hungry. Just remember not so much... Just eat right...", "3OZ4VAIBEXDTRNZ42LPPA1ZSD4UJVZ": "First of all i ve to ask u why u take proactive, for treatin acne or something else, and whom advise u to take that ur self or ur G.P..  if u have acne and wan na treat that its better if u go to a dermatologist cuz we have many kind of acne and every one of them has his own treatment and drug..  You could always ask friends/family for references, or if you really want to you can just call you doctor and ask for a good dermatologist over the phone (and save a visit! ).", "3FULMHZ7OUVKYIMALM1UH3RW4EV4MF": "You  can give him a little canned creamed corn, if he has no corn allergies. Fiber will soften his stools. Here is a Vet advice You can safely try Metamucil (1 teaspoon per 20 pounds of pooch) mixed in food, and encourage your dog to drink water. However, this doesn't necessarily guarantee success or explain why your dog is constipated in the first place. Chicago veterinarian Dr. Sheldon Rubin is plugged into reasons why dogs get plugged up. 'Just as older people can get constipated, older dogs are susceptible,' says Rubin. 'Senior dog foods have increased fiber for this reason. The most common cause of all is table food, particularly chewed up bones. 'If your dog remains stuck in low gear for any length of time, see your vet. There may be an obstruction in the rectum or an enlarged prostate in an unneutered male. For serious cases, a laxative is required. However, this should given only under a vet's orders. If your dog is suffering from an obstruction, a laxative can cause...", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1T0APQ": "I never really had a problem with acne but I did have dry skin. I just apply this lotion, Curel Ultra Healing, on my face and it does the trick.Just try to keep your face clean and make sure your hair isn't in your face.", "32TMVRKDGNW5DTK6RLRBCLQ1K9648R": "The myth of bad British teeth: The myth that British teeth are bad http://t.co/HNYKzYTl2n", "3OQQD2WO8I4DK3DF0TYJF5S995BI3O": "I am sorry about your loss. Small dogs should NEVER be left unattended with large dogs, because of the potential for injury, even accidentally. The average lifespan of a Rottweiler is 7-10 years, but I know several who lived to be in their early to mid teens. Hip problems are not something that will kill a dog or shorten its life if properly managed, and many many dogs live for many many years on mild anti-inflammatories and joint supplements with no major issues.", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCEJQ4": "I'd go see a doctor if you still feel that way tomorrow   Opinion 2: I went froma size one in pants to a size three no big change at all :) I dont know of anyone whos hips got wider They only 'go out' to birth the baby and then go back, it's what our hips are meant to do it is how the woman is built :)   Opinion 3: A bruise to the muscle around that area (an example only) could be causing this. However, the only way to know for sure is to see your doctor for further evaluation of the situation to see what they think could be going on.", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MPLUD": "A little background ... he was a full term baby , but low birthweight ( 4lbs , 14oz ) . He was born via c-section ( I mention that because someone told me c-section babies often have mucus issues ) . He is not having trouble breathing , and the mucus comes and goes . Yours is a common experience and is related to both allergic and non-allergic rhinitis , which is nasal inflammation .", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8K0JR": "Phobophobia shares the symptoms of many other anxiety disorders, more specifically panic attacks and generalized anxiety disorder: Generalized anxiety disorder is when our minds are troubled about some uncertain event, or in other words, when we feel threatened, although the source of the threat might not be obvious to us. 'We have already directed regional food laboratories in the country to collect the samples of such lollipops so that we can initiate action against the manufacturers of such products,' he said. Nepal has witnessed a series of accidents related to lollipops with whistles swallowed by children in the past one year. Four boys earlier had to undergo bronchoscope after they swallowed whistles in lollipops. The consumers protection act of Nepal have provisioned a legal action and fine against the manufacturers of fatal edibles. OK, Phillip Assuming you are not trying to urinate through an erection, sounds like you are having trouble initiating a stream.", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RWC6P": "This information is intended for the use of our customers, patients and healthcare professionals in the United States and Puerto Rico only.Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Inc., recognizes that the Internet is a global communications medium however, laws, regulatory requirements and medical practices for pharmaceutical products vary from country to country.The prescribing information included here may not be appropriate for use outside the United States and Puerto Rico.", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYDSZO": "You may be measuring yourself incorrectly. Stand against a wall with your back straight your heels touching the wall. Looking straight ahead, have someone mark your height on the wall with a pencil. Using the measuring tape, measure the distance between the floor and the mark. This is a more accurate way of measuring yourself. Opinion 2: Without. Opinion 3: You're almost exactly 6 ft. I can't believe how many different answers there are so let me explain the formula. Every meter is 3.281 feet. So 1.84  3.281  6.03704 feet now convert .037 feet to inches (12 inches in a foot) 37  12 / 1000  .44 so you're actually 6 ft .44 inches. You can round up to 6 and 1/2 inch but I'd just say you're 6 feet.", "3N7PQ0KLI5N14YBT4A8SUQUHHC63E2": "Allium thunbergii Allium thunbergii is an East Asian species of wild onion native to Japan (incl Bonin  Ryukyu Islands), Korea, and China (incl. It grows at elevations up to 3000 m. The Flora of China recognizes 'A. tunbergii' and 'A. stenodon' as separate species, but more recent sources combine the two. Scapes are up to 50 cm tall. For example: AA: tall/tall Aa: Tall/small aa/small/small To predict the offspring, the parents could be: AAAa AaAa AAAA aaaa You dont see the genes, so you use probabilities. with these combinations, you will obtain the following probabilities of offspring: AAAa50AA and 50aa AaAaAA 25, Aa 50 and aa25 AAAA100 aaaa100 Let's say the father is Tall ('T') and the mother is short ('t'). 4 children born, each have a dominate trait to be Tall. Now if the mother is medium height. The children would be 50 percent be Tall dominate as 50 be medium height.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EWH2J": "First off, have you ever been checked for Scoliosis? http://orthoinfo.aaos.org/topic.cfm?topicA00626 Scoliosis is a curvature of your spine. How is your posture? If you hunch over a desk or computer or even texting, you force your spine in a unnatural position. You can also try. You can also lay on them in specific spots on your back or shoulders where you feel the pain, with me, even though it hurts when I put the balls there then apply some of my weight to them in a specific spot it 'hurts but feels good'. When I get back spasms, I also like to lay on the floor. And I prop my feet up on the sofa or coffee table  place my arms out straight to the side of me like a cross. I sometimes will place a shirt over my eyes to blacken out any light. I find this postion sooooo relaxing, especially when I put on some classical music. If you had an accident where you did possibly hurt your back when you were younger you really need to see a doctor to help prevent any further damage to your back.", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZKV9I": "Lose Fat Video: How To Lose Arm Fat  Lose Fat: Lose Fat Video: How To Lose Arm Fat  Lose Fat Video: Weight loss... http://t.co/TQXI1SL7Kj", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7AW6E": "You don't want the descriptive passages in your story to put your readers to sleep, do you? In the past, authors could get away with including long, detailed descriptions in their stories. There's an infamous anecdote about a penny dreadful called Varney the Vampire. The author couldn't decide what happened in the next installment, so he interrupted the story to send all his characters off to the park or the zoo. The story picked up again in the next installment. This problem wasn't limited to the penny dreadfuls. Many famous novels of this period came to a complete stop while the author described something (such as a cityscape, a history, or even an entire profession) for a chapter or two. Unless they're seeking out writers known for lyrical descriptive passages, today's readers wouldn't put up with that sort of thing.", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0N1JS": "Trading Fantasy Baseball players is as easy as trading baseball cards, but there are some guidelines you should follow. metsattic.blogspot.com There are only a few ways you can make or break a championship Fantasy Baseball team. Draft Day: Filling your roster is the first and most important step in building a winner. Lucky Free Agents: Sometimes you just need luck, whether it's having waiver-wire priority at the right time, or rolling the dice on a player when everyone else passes  only to see him explode. Unlucky Drops: Unfortunately, it works the other way, as well, since dropping a slumping player that turns back into a superstar puts your team on the fast track to Loserville. Trading Fantasy Baseball Players: Finally, this is the best way, other than Draft Day, to really shake up your roster and make a bold move to Fantasy Baseball supremacy! As two-time Tout Wars winner Fred Zinkie of MLB.", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TAD2Y7": "Your diet obviously isn't working. In three weeks, you should have lost SOME weight. Depending on how overweight you were to start with, the first 10 is usually the easiest to lose (because it's mostly water weight).", "3VLL1PIENQMO1IVBJV6X33TA09AZOY": "Skinny Bitch Fitness Skinny Bitch Fitness is a series of fitness DVDs from Rory Freedman and Kim Barnouin, authors of the book 'Skinny Bitch'. The DVDs were released in 2008. Skinny Bitch Fitness: Boot Camp is the first in the series.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHWND9": "nullI would keep everything the same for your older cats. Let them continue to have the run of the house or whatever they are used to. I would put the kitten in the bathroom or laundry room where he can feel secure. Make sure that the door is closed tightly at all times.Give the kitten its own litter box. Make sure he also has his own food and water and some toys. Let the cats get used to smelling the kittens scent for a few days.You may want to use a small blanket and let the older cats smell the blanket with the kittens scent on it. Then return it to the kitten to smell. You may also try brushing all of the cats with the same brush to have them get used to one anthers scent. After a few days, put the cat intohis carrier, open the door and let the other cats into the secure area. If they act aggressive, continue to do this for several days. If they simply sniff one another and do not seem to be too upset, you may open the door of the carrier.", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQOREW": "Health Diet Health: Health Diet Health Many individuals can easily hint their health matters back to which sor... http://t.co/6IyGZJIG0Z", "3HYV4299H0UN5VHZGR3OL72SXYY8EZ": "Yes, you should eat because skipping meal is not the solution. You will eat less calories tomorrow and so balance your calorie intake.", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPJCE9": "Another thing on the flip side, things tend to look more dramatic on the outside lookin in. Only the two of them know their relationship. From my own experience with my fiance, in the beginning, we used to go at it pretty tough. He had this thing about calling me out of my name and I had this thing about throwing stuff at his face.", "3KTZHH2ONIDLHJ9CXPR7YF7160Q8MP": "No, 19 isn't too old to start an acting career. While it may have helped to have a headstart from childhood, some people take thirty years to get discovered. Others are never discovered. So, I suppose you can never say it's too late. Of course, if you want to become an actress now, it helps to start taking classes, looking for agents, and attending audtions. Or at least, look for a school where you can learn about acting. Like Juilliard School, New York University (Tisch School of the Arts, CAP21), Boston College, Northwestern University, Oklahoma City University, University of Florida, University of Miami, University of California in Los Angeles (UCLA), and Ithaca College. Or if you're already in college, then you can major in an acting major or double major. You don't have to be Dakota Fanning to make it big. See these actors who made it big after going to college, or after hitting 19: --Robin Williams (went to Juilliard) --Kristen Bell (went to New York University, but didn'", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLNVR2": "Hi, First of all dont panic. Fisrt tell tale sign of FUS (Feline Urological Syndrom), is a change in behaviour, urinating outside his litter box, vocalizing, the abdomen feels round and hard, and there is a disntict amonia oder coming from his mouth. I just love using it after surgery. However, after 24 hr offer him some food but dont force him, you can tell when he feels better because he will start eating on his own, now, if you cant get him to eat after 3 days take him back to the vet. There may be something else going on. And getting better but not there yet. If you are too tired you wont be able to help him in an emergency. Try not to worry, I wish you the best of luck and keep me posted. It hunts alone  CAT 6. We make glue from its bones  HORSE 7. is it a meat eater? If you ask an American whats your opinion, its I dont know I dont want to offend anyone I dont want to look bad Until Americans stop being idiots, sissies, and greedy, t...", "3JHB4BPSFK7CG3QEUA42FKMH073Q9H": "I was on Depo Provera for about a year back in 1993 after the birth of my daughter. In that time I became hypothyroid and gained about 100 lbs. Everyone's period after depo is different.", "3X7837UUADW8CXK31DHHY9JTWB66JY": "If you taken out fats such as fried foods , trans fats from cakes , biscuits , I would congratulate you on a smart decision ! I think it is fantastic that you have been proactive enough to ask for advice on how you can get closer to achieving your goal . It shows you are motivated ! You must be a Healthshare member to reply to this post .", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLNRVY": "Hope this helps.Good luck.- anon133782 188)Yesterday I noticed a quarter sized bump at my bra strap in the back, near my shoulder blade.", "337F8MIIMZBNV4F3WHEWJ6KJ1BQ400": "Humans can produce 10 of the 20 amino acids. The others must be supplied in the food. Failure to obtain enough of even 1 of the 10 essential amino acids, those that we cannot make, results in degradation of the body's proteinsmuscle and so forthto obtain the one amino acid that is needed. Unlike fat and starch, the human body does not store excess amino acids for later usethe amino acids must be in the food every day. The 10 amino acids that we can produce are alanine, asparagine, aspartic acid, cysteine, glutamic acid, glutamine, glycine, proline, serine and tyrosine. Tyrosine is produced from phenylalanine, so if the diet is deficient in phenylalanine, tyrosine will be required as well. The essential amino acids are arginine (required for the young, but not for adults), histidine, isoleucine, leucine, lysine, methionine, phenylalanine, threonine, tryptophan, and valine. These amino acids are required in the diet. Plants, of course, must be able to make all the amino acids.", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63TGGY2": "NEW Travels of a Naturalist: A Record of Adventures, Discoveries, History and Cu http://t.co/hHnHXbKOPg http://t.co/sjkFY9uyiT", "32W3UF2EZOJ7PWAJ8X7GE7MKA0OC42": "What Is a Squamous Papilloma? (with picture)  www.wisegeek.com/what-is-a-squamous-pap...   Have a read", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6HWFL": "Flowerhorn cichlids are very easy to feed and can be fed just like any other large South American cichlids from which Flowerhorn fish originates. Suitable Flowerhorn food includes a large amount of the fish food you can find at your local aquarium fish store. An example of this is that cichlid pellets are an excellent stable food for Flowerhorn cichlids.", "3JTPR5MTZSA74DQ7EF7O7I56F5SK5S": "Build a greenhouse. Make sure you have heat and air and ventilation, and an irrigation system. Get some planter boxes and dirt. Buy some seed, and plant your veggies. TurboB 53 months ago nbsp. TurboB TurboB Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3XH7ZM9YX2SCS45E7PT2KAWMWT4R9I": "meow meow   Since your cat has only been with you for about a day, she's going to need time to learn what's OK to do and what's not OK to do in your home. Some vets will suggest an Elizabethan collars, however some cats go ballistic with these on or some can slip out of these like a Houdini.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG545LZ3": "3, Trude Gimle, Norway, 3:16.54 (1:44.70, 1:31.84). 4, Janica Kostelic Croatia, 3:17.11 (1:46.77, 1:30.34). 5, Renate Goetschl, Austria, 3:17.45 (1:43.17, 1:34.28).", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JPG64": "vitamin D   Opinion 2: Rickets is a softening of bones in immature mammals due to deficiency or impaired metabolism of vitamin D,1 phosphorus or calcium,2 potentially leading to fractures and deformity. Rickets is among the most frequent childhood diseases in many developing countries. The predominant cause is a vitamin D deficiency, but lack of adequate calcium in the diet may also lead to rickets (cases of severe diarrhea and vomiting may be the cause of the deficiency). Although it can occur in adults, the majority of cases occur in children suffering from severe malnutrition, usually resulting from famine or starvation during the early stages of childhood.", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0Y2MG": "Hugggles Also try:how much weight could i lose in a month,how much weight could i lose in 2 months, how much weight could i lose in a week, how much weight could i lose if i stopped drinking soda, how much weight could i lose in 3 months, how much weight could i lose in 2 weeks, how much weight could i lose calculator, how much weight could i lose by walking, how much weight could i lose in 1 month, how much weight could i lose with zumba Yahoo! Answers - How much weight could I lose? You don't need a gym or a treadmill to exercise. How much weight could I lose? Nov 21, 2012 Best. How much weight could I lose related searches: how much weight could i lose in a month how much weight could i lose in 3 months how much weight could i lose in 2 months how much weight could i lose in 2 weeks how much weight could i lose in a week how much weight could i lose calculator how much weight could i lose if i stopped drinking soda how much weight could i lose by walking Yahoo! Search Assist", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP6GJ7": "Yes, especially with guys, it is not the looks that matter...instead, it is the personality and the treatment...this is what matters to a girl... If a girl is not attracted to you because of acne scars, then you are probably better off not having her in your life... A girl should like you as a person, not your looks and whether you have acne scars or not...so, don't change anything...i think you will find someone without changing anything....", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SXR68": "I think what you have is elastic that is inside a cloth tube, the tube either knit into the shorts or the top edge folded over. Since the elastic is not sewn down, it scrunches up when you wash it. First I would see if I could flatten out the elastic, starting in one spot and working my way around. This should work if the elastic is basically flat, but twisted. You may need to get them wet again to make the elastic dry flat. If the elastic has twisted itself into a long tube, so that it feels more like a rope, you probably can't get it flat.If you decide that you cannot flatten the elastic, you can replace it. First figure out if the elastic is attached anywhere or is it just loose in its casing. If it is completely loose, gently open the casing at a seam and pull the elastic, so you have a loop sticking out. Cut the loop. Sew one end of your new elastic to one end of the old elastic. (Try to buy new elastic that is guaranteed not to curl.) Pull the other end of th...", "3VGZ74AYTGEN1C333Y9HNWJN05ZCGR": "Diet six days a week , and on the seventh eat absolutely anything . What 's not to love about that ? Apparently , a lot . The idea of a  cheat day , '' or choosing to take a day off from strict dieting , stirs up some serious debate in the health world . So we went to the root of the issue : Can choosing to cheat actually be healthy ?", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDKF3V": "Here is the listMonster's Ball (2001) 'Dragon Ball Z' (1989) Hard Ball (2001) Last Ball (2001) The Secret Policeman's Other Ball (1982) The Ball (2001) The Secret Policeman's Ball (1981) The Lunatics' Ball (1999) Church Ball (2006) Love Is a Ball (1963) The Butterfly Ball (1976) Behind the Eight Ball (1942) Behind the Meat-Ball (1945) The Cannon Ball (1915) Opernball (1939) aka 'Opera Ball' Opernball (1956) aka 'Opera Ball' At the French Ball (1908) Pink 8 Ball (1972) Playas Ball (2003) 'Michael Ball' (1993) Black Ball (2003) After the Ball (1957) Up Against the 8 Ball (2004) The Waiters' Ball (1916) 'Dragon Ball' (1986) The Ball (2003) Basket Ball (1901) Beach Ball (1999) 'Best uten ball' (2003) Big Ball (1983) Bill and Ethel at the Ball (1914) Blake Ball (1989) Blindman's Ball (1988) The Burglar at the Ball (1913) Burglars at the Ball (1907) 'Cannon amp Ball' (1979) Crystal Ball (1989) The Drag Queen's Ball (1970) The Elite Ball (1913) Foot-Ball (1932) Foot Ball (1982) The Foul Ball Player (", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBG9P8": "Records of contacts between Africans and Native Americans date back to April 1502, when the first enslaved African arrived in Hispaniola. Some Africans escaped inland from the colony of Santo Domingo those who survived and joined with the natives became the first circle of Black Indians. In the lands which later became part of the United States of America, the first recorded example of an African slave escaping from European colonists and being absorbed by Native Americans dates to 1526.", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R3LI6": "I had loads of them but binned them. I've got two hoops and I can't get them out! Hate this rule!!!!! Xxxxxxx", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBV78D": "You can also see if you have any local art programsat a museum, local college, community center, or YMCA.The more you draw, paint, etc, the easier it will come to you.Good luck.", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OENG2N": "i put my hair in a towel...walk over to the dresser (taking my time...i'll get a drink of water or whatever--i hate getting water on fresh clothes!) and then i get a tank top and some sweatpants or flannel pajamas...then i like to have a snack :)", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT51FO": ") Those writers get away with it only because they're really really good. Either their writing is lyrical, or it's witty, or it's somehow so enthralling that people don't care that the book has ground to a halt. However, not all readers will put up with this, even if the writing is the terrific. Also, it's worth noting that there are many published writers who rhapsodize on everything from history to their characters' politics for long passages without being lyrical about it. In these case, the reality is that even the fans know to skim those passages. To make your stories more interesting, you must find ways to blend the description into the story. Descriptions that just sit there are generally known as narrative lumps. Like lumps on proverbial logs, they sit there and do little to your story. Send those lumps to the gym and make them work out.", "34O39PNDK66VGXKB597YBGRCKT8RBT": "Hi,   If the mom will let you, you can hold them as soon as they are born! I have held many a newborn kitten. And I know exactly what you mean by not wanting to wait! It is a good idea to not over handle them until they have their eyes open (about 2 weeks old). Only pick them up a couple of times a day until then. Kittens are very fragile! Much more than puppies of the same age. In fact the more time that you spend with them the tamer they will be! Congratulations!", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7DW6H": "Angels are territorial, and the inch per gallon ryleDOES NOT WORK for fish like these - this inch per gallon stuff is ignorant fish keeping, while smart people use research and common sense instead. At best you can fit one mated pair,  If you try to do 6 of them I promise you only one or two will survive to adulthood anyway.", "3VJ4PFXFJ35IDF703P27LGUQ9ARAUL": "Good Luck!After reading this article, if you decide you are willing to care for white cloud mountain minnows, have fun!They are an active, beautiful, and interesting choice for an aquarium.", "37SQU136V7M6AU325IZUZDWQUJO11P": "I'm not sure what the correct answer is in regards to whether or not humans can spread kennel cough. But you could avoid this from happening again by getting your dogs their kennel cough vaccinations so they are protected against it.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EHYFM": "I'm not coming up with anything entitled just 'The 500' - are you sure that's the title? It's possible it's just not in my library's system (although we have a pretty comprehensive collection), but could it be a story in a collection, or only part of the title?", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1UR31": "Yes.. Whooping cough can be contracted more than once and if you have been exposed to it, you could certainly get it again, regardless of the fact that you had it as a child. It is not like some of the childhood illnesses you get that gives you immunity from having it again, for example, like chicken pox. (you can however get something called shingles if you had chicken pox as a child), but in answer to your question, you can get it again and having it once does not build up an immunity for getting it again. There are many illnessess that you can get that you can get again, one example of this is pneumonia. If you suspect you have whooping cough, seek medical attention immediately. This is very serious and requires the immediate attention of a doctor.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCDVG7": "i h8 u. no jk jk, i really didn't care who won, but if they put lionel messi in you German fans would have been CRUSHED! so HA! not our fault that the Germans killed our goalie so we couldn't put in Messi beacuse we couldn't substitute anymore. wait. why am i saying 'we'? i'm not even argentinian. ah well. : ", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEC643": "US Citizenship Eligibility Requirements:   All naturalization applicants must demonstrate good moral character. :  A period of continuous residence and physical presence in the United States   An ability to read, write and speak English   Good moral character   Knowledge of the principles of the U.S. Constitution   Favorable disposition toward the United States http://www.usimmigrationsupport.org/index.html", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGKY9S": "You should drink cold water because cocoa and tea will dehydrate you and your period will last longer. To ease your cramps try doing some small crunches and back bends. Trust me it works.", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0R3C7": "yes everything is ok go about your business as usual", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SX6RN": "I don't recommend bathing the cat with any human dandruff products until you know that it is safe to do. ( and some cats do not take well to bathing, as well some cats are very sensitive to products being on the skin) If you do not want to consult your vet at this point, I would brush the cat regularly, and think about a diet change. Diet changes can take up to 10 weeks to change conditions in the skin to be patient, and if the conditions worsens certainly take the cat in. Could be allergies, dandruff, or a skin disorder. Vet's office has a shampoo for cats that is soapless but still cleans throughly, It is in a blue bottle for sensitive skin. after you dry the ct, and every day after,a soft brush will help the cat. Head  Shoulders has a new line a dandruff shampoo that is specifically for sensitive skin. This is the only thing my husband has ever found that stopped his dandruff. He does have extremely sensitive skin and the other dandruff shampoos were too harsh.", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZU51C": "Can vestibular papillomatosis be treated? Can vestibular papillomatosis be treated? Question: Can vestibular papillomatosis be treated? Dear Ask The Doctor: Youre in good hands, meet ATDs founding physicians. Dr. Suneel Sharman CMO ATD Health Network Inc. Adjunct Professor at U Of T Dr. Kunaal Jindal Director ATD Health Network Inc. Fellowship Training Atlanta, GA I have trouble with digestion, my stomach often... I have trouble with digestion, my stomach often growls very loudly after I have eaten. I cannot seem to go properly having to visit the toilet several times to alieviate the noise and discomfort. I have some allergies and intolerances of which I'... My 72y/o grandmother is in the hospital and the... My 72y/o grandmother is in the hospital and the doctors seem to be dragging their feet to give any real answers... So last year, at a flare up of a gall bladder episode, my grandmother endured a failed ERCP to remove a stone lodged in the bile duc... Lumps in neck and collarbo", "3Z56AA6EK4YYD5QO4AU9E1BA0516M2": "I still get compliments on my teeth but I don't really go crazy on making them perfect.I brush twice a day, sometimes floss, but I do use a whitening mouthwash..it helps!So, I'm going on a date with a fine guy from Newcastle tonight, and although I haven't seen pictures of him smiling teeth and all, I'll have the worst thoughts of nightmare teeth imaginable, but I'm more excited to see what kind of person he is!", "3B6F54KMR2A64E2WI1EEVEJZKJ1S10": "I would definitely talk to a dermatologist if this keeps happening.Good luck. Did you find this post helpful?", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3BBZWC": "anything can cause this from stress, change in jobs where there are more women as they can throw your cycle off which, incidentally did exactly that to my daughter. I'm not a doctor so check with one.", "35ZRNT9RUIWNGPOIYOBOZ2OVLEC3O6": "Sure. in fact, if you usually have caffeine and you stop for more than a day, you'll probably get a b  tching headache. For the cramps, try having some hot tea..", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV3NO6": "Somatic symptoms are defined as distressing physical or bodily symptoms, including pain. In somatic symptom disorder (SSD) the responses to somatic symptoms is excessive and causes intense fear, concerns, and disturbances in optimal functioning. There are a number of symptoms that are commonly seen in patients with SSD.", "3EKTG13IZU1GWQTVRE0B3KT7Q0NLMM": ") to be or feel certain of the truth or accuracy of ( a fact , etc ) to have a familiarity or grasp of , as through study or experience : ) to understand , be aware of , or perceive ( facts , etc ) : ) to be sure or aware of ( how to be or do something ) to be intelligent , informed , or sensible enough ( to do something ) : to know how one thing or things in general work a parenthetical filler phrase used to make a pause in speaking or add slight emphasis to a statement  know '' ) .", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL468Z4": "Dawn dish detergent will not harm her or the puppies, but will kill fleas. There are no natural repellants that would not harm both, and the best thing would be to dust the yard with diatomaceous earth (sold as D-Earth at Petco), which will kill the fleas. It is nothing more than powdered, fossilized fresh water crustacean's shells, and you can use it safely in the house- but do take care to work it into the carpets and floorboards, and the vacuum up the rest, You don't want it on the puppies, and getting into their eyes. Your vaccum is the best defense against fleas. A spritz of Frontline spray in the bag will kill them there.", "3FSEU3P2NRYIW41016TOBVWG2F9RR4": "The Paranormal film on the other hand, I go into it knowing it's fake and for .... You guys should do a special double review of The Recovered and Feeding Frenzy. .... normally is ?? no demons or ghosts or things that go bump in the night... Sep 29, 2006 ... Written at the height of her fame but not published until over a ..... My Story shows us a side of MM that is contrary to her identity as sex ... Marilyn mentions often episodes of crying in bed all night and .... Aug 20, 2013 ... and why Season 7 will not be taking a page from The Walking Dead. ... Full- frontal nudity on a guy is not something you see often on ... The Jason/Violet sex scene was more on story, because that was set ... The finest films that have hit screens during our existence, because greatness ... D.C. radio talk show host and community activist in the 1960s and '70s. ... Seriously, anyone who can't get a laugh out of 'durka durka ...", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVN0V8": "In psychology, 'young adult' means people between around 18 to around 25. Adolescence, which is the time from the onset of sexual maturation until full adulthood, is subdivided into two parts. The first half of adolescence is called puberty and is defined by the development of the capability for sexual reproduction. Puberty today typically begins around ages 10 (girls) to 12 (boys) and is completed around ages 18 (girls) to 20 (boys). From a biological (brain development) and psychological (personality development) standpoint, full adulthood is reached around age 25. The phase from the end of puberty (18 to 20) until full adulthood (around 25) is called 'yound adult' in science. The exact ages of course vary between individuals, scientific discipline, culture, and scholar, and these divisions are highly debatable, but the above is a common view held by many scholars today. In book publishing, on the other hand, we have the marketing categories of children's books (0-8) young adult (12", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J535Z": "The Cleveland Clinic explains that your perception of what constitutes a serving size is skewed by generous 'super-sized' portions you get when eating out. Consult the Nutrition Facts panel on the foods you buy to see how many servings there are in the package or can so you don't overeat. When you prepare your own food, downsize your portions visually. A 3-ounce serving of meat is about the size of a deck of cards. A baked potato is about the size of a fist. And a serving of cheese is the size of four die stacked together. Step 4 Give some love to healthy foods. A healthy diet that gives you all of your essential nutrients consists of foods from all four food groups, including vegetables, fruits, whole grain foods, low- or non-fat dairy foods, lean sources of protein, nuts and seeds.", "3D7VY91L65V4JH7J01BHPHX2E69MB0": "Eye power of -0.5 indicates a mild astigmatism of like 1/2 diopter. Although his vision initially improved, he almost immediately started suffering the irreversible side effects of Lasik surgery, dry eye, halos, star-bursts and night blindness. Over time his vision became worse than it was prior to the surgery and he was severely myopic prior to surgery. LASIK or Refractive Vision Correction surgery is laser surgery that can correct nearsightedness, farsightedness and astigmatism. If you have the surgery prior to total vision stabilization, you will have to have the surgery repeated. Laser Vision Corrective surgery has only been in use for a little over 10 years, therefore the. However, there is still a small percentage (about 5) who experience night blindness, halos, star bursts and loss of vision. These side-effects are usually permanent and often cause depression and loss of quality of life issues See 'Sources' below for additional information on Lasik procedures and side effects", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZJF2J": "Cortisol, a.k.a. hydrocortisone, helps regulate inflammation and blood sugar levels.", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8H0JO": "At home: I should've attended school At school: I should've stayed at home all the time", "3VO4XFFP15K82K2LFD6I1OVB5HI7QP": "As a firefighter and paramedic I can tell you without looking at your face, you have second degree burns. The blistering could potentially be damaging to your face. Definitions : 1st degree burn..", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734PTIH": "For the squeaking braces try silicone spray. It doesn't matter what people think. Most of them you will never see again. Besides It is impossible to tell what people are thinking. You may think they are thinking one thing, when they are thinking something entirely different. Try to keep a positive outlook and smile a lot, weather you mean it or not. Just the act of smiling will make you feel better. I hope I have helped you. I feel very sad for your situation  My best Hope", "3VADEH0UHCV9L6LY33P4WA1XNZ5PSZ": "Eating healthy lose weight - tips plans show , Eating healthy to lose weight - help losing weight. eating healthy... http://t.co/u0mPvgqQd5", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFOTWP": "no, i would never punish a puppy. i had a puppy who pee-ed in the house occationly, and if u punish dogz, they will make you feel bad. if i were you, never get phyical.", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9F42P": "this is normal, eventually he will come around is he sick? maybe something bad is happening to him right now that he doesn't want anyone to know about, has he lost weight? I'm glad it worked for you, but honestly, your weight loss achievements were likely not a result from eating right 4 your type.", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH8WYJ": "My youngest daughter's father is an addict acolholic. We lived together for her sake for eight years and than I couldn't take anymore. 2000 and if you asked her she does't want to see him. She has several learning disabliites, If you asked her father what they were he would only know that she has dyslexia because he is also dyslexic. If you asked him what other issues does she struggle with he could't. If you asked him what school she goes to he could't tell you. If you asked him what grade she was in he would know only because of her age and the fact that as far as he know's she's never been held over. He can't tell you how she did in her first year of high school he can't tell you who her favorite friends are, What she wants to do with her life after high school. When she needs to talk to a man about boys or growing up as female from a boys point of veiw, she either talks to my brother or her father's brother not her father. She really has little if not contact with his side of the family.", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V50PLO": "I really wouldn't worry to much about it if I were you. Sometimes that just happens. Clots of blood are normal during your period.", "3YGE63DIN8VZ46YN6NKFEY3AL4TW0I": "Photography today is digital and it seems to stay like this for the next few years. As I am a photographer who learned photography by shooting on film and developing my pictures in my dark room, I would not recommend it any more. You can learn the same principles by shooting digital and doing post processing on your computer. Learning Photoshop I think would help you a lot more than learning to develop black and white negatives. Pick up as many books and albums about photography as you can find. Take a crash course if you can find at your local library or anywhere else that would not cost you too much and I left it as the last thing, but is the most important, shoot as much as you can. Once you have a decent portfolio, you can try to find a pro, who would take you as an assistant. Good luck!", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY7VOX": "The Spanish Flu of 1918-19 killed 60 to 100 million people world-wide, it started in the last year of the war and was spread by soldiers returning home from the war. Source below states the epidemic started as a result of a U.S. Army bacteriological warfare weapon that somehow infected U.S. Army soldiers at Camp Riley, Kansas in 1918 and spread across the world. It's an interesting story. P.S. There was a strange thing about that flu outbreak, it affected mostly healthy young adults, usually, flu outbreaks affect juvenile, elderly, and/or weakened people, most of the people that died from that outbreak were 20 to 40 year old adults, strange.", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONXZHB": "Oh, just read it. It's short. (And fantastic, but that's just my opinion.)", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAIIGY": "eating nomally has many definitions. Try eating breakfast that contains lots of fiber, snack on fruits and veggies, get your protein and dinner should be the smallest meal of the day. You shouldn't eat past 7 or 7:30. if youre above 150lbs you eat balance of carbs/protein/fat food thats 400cal..anything thats 400cal..then after 3 hrs,eat 100cal snack..then 400cal lunch..100cal snack..400cal dinner and 50 snack..youre eating 6x a day but on lil portions. if youre less than 150lbs..cut breakfast,lunch and dinner in half but still take 100cal snacks and the 50 snack at night. and an Orange ( dont eat corn at all.Theres enough corn in everything you eat look on the lables of you food corn syrup is in everything and its really not that good for you) Dinner Chicken noodle soup,and 1 glass of OJ. Dinner Kiwi, Watermelon and a banana 2 glasses of water. Dinner Cabbage soup 4 glasses of water Day 8. Lunch 1 Steak and a potato 3 Glasses of water Dinner. as much fruit as you can eat.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BQARK": "I have 9 periods and I only like periods 8  and 9 cause that's social studies and study hall lol", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDMOT5": "and dark age of sharifan", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX3WNS": "I hate eggs you bitch you know that ?", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LASXBU": "10:00 your body needs at least 7 hours of sleep so if you go to bed at 10 you'll be fully rested and ready to be up by 7. Tips to go to sleep faster: Take a bath right before bed it make syou tired. Then put on lotion to sooth your body Drink something warm If you dont like reading read (my doctor recomends this) An hour before bed dont watch t. Or be near light because when your around light your body thinks its morning", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJ9ZY9": "The British government arrested all the top Congress Party leaders and thus killed the Quit India Movement before it had a chance to gather steam.It fizzled out entirely within a matter of months.Although Boses Indian National Army (INA), which drew its cadre from Indian POWs in Japanese camps and fought along with Japanese forces on Indias eastern front towards the end of the war, failed in its ultimate mission, indirectly it succeeded in causing the British to leave India early.", "335HHSX8CD3B604SN0MAS2D605PDHS": "if his balls arent going to rub my clit or give me a vaginal orgasm, I dont' see why they matter. the only thing i can imagine is if they are larger, he has more sperm making him therefore more fertile", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5EO6X": "Yes you make money at hub pages but you need to be creative in making money with them (Add more affiliate links to CPA offers). I use them more for link building and get some residual commissions from adsense. Hub pages does not pay you money .... its the companies like google, ebay and amazon that pay you. What this means is you sign up as an affiliate to those companies and then provide your affiliate info to hub pages. When you write articles for hub pages they post ads from those companies and you get half of the commissions. If you were to post ads on your own website you would get all commissions. The reason why hub pages might be better to start is because they get way more traffic then you would at your own site so it pays off to start by writing for hub pages then if you get good at SEO start your own website. If you have questions contact me. The best way to make money with hub pages is with CPA offers and google adsense. Questions?", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8WPEY": "Yes...HERE COME THE BULLIES is a one-act play about school bullying. 6 males 9 females. Simple set. (Libby Hughes). http://www.capecodtravel.com/libbyhughes/plays.shtml  Other resources to try:  http://www.stagepage.info/oneactplayscripts/bush.html http://www.theatrefolk.com/store/genre/23-one-act http://www.scriptcircle.co.uk/index.php?pg51actionauthorid110authorTonyBreeze  Introducing children to drama is hard work, but rewarding. Break a leg! :-)", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FYP5Y": "Niggga If I ever Deadlift 200 lbs with my shirt off, revoke my membership", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6V18LO": "I like to just wear the basic like mascara and lip gloss...but i also dont wear alot in the first place....", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88LZFE": "i know its just so funny", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBLETW": "pretty ambiguous question.", "3D42WVSDH8TUQF8DO6LO22BU2EEYFJ": "data:image/gif. base64,R0lGODlhAQABAAAAACH5BAEKAAEALAAAAAABAAEAAAICTAEAOw quot. onload quot. sharing. buttons. pinterest( replace: this, type: 'pinimage', media: 'media', description: 'desc' ).", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6IFW5": "College Board A. P. European History Main Page1000s of links to great web sites and primary source documents. Just pick a topic and go to that page where you will find a large number of links that can be used for research and study. Click on the blue check mark () and you will be directed to the in-depth, detail-linked class assignment page for that topic! College Board A. P. European History Main Page How to read a primary source document International Affairs Resources (World Wide Web Virtual Library) Links to all European nations - maps The Collapse of the Medieval World The Renaissance The Reformations The Age of Exploration The Wars of Religion Age of Absolutism Scientific Revolution Age of Enlightenment The Ancien Regime Revolutionary France The Napoleonic Age The Industrial Revolution Reaction, Revolution  Romanticism European Nationalism La Belle poque .", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9RHNE": "Pet hair cannot cause asthma but if you already have asthma it can trigger off an attack. There are many pets in rescue canters because their owners realised they are allergic. Remember if you have asthma to hoover every day, hoover the mattress every week, replace your pillows ever couple of years and every couple of months wrap your pillow in a plastic bag and put ti in the freezer for 24 hours. Statistical area The United States federal government defines and delineates the nation's metropolitan areas for statistical purposes, using a set of standard statistical area definitions. They are saying no pets before children enter 1st grade. Do your homework, we just bought two kittens from a local pet store for about 50 bucks US each. If you buy from a pet store..take time to look at the place, is it really clean and do the people care about pets. Buy a good quality pet food. Vet bills can get up there, but plan a budget and you'll do fine Have fun and watch them claws!", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2F1TY": "i find that drinking or injecting a pint or so of my own sperm greatly increases my muscle mass.", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1FBKL": "Gingivitis is completely reversible. I might take a couple of weeks of brushing, flossing and visits to the dentist. And don't worry, gingivitis is not phenomenal. It's just because of the build-up of plaque that makes your gum open slightly. Just continue to do what you are doing and it will go away. And no, Grandpa Walleye. If the gum slit is deeper than 3-4mm, then it would not be gingivitis. It would be Perioditis, which can't be completely healed. Opinion 2: You can do some good by yourself at home but it sounds like your gingivitis is advanced and you will need a professional cleaning followed up by a good home care program of prevention. See the dentist and in the meantime keep brushing and flossing. Good luck.", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWY1WP": "Timeline of Aboriginal history of Western Australia This is a timeline of Aboriginal history of Western Australia. It began with the Fairburn Report which first drew attention to the 'Aboriginal Problem.' Based on data for 55- to 59-year-olds, aspirin prevents around two first heart attacks per 1,000 people annually. Based on data for 55-to59-year-olds, aspirin prevents around two first heart attacks per 1,000 people annually. German settlements in the Riverina In Australia, a number of German settlements in the Riverina were established in the late nineteenth century. The settlements were populated by Germans migrating both from established German settlements in South Australia and directly from Germany. Australia became a popular destination for German immigrants from as early as 1838 when religious persecution in Prussia led to the first organised group migration of Old Lutherans to South Australia. The first South Australian Germans to reconnoitre the Riverina took up land in Ma...", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATZA54": "Introduction to Documentary:, Nichols, Bill, Good Book http://t.co/ATYlqBxTik http://t.co/Av76qCmjCy", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JWHOT": "Pet hair cannot cause asthma but if you already have asthma it can trigger off an attack. Unfortunately there is nothing you can do. There are many pets in rescue canters because their owners realised they are allergic.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY0X1A": "The Americas to 1620 Colonization  Settlement, ... other European groups were joining the settlement process: the French in ... The process of settlement and ...", "3IH9TRB0FBXHA0Z0DPK0RCDCBLZ1IH": "It is possible to exercise TOO much. If you restrict calories or exercise to the point where you should be consuming more calories, your body will react as though you are going into starvation mode and basically hoard everything it takes in. Try taking it easier or adding more wholesome food like fish and avocados to your regimen. Another Answer: Weight loss is determined by burning more calories than you consume (and digest). Also, exercising both stimulates the appetite and can build muscle mass (hopefully by converting fat to muscle so that weight is gained while health and appearance is improved) which weighs more that fat (or less muscle). I was a voracious eater (legendary at times) but could not get up to and maintain 200 pounds until I greatly increased my working out with weights. Once I was at 200 pounds a month or two my appetite became more manageable. So, there are two basic reasons people gain weight while exercising. 1 they still consume more calories than they use (i.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY21XG": "Will i fail? Hi Jared. I havent smoked marijuana in 8 months. Should I pass a hair follicle test, also a body hair test if needed? hey Jared, I used to be a heavy smoker but havent smoked much this year, like 4 times. Its now been 45 days since I last smoked and passed one of those dip stick test for my PO Tuesday (05/12/2015). I took 2 hits off a j last night (05/16/2015). I may have to test in 2 to 3 weeks. What do you think my chances are. BTW, Ive already tested for my PO and passed on Tuesday. Hey Jared. I smoked twice a month for a couple years. Nothing since December then I smoked a joint on 4/18 then two hits on 5/7. Med quality stuff. I may be asked to take hair follicle test on June 4th. Should I be worried. 57? 185lbs. Hey Jared, I smoked occasionally, maybe once a week or once every two weeks for a few months. Then I stopped on March 14 because I figured I would have a hair test for a job around the beginning of June.", "3Q2T3FD0ON6ZGM36L8WB7YZQQEY3MS": "There are many reasons for this: The Dutch and British did not have policies of eradicating any native people. While there were wars of conquest (especially by the British), they did not commit mass genocide (except when the British got rid of the Griqua people). For the most part the natives were left to their own devices. Furthermore, the white settlers bought and bartered for a lot of the land they settled on. This meant that most of the natives were left alive. The Europeans did not have much contact with the natives. This prevented the spreading of new diseases brought over from Europe. Where many people were killed in Australia and North America, the white South Africans opted to rather live 'apart' from the natives. Most natives were also allowed/ expected to live in their traditional cultures outside of European settlements. Finally, and the most important difference, is population control. Where most white South Africans practiced family planning, many of the natives did no...", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0ODU0C": "All of your choices are good ones. Have you tried trail mix eg almonds, dried fruit, walnuts. Nuts are full of nutrients but have protein as well so that just a few can be 'filling'. Also a fiber based cereal with low fat milk is a snack that I often have when i have the munchies. Here's a great articlehttp://www.webmd.com/diet/features/snack-attack Also, remember that sometimes if a person is stressed or tired, he or she may think they are hungry but really it is a stress response. Additionally, if you are not drinking enough water during the day, you may be thirsty and this may feel like hunger. In any case, drinking 6-8 glasses of water is key to be healthy. Glad you're doing so well with healthy eating. Keep up the good work!", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY5VOV": "Hi there. If your periods were 4 days long and are now 7 days long, then 4 days is what your body has considered normal. No first periods are not usually longer than later on.", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1Q4RZ": "The average penis size is 5.5 inches. The average penis size of someone looking up average penis size 3.5 inches. -Daniel tosh", "3P520RYKCH4L79VJ8TBQD5E4HWSU51": "Because of their kindly and easy going nature , Goldens are a popular breed . Many people , in hoping to cash in on this popularity , breed Goldens without regard to their temperament or other good attributes . You should be very selective in picking out a puppy from a breeder .", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSGD91": "BonBlogsa work in progress Bonnie Gillespie writes about the view from inside her brain and points south. Oh, and from Hollywood. Menu by Bonnie Gillespie week of May 24, 2010 Originally published by Actors Access at http://more.showfax.com/columns/avoice/archives/001188.html . Please support the many wonderful resources provided by the Breakdown Services family. This posting is the authors personal archive and new columns are available each Monday at Showfax . Your Turn Hi Bonnie: Ive been reading your column recently and I love it. Ive read your book , as well as other acting books as well. I praise you for giving the best advice possible for actors. There is one thing as an actor that I am deathly afraid of and thats my age. I feel like because I got such a late start in this infinitely hard career that I may be slipping. I am 28 years old and Im afraid I wont be en established actor anytime in the next few years. I know it takes a decade to really be someone, but I fear not", "3EQVJH0T40JINP0P9QMPX6VS3RAHTC": "'Rightful liberty is unobstructed action, according to our will, within limits ... This is the sum of good government, and all that is necessary to close the circle ... a good thing, and as necessary in the political world as storms in the physical. A physical law or scientific law 'is a theoretical principle deduced from particular ... It is always possible for laws to be invalidated or proven to have limitations, by ... laws, and are goo... ... Who will pay for my medical bills, lost time from work and physical limitations? ... available insurance coverage and who is responsible to pay for these things as well as .... Physical beauty is the sign of an interior beauty, a spiritual and moral beauty ... But this judgment only expresses a subjective act of reflection, and does not throw .... of good and happiness are realized in perfect accord and in constant harmony.", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTAQBZ5": "American Cocker Spaniels What's good about 'em What's bad about 'em There are energetic Cockers, and placid Cockers. Hard-headed Cockers, and sweet-natured Cockers. Serious Cockers, and good-natured goofballs.", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S6SEK": "My sis' dog does this becuase he learned it from his parents. They would poop on the floor and then be shamed so they knew that if the poop was found theyd be in trouble. Instead of thinking 'hmmm maybe I shouldnt poop on the floor....'", "3YO4AH2FPDIUK921UEL9M9LOX38Q04": "And explain how this is going to work , and why my ortho is n't trying to correct my midline before the gaps close up ? Thanks in advance ! VA5 I was also wondering if you had your midline corrected since this thread was made ? Pretty much . It was mostly a slant that I had and that was pretty much taken care of too .", "36KM3FWE3RAKERXMYFC3MI4TSDJ70Q": "You should probably contact your eye doctor and get the okay to wear them. You have to have a perscription to get special contact lenses. This is one place I found that sells a bunch. http://www.aclens.com/halloween-contacts... I know this is kind of off topic, but I don't think I've ever seen a Ceil Phantomhive cosplay with a pentagram eye and no eyepatch...it would be cool if someone cosplayed Ceil like that. But I don't think anyone has yet. Good luck with Grell, he's my absolute favorite manga character!", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXMUJM": "Rarely, but I should look into it. How? you would be amazed how that helps.", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXNL0C": "They have the largest occlusal surfaces of any of the teeth and have from three to five major cusps . Lower permanent molars always have two lingual cusps  upper permanent molars always have two buccal cusps . Lower molars have two roots  upper molars have three roots . Molar teeth by definition are cheek teeth that are NOT preceded by primary teeth .", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0A2OS": "Primarily, it appears on the back and outer sides of the upper arms, but can also occur on thighs and buttocks or any body part except glabrous skin (like the palms or soles of feet). Worldwide, KP affects an estimated 40 to 50 of the adult population and approximately 50 to 80 of all adolescents. It is more common in women than in men.", "3NQUW096N661P6A125W6YYNNQ1G9LB": "1. does it hurt when you bit down? If it does then your filling is too high. Your dentist will just take his high speed hand piece  adjust it for you. He will tell you to bite down  you should feel better. 2. Or you could have an infection. 3. You may have bit down real hard and bruised the Periodontal Ligament, in which case it will be sore for about a week  then the soreness will go away on it's own. Whichever it be your dentist will figure it out. Good Luck.", "3ZFRE2BDQ9CBVR93KMTTMGK3CDFZX3": "There are actually more than two kinds of sonnets. The English and Italian (Shakespearean and Petrarchan) are the two main ones, but there are several others. You can tell Shakespearean and Petrarchan sonnets apart by their rhyme schemes. The traditional rhyme scheme of a Shakespearean sonnet is ABAB CDCD EFEF GG. (There are a number of. Read it out loud if that will help you hear the rhymes. Bright star, would I were stedfast as thou art--- Not in lone splendour hung aloft the night And watching, with eternal lids apart, Like nature's patient, sleepless Eremite, The moving waters at their priestlike task Of pure ablution round earth's human shores, Or gazing on the new soft-fallen mask Of snow upon the mountains and the moors--- No---yet still stedfast, still unchangeable, Pillowed upon my fair love's ripening breast, To feel for ever its soft fall and swell, Awake for ever in a sweet unrest, Still, still to hear her tender-taken breath, And so live ever---or else swoon in death.", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZAZLYA": "trehay your inner animal is the animal that represents the month you were born. Your secret animal is the animal representing the time", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6MJKC": "DENTAL HYGIENIST (HONOLULU): Growing general dental office seeking a reliable and friendly dental hygienist. http://t.co/2PsgIXmScO", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0BXI2": "African slaves proved to be extremely hardy in harsh working conditions in tobacco and cotton fields. African slaves had a harder time escaping than whites or native Americans. Africans were easily identified by skin color. Native Americans could generally get protection at any Indian village or reservation, often including those of competing tribes. Native Americans also were shown not to thrive in slavery conditions -- Spanish missionaries in California, for example, enslaved the natives and found that the majority wasted away and died in captivity. Whites needed only to escape to a town a few miles distant and begin to use a new name in order to get away from slavery or indentured servitude.", "3TY2U1TEB78K0SZALWB67DOYIHOJJF": "Wrong bathroom, MENS ROOMS DOWN THE HAAAALLLLLL So I pull up my shirt to prove I'm the right gender, But the looks their giving me are anything but tender.What's your problem?I ain't got a member!", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVJIF0": "I'm sure I can do it cause I can do anything......do I want to run for hours.....Idk", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K99H6": "See a chiropractor, they do a great job fixing you up. In the meantime, evaluate your diet and see if you are getting enough calcium into your body, if not, supplements will help - ensure you buy good quality calcium, most of what we get from drug and grocery stores is useless. I get mine from Health Food Stores like Whole Foods.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS8CBB": "They aren't thick, they look lean and long. Whoever thinks that's thick needs to get their eyes checked. Opinion 2: Aha ' Make my legs jiggily ' you just made my day (: But yea , just eat alot of meat , fat , ect . 'd you'll be thick in no time ! Good luck :p", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCAJ9I": "Hope this helps!Reply Sandy 7.16.2015 at 5:05 pm  I have a small decorative bowl filled with coconut oil and sugar sitting on our bathroom sink.I use a small spoonful when I have paint on my hands and when I want to moisturize and get soft hands.", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0FXI6": "It is completely normal to have large blood clots during your period. I know they suck but almost everyone gets them. Sometimes it's from being heavy, and sometimes it's just from having a heavy period. Most people get them right in the beginning of their periods (meaning the beginning of the week(s)). Keep an eye on it. If it lasts for the entire week or gets larger throughout time, go see a doctor. Opinion 2: It was probably the birthcontrol thing -- that's happened to me as well. I had a sort of lightish period, that ended up being more like nonstop spotting that lasted nearly two weeks! I had to stop taking the birthcontrol, use condoms and spermicide in the meantime, and wait till I got a real period to start the usual method again. Better still, go to your gynecologist, or to Planned Parenthood -- I've heard their services are excellent.", "3R4QIDVOJPA4EWRQTUPODHYE81UEE2": "Im sorry to break it to you, but there is no possible way to make your hip bone smaller. i also have big hip bones and i think of it as a good thing. it makes you curvier also, and if its a lovehandle problem then just do exercises designed to tone the hips like side bends or trunk twists.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK29EFK": "After the breeds were separated, the American cocker eclipsed the English in popularity  but only in America. Throughout the rest of the world, the English cocker is by far the more popular of the two breeds and is known simply as the cocker spaniel. 'No getting dressed to take him out to go!' - Barbara 'There are no words to express our delight with the Puppy Apartment and PTPA Potty Pads.' - Judy 'She loves her Puppy Apartment so much!' - Brady  Stephanie 'Its given us peace of mind!' Annie  Dan 'Its been WONDERFUL to have my life back!' Susan 'Youll never go back to other training methods!' Janipher 'Weve had NO accidents!' April 'It was instant success!' Mandy  Will 'This product certainly was a lifesaver!' - Christine  Choy 'It was the easiest house training experience I have ever had!' Lauretta 'It is like a light bulb goes on and he trots over to the PTPA and does his business!' Kendra 'I will not have to worry about my carpets anymore!' Nicole", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKD8TMW": "just say hello and get the ball rolling if they r interested they will respond n best bet will be look in their eyes... they express a lot u can catch easily.. good luck", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCQY0G": "Topic Overview What are hemorrhoids? Hemorrhoids are enlarged veins that develop in the anal canal. Nearly everyone has hemorrhoids at some time. About 50 of people older than 50 have had hemorrhoids at some time in their life. 1 What causes hemorrhoids? Excessive pressure on the veins in the pelvic and rectal area causes hemorrhoids. Being overweight also can contribute to developing hemorrhoids. Straining to push the baby out. The symptoms, progression, and treatment differ depending on where hemorrhoids develop. Internal hemorrhoids have four degrees of severity. First degree: The hemorrhoid does not protrude from the anus. What are the symptoms? External hemorrhoids: External hemorrhoids can cause itching, burning, and irritation. Internal hemorrhoids: Rectal bleeding is the most common symptom of internal hemorrhoids. How are hemorrhoids treated? Home treatment is recommended for most external hemorrhoids. Dale Mercer, MD, FRCSC, FACS - General Surgery Last Updated: November 10, 2004", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKRVU6": "All young animals are playful and curious. That's how they learn, explore and perfect their skills. Weren't you playful and mischievous when you were young?", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXRDJV": "Variable like gender would have two attributes: male and female. Attribute is the name of a board game. An attribute may also refer to a deity's aspect see Negative theology.", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKVG9D": "The tube that carries urine from the bladder to the outside of the body is called urethra.", "3MWOYZD5WVMUKTHSG7V38GM1QV1NO4": "I work at an imaging center where I operate a CT scanner. When we do a urogram, we include all the major organs in the abdomen and pelvis. So the answer to your ...", "3M7OI89LVYML4JEXRL0VB56Y6RX6CK": "Well I feel strongly about this subject with the information that I have seen. We are being ripped off by vets in this area. The other vaccines are not mandatory.", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFQQ4M": "How is gum disease treated? The main goal of treatment is to control the infection. The number and types of treatment will vary, depending on the extent of the gum disease. Any type of treatment requires that the patient keep up good daily care at home. The doctor may also suggest changing certain behaviors, such as quitting smoking, as a way to improve treatment outcome. Deep Cleaning (Scaling and Root Planing) The dentist, periodontist, or dental hygienist removes the plaque through a deep-cleaning method called scaling and root planing. Scaling means scraping off the tartar from above and below the gum line. Root planing gets rid of rough spots on the tooth root where the germs gather, and helps remove bacteria that contribute to the disease. In some cases a laser may be used to remove plaque and tartar. This procedure can result in less bleeding, swelling, and discomfort compared to traditional deep cleaning methods.", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NIRKE": "Stop talking to me. Stop hml. Stop talking to my friends. Stop talking to my family. Just stop associating yourself with me period.", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV0UX9": "HAVE FUN!!! 'Invalid Item' (Gothic Shrink) Rating: 13 Moderator: ArtimusG Current Size: 44 chapters (May 11th, 2005) Official Information: You're name is Joshua Langstrom.You live a pretty decent life.", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBM5BW": "Less than an hour. I worked for thirty minutes at Buffalo Wild Wings in Massillon, Ohio. The shift manager yelled at me on my first day, having not even clocked an hour into the job because I wasn't saucing the wings properly. I told him to go F himself and walked out.", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65WKPH": "Are dogs really better than cats? If pressed to choose, I will say that I am a 'dog person.' I have always loved dogs and cannot imagine life without at least one dog to follow me around, hog the bed and smother me with wet kisses. This being said, I am a lover of all animals and a definite cat fancier. I am also a cat owner who adores her sweet kitties. It is certainly hard for me to imagine life without the soft purrs, biscuit-making and gentle head butting. However, if I had to make a choice to live with only one species, the dog would be the winner (just don't tell this to my cats). I am not one of those dog lovers who thinks cats are aloof, selfish and overly independent. Cat personalities are as versatile as human personalities. Some are social and attention-seeking others are quiet and timid. Some cats are pretentious divas others are goofy playmates. But there are some undeniable truths about the differences between dogs and cats.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMZD8D": "Never heard of it. We eat our lunch hot, but everything else cold (because 'everything else' tends to be mostly bread with stuff on it)", "3YOAVL4CA0FKXPLT0BROP5N5JID4ZW": "Dick Makin Collection/The Image Bank/Getty Images Updated November 28, 2014. Whether alcohol and drug abuse is a factor or not, domestic violence and abuse is a very serious problem -- for the victims and the abusers. As we saw in last week's article although statistics seem to indicate some link between alcohol/drug abuse and domestic violence, others believe that they are two separate issues. Domestic abuse is not so much about a 'loss of control' as it is about total control! Ironically, many batterers do not see themselves as perpetrators, but as victims. This reasoning is common among batterers. Most enter treatment programs heavily armored with elaborate denial systems designed to justify or excuse their actions. All About ControlThere are varying theories about what makes batterers use abuse on those closest to them.", "30P8I9JKOIJLKOKJDJLV9RGNV3ZV5P": "Well Danny that will all depend on how bad it is. Give it a few days, if you still feel it's still bothering you go back and see the doctor, tell him it's still bothering you. There are two main factors involved, how long and how much?", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMRT3G": "?? ???? ?????? ?????? ??? ?????. ???? ??????? ??? ??? ??????? ??? ??? ????. ???. ????? ...", "3INZSNUD80OIRUM9POYIFLFIHSFD90": "This medication is a combination of a narcotic (hydrocodone) and a non-narcotic (acetaminophen) used to relieve moderate to severe pain. Hydrocodone works by binding to opioid receptors in the brain and spinal cord, and acetaminophen decreases the formation of prostaglandins, therefore relieving pain. Norco 10/325 is exactly what I take.", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP337H": "its strange that a student cannot write an application well I will help u the Principal, Name of yr Intuition Place Date  Sub:Change of subject from Commerce to Physics, studies. Respected Sir/Mam, I name,class, section wish to change my present subject Commerce to physics,chemistry computer studies as I want to go for Pre-Eng,and I will be requiring knowledge of the said subjects I shall be grateful if you allow me to change to these subjects. Yours Obediently, Yr name  Where there are capital letters required do it", "308KJXFUJR43D2SB3KCXGK8OQWITAB": "new Novel focus group, North London with http://t.co/OBHYuagPaM novel amwriting", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL458Z3": "Imperialism. When Europeans first came to North America, they created new settlements ... What kind of society did the French colonists create in their ... Then summarize what you have learned in the ??earn?? column. Spain and France looked north and regarded the country as heretical and a ... of excitement and achievement, nearly superhuman heroes and daring deeds, with the ... with concessions to make the religious settlement palatable to Catholics. Both were failures, and the fate of the 1587 colony remains a mystery (all colonists ...... Braddock, who decided to attempt to kick the French out of N. America,?... The British, French, and Israelis decided to take military action. The British, especially, considered the canal a vital waterway, a lifeline to their colonies in Asia. Summarize the accomplishments of the Spanish in opening the New. World to exploration, conquest, and colonization. c. Explain why English settlers came to North America.", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRG10K": "Where are you looking for them? Because I graduated nearly 20 years ago and can still answer most of these. Pick up an American history book. It's all in there. Opinion 2: Much as in other American colonies - - - people mostly awoke with the sun and worked at farming the soil till sunset he then slept till daylight and the process began anew Deleware was more rural than neighboring Pennsylvania and with its coastline many of its citizens earned a wage by fishing  collecting mussles  oysters though as mentioned farming was a mainstay with grains  corn being the principal crops. Gonna throw links and snippets at you.. 1st site gives you lots of daily life activities.... http://www.scgnet.us/orgMain.asp?storyid... '''white settlement on the Upper Delaware River, called Cushetunk. Todays Fort represents the development of the settlement over a thirty year period. The original settlers were farmers who came primarily from central Connecticut and were of English descent. They were sear", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW2AVZZ": "My guinea is four years old and had never had a problem in his eyes. He started to have discharge in his right eye and I am very concern. I took him to the vet and they gave me oinment. It looks alot better now but the thing is his left eye is starting to get discharge and crust. I'm afraid he has pneumonia. How can I tell if he's ok or not? if the discahrge is transparent and it is an eldery Abyssinian. it is likely to have cataracts. Other guinea pigs types could also suffer from this. guinea pigs feel no discomfort or pain with this, they just lose their sight. cataracts If the discharge is white, then it is normal. i would take ir back to the vet to be sure. please contact me if you have any further questions. i hope he is ok.  ( i got this from here hope it helped  http://en.allexperts.com/q/Guinea-Pigs-1574/Discharge-eye.htm )", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGRCS9": "Apply the Heading 1 style to that paragraph. In the same way, apply the Heading 1 style to other major headings in your document. Instead, modify the heading styles. Step 2: Create the Table of Contents Click where you want your Table of Contents to appear. Click on the Table of Contents tab. Click on the Table of Contents tab. Click OK. Step 3: Customize the Table of Contents (if you need to) Tip! Instead, modify the Heading style. That is, it puts the text from Heading 1, Heading 2 and Heading 3 in the Table of Contents. According to Google, Google Apps Script 'provides easy ways to automate tasks across Google products and third party services.'. Apps Script is also the tool that powers the add-ons for Google Docs, Sheets  Forms. Notebooks could contain headings and notes. On November 11, 2011, Google began exporting the contents of existing Notebooks to Google Docs, and made Google Notebooks read-only. On March 20, 2013, Google launched its new note-taking application Google Ke...", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E8TBB": "Sharing: Lindsey Strawn-My Plexus testimony! I was diagnosed with PCOS (Polycystic Ovary Syndrome (PCOS) in... http://t.co/lgznUXzt", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE7X5U": "No no - you project and abstract attempt of a conclusion, based on fragments of what I've said.It's called cherry picking arguments", "3OYHVNTV5TWTCNWPJU3NGO5XW0XOK1": "you can't know for sure.you're 11 years old so you still have a lot to grow. I'm 16 and I was about 5'2' last year, now I'm 6 feet tall so don't worry you can still grow a lot.", "3L7SUC0TTUS3ZU492LES501JN2BM0D": "Some, kids only a few weeks old, were about the size of large dogs others, full grown, stood nearly five feet tall with their long necks erect. Their dense, velvety fleeces made up a fashionable palette of earth tones  white, tan, brown, gray. This is Cleopatra,'' said Charles Stewart, presenting a female with dark facial markings that look like too much eyeliner.", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8IW9P": "The nail will be loosened from the bed where you have the blood pooled underneath it. If that goes completely across the nail from side to side, but doesn't extend all the way back to the cuticle, then the nail will be loose but probably not come off entirely. If you like, you can drill a hole in the nail to relieve the pressure underneath and increase the chance of keeping it in place. For that you can use a paperclip or large needle, heated to red hot in a flame, and then touched to the nail in the center of where the blood is. It will melt a hole in the nail, and it won't hurt. You can't burn through the finger, the blood will cool off the tip long before that happens. In fact, the minute you are through the nail, the blood will spurt up through the hole. The finger will feel a lot better afterwards as well. As the new nail grows out, it will push the rest out just like it always does.", "3ZC62PVYDH8MQW9OJ458PV4S4DHXX4": "Nearly everyone has hemorrhoids at some time. They can develop at any age, but the incidence increases after age 30. About 50 of people older than 50 have had hemorrhoids at some time in their life.", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0CZI4": "x is already defined as y  50 so substitue it in the first equation. (y  50)  2y  200 combine y -- y  2y  3y 3y  50  200 isolate y subtract 50 from both sides 3y  150 divide both sides by 3 y  50 A punnet scare helps us understand an offspring's phenotype  genotype by combining the resessive and/or dominant genes of it's parents to provide information of it's genetics (phenotype  genotype). A parent with a ressesive gene (usually represented by two lower case letters) combined with a parent with a dominant gene (represented by either two capital letters or one capital letter followed by a lower case letter) can produce offspring with their dominant and ressesive genes.", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMQT44": "null...at elance, rent-a-coder and other 'hire consultants' that will do it for you. Problem is that sometimes the work is done by people who arent fluent in english. Now this isnt a knock against them, but if you plan to market to english speaking people, than its a good idea to get a person who is fluent in that language. Theres a vendor who does this exclusively for the ebook industry and they seem to have a great offer along with a decent price. Im pretty sure you can find it cheaper, but probably not at the same quality written by people fluent in english. Check it out here. They will also create an ebook cover and a web site for you to sell your ebook from.   ", "37SOB9Z0SSVFA4LLLWVW7LK1Q953LN": "Charles Dickens from Daivid Copperfield. I love this portion of the book, when he runs away from Murdstone and Grinby's to his aunt. Here is a great description of what he observes at his aunt's house in Dover:  My aunt was a tall, hard-featured lady, but by no means ill-looking. There was an inflexibility in her face, in her voice, in her gait and carriage, amply sufficient to account for the effect she had made upon a gentle creature like my mother but her features were rather handsome than otherwise, though unbending and austere. I particularly noticed that she had a very quick, bright eye. Her hair, which was gray, was arranged in two plain divisions, under what I believe would be called a mob-cap I mean a cap, much more common then than now, with side-pieces fastening under the chin. Her dress was of a lavender colour, and perfectly neat but scantily made, as if she desired to be as little encumbered as possible. I remember that I thought it, in f", "3CVBMEMMXBEVPR3IWNJOSA3AEULH72": "Get one of your dirty t shirts and give him the scent then hide it and tell him to find it. Doing this for the first time, hide it where he can see you hiding it, you want to make it easy at first for him to succeed. You can also hide dog bones or treats he likes so he has to find them. You can put a treat under a glass or cup and then switch them around and see if he can find it under the right glass or cup.", "367O8HRHKG6NWDZF5JXGTCQ2W3AS4C": "I repeated the process and the results were the same. FINALLY I decided to ignore it and that was hard. But ignoring it was the BEST thing. Today it's gone and has been for more than a year and another appeared has stopped to annoy me. I've decided to ignore it anticipating the same result. NO MORE. which is what i suggest. Leave it be and it will go away bit the little scar will always remain. Mar 28, 2014 this is the answer. its a build up of dead skin. the bottom of the hole is where your first layers of skin should be. SOLUTION : I bought a cheap pair of cloth gloves (not to big). Now dig out white hard seed and scrape around outside dead skin making area flush. This will increase bending motion. make sure hand is soaked to the point where area is soft and very white. grease hand with Vaseline and fill hole with it. bend hand in opposite direction of normal bend much as possible (skin will stretch and suck in Vaseline). Make sure hole is compacted with grease.", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BF59I": "a variety of things...you may have scratched your eye taking a contact in or out...or you may have pink eye. Don't put your contacts in tomorrow!! If you wake up and your eye is 'crusty' it's most likely pink eye, it's a fairly common, very contagious infection of the eye. If you wake up and your eye is crusty, or gooey....like there's a bunch of discharge there, go see a doctor, you'll have to do a couple days of eye drops, and wear your glasses for a couple days. Most importantly...don't use that pair of contacts again if you have pink eye, because you'll just get the infection back!", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL498Z7": "CameronMustGo because this govt has seen the return of rickets. Rickets for God's sake! What next, Polio, Scurvy, the", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TAB2Y5": "this tips help me a lot i hope it help u too. sorry it long tips Neutrogena Deep Clean: Ideal for normal to oily complexions, remove dirt, oil and makeup also removes dead skin cells. do this 3 times in week try Neutrogena Oil-Free Acne Wash. it works for me and it take 4-5 days acne gone i do once a day tips: when i feel pimple come up i wash my face with Neutrogena until it gone for Acne, Whitehead and Blackhead look ingredients in products Salicylic Acid: is ideal for unclogging pores and treating blackheads and whiteheads, Bbenzoyl Peroxide: is ideal for acne it kills the bacteria in the pores that cause inflammation and acne. retinoids like Retin-A or Differin and lotions containing alpha hydroxy or salicylic acid can help shrink the opening of the pores  Acne treatments such as benzoyl peroxide, topical antibiotics, alpha- and beta-hydroxy acid creams, and tretinoin For acne-prone skin, try one of these:  Clinique's Acne Solutions Cleansing Foam  Clean amp.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHYDN1": "From what my teachers told me back when I was in high school, it's generally banned because of the cussing and the mature themes (like when he hires the prostitute). Not to mention his delinquency. Holden Caulfield, the main character of The Catcher in the Rye, does not kill anyone in the novel.", "3CESM1J3EI1UIHK28C0WNZD1Y7C6WQ": "Get some Omega Fish Oil capsules and add one to him food per day. His coat will gleam in a few weeks! (and it will boost his immune system... will even help him with hairballs!) If the site of the dandruff bothers you, get a flea comb and comb the area to get it out. I wouldn't advise bathing him for dandruff. Cat skin is very very sensitive and bathing could dry it out and cause more extensive dandruff problems down the line. You might want to consider if there is a reason for the dandruff...Could just be age, where the body doesn't process all the nutrients from his food as well as it once did. The fish oil will help, but so would making sure he has a very high quality diet that is 95 meat. (Found in pet stores). The cause could also be that he is allergic  to what he is currently eating, but most often, it's either age related, weight related (if he's a bit heavy, he can't reach to groom as well as he could otherwise) or often arthritis is setting in. (In which case Co", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMN8C8": "well i use lantus at night as my long acting and novo rapid during the day as my short acting. the fact is basically that your long acting is less likely to make you dip if you take the right dose of it, just like your short acting... i take my lantus before i go to bed and i have only went low during the night around 6 times since iv been on it ... granted iiv only had diabeties for 4 and a half years but you find those things out i guess! but dont worry about it ... i never started off on a long acting , i started off on only short acting which proved to be very effective for me then as my honeymoon period etc were over and i was needing higher doeses of insulin i was put onto both the long acting and the short acting ... i find that i tend to go low more after iv taken my short acting, just take a little dip sometimes! hope this has been some help? xx", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734OTIG": "Here's the lowdown for any guy who's ever worried about whether his penis is a normal size. In addition to size, guys also wonder about other aspects of how their penises look, such as whether the skin covering the penis is normal or if it's OK for a guy's penis to hang to the left or right (it is!). Guys who are reaching puberty should have regular testicular exams, so that's a good time to ask your doctor any questions. Heres the lowdown for any guy whos ever worried about whether his penis is a normal size. If youre concerned about how your penis looks, ask your doctor. Just as guys may wonder about how their penises develop, lots of girls ask the same thing about their breasts. Penis size is an obvious example. This applies to height and weight, size of hands and feet, and, yes, also to penis size. The age at which a guy starts to grow varies from person to person. Penis size is an obvious example. This applies to height and weight, size of hands and feet, and, yes, als...", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSW4H6": "i've been getting some small red bumps on my penis, only 1 every time it comes... now i havnt come in contact with anyone physicly too get any infections from another person... but let me describe how it is at the moment... ok i have had a red bump there for a few days... i popped it and water and also a small amount of white whatever came out... then a tiny bit of blood... now.. a few days pass.... and there is like a small line next too it connecting too it that feel a little swallen, hmm its hard too describe... lets say that this is the shape on my penis... -----o its like a line that leads too the bump... i feel too embarrased too goto the doctors, i know i should go... but can anyone give me an alternative idea of what i could do... oh and today i see tiny little dots on the head of my penis (the bell) but tiny tiny little things... Could this be a hygen issue, do i need too clean myself more or is there some type of cream i can use?? i've latly been using Aqueous Calamine Cream", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN125I1": "First off make sure you get a good quality puppy food. NO walmart brands. ICK ! A doxie baby needs to be fed atleast 4 times a day. Make sure he has access to water at all times. I would say the weight is about right. Good luck   Opinion 2: 1/2 to 3/4 of a cup total per day, can be divided into two servings. Consult your vet for the exact amount based on your dachshund's weight and activity level. If you give treats, subtract the same amount from her daily feed ration to avoid gaining weight. Very small mini's (under 8 Lbs.) as adults, should be fed twice per day because their blood sugar can drop too low with only one meal per day. Note, the amount given above is a general guideline, please ask your vet.", "3FHTJGYT8NY6V1C783VN7WIUZOEPGI": "I wish someone had told me what I am about to tell you. If someone had, perhaps I could have accepted my body the way it had been created and not felt so self-conscious. Unfortunately, I was always too embarrassed to discuss this topic with anyone, even my identical twin sister and my mom. I am 46 years old, and there was not the access to the internet then as there is today. It didn't help me when I was your age. I was always self-conscious about my labia and I spent all of my adolescence and most of my adulthood feeling like there was something wrong with me. I cannot tell you the cost because mine was covered by my insurance (I had mine done at the time I had some other gynecological surgery following the delivery of my sixth baby.) If it is being done strictly for cosmetic reasons, then insurance will not cover it and the price can be quite expensive. If. As for approaching your mom, I would suggest that you show her this question and my answer and tell her you wrote it. Good luck to you.", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA8659": "The Cold War (1947-1991) was the open yet restricted rivalry that developed after World War II between groups of nations practicing different ideologies and political systems. The Cold War was. The United States accused the Soviet Union of seeking to expand their version of communism throughout the world. Another manifestation was in the propaganda wars between the United States and the USSR. Other fields in which arms races occurred include jet fighters, bombers, nuclear weapons, chemical weapons, biological weapons, surface-to-air missiles, anti-aircraft artillery, regular artillery, surface-to-surface missiles (including SRBMs and cruise missiles), inter-continental ballistic missiles (as well as IRBMs), anti-ballistic missile technology, armoured vehicles, rifles, rocket propelled grenades and other anti-tank weapons, submarines and anti-submarine warfare, submarine-launched ballistic missiles, electronic intelligence, signals intelligence, reconnaissance aircraft and spy satellites.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9BFP6": "Well, shoulder pain usually just sits there and aggravates. Elbow pain usually is much sharper and have some tingling involved. From what you said I would strongly reccommend getting your elbow up. Elbow should be above the shoulder in your pitching motion. Also, as a former college catcher, use your back and most of all, keep that front shoulder square!", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPJ9AV": "So computer scientists at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh are teaching them to lip-read. When people are in a noisy environment they pay more attention to the lips,'' he says. Lip-reading dramatically improves our understanding of what people are saying. But when there is a lot of background noise, the success rate of a typical package drops to around 60 percent  and NLips can bump this up to about 85 percent. He admits that the lip-reading software is hopeless on its own. When people are in a noisy environment they pay more attention to the lips,'' he says. Lip-reading dramatically improves our understanding of what people are saying. He admits that the lip-reading software is hopeless on its own. LR QC Jestrum piercing A jestrum piercing, also known as a vertical medusa, is an upper lip piercing that is very similar to a labret piercing, or more specifically a vertical labret piercing. It is placed in the philtrum of the upper lip, directly under the nasal septum...", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG6ZJ2P": "like my mom tells me he's missing the part of life. his kids and his wife. i don't know if it will really help but i tried I'm a 21 year old male so let me try to help you out.", "3FSEU3P2NRYIW41016TOBVWG2FBRR6": "QL QL QL LEMON CURD TART PASTRY: QL 1 1/2 cups flour QL 2 tablespoons granulated sugar QL Pinch salt QL 1 large egg yolk QL 1/2 cup chilled unsalted butter, cut into 6 pieces QL 4 to 5 tablespoons ice water QL FILLING: QL 1 cup fresh lemon juice QL 1/4 cup finely minced lemon peel QL 1/2 cup unsalted butter, melted QL 6 eggs QL 1 1/2 cups granulated sugar QL Powdered sugar for top For Pastry, place flour, sugar, salt and egg yolk in a food processor fitted with a metal blade. But whatever the cause, jobs will be cut. The business combination, built on unsustainable projections, doesn't meet expectations, and even more workers are sent packing to help recoup costs. 1930 The young grandsons of the founder, Pietro Jr and G.Battista took over from Pietro Laverda Sr at the companys helm. 2005 The year got off to a good start with a shareholding agreement with Gallignani SpA, an important manufacturer of pick-up balers.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2FT1Q": "when i was younger, about your age, i played soccer constantly and i was really active my period was irregular until i got into probaly my junior year in highschool but if it goes much longer just go to the doctor to have it checked out...good luck", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVOV04": "There's no need for you to beg and coerce Sit down and put on your thinking bonnet. A wealth of facts are at your finger tips, Just arrange them in some sort of order. You may find your work able to eclipse The most diligent swat and school border. Draw these marks on the board above successful sentences - / - / - / - / - / And write a line of a sonnet on the board, too and do the same with that. I'm sure that they will get it. Good luck. .... The only little Germanism is right at the end, where you say 'the death' / 'der Tod'. We just don't put the article with a lot of abstract nouns (life, love, death, beauty, kindness) in English. Practice.' Practice your presentation in front of any audience you can, preferably one that's just a little bit outside of your 'comfort zone'. Doing this will help you get comfortable, and will expand your comfort zone.", "3RKHNXPHGWUOPSGMFGFWFUXMEMOKUD": "Interventions have their place, but there is a risk of scarring and infection from a .... wipe first (and would frequently get blood clots), then use the bathroom. .... She's concerned I'll go low and it will hurt me at birth if I bleed very much. It's more about the, uh, accessories of menstruation than the ... female experience , I suspect most women don't have a good idea of .... As I stepped over a large piece of driftwood, Summer Lover gallantly offered me his hand to help me over. ... Many women hear the term implantation bleeding used a lot in regards to the early stages ..... ON top of this i have an incredibley sore lower back/pelvic pain like a constant .... (evening) It's very little blood so I've only needed panty liners! One aspect of the two-week wait after IVF drives women particularly crazy: the .... Its been a long wait for me so i will have to grin a bear the pain for now, and hope it ....", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GPYQF": "I hope it goes away! !39 Verfasser Goldammer (428405) 18 Aug 13, 12:43 Kommentar Steve, I also feel with you.But if I would hear every German's voice sound like Chaplins in The Great Dictator (something like Krttlebm ok bttebrt) I surely had headaches, too!", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NIZGA": "Send the dental office  the collection agency proof that you paid the invoice in full such as a copy of the cancelled check or paid in full receipt. If the office is still insisting that you owe additional money you can report both the collection agency and the dental office to the Better Business Bureau or take them to court. swzsalary.com states: The median expected salary for a typical Dental Hygienist in the United States is 64,051.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCEVG8": "Jul 28, 2015 ... I had what i think is called a split hyman .. where there is a piece of skin still ... sex for years. but now i know there is piece of it hanging out of my vagina, ... whats the use then?? im 16 n have to deal with a hanging hymen till i have ... when i finally lost my virginity, i was 15. i was totally drunk and don'...", "3ZTE0JGGCEQBTPK1RHMPS5SPRRROCR": "She has authored fifteen novels and novellas and created four different series. In 2012, Dare won the prestigious RITA award, given by the Romance Writers of America for her book 'A Night to Surrender'. In addition to writing in the historical romance genre, Tessa Dare also works as a part-time librarian.", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J5P4V": "'The Code of Hammurabi (also Hammurabi), the most complete and perfect extant collection of Babylonian laws, was developed during the reign of Hammurabi (r. 1792-1750 B.C.) of the first dynasty of Babylon. The code consists of Hammurabis legal decisions, which were collected toward the end of his reign and inscribed on a diorite stele set up in Babylons Temple of Marduk, a temple named for the national god of Babylon. The 282 case laws include economic provisions (prices, tariffs, trade, and commercial regulations), family law (marriage and divorce), as well as provisions dealing with criminal law (assault, theft) and civil law (slavery, debt). Penalties for breaking the laws varied according to the status of the offender and the circumstances of the offense. The code survives only in the Semitic Akkadian tongue, but it is clear that it was also meant to apply to the non-Semitic Sumerians, representing an integration of the traditions of both peoples.", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY6OVP": "I just got my period today and I am getting a sore throat .these past periods I have been only wearing pads , but in the past I have worn tampons and when I wore them I would wear size regular no matter the flow and always for eight hours , even on days when it turned out I didn t bleed . Also , the last two times I wore tampons during my period I left the tampon in for 10 hours . Im worried I have a mild case of TSS . Also five years ago I became really sick , fever for three weeks straight it occured around the time of my period .", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXGVFB": "You most likely have a urinary tract infection. You need to see your doctor so they can test your urine. You will probably need antibiotics. You could also have something more serious as well. Always best to seek medical care. Im a nurse.", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1MQ8T": "The pediatrician said that he may change at 14 years with eating . Mealtimes are hard because poppa is always at him for fingering his food and nibbling it on the edge . I have tried him with pasta soups etc but hes not interest . You can take a horse to water but you can not nmake them drink it .", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0B2OT": "Drinking water has several health benefits , including lowering blood sugar . Eating vegetables like green peas can help lower blood sugar . Avoiding drinks that are high in sugar , like sweet tea , can help lower blood sugar .", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9EQLHF": "You could send your CV with a SAE ( apparently you get more of a chance of a reply that way ) to every single ageny and agency in there , but only a select few may reply . If you managed to find a genuine and great agent and or agency then if you could be so kind as to let me ( and others ) know , I would be so grateful Follow me  alyharris / 'Like ' me on FB  Alison Harris Hey , I 've just graduated from college and looking for an agent but i have no idea where to start filtering out the good from the bad ! I 've had varied advice such as send to all , or pick out the good ones but i do n't know ! If anyone can help me too I 'd be so grateful ! I already have Contacts and Actor 's Yearbook etc , but I 'd love it if anyone can recommend some agents .", "3X52SWXE0X3JYYT3I3DZ9Z5BUTQCWR": "If you have a red line running from the burn on your hand past your wrist it could already be infected and I would advise that you see a health care provider as soon as possible. You should not use Epsom salts for a burn, or ice. You can submerge the area in cool water. I would also not advise putting any antibiotic ointments or dressings until a health care provider has evaluated it.", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NMZGE": "Good food. would recommend a protein shake and a peanut butter sandwich. If you don't have protein, make yourself a egg sandwich with whole grain bread if available. Also eat some fruit and a favorite snack to avoid being crabby and feeling full but not bloated. earldapearl1 65 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. earldapearl1 earldapearl1 Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8W5ET": "I have a bad cold and I can not smell anything and I'm trying to get my smell back to. Do u still have a cold cause if u do ur maybe plugged up or maybe u can see a doctor   Opinion 2: You dont want to supress your sense of smell. If you really wanna lose your smell, have a car accident and head butt the steering wheel. Thats what I did and i have no sense of smell and have lost have my taste. I cant tell if food if off cause I cant taste, I cant tell if gas has been left on, dont know when a baby has a dirty nappy, cant appreciecte good food, and the list goes on. I wish I could smell purfumes... If it really bothers you go see a ears nose and thoat specialist and they may be able to recommend something.", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NFRKB": "Google returns numerous links of sites that offer free tutorials on hand-drawing anime style cartoons.", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKD9MTQ": "books Summery Novel of Sisters and Honey: Off the Shelf I love a book steeped in summery goodness and brimmin... http://t.co/Co5BVby2Ra", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVD1B6": "Lino The dental work youll be receiving is both affordable and inexpensive compared to prices in the United States and Canada.However, please dont make the mistake of thinking we are cheap dentists offering cheap dental treatments. Just because they are dentists in Mexico does not mean that the results will not be excellent.We do not believe in sacrificing quality and care.", "3VLL1PIENQMO1IVBJV6X33TA098OZL": "This girl's face turns bright red when you were around her after knowing you love her because you make her blood run fast.", "304QEQWKZPIRZXPLF1T5X4QOI2R0O7": "yeah i'm down for that bitches ?", "3P888QFVX3SFNQUKWZNKCAH6V6QOQU": "In reply to Domino, it is a misconception that if it is cancer that you can't move it. I was diagnosed with breast cancer at 25 and had been previously undiagnosed for two years prior because the doctors said that the lump wasn't hard enough and that they could move it so it was nothing. 13.", "3GL25Y6843SBWKAK5X3ZEEOUX9ZXMM": "I would rather be cold. You can always put on more clothing. When your hot your hot. You can be naked and still sweat like a pig.", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZW1PV": "Omg!!! My gym needs this!! Right NOW!!! Like Fabodylous.com for more fitness videos! Category    Opinion 2: Nah I'm 6 ft 1 and taller thn my dad and relatives and I started the gym when I was 14", "311HQEI8RSEHGC3C29PVSH7FAK07ZG": "353.return Source: 'History of the United States of America,' by Henry William Elson, The MacMillan Company, New York, 1904.Transcribed by Kathy Leigh.History of the United States of America Table of Contents  2001-2012 Interesting.com", "3PA41K45VN2N2816F0RT1J510LSP7C": "The ADA also found that 9 out of 10 full-time and part-time dental hygienists received dental coverage. Dental hygienists who work for school systems, public health agencies, the Federal Government, or State agencies usually have substantial benefits. A dental hygienist is a licensed dental professional who specializes in preventive care.", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJFTJU": "Borders doesn't buy textbooks and B  N will rip you off. Your best bet is either amazon.com or half.com You can also try listing the books on facebook, myspace, or around campus. If the books are indeed old editions, you may have a tough time selling them. good luck!", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVGZSU0": "Black paper: Depression, mystery and dark elegance.", "336OE47KI2IFX7Z39K84ZRT0F04WV8": "An underweight woman should gain 28 to 40 pounds, and an overweight woman may need to gain only 15 to 25 pounds.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMTDKW": "I don't know :(", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCGQJD": "yeah but you keep your cool  bring light to cloudy situations", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2X60O": "It would not be advisable, since the Indonesian box turtle, better know as Malayan Box turtle, (Cuora aboinensis) prefers a humid, watery habitat. It should have a shallow tank full of water about half the height of the turtle's shell. Provide some land areas as well. They are a swampy turtle.As for tortoises, they do not like water and cannot swim. Most tortoises are from dry places and rain forests, which cannot be combine with a swampy turtle.One more thing... you should not mix turtles from different regions. You may introduce new 'bugs' to each other, sort of like how Europeans introduced diseases to the native of NA.Here are some caresheets for your boxie and other common torts:http://www.chelonia.org/Articles/Camboinensiscare.htmhttp://www.chelonia.org/Articles/hermannstortoisecare.htmhttp://www.chelonia.org/Articles/iberacare.htm", "3SX4X51T807N0AN373QYMA21RO2AO7": "This is the scariest game to play with your crush ! What age do guys usually start watching porn and masturbating ? And why ? go hand in hand ( no pun intended ) . And yet , the time at which guys begin experimenting with each of these male rites is usually slightly different from one another .", "3OB6JN3A9QNRZOO8WYX7PW26WSBMRC": "The Titanic was a real ship and it really did claim to be unsinkable. There is some debate on why the Titanic hit the iceburg, did Bruce Ismay really did pressure Captain Smith to go faster so he could get his headlines? We will probably never know the whole truth.", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2RST8": "If you follow the 'rules' of food combining strictly... which can be difficult at first, but soon become a 'way of life' you can lose weight naturally... feel full of energy (not starving  hungry or over stuffed  lethargic) feel great all day, eat well with lots of variety  never feel like you are 'dieting' the 'old fashioned 'boring' way...because you can eat all/any foods (just separately at different times) sleep well and wake up feeling great and lose weight! Day by day naturally you will see and feel the difference. Someone once told me that food combining was the real natural way we were meant to eat, that is...our digestive systems were set up to eat this way...i believe it to be true.", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08IT87": "It is a very good idea to have clean hands AND clean teflon tape, especially for gas lines. Just make sure no debris, sawdust, ext. are on the tape when you wrap the threads, because that can cause a leak. Hand-wraps can be washed and go to the drug store and get one of those bags women use for washing their dainties and put your hand wraps in that bag and wash the bag and its contents and then hang them to dry. ... We have to hand it to our hand specialists: They're first-rate finger experts. At Scott White ... Keep dressing clean, dry and intact until follow-up appointment. Wrap your hand in plastic wrap when s... Remove the grime, remove the dating, remove the money the sword is worth. Here's a site that tells you how to take it apart to clean the blade, though! http://fulltangkatanas.com/disassemble-k...", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA90WN5Z": "I don't think there is anyone who doesn't do that at least once in their life.", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHGB7G": "liposuction and butt reduction is the quickest method", "3YLTXLH3DF4KVX7IS9D5SWUVEOPHP7": "I have a friend who lost his senses of smell  taste when a shell blew up near him in 'Nam. Poor guy drinks Bud.", "3J6BHNX0U9QBU2WDIF3A1Z5S6QUKNK": "10l will prob last about 50 cleans if ur using as bedding cage floor will last about 7  50l will last 250 cleans if bedding about   28 cleans if floor", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDSA1K": "Don't expect a miracle, but don't give up before trying either.You're worth the effort.Good luck!", "338431Z1FLDFZR9K9ECKH0RBRSTORW": "In one study, womens orgasms lasted 18 seconds on average, and mens orgasms lasted about 22 seconds. Another study found that a womans orgasms last about 315 seconds, while a mans orgasm is shorter. a The duration of an orgasm is usually just seconds for both men and women, but multiple factors influence exactly how long it will last, including age, period of sexual abstinence, type of sexual stimulation, and whether the orgasm is from masturbation or . c In one study, 85 of men reported that their partner had an orgasm. However, only 64 of their female partners reported experiencing an orgasm, creating what some sexologists call an orgasm gap. b The duration of an orgasm tends to decrease as a person ages. c How often a person experiences orgasm varies considerably among different peoples and cultures. Some societies have recommended that men experience orgasm infrequently because orgasms and ejaculation are considered debilitating.", "37PGLWGSJT4JG1LMLZQIWR9BKRZIK1": "the dentist had to numb me a lot bc it wasnt working and now not only is my lip and tongue numb but so is my cheek and my ear", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2ALCAE": "Hi See Above Answer. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. The opinions expressed here are solely those of the User. User-generated content areas are not reviewed by a WebMD physician. WebMD understands that reading individual, real-life experiences can be a helpful resource, but it is never a substitute for professional medical advice. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 2 of 4 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer", "3LVTFB9DE5GRVDDM8GAC71844KZQG9": "I really feel for you, at such a young age and a mum already. But I admire your courage to stand by your decision and be responsible for the baby. Firstly - the community must have some sort of facilities that can offer you help. I use it all the time myself - eg. helplines for parents, places where you can ask questions about your own health and your baby's. The pulling of the shirt can mean lots of things, we obviously wont know what they are trying to tell us because it could mean so many things! Try the basic things you can do. Is she hungry? Try feeding her. Has she soiled her nappy? Just go through the basic things you can do for a baby. Sometimes babies just want to be close to us, give her a cuddle and hold her close. You mentioned you already feed her. It could mean she has reflux/gas in her stomach. I really dont know because I am not an expert, just a first time mum myself. Try stroking her back and soothing her. The best thing to do is maybe consult your doctor and get her", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R1LI4": "I am sorry that this isn't what you want to hear, but in my mind you are setting yourself up for failure, and I want everyone to have successful weight loss! Don't forget to exercise...strength training and cardio are necessary!! Time at an exert level is the calorie burn. 4) Understand the weight loss rate difference now. Where at the beginning 1200 calories cut a pound from your weight, and now it is closer to 2800 to 3000 calories a pound. Whenever you are trying to lose weight, you should concentrate on these three things which all work together in providing a healthier and quicker weight loss goal for yourself. I have found this combination really successful in my weight loss plans. If you? ?e struggling with weight loss (or would like to lose weight easier) and want to know how to speed up your metabolism, you want to read this article.", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQBFDV": "It really works!If it didn't work you get paid 100 which is way more then the 6 it costs.Good luck!", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G2DS9": "Not just the difference between cramps and other pain ,  but a basic knowledge of your repro system , including where your vagina , cervix , and uterus are exactly . Serkin also advises women to clearly explain their complaints to their doctor because if the patient does not ask the right questions , she wo n't get the right answers. If youre not sure where your period pains fall , keep reading . Weve rounded up some of the more common causes of menstrual pain , as well as tips and treatment info , to help you get informed .", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYCSZN": "News and Events The Writing Center will open for the fall semester on Wednesday, September 9. Our regular hours for the semester will be Monday-Friday, 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. Drop-in hours will be held Sunday-Thursday evenings. Information about drop-ins will be posted when we open. In the meantime, please email us if you have a question. Quick Links", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PX18C": "Here's how to do it: http://pad3.whstatic.com/images/thumb/e/ee/Make-a-Picture-Frame-Step-11-preview-Version-2.jpg/550px-Make-a-Picture-Frame-Step-11-preview-Version-2.jpg http://pad2.whstatic.com/images/thumb/e/ee/Make-a-Picture-Frame-Step-11-preview-Version-2.jpg/300px-Make-a-Picture-Frame-Step-11-preview-Version-2.jpg http://d5kh2btv85w9n.cloudfront.net/7/7a/Make a Picture Frame Step 11 Version 2.360p.mp4 First, glue the frame together, using clamps and angles to keep it firmly in place. You will want to ensure that the angles dry correctly. When the glue has dried, gently hammer in a nail at each of the four corners to secure the pieces together. The nails should be driven into one side of the frame, passing through one piece of wood and into the other, reaching as close to the midpoint of the wood as possible. They should also be placed perpendicular to the line of the joint. Use wood filler to fill any gaps. 7 Insert the glass.", "341YLJU21IXOZLHWWTKEWVNH3RFI2H": "Your piggie will probably die, or become defficient in vitamin c or another vitamin if they are deproved from hay. Guine apigs need a constant supply of timothy hay. Also, guine apigs dont sleep with their eyes closed, they usually sleep with them open, so maybe you should take him too a vet. If he isn'tt as active, just leave him be, all guine apigs have different personalities some are just lazy, some enjoy running around. Not being as active is nothing to worry about, unless he never gets up and walks and just lies in one place all teh time, then he coudl need a vet. Good luck with your pigs", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLEGW1": "Don't give up. Be safe, be careful, and above all, be smart. Do your research before you make your decision. --Staceyanon153657 Post 73 I agree with one of the comments on here: if men had to go through this every month, there would be a cure by now for sure. I have to say, i am absolutely pissed at the fact that i don't even want kids, but still have to go through this crap every month. Bleeding, i can deal with. Abdominal pain? It's horrible. We already have to go through the horror of having kids. Pain every month is really pushing it. The closest thing men have to experience is a kidney stone, and that's what -- once in their lives? I think i speak for all when i say that every new month, all females wish for a sex change. Forget you, periods. anon151217 Post 72 I sympathize with everyone on this forum. I too, experience debilitating cramps and other symptoms related to my period and I want to say that you shouldn't hesitate to talk to your doctor about it.", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV473NR": "If you have any meds such as ibuprofen, take the recommended amounts. Anything warm will help. Hot drinks are a must, such as tea. Hot packs are really god too. Just lay them on your tummy and watch a movie. Hot baths are good too. Chocolate helps, and I also heard that bananas help too! Hope I helped! Opinion 2: hellooo, i thought i would just say that you probably have no cramps and are just exagerating, your mind is unbalancd and thinking negative thoughts, think happy thoughts and they lift you in the air hehe. pretty much what everyone has said heating pads, hot water bottles, lying down, herbal teas, hot bathsm EXCERCISE! although i dont think you would quite be into that hehe bets of luck hun", "39AYGO6AFFI4VNBOGB99RG0A5V7N6F": "Bruises, or ecchymoses, are a discoloration and tenderness of the skin or mucous membranes due to the leakage of blood from an injured blood vessel into the tissues. Pupura refers to bruising as the result of a disease condition. A very small bruise is called a petechia. These often appear as many tiny red dots clustered together, and could indicate a serious problem. Skin rash is a symptom in which a person has changes on part or all of his skin, such as color changes, bumps, blisters, oozing, peeling, itching, bug bites, etc.", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYRMV8": "The main thing she did was to sit on the floor, offer treats - a small amount of chicken or tuna and let the cat come to her. She would approach and then retreat quickly. When she did my sister did not react or reach out to touch - this is critical. It's proven they live longer if it's done and you know there are too many kitty's running around. My female cat (1 year old) already had a litter at 6 months old when I got her. She has since been spayed and she's the sweetest cat I've ever known. No, her personality won't change after she's spayed. The only difference is that she will not go into heat ever again so you no longer have to put up with her yowling, restlessness, and having male cats hanging around your yard. So make sure that you keep her in a room for several hours where she cannot jump or hurt herself in any way. Though she will be wide awake the anesthesia will impair her coordination and judgement for a while.", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEKHK7": "I can totally sympathize with you and understand how frustrating this can be. The worst part is the anxiety you can get from worrying about the anxiety you might get when you go to bed. It's crazy, isn't it? ?????? I have a couple of suggestions for you: 1. Reading takes me far, far away from whatever it is that is on my mind and finally puts me to sleep. Or, go to your local library and checkout books on CD's or books on play-aways (which is like an Ipod you use with ear buds). (Or check out books on night-time anxiety attacks and explore drug-free courses of action therein. Try relaxation exercises: Breath in deeply through your nose. try to hold it for a count of ten. and exhale. Do this 10 to 20 times. Take a warm, relaxing, scented bath before you retire. Borrow or buy a white noise/relaxation machine. Keep the receipt. You will know within 21-25 day if it is helping.", "3QX22DUVOOFJSV5P5I2HQTR9HYQVMG": "These shortened periods seem longer than usual.", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1OQ8V": "Lymph nodes ttp://t.co/Hfn8vgSs2A ttp://t.co/Kb9cM7xQ1L via NME2key", "3GVPRXWRPHSVLME22519SM4PE7Z7IK": "This is something that can be used in social studies to bolster cross curricular Activity Unit contains graphic organizers for an interactive notebook and game activities covering vocabulary , constructive response writing , and skill practice . The City of Ember Book Unit includes vocabulary practice , comprehension quizzes ( including interactive ) , skill practice , and language arts lessons . Activity Unit contains graphic organizers for an interactive notebook and game activities covering vocabulary , constructive response writing , and skill practice. Around Avonleas Green Gables lesson plan  Create an Avonlea landscape of Prince Edward Island , Canada that takes your breath away !", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGW8WS1": "Below are some common causes of toothache or tooth pain that can bring a lot of pain and discomfort in your life. Dental cavities or caries are the most common cause of toothache. Due to holes or cavities in the enamel or outermost white layer of teeth and dentin, the yellowish layer beneath enamel, the pulp becomes exposed to bacterial toxins or food items that are hot, cold, sweet or sour. This leads to toothache. Gum disease is another quite common cause of toothache. It is characterized by the inflammation of the gingiva or soft tissues of the gum, and loss of bone at the base of the teeth. Gum disease is actually triggered by plaque, a combination of food particles, saliva and toxin secreting bacteria that accumulate along the gum line in course of time. Toothache is also caused when the tooth root becomes sensitive to stimuli. Tooth root is the second-third part of tooth that lies buried in the bone surrounding the tooth.", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8K0DVI": "Some grow to 21.", "306W7JMRYYWPYS5F601YKZW7U1LB82": "Five years later, we see no need to alter our response other than to suggest the use of the multiplier a  48271 in place of 16807. This revised constant is used in C11's codice2 random number generator. The Sinclair ZX81 and its successors use the Lehmer RNG with parameters 'n'  2  1  65,537 (a Fermat prime 'F') and 'g'  75 (a primitive root modulo 'F').", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHABT0P": "Most lymph nodes in the body can not be felt . Lymph nodes often swell in one location when a problem such as an injury , infection , or tumor develops in or near the lymph node . Which lymph nodes are swollen can help identify the problem . The glands on either side of the neck , under the jaw , or behind the ears commonly swell when you have a cold or sore throat .", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWRAMC8": "Not through my superior training skills, I wish I could claim it was, nope, he was just really smart. Basically i just took him outside a lot, and when he did his business, I praised him. If he went in the house, I did not take him out. Your puppy likes you just the way you are, so you have to learn to like it back and not be embarrassed. I used to have a puppy before my dog now, Jenna (she was a chihuahua), and I loved her so much even though I was bigger than her. These are a few things that you can do that might make the puppy feel at home. Your puppy?? sleeping quarters should be in a small crate. ?? I had a large crate with a partion and put a blanket over it to make it seem more cozy. It was a pain to potty train her as she would literally just stop and go. No sniffing, circling, etc. Back to your question, it really depends on the type of dog you have.", "3O71U79SRBN303OLBNXCF672IUYSMA": "2, Jai Taurima, Oceania, 8.32 (27 feet, 3 3/4 inches). 4, Kiril Sosunov, Europe, 8.08 (26 feet, 6 1/4 inches). 5, Roland McGhee, United States, 7.79 (25 feet, 6 3/4 inches). 6, Masaki Morinaga, Asia, 7.76 (25 feet, 5 1/2 inches). 6, Dan Browne, United States, 14:22.48. UR Women QC Javelin  1, Joanna Stone, 0ceania, 69.85 (229 feet, 1 inch). 5, Tanja Damaske, Germany, 62.51 (205 feet, 1 inch). 6, Lei Li, Asia, 59.45 (195 feet). 8, Lindy Leveau, Africa, 43.18 (141 feet, 8 inches). 6, Oceania, 3:31.6. It was the third time in as many years that Gyorffy has set the Heptagonal record. As a freshman in 1998, she jumped 6-3 1/4 to shatter the previous standard by 5 inches last year, she added a quarter-inch to that with a leap of 6-3 1/2. On her first tries, she easily hit 6-2, 6-3 1/4, and 6-4 1/4. They gave us everything we expected of them.'' QL QL Dartmouth's men enjoyed a slight lead on Princeton before Scott Denbo won the shot with a throw of 59-3 1/2 to put the Tigers in...", "3OWZNK3RYLNT8CCWQA9SFYBSXMYU2X": "Most of the schools out there that offer a Dental Hygienists program are on the Associates Degree level. Typically this indicates a 2-year program. Very rarely would you see a Dentist require a Bachelor's degree in this area- unless they are looking for someone who could fill in a more than just a hygienist. possibly a business/office manager. In any case- Hygienists are in demand and the education that they receive is intense. If you pass through the program- the Dentists know you can maneuver in an office setting. This is provided that you are going to an accredited school and you will be ready for your states licensing when you are finished. This would probably be a good reason as to why there are so few schools offering the program and the acceptance into a program is so competitive. You see the same type of thing with nursing- there is not much of a difference in pay or job offers between an RN and a BSN. The difference come in when you get the Masters.", "38O9DZ0A62L861MVUSBPZSXCU0H264": "The Japanese bombed Pearl Harbor, Hawaii on December 7, 1941. DECEMBER 7 1941 It was December 7, 1941, which was the date Japan brought the US into the war.", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP582PB": "think it was more anxiety then panic, the panic attacks can affect breathing like yours. Can't explain them!", "3JU8CV4BRLAUNET5WM8VC5RWQA3OP2": "Phil is probably senile. Knicks measured Porzingis at 7' 3' w shoes, 233 pounds, 38 inch vertical. PhilJackson said...", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1PR4L": "Also Im not sure if you are still able to do exercize?I think it would be best to talk to a doctor or nutritionist about this.Good luck!", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGGC1R": "Oh you are going to be just fine!!! You have the want and the urge to draw. And you already do have some experience! Whether you know it or not. All the time that you spend drawing is just teaching yourself more and more. Start by looking at a pic of something that you would like to draw. Then take a ruler and make a tic-tac-toe on the front of it. Then take one square and draw just that square on a piece of paper that has a 2inch by 2inch square in it to draw in. Keep in mind where the lines stop at the edges of the square. You won't be able to tell what you are drawing because you are only drawing 1 piece out of 9. Do this with the rest of the squares that are there to draw. And when you are done. Put them all together and see how close they all come. It probably won't look real good the first time or two but it Will be fun. Here is an excellent link to what I'm talking about. This kind of thing really does help!. Just keep drawing! And be sure to have fun with it no matter what.", "3NBFJK3IOHGOA106T3I8IWD4PJGOGY": "Hello there CherokeesevenThere are several ways that you can fix the problem, which I am led to believe that there are fixes. My husband Greg, has the same problem with his eyes.Just follow the purple steps belowand you are done. INCREASE YOUR FONT SIZE: Squinting at blurred, fuzzy or tiny characters for hours can contribute to CVS. If you have to lean forward or backward to read whats on the screen, the text is too small, says Dr. Gaudet. Increase the point size until you can read it easily while sitting back comfortably in your chair. To increase a fonts point size in a word-processing program such as Word, go to Home  Font  Font Size. To increase point size while reading on the web, in Internet Explorer go to View  Text size and select from Largest to Smallest. CHECK YOUR WORKSPACE: for sources of glare. The monitor acts as a mirror, reflecting shiny walls and light sources.", "33KMQD9OFJCYW2X6JEXC1XEG0RN77O": "13 Year Old Mozart Sings Time After Time: 13 Year Old Mozart Sings Time After Time We are so proud of 13 year ... http://t.co/qSStthyRKq", "3ROUCZ907FSC2EH4HMVGN5M6G58OOM": "There are articles on this topic on this website already  check the articles , please . I would get a bigger tank , ( I think 20 gallon per angelfish ) stop adding chemicals , and if you do get a bigger tank , get a pleco . Hi , I just found this site .", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVPZCZ": "3 teaspoons would be equal to 1 tablespoon. If a teaspoon is equal to 17 calories, a tablespoon will run you around 51 calories. The 51 calories when converted to the Weight Watcher point system, the tablespoon of brown sugar will be equal to 1 point.", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSCQU7": "I know a diabetic who is trying to lose their belly fat as well. Also to lose weight especially belly fat try to consume more protein than carbs. Unfortunately you can't target fat loss, exercise and a sensible diet will help you lose the belly fat but you will also lose the fat on your hips and butt.", "3J94SKDEKINZQ7KXMYL135AGVWXD5A": "liposuction and butt reduction is the quickest method  tae-bo really flattens stomach! You want to flatten your stomach, not starve yourself to death.Good Luck.", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGSJPD": "Im so sorry to hear that you are going through this. I know its difficult  I had lymphoma (non-nodular sclerosis lymphoma to be exact) 15 years ago when I was 18. By the time it was caught, it progressed to stage 3. My doctor gave me 6 months to liveWell Im still kicking 15 years later! IF your doctors say that your white blood cell count looks good, that is a great thing. Also, if they havent rushed you into surgery to do a biopsy of your lymph node, that is also a positive sign that it may not be lymphoma. How swollen is your neck? This can be another indicator. When my neck swelled up, it was the same size as my jaw (i.e. no indent between my jaw and my collar bone). It was HUGE. If you have an infection, it is typical for your lymph nodes to swell a little. They are in overdrive pumping out white blood cells to fight off the infection. That is why they are testing your white cell counts.", "3IVEC1GSLPXD5BJ6V7503DSCO0OJ1B": "The 'doing' was enough.Hope that helps.Let me know if I can offer you anything else.", "33QQ60S6ASGMC29IBN5EWAID0OHU0G": "sure, they should be fine -- just go light on the butter or oil. without the gall bladder, your liver is still producing bile but without the valve machanism to regulate it. A hardboiled egg is healthier than a scrambled one because a scrambled egg is generally egg  milk and fried in butter or oil.", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU600XG": "To see what your guinea pig's eye colour is you just need to look at his/her eyes in sunlight. That's how I found out my guinea pigs Elvis and Jerry-Lee both have brown eyes. -Gamegirl494 Just to update Jerry-Lee died yesterday Sept 24 2009 from an infection and he was only one and a half years old born in Dec 2007 :'( Jrpetkeeper: Guinea Pigs can have black, blue, brown, purple or red.", "3UEDKCTP9VOMRH4Q28ML52J26BM7KT": "Breaking a sweat with weights in an effort for the perfect six pack might be a waste of time . As a new study has found that the best way to burn belly fat is through aerobic exercise . When researchers monitored people who did aerobics for eight months , compared to those who did just weight lifting , the former group lost almost 20 times as much fat around their stomachs .", "3V0TR1NRVA0JWHDLOJBP8CWWAX6A41": "I really don't think that I can wait 8 weeks for a date to see the ... enr doctors they also said its normal you don't have any problem but my .... Its blurry and sometimes I have double vision in it. I too have the spots and headaches everyday. I think Ill try again later when im in the dark room longer as it does ..... When I was a kid I used to see dots in the dark, like the black and ... Usually these waves start covering my sight and sometimes it feels like they are persons. I can't see for a second every time I stand up and sometimes I fall down or bump into things. ... I've always had low blood pressure and am underweight normal ..... but it's starting to go for a little longer and I'd see more b... Since I was a small child, I would lay awake in bed in my dark room ... I normally just see red and dots in my eyelids before my eyes open and adjust to the brightness. ... peripheral vision and see the 'depth' within it, lights start emergin...", "3SSN80MU8CMG6WAHKLQJZ1WQ844KX4": "The symptoms are what you mentioned, plus, sometimes, after a while, blood in the urine and blockage(straining without managing to pee). You need to : a. take a sample of urine for analysis (put a sterile cup under his tail when he pees) or take him to the vet to do it. They need to check for bacteria, PH, invisible blood, and sensitivity of the bacteria found to specific antibiotics. Based on the results, she will be given antibiotics (usually amoxicillin, better injected, or nitrofurantoin) and special diet (Hills c/d or Royal Canin Urinary). Also, giving her a lot of water (canned food with extra water) helps, but only combined with the medication. For kidney disfunction, they do a blood test (urea and creatinine). it is a simple problem when you deal with it quickly. You have a dog, he pees, his pee is high in ammonia....pure nitrogen, and concentrated the way it is on your lawn, much like too much fertilizer, can burn the area. will reduce the effects of the acidness of the pee...", "36AZSFEYZ4YN941SETC8CDGF5ZMBV7": "if they haven't been cutting for long, its probably not a habit yet...which is good. i've been a cutter for awhile now so at this point if anyone tried to stop me i know i wouldn't. try to spend as much time with them as you possibly can, and talk to them about their problems or whatevers stressing them out. i think it is VERY important to show you care, not only that but to take extreme measures to show you care because sometimes its hard for cutters to accept the fact that someone does care about them. if they don't like talking about their problems, just try making it clear to them how upset it makes you, and chances are they care about how you feel and might stop if they know its hurting you. also encourage them to see a counselor or get a therapist..if they don't want to talk to an adult there are a bunch of online chatrooms where you can just vent to strangers. its really important that this habit doesn't form because they might just start out cutting a little but eventually th", "3NQUW096N661P6A125W6YYNNQ1F9LA": "You can just call it Dragon but in a different language, it would be interesting and make a reader wonder what it means. This site has dragon in almost every language: http://dragonsinn.net/say.htm I hope this helps.", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6GFW3": "Try this: Cornish hens with a flavorful glaze. 4 Cornish hens salt and pepper 1/2 cup melted butter, divided 1 can (12 to 16 ounces) pineapple slices 1 cup chicken broth 1/2 teaspoon ground ginger 2 teaspoons cornstarch Directions for glazed Cornish hens Season cavity of Cornish hens with salt and pepper. Brush Cornish hens with half of the melted butter. Place 2 pineapple slices on top of each hen. Talbot cavity A talbot cavity is an external cavity used for the coherent combining of output from multiple laser diodes arranged in an array. Hiccups occur when a spasm contracts the diaphragm, a large sheet of muscle that separates the chest cavity from the abdominal cavity. This spasm causes an intake of breath that is suddenly stopped by the closure of the vocal cords (glottis). This closure causes the characteristic 'hiccup' sound. Full stomach can be caused by: Eating too much too fast. Sudden change in stomach temperature, such as drinking a hot beverage and then a cold beverage.", "3JMQI2OLFZ33GWQ3QYHNXMA2MHVND8": "Here is a list and baby name websites!I have 5 girls and these are the names my husband and I chose: Britney Alyssa Kiana Danae Dana Nicole Alyssa Jo Andrea Shae  There are alot of girls in our family that may help chose a middle name for you: Quinn Aubrey Talia Jenna Taryn Madison Alexandra Mia Paige Jaelyn Seirra  http://www.babynamesearch.com/middle-names.htm  Middle Names at Keep Kids Healthy Baby Name Guide  http://www.babynames.org.unames-dictionary.htmk/ These are two good books on Amazon.com to help choose baby names", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2YKWB": "Actually, the muscles you are tightening to cut off your stream of urine are your PC muscles. The exercise you are doing by tightening the PC muscles is called Kegals. Strengthening the PC muscles leads to better orgasms. As long as you are not holding pee in your bladder for a long time prior to urinating, you will be fine. Stopping the stream of urine while peeing will not cause any harm, and it's an easy way to practice Kegals. Best of Luck!", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBVOJ0": "which of the following is NOT one of the concerns ... Both are trying to increase the ... jesse performs better on the schools achievement test than any ...", "31KSVEGZ34QN40IM003UYU4XUUPRW8": "i consider hip hop a way of life for some people they live and breath it . People that listen to hip hop embrace the culture even with the way they dress. some artists like 50 cents, jay z,kanya west, p diddy. one dance move thats is really a hip hop move would be called crunking You can lose wieght in 50 minutes only.", "3MJ9GGZYO349T3YYK5S1FXZYQJ72AU": "Depends on the type of vestibular injury you sustained. First, ask your doctor who he/she recommends for vestibular PT. Vestibular neuronitis is another term that is used for the same clinical syndrome.", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9E24M": "BP  gt 150/100 should be evaluated by a physician.Normal pulse islt 100 beats per minute", "329E6HTMSW04QY330WJVSL7M1923KM": "Nettle is rich in vitamins A , C , D and K , as well as calcium , potassium , phosphorous , iron and sulfur . The calcium content makes it an excellent herb to take for easing leg cramps and muscle spasms s calcium content also affects the uterus , helping to diminish pain ( including during and after birth ) . Alfalfa is rich in essential vitamins and minerals , like those found in nettle .", "3ATYLI1PRT0Y13Q7193BF95KHBXOJ2": "There are 12 inches in a foot therefore you are exactly 5 foot 10", "3O2Y2UIUCQSZ6AJWKRKXTUWJ4Z8FK8": "Try to wash your face with some good soap or even simply with water many times a day. for eg..8-9 times.at regular intervals. I have very oily skin.", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C25WA": "Taylor (large mutt) likes to play keep away, tug and rarely fetch. He's getting better at fetch though. His favorite thing to do is dressage. It's so funny because he is a dog. When he is playing keep away, he pounds the ground with his front paws and does movement just like a dressage horse. lol!! Have to record and show one day. He even knows how to side step with the bounce and a bit of hyperflexation. Teensy LIVES for fetch on any day. Kinda loves the tug toy but mostly her ball. Plays keep away sometimes, we both get our exercise. lol!", "3KQC8JMJGCQDO82VUBGYFTRU9SYH3W": "2'' is the size you say, which means 2-3 cory will have enough space in 1 gallon water for the timebeing, thus 10-15 cories are good enough, though you have to keep in mind that you would need a bigger tank after about a year. Two fit easily in a one gallon tank as they are only about an inch and a half long. You could fit them into nearly any size tank.", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KYDVG": "The only one who can help is a vet. He might or might not be able to figure out the cause of the seizures, but he can certainly give you medication (such as phenobarbital) that reduces the frequence of their occurrence. As for the possible stroke (and that's what it sounds like to me too, but I'm not a vet), not much can be done, but usually the animal does recover to near normal within a few weeks. I hope that's the case with your little guy. EDIT: I had a dog with Cushings (a tumor in the pituitary gland). For the first year after being diagnosed, he had occasional seizures. When they became frequent (about every 3 weeks), we put him on phenobarbital. He lived just over another year and had only 2 seizures the entire time. However, phenobarbital is very hard on the liver, and he was in the mid-stage of liver failure at the end (he didn't die of that, however). Keep in mind this was an old dog anyway (14.", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5552Q": "Keratosis pilaris results in small bumps on the skin that feel like rough sandpaper. They are skin-colored bumps the size of a grain of sand, many of which are surrounded by a slight pink color in light skinned people and dark spots in dark skinned people. Most people with keratosis pillars do not have symptoms but the bumps in the skin can occasionally be itchy.", "3PZDSVZ3J5FQG07AXNGUUIGW943N4W": "Guenther Mader, Austria, (2:04.03/1:41.38) 3:45.41 3. Alessandro Fatelli, Italy, (2:04.34/1:45.44) 3:49.78 5. Patrik Jaerbyn, Sweden, (2:05.55/1:49.96) 3:55.53 10. Jean-Luc Brassard, Canada, 28.17 3. Mikko Ronkainen, Finland, 27.70 5. Natalya Baranova, Russia, 3:50.1 2. Anke Reschwamm, Germany, 3:50.6 3. Viola Bauer, Germany, 3:51.1 4. Yelena Burukhina, Russia, 3:51.5 5. Marit Roaldset, Norway, 3:54.1 6. Frode Jermstad, Norway, 3:16.1 2. Thobias Fredriksson, Sweden, 3:16.9 3. Mikael Oestberg, Sweden, 3:17.3 4. Jan Egil Anderson, Norway, 3:17.5 5. Anders Hoegberg, Sweden, 3:17.7 6. Marc Mayer, Austria, 3:37.5 Nordic Combined 1. Mario Stecher, Austria, 19:30.9 3. United States (Brian Shimer-Paul Jovanovic), 1:55.19 4. Canada (Pierre Lueders-Ben Hindle), 1:55.58 4. Kenji Ogiwara, Japan, 246.5/38:36.5, at 1.5 seconds 3. Jari Mantila, Finland, 251.5/39:55.9, at 50.9 4. Halldor Skard, Norway, 225.0/38:15.5, at 1:49.5 5. Felix Gottwald, Austria, 217.5/38:47.0, at 3:06.0 10.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23E02H8": "I've done this a few times. I used to never dye my hair even though I wasnbsp. very prematurely gray/white. Im talk about finding a few gray hairs in my teens. My natural hair color --before the white started coming-- was very dark, so thenbsp. white shows up like theres a spotlight on it. My family on my dads side is Irish American of the Black Irish variety. This means that one day my hair will look like Phil Donahues. So, I just left it until I had anbsp. big mopnbsp. of salt-n-pepper wavy/curly hair. In my 30s I was in grad school, in a male dominated field, with a bunch of people that were a decade younger than me, and I looked a hell of a lot older than I was. I was being called quot. Maamquot. by peers. So, I decided to start dying it. I figured Id let it grow out again one day when it looks like itll actually be that nice white all over instead of salt-n-pepper.", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0V2MD": "Lower Back Pain Noise in my spine Welcome to Spine-healths Lower Back Pain patient community. You can also read doctor approved Lower Back Pain Articles and watch Lower Back Pain Videos . 15 posts / 0 new Title: Member Noise in my spine 4 years ago I had double back surgery to have a tumor removed from my L4. I now have a synthetic vertebra and am fused from L3-L5. Yesterday morning I reached for a cup of coffe and I heard a large pop in my lower right side of my back. I froze when it happend thinking I would experience alot of pain and was nervous. When I was getting dressed I bent over to put my pants on and my spine made a grinding noise. Long story short, some times when I breathe I can feel the odd sensation in my spine, if I bend over, I feel it, bend my neck, twist my back or reach for something, I feel it. I saw the PA at my neurologist's office yesterday and I have a CT next Friday..earliest I could get in. I was given pain meds as well as muscle relaxers. The noise is so cre", "372AGES0I432T0NCA5ZG0DI43WXXR9": "You need to examine WHY you are anxious. This is sometimes difficult to get to but figuring out what triggers you and why is the first step to getting control over it.The most important thing to remember, is that YOU are in control.I used to have terrible panic attacks and then one day I realized... i am doing this to myself?? WHY?? After that I began to really look at things and see what was going on and how I could find ways to change it. Ultimately, I gained control over myself and my panic attacks and thus, my life. I think too many people get to thinking they are out of control and all of these things become self-propagating problems (we think they are getting worse, so they do). I strongly believe that life is not about getting RID of our neuroses, it is about learning to live with them and appreciate them for making use the unique people that we are! Good luck my friend...", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKNCVG": "wow, girl! there are too many!try any S.E. Hinton books, like the outsiders or that was then this is now, or try ny paul zindel like the pig man and a bagonnia for miss appealbaum. Each extremely depressing, if that's what you're after.", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE15IP2": "Yes, the symptoms you are describing is of someone using it. You will lose weight, you won't be able to sleep anymore, you will have violent behaviours, you will smell awful and I could go on and on. Get out while you can. I destroy homes  I tear families apart. I take your children and thats just a start. The sorrow I bring is a sight to behold. I live all around you, in school and in town. I live with the rich, I live with the poor. I can be made under the kitchen sink, In your childs closet, and even out in the woods. If this scares you to death, then it certainly should. I have many names. When I possess you, youll steal and. I take kids from their parents I take parents from their kids. But you came to me, not I to you. You could have said no and then walked away. I can take your life and make it so dim and sore. I can show you more misery than words can tell. Edit to:aldebran: haha, so CTU is nuts I won't say anything cause you can't speak to people on drugs. To hell with everyone els", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481S2BP": "PP...you a cavity? Brush em brush em brush em!", "3BFNCI9LYKOGVJWJH2UMOG20VP073I": "When it is love, you will not have to ask anyone.", "3E22YV8GG14C5TTTV78IXGRR000NPO": "A lump in the armpit or above the collarbone that does not go away may be a sign of cancer. Most breast lumps are not cancerous. Sometimes a person develops lumps during their period. Signs that suggest a lump is more likely to be cancerous: The lump is firm and hard The lump is not discrete it is not easily distinguishable The lump is fixed in the breast it does not move There is only one lump There is not an identical lump in the opposite breast The skin of breast is dimpled The lump is accompanied by bloody nipple discharge Signs that suggest a lump is less likely to be cancerous: The lump is soft The lump is discrete it is easily distinguishable The lump moves in the breast There are multiple breast lumps There is an identical lump in the opposite breast The lump disappears after the menstrual cycle As women we should check our breasts monthly preferably a week after our pereods. I hope that yoursare just a lump and that you will be fine Good Luck sometimes there are no sympt...", "3VCK0Q0PO5C9HCP9EMTSIFQJSSO0NU": "try downloading google chrome, maybe the problem is internet explorer thnx )", "3DFYDSXB2WYTE8A4XVFKEFX9ZXKUJK": "Drink plenty of settled (declorinated) water upon awakening to wash toxins out of the body and prevent colds. Combined with Ester C in the morning this cures sore ... Free Online Games at 108GAME.com. Awesome action games, puzzle games, adventure games, multiplayer games, skill games  best action games.", "3HRWUH63QU08CJBABSZ4ZAMA90W5NH": "It could be anything, please go to a doctor...even if you are a virgin, you can still get things like warts, etc. from other sexual contact, etc...it could be skin cancer, it could be anything, please get it checked out. There are sites like webmd where you can compare symptoms, and the CDC has photos of certain diseases and conditions...but you really should get to a doctor.", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPU1LW": "I take the birth control pill all month long. In a pak, there are 3 weeks worth of quot. realquot. pills, then quot. sugarquot. pills to take during your period. I just throw out the sugar pills, and when i finish the 1st three weeks of one pak, I immediately start another. It is totaly safe. If you think about it, in the days before the pill, women were pregnant 10, 11, 12 years in a row, just popping out kids every year, so they never had periods. It will also protect you from uterine cancer down the road. You can ask your doctor to write a letter to your insurance company explaining why you need this, it's called Dysmenorrhea (painfull periods). There is the depo provera shot every 3 months in case you don't want to take a pill every day, but it's downside is spotting all the time.", "35A1YQPVFEEGYI0JECMCU2QTN15I5H": "Well someone who listens, first and foremost!!!! I could write a lot on this but will leave it at that. Every time I go to the doctors and they do a culture it is the same thing negative. Not sure if your doctor tested you for other things or if he/she just did a basic exam and didnt find anything in that.", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1FKQ5": "I loved your question, because I had no idea what herbst and forsus even were let alone the difference. So I just had to find out and. This is want I was able to fine. The Forsus spring is a new development which has been tested in a clinical study to establish when it can be used and to compare it with its predecessors. Overall, two thirds of the adolescents found the Forsus spring better than the appliance previously used to correct their Class II malocclusion, such as headgear, activator or Class II elastics. Conclusion: The Forsus spring has stood the test in clinical application. It is a good supplement to the Class II appliance systems already available http://www.springerlink.com/content/5g3e5wg8juhhu8pd/ I also found this web site that has more information as well photos, I thought that should be able to help you know more about them http://multimedia.3m.com/mws/mediawebserver?66666UuZjcFSLXTtoX6MX46EVuQEcuZgVs6EVs6E666666-- I hope this help you http://www.insurancecompany.com", "3X2YVV51PU2ZBVJ526OFS3MKQWUW1G": "But it's not just any coffee.", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDJF3U": "If you use the birth control pill  that is, an oral contraceptive  you're probably happy with its convenience and reliability. Will a pregnancy test be accurate if you're taking the birth control pill? You can get accurate results from a pregnancy test while you're on the pill. Still, the birth control pill is a potent estrogen. Once you learn that you're pregnant, stop taking the birth control pill. Do birth control pills cause weight gain? Women often blame the birth control pill for weight gain. The effect of birth control pills on breast cancer risk isn't quite clear. Do birth control pills affect cholesterol levels? Birth control pills can affect cholesterol levels. Progestin in birth control pills has the opposite effect. Do birth control pills affect blood pressure? Birth control pills may increase blood pressure. When you no longer need contraception, hormone therapy is a better option for managing uncomfortable menopausal vasomotor symptoms, including hot flashes and night sweats.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMQKD0": "If shedding is a problem for you, a husky is not a good choice for your next dog. I would recommend a non-shedding or low shedding breed such as poodle, maltese, bichon frise, or any of the wire coated terriers. Huskies shed/dig/howl.", "38EHZ67RIMQ0AYFUGN3VQSOZUJ3GMD": "I have a BIG problem: Twice last week I went out to the bar and BOTH ... be having trouble getting an erection when a BEAUTIFUL girl is literally ... Losing erection with my wife (1 replies): .... I am also 21 years old and same problem is facing. If you get super upset about it, it will get worse since you'll be psyching yourself out about over and over. Ask your wife to be supportive as well (I'm hoping she already is). If she gets upset about it, it will make you feel worse. Or if your relationship with this girl is bad and you don't truly want to sleep with her, your body could be stopping you. Or if the girl is so HOT that it intimidates you, losing your confidence could cause you to lose your erection. go to a gay bar and find hot hung cute blonde blue eyed guys like me hons with io inches of cock hons. you wont lose erection with us hot hung cute surfing dudes like us hons. hot hung blonde blue eyes bubble butts hons.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8YE54": "The Code of Hammurabi is one of the most ancient written law known to men. Hammurabi, the king, reigned from 1792 to 1750 BC. Code of Hammurabi The Code of Hammurabi (also known as the Codex Hammurabi and Hammurabi's Code), created ca. For a comprehensive summary, see Babylonian law. Hammurabi (1728 BC-1686 BC) felt he had to write the code to please his gods. The Code of Hammurabi was one of many sets of laws in the Ancient Near East. The earlier Ur-Nammu, of the written literature prolific Ur-III dynasty (21st century BC), also produced a code of laws, some of which bear resemblance to certain specific laws in the Code of Hammurabi. 1200 BC - under Moses) also has some laws that resemble the Code of Hammurabi, as well as other law codes of the region. Consider the first written law called the 'hammurabi'. Look at Islamic shariah law...its almost a total plagarism of the pagan Hammurabi...BUT...LOOK YOURSELF...DONT TAKE MY WORD FOR IT...COMPARE THEM 'cut of the hand of the theif' ...", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYJJR8": "Foot and ankle tendonitis is a common cause of foot pain. ... Tendons are the strong, cord-like bands of connective tissue that link muscles to bone. If a tendon is made to work too hard, for too long or in the wrong way, damage .... ... Know it is very hard as you have no confidence that the ankle will hold, but small goals every day helps. ... and if I take care to walk using heel, ball, toe my gait improves too! .... Specifically where? It's too vague and there's several bones in the area, could be many things. In either case, you still need to consult with your doctor to determine the extent of the damage and see what your options are. If you are a young person, show your parents because you need an x-ray on this ankle soon. Telling your parents is important because you need your ankle to be strong for about 70 more years so take care of it now.", "386T3MLZLNTOE5258K490I0O3XN084": "Obviously the unresolved issues you have with your baby's daddy are weighing on your mind and your subconcious. Combined with the variety of stresses/stessors of everyday life and including a child, the baby daddy issues are creeping into your rest. Take care to resolve these issues so you can get on with the rest of your life.", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S4258WH": "This feature is not available right now . Please try again later . Simple instructions on how to sew a pillow for your favorite pet . When autoplay is enabled , a suggested video will automatically play next . How to Make an iPad or Tablet Sleeve- DIY Tutorial How to Make a Dog Bed With Pillows : Tips for Dog Lovers Sew a Skirt with Deborah Kreiling from Simplicity Patterns I Creativebug", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA2YLQ": "The pentagon is not a person :)", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QW7YP": "The Price Of Life (4:10) 12.Show A Little Kindness (5:00) 13.Time Is Your Gaoler (4:02) 14.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PVDEA": "Douillard's LifeSpa Privacy Policy Terms of Use Copyright  2015 Dr.Douillard's LifeSpa Top Dr.Douillards LifeSpa 6662 Gunpark Dr East, Suite 102 Boulder, CO 80301 US t: 866-227-9843 e: infoatlifespa.com", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO90CB": "Get a loofah on a stick , lather that puppy up well with cetaphil and scrub away . I dont know how much a primal diet affects acne but for certain the condition of our skin is an indicator of health . I can tell when my daughter is going to flare with crohns based on her skin-acne , rashes , dry skin etc .", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BKPQA": "By the time of his death Frederick had lost much of central Italy, and his support in Germany was uncertain. Golden Bull of Sicily The Golden Bull of Sicily (, ) was a decree issued by Frederick II, Holy Roman Emperor in Basel on 26 September 1212 that confirmed the royal title obtained by Ottokar I of Bohemia in 1198, declaring him and his heirs Kings of Bohemia. The kingship signified the exceptional status of Bohemia within the Holy Roman Empire.", "3DA79LNS59T3THTQU5XNTCUIKMVT3K": "The leopard gecko often eats the skin as it sheds, but this is normal behavior. If it looses its appetite that is normal. If you see remnant skin still on the lizard after the shedding process, he may need some help.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG543LZ1": "Less than an hour. I worked for thirty minutes at Buffalo Wild Wings in Massillon, Ohio. The shift manager yelled at me on my first day, having not even clocked an hour into the job because I wasn't saucing the wings properly. I told him to go F himself and walked out.", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWH9NE": "I've got heaps.......Some of these aren't from WWE.SHOP.COM!This is my collection since I was four years old and pretty much anything to do with wrestling that I have been involved in!NOTE: Some of these belong to my brother.... OK!Where do I start!LOL!Here we go...sorry it's so long, I've been a fan since 3-4 years old so I have loads of stuff!I have got......... -30 WWE DVDs.-VHS, I have too much to count.-6 music cd's of WWE aswell.-I have got every issue of WWE magazine from the past 4-5 years and I've got others from way back.-10 video games aswell.-35 WWE shirts.I'm serious!-I have never missed a RAW, Smackdown, ECW or PPV in the last 8 years!-I have met 27 wrestlers and some I have met over 4 times.-I've been to 23 live events!I've been to 9 RAW shows, 8 Smackdown shows, 2 Royal Rumbles, 1 Summerslam (I sat fron row! ), 2 Unforgivens and I even went to WrestelMania 21 where I sat in the 11th row!-I have about 40 autographs!They are all framed!-I always watch TNA.But WWE is 1.", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GNQY5": "How far do you intend to take this, and would your mother approve? Temujin, later to be known as Genghis Khan would be my pick as the greatest conquerer of all time. genghis khan's armies invaded half of the known world''.", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG63J2T": "I have searched extensively and there is no such groupThere are a couple of similarly sounding group: 3 days til dawn and 3 days to darkness that only appear to be on Myspace.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MO2VNI": "Flu at epidemic levels in U.S., deadly for children: ATLANTA (Reuters) - As epidemic flu spreads across the Un... http://", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMUDLV": "The quot. dander,quot. or skin shedding, of an animal is more potent in causing allergic reactions than the animal's fur or hair. In addition to the skin sheddings and fur, allergic reactions can occur to the saliva and/or urine of cats, dogs, and horses. The scope of the animal allergy problem is enormous. These allergies are believed to affect up to 20 of North Americans and are directly related to the increasing popularity of pets, particularly cats and dogs. CatsThe most well-known indoor allergy is probably due to Felis domesticus, the domesticated cat. The main allergen is a protein that is produced by the sweat glands (sebaceous glands) in the skin and appears in the skin flakes or dander that are shed from cats. The allergen is also found to a lesser degree in the fur, saliva, and urine of cats. Even with a past history of tolerance to cats, it is possible for a person with an allergic tendency to develop a sensitivity to cats after constant exposure.", "3PEG1BH7AEP9TT7GFPY1A45YP1EBKK": "puts a lot of strain on your eyes. it is also recommended to have a light on while looking at a screen. it relieves some of the strain caused by focusing on a bright light in a dark room. If you spend lots of time looking at a computer screen, you could be at risk for computer vision syndrome, or CVS. Learn more from WebMD about its effect on the ?? Nov 8, 2007 ... Despite the brief reprise your vision remains cloudy, causing the words on the ... Staring at a computer screen qualifies as well, though monitors?... This may e a problem with Craig's List unless they list their business or you follow up as a prospective candidate specifically to establish the identity of these miscreants. Ever have blurred vision when looking away from the screen? ... However, improperly-placed lighting can actually cause problems due to screen glare or over-illumi...", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO09ZI1": "Average penis size between 5.5' to 6.5', this are result based on survey of 600 people, within age between 19 to 30 in USA. And the length is measured along the head of the penis from tip to abdomen. Opinion 2: It's normal. The average is in the 5 to 6 inch range, and to develop an average there's smaller and larger guys. You seem to be right in the middle. Flaccid/soft size really doesn't matter. As long as you can go to the restroom with it it's fine. In addition, some guys are small when soft, but grow a lot when erect, nicknamed 'growers'. Those that already look large when soft but don't grow much when erect are nicknamed 'show-ers'. Here's a few links that show the average erect penile size: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Humanpenis... Other studies that claim larger numbers are studies in which the guy measures himself (read: exaggerated or wrongly measured, hence why the 'average' goes down with age after teens)", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPIKTPT": "You're staring at the computer screen too much. Take a break every half hour. If it doesn't go away you have a neurological problem or other problem. Opinion 2: stress   Opinion 3: Maybe your friend just can't help it. She could go to a doctor there maybe something they could do to fix it.", "39O0SQZVJN58ELHLSSVI6E5G13GR76": "Personally, I think the information you've read is more marketing hype than truth.Personally, I think the information you've read is more marketing hypethan truth. Coconut oil is a saturated fat and believe me, there's enough saturated fat in everyone's diet that they don't need to supplement with it. Saturated fat isalso the sort of fat that you'd want to avoid if you're trying to lose weight. You have only so many calories you can consume daily and if you're filling them with saturated fats from coconut oil then you're not going to have room for 'essential fatty' acids that will make a difference in your health. About the misleading notion that coconut oil metabolizes like a carbohydrate -a fat is a fat and your body digests it as a fat.Coconut oilwon't 'metabolize' like a carbohydrate - they are two different compounds and your body digests and absorbseach one differently.", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV22KA": "download? i don't know about that, but maybe you should buy it from a bookstore. sure the books is available because the movie is on cinema now. Opinion 2: Sorry, I don't think it's available online. It's still copyrighted. How about the library? Opinion 3: Not online. Its illegal, if I remember right. You have to pay for the book. You can go to a public library and get it free, though. If you have connections, borrow it from a friend. Its a book worth reading, I'll tell yeh'. lol, good luck. Obviously, I don't know much. You can probably discard my answer.", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GOYQE": "She has elite totals in both weight classes. raw weight class are 203.93 lbs. for squat, 181.88 lbs. for bench press, and 301.33 lbs. for deadlift best competition total in that weight class is 688.95 lbs. raw weight class are 254 lbs. for squat, 181.88 lbs. for bench press, and 336 lbs. at the 2004 USAPL Senior National Championships, and another world record total of 2,529 lbs. Brian held the IPF world record in the bench press of 775.5 lbs. (352.5 kg), and total(squat, bench press and deadlift) of 2,596 lbs. (1,180 kg) in the 125 kg(super heavyweight) weight class. He set two world records, squatting 854 lbs and a three lift total of 2,226.6 lbs beating the former world record holder, Konstantin Konstantinovs of Latvia, by over 50 lbs. On March 24, 2013, Efferding broke the old raw Total record in the 275-pound-class held by Jon Cole since 1972: At the event called 'March Madness' Efferding set the record to 2,303 lbs with an 865.2 lbs squat, a 600.7 lbs bench press and an 837.5 ...", "3K3IX1W4S6P5LAZ4M33DBA7R1TZPA4": "It takes aproximately 28 days for the guppy to give birth. Once she has given birth to all her fry, you should take her out because most fish are known to eat their fry. Feeding: To feed the fry you must either use infusia, egg yolk, baby brine shrimp, or fish flakes. You should feed the fry about 3 times a day. The size of guppies vary, but males are typically long, while females are long. Two or three generations of guppies per year occur in the wild. Young guppies school together and perform antipredator tactics. Male guppies mature in 7 weeks or less. Female guppies' reproductive success is also related to age. Female guppy choice plays an important role in multiple mating. The rate and duration of courtship display of male guppies also play an important role in female guppies' mating choice. Guppies are highly prolific livebearers. Guppies prefer water temperatures around for reproduction. The female guppy has drops of two to 200 fry at a time, typically ranging between 30 and ...", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN5AI4C": "Homemade skin care tips for oily skin  Natural skin care tips for oily skin  Skin care tips for oi http://t.co/QWSPzZhofg", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3454YNU": "Human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) , to find out if you are pregnant. Testosterone , an androgen . Androgens at high levels can block ovulation and cause acne, male-type hair growth on the face and body, and hair loss from the scalp. Prolactin , which can play a part in a lack of menstrual cycles or infertility. Cholesterol and triglycerides , which can be at unhealthy levels with PCOS. Thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) to check for an overactive or underactive thyroid. Adrenal gland hormones, such as DHEA-S or 17-hydroxyprogesterone . An adrenal problem can cause symptoms much like PCOS. Glucose tolerance and insulin levels, which can show insulin resistance . Testing for problems from PCOS Diabetes. If you have PCOS, experts recommend that you have blood glucose testing for diabetes by age 30. 3 You may have this done at a younger age if you have PCOS and other risk factors for diabetes (such as obesity, lack of exercise, a family history of diabetes, or gestational diabetes during a", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI67YIB": "yeah text it to me! When mine starts getting bad again I will probably go to her! Like as of now I have it under control but", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6SZ6RP": "It could be a canker sore. Cold sores do not usually appear inside the mouth. Canker sores are a bit of a mystery, but they can occur at any age. They are not contagious. You just get them. There are two types of canker sores: Simple canker sores. These may appear three or four times a year and last up to a week. They typically occur in people between 10 and 20 years of age. Complex canker sores. These are less common and occur more often in people who have previously had them. The exact cause of most canker sores is unknown. Stress or tissue injury is thought to be the cause of simple canker sores. Certain foods - including citrus or acidic fruits and vegetables (such as lemons, oranges, pineapples, apples, figs, tomatoes, and strawberries) - can trigger a canker sore or make the problem worse. Sometimes a sharp tooth surface or dental appliance, such as braces or ill-fitting dentures, might also trigger canker sores. Some cases of complex canker sores are caused by an underlying h...", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEA7567": "And I know that you didnt want anyone to say this, but I think he should move on. Obviously she doesnt care enough about him to think about his feelings. She doesnt deserve another second of his time. He might need to stay single for a while because if he just jumps into a relationship, there's more of a chance he'll get hurt. So my advice, lose jaymie, get himself straight and move on from there! The blood doesnt circulate around their bodies properly coz they're not moving. This is why soldiers on guard that remain motionless for very long periods wiggle their toes intheir boots, to keep the blood moving. My back is stiff, so I try to move. I move my legs and it's as if someone tied cement blocks to them. A creeping sensation moves up my legs, and I stop trying to move them. I try to call out, but my mouth doesnt want to move - like I am wearing a clay mask and it has dried. I can't move my legs!", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0DIZO": "I thought i had hiv or std and got myself tested all of which came out as negative Thank God! ... On that same day, I noticed a few red spots on the tip of my penis (at .... These last 2.5 Months have been the most difficult for me in my 28?... I have a bump on the shaft of my penis but it has been there for at least ten ... And what test to men do to find out if they have been exposed to HPV? ... I noticed these little bumps like a couple of months ago on my penis, ...... Aug 18, 2015 ... for 3 days, the test results came back negative so I went back again ... the std tests came back fine and there was nothing wrong with the ... I also think I have a yeast infection as the head of my penis is a bit ... With that being said you can get the warts anywhere on the body mouth, shaft of the penis, scrotum, or anus, but are most common at the tip of the penis. In women, the warts occur on the outside and inside of the vagina, cervix, or anus.", "3O0M2G5VC605RY3GWDXPCHLC4FP49H": "When I was six years old, I was literally 'run over' by a horse. The left side of my skull was crushed into my brain. (I still have a horseshoe shaped scar you can ... In A Brother's Price, Cira has some really ugly scars. If you think her face looks bad, wait until you see her back. She got them in the explosion that killed her ... Learn how to do just about everything at eHow. Find expert advice along with How To videos and articles, including instructions on how to make, cook, grow, or do ... Lisa I have not been diagnosed as having any kind of cancer, yet the first GYN ontological surgeon I visited recommended a total hysterectomy, even though my CA-125 ... Save on EarthLink's award-winning Internet services for your home: dial-up, DSL, high-speed cable  more. Plus, web hosting  software. Connect with us! ... 2473 A 2469 my 2436 first 2433 people 2410 new 2302 any 2299 should ... 571 US 570 problems 568 To 568 ... 64 crash 64 wooden 63 ...", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLRVR6": "Via email , text message , or notification as you wait on our site . 35 years experience as veterinary tech and 20 years experience doing reptile rescues . our sons baby bearded dragon ate 6 mealworms and has become impacted -- he is under lights , temp is about 100 in bask spot and he keeps having a seizuer where he opens his mouth and falls and I pick him up and hold him and he is okay -- we have tried a couple of warm baths , what can we do -- it is sunday and not vet open 35 gallon tank , he is 21/2 months old , he has flukers pellets and crickets dusted in flukers cricket diet and we have uvb light and baskinglight , substrate is reptile carpet he is not passing anythinhg right now , he is trying to , but seems to have seizure under the lights and ipens his mouth wide like he is trying to vomit , i pck him up and he calms down and i put him back under the light , cage temp under bask light is 90 Ask-a-doc Web sites : If you 've got a quick question , you can try to get an answer from", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKDCTM0": "Men's chests and nipples are as sensitive as women's. However, as the majority of men regard breast stimulation as what is done to a woman and is not a macho thing, they tend to block this sensation. Would you want to be showing your breast?", "36FQTHX3Z3P3XVZ9UJ62TIOWEFRB38": "1 of 4 Hip Exercise Can Help Improve Your Golf Swing Weight Shift, Rotation Use to navigate. Photo Credit: pinbokeplanet/Flickr A good weight shift and a good hip rotation are essential parts of a good golf swing. But if your hip muscles are tight and weak, you're more likely to quot. achievequot. hip slide, rather than hip rotation. And that's not a good thing. On the following pages we'll see an excercise designed to strengthen muscles that can help you improve your golf swing weight shift and hip rotation. 1 of 4 Show All 1 2 Hip Slide vs. Hip Rotation 3 Hip Strength Exercise 4 Weight Shift Drill 2 of 4 Hip Slide vs. Hip Rotation Use to navigate. Photo Credit: Courtesy of Golf Fitness Magazine. used with permission Ever wondered why some of the smaller pros, both on the LPGA and PGA tours, can crush the ball even with their small builds? One reason is that they maximize their hip rotation in the golf swing and shift their weight correctly.", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4ANM5Z": "Gutbucket (album) Gutbucket (An Underworld Eruption) is a 1969 sampler album released to promote artists on the Liberty Records label. Both albums were reissued on a single EMI CD in 1994, with an informative booklet, but with 6 the original 31 tracks (from the combined albums) missing. 'Someone' decides which artist to sign to the label, 'someone' decides which songs off the album should be promoted, 'someone' fronted the money to make the album. Rap labels look for new artists to take the music further, just as these artists look for rap labels to give them a large audience and make it big. Artists are signed because they fill a niche to reach an untapped audience, or to capitalize on a similar artist who has opened new territory for a certain type of music. The internet is changing things, but the more they change the more they stay the same. Sakamoto and other musicians were concerned about the issue of landmines remaining buried in several countries.", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1XR34": "Good luck!Frank Castle September 22, 2011 at 9:57 pm God gave us guilt to know when weve done something that conflicts with His commands and so we can correct ourselves.Sam October 28, 2011 at 3:35 am Heres my problem  I have been struggling with this problem for years and simply, I dont want it anymore.", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPER0A": "Derivative: synchronization noun Derivative: synchronizer noun Etymology: 17c: from Greek syn together  chronos time. Two Girls Dressing a Kitten by Candlelight Two Girls Dressing a Kitten by Candlelight (also known as Dressing the Kitten) (c. 176870) is a 'fancy painting' by Joseph Wright of Derby (173497). The picture is one of a number of candlelit studies made by Wright that demonstrate his skill in the use of 'chiaroscuro' in which he specialised.", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ5AWN": "Finally passed my plateau just 15 more lbs to lose and I'll be where I want to be ?", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VJ1QN": "I'll be in the laboratory with DADDY-O at The 55 Bar this evening7-9PM 55 Christopher St. Tony Mason,Booker King, Craig Dreyer and me", "3VEI3XUCZRVXKRLLOEPZ60W11XNPRC": "God is my leader.", "3VMV5CHJZ8D4NT5EPK47C6JRORVTGN": "Delaware: The Dutch first settled Delaware in 1631, although all of the original settlers were killed in a disagreement with local Indians. Seven years later, the Swedes set up a colony and trading post at Fort Christina in the northern part of Delaware. By 1655, the Dutch had forcibly removed the Swedes from the area and reincorporated Delaware into their empire. After William Penn was granted the land that became Pennsylvania in 1682, he persuaded the Duke of York to lease him the western shore of Delaware Bay so that his colony could have an outlet to the sea. The Duke agreed and henceforth, Penn's original charter included the northern sections of present-day Delaware, which became known as 'The Lower Counties on the Delaware'. A lengthy and occasionally violent. It wasn't until 1776, however, that Delaware had a government completely independent from Pennsylvania. In 1787, Delaware became the first colony to ratify the U.S. continued on: http://mrnussbaum.com/history/jamestown.htm", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KXJ4N": "Sweetie, I felt the same way when I was pregnant with my daughter, the first trimester, I had no morning sickness and I did not feel pregnant, just tired and 'crappy', just like you are feeling now, it is totally normal, and since every woman and every pregnancy is different, it will get better, since your body and baby is constantly growing and changing, then just wait another week and you will be experiencing new 'feelings', and then feeling better also.????? It will get better honey, just wait????", "3NQUW096N661P6A125W6YYNNQ1IL9P": "Have you had a test for syphilis if memory serves me right the bumps (postule) on the back of the throat is a symptom or was that typhoid anyway get this checked out sounds like an STD. and for gods sake please wear a condom when having sex with your wife. some of the symptons may not show up in your wife for several months and she may already be exposed and carrying whatever you got.", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBS78A": "You can even make it as simple as possible.", "3NSM4HLQNRSI8270BCFO1FC6A76QQ2": "The immunization was called 'vaccination' because it was derived from a virus affecting cows (). Smallpox was a contagious and deadly disease, causing the deaths of 2060 of infected adults and over 80 of infected children. When smallpox was finally eradicated in 1979, it had already killed an estimated 300500 million people in the 20th century.", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BQRA1": "no just at home when i had done something really bad.", "3RHLQY6EDT2HUOGX8T2RYD42V03D46": "I can tell you that Vitamin E oil works WONDERS on scars! It makes even old scars fade! Just rub Vitamin E oil on it every day and it will fade in time. you can buy Vit E from most pharmacys. Hope this helps!!", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKWG9E": "Vigo insecticide collars for dogs 55cm or 64 cm - against fleas and ticks for dogs. Contains: propoxur Collar... http://t.co/pHlYoHq2or", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVUSQW": "Dec 13, 2012 ... Indeed, in many countries, are known as shrimp scampi. ... Also, prawns usually have claws on three pairs of their legs and Shrimp have shorter legs and have claws only on two ... What about tiger, king and banana prawns? Fisheries in many parts of the world capture shrimps, prawns, spiny ... the highly modified fifth legs of male copepods of the order Calanoida. ... a copepodid, which resembles the adult except that it does not have a full complement of limbs. They don't have a carapace, have a compact head with two pairs of ... seven similar pairs of pereopods (walking legs) no claw on their first ... never released as larvae, like crabs and shrimp instead they are released as?..... red king crab printer friendly page. ... Shrimp, Coonstripe, Shrimp, Northern, Shrimp, Sidestriped, Shrimp, Spot, Smelt, ... They also have five pairs of legs the first bears their claws or pincers, the right ...", "3LB1BGHFL2U49KQEJQQDJ6QVTNMYTR": "I'd be a 'no' btw", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3B9WZ7": "Agriculture is mankind's oldest industry. When a person crafts something by hand, they have absolute control (more or less) as to the final outcome of what they seek to make. How well it is made depends upon the skill of the artisan. This is where the word 'technology' comes from. Loosely interpreted it means 'man-made'. Living organisms are another matter. They thrive on their own. As aa consequence, early civilized man didn't give too much thought on the plant food he consumed. Bushes growing berries and trees bearing nuts and fruits were readily at hand. At some point, civilized man learned he could take the seeds and bury them in the ground and eventually plants would spring up and bear food that could be consumed. The same could be said about the eventual raising of livestock. Before that, early man hunted. When he learned that certain animals could be domesticated, he began raising animals on his own.", "301KG0KX9CJO3Q6CQB2TWJM23EZ2H7": "I have n't had a steady period since March as well it comes heavy for one day and then completly disappears . Sex doesn t hurt but there is definate bleeding and I was wondering if it was due to pregnancy , like spotting or something . No need to post more than once , everyone scans through the forums so your question will get answered even if it 's only in one forum .", "32XN26MTXZHJTCMO29DD5NMUNXOL0D": "all puppies nip...wash your hands but some antibiotic oitment on it and you will be just fine.....then give her to a home that knows about GSD's because she needs love and attention and especially training...wake up! Maybe have a fun toy in your hand when she goes for your ankles. And get just as excited as she it about biting your ankles.", "3UL5XDRDNCHN9CO65QALHDWFK5085Z": "... While dominance, is sometimes the reason for certain bad dog .... the stairs NEXT to me once - instead of snapping at my ankles the whole way up, ... What works well to stop the chase, pounce, and bite, for Sephy are timeouts. If it you don't see results in the 3-4 weeks, you need to do what is best for the dog and you. I really hope this helped. Good luck :) Experienced dog owner, I foster puppies/ dogs, and I work at a pet store/ pet hotel When I want a friend to tell me what she thinks of one of my 6-7 weeks old pups I let it grab my fingers then I walk backwards so that it displays its trotting action. (Why aren't my friends willing to do that???? ... He doesn't get excited and so he doesn't jump on me or bite my ... around them, just as children use their fingers and hands to explore their surroundings. .... and stop some times and sometimes she just wants to bite even more?", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59FWP5W": "Seems counterintuitive, but it works!The leaves are great in salads.Good luck.", "3O71U79SRBN303OLBNXCF672IUVSM7": "Dont' worry, however install a free cache remover that erases your tracks, else manually delete your cache, history, cookies, temporary folder and any suspecious downloaded internet programs.", "3B0MCRZMBRSC8E56BMLA15WM0FYPPJ": "THE BEST I EVER HEARD! Dyslexic walks into a bra......", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLVYJM": "Massage a few drops of coconut oil around the eyes to get rid off dark circles.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSTE1M": "that was kinda a scary book your not really telling anyone what you kneed. do you not know how to write and essay? You first have to decide on what point you are going to prove in your essay.", "302OLP89DZ5MRLQ0HYH7RA8K2ALACC": "The Hobart Shakespeareans The Hobart Shakespeareans of Hobart Boulevard Elementary School is a 2005 documentary film that tells the story of the inspirational inner-city Los Angeles school teacher Rafe Esquith whose rigorous fifth-grade curriculum includes English, mathematics, geography, and literature. The pinnacle of student achievement each year is the performance of a play by William Shakespeare in the year of filming, that play was 'Hamlet'. The Hobart Shakespeareans drew the attention of renowned Shakespearean actors Ian McKellen and Michael York, who pay a visit to the class to watch their performance of 'Hamlet'.", "3UV0D2KX1MHES8UTZZXHMD7N7DGF4G": "In my case, I had to quit my shift work job, to have a normal sleep. use a nasal dilator, saline nasal spray or breathe right strips to help open nasal passages. And don't forget your doctor. Repeat this procedures 10 to 15 times, or whenever you feel the need to do so. 6 Do the paced breathing technique. This type of breathing is essential for maintaining good breathing or to prevent breathing problems while walking or lifting objects. In time you will be able to do this naturally. Your nose is your breathing?? best friend! Nose breathing warms, moistens, and filters the air for the lungs as well as regulating the amount of air you breath.", "3YGE63DIN8VZ46YN6NKFEY3AL4SW0H": "What is cirrhosis? Cirrhosis is a complication of many liver diseases that is characterized by abnormal structure and function of the liver. Why does cirrhosis cause problems? The liver is an important organ in the. In cirrhosis, the relationship between blood and liver cells is destroyed. What are the symptoms and signs of cirrhosis? Patients with cirrhosis may have few or no symptoms and signs of liver disease. In fact, the number of livers that are transplanted for NAFLD-related cirrhosis is on the rise. These pieces of information suggest the possibility of liver disease and cirrhosis. Some patients with cirrhosis have enlarged livers and/or spleens. Liver cancer most commonly develops in individuals with underlying cirrhosis. Liver transplantation Cirrhosis is irreversible. What is new and in the future for cirrhosis? Progress in the management and prevention of cirrhosis continues. Transplantation of the liver is becoming an important option for treating patients with advanced cirrhosis.", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VQBS0": "Homegrown salad leaves, radishes and nasturtium leaves and petals from the plot! http://t.co/c6AQOMdvAo", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRWS0Y": "You didn't provide much to this, but. Use a 10-8-6-4-2 Squat work out 2-3 times a week. Use whatever weight you are comfortable with because i do not have percentages right now. Trust me on the work out type. I went from a 340 1 rep squat to 385 in about a month switching over to this workout style. Good luck my man.", "3H1C3QRA01HPHY7CX3JTNTYBNPKCEA": " For now, North America, France and Spain will have WWAT ! Dates will be announced soon ! (:", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBJTE9": "Hi there. If your periods were 4 days long and are now 7 days long,then 4 days is what your body has considered normal. Here are some of the reasons your body can bleed for a little longer.chemical pregnancy. this is where you were pregnant but by the time of what would have been ur first missed period u actually started and the pregnancy will expell its self. weight gain. I have been thinner and bigger and there has been a difference in my periods. causing them to last a few days longer than they used to. and fibroids. alot of times women develope fibroids at about our age and on. more common among women who smoke and have had 2 or more children. at this time 7 days is among the normal range of a menstral cycle. but because ur's is always 4 day its unusual to your body. I would make an appointment if it lasts more than 7 days. there are also questions about how heavy you are bleeding and how red?? is it bright red or dark? are you gushing or just enuff there to wipe off? the...", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCSY0I": "No, no film adaptations exist Clearly the amazon link is someone trying to make a dollar by using the name. They obviously do not think they will sell (m)any, since they are quot. manufactured on demand using DVD-R recordable media. IMHO, Salinger should find him/them and sue them. Now, as to quot. Catcherquot. , no there has never been a film adaptation. Quoting from Wikipedia:  Attempted film adaptations Early in his career, J. Salinger expressed a willingness to have his work adapted for the screen. 32 However, in 1949, a critically panned film version of his short story quot. Uncle Wiggily in Connecticutquot. was released. renamed My Foolish Heart and taking great liberties with Salinger's story, the film is widely considered to be among the reasons that Salinger has refused to allow any subsequent movie adaptations of his work. 33 The enduring popularity of The Catcher in the Rye, however, has resulted in repeated attempts to secure the novel's screen rights.", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9PNHI": "First off- base a character on yourself and you have a Mary-Sue, regardless. And yeah, she is an anti-sue, too man bad traits, not enough good, not believable as a character. No normal person, including those with depression, are unhappy 24/7. They can be very good friends, funny, kind, clever, pretty, out going or shy. And the fact she was hurt and that caused her to retreat into herself is classical Anti-sue. Even an actual Mary sue has that. No-one only has 2 positive traits. Some good traits can also be bad (say, I'm bossy, but I make a good leader) or (I'm blunt, so people know I'm telling the truth)  You cannot only be creative and clever. http://www.springhole.net/quizzes/marysu...", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NA34U": "No one could/would be perpetually perky in the throes all of that , You've been through a lot. Keeping a log is also important for you to work-through some of this family-stuff. It will be helpful for the next faze of your overall. which is to find some help. You can decide that you refuse to behave like some of those people you just happen to be related to do. Ask your therapist for referrals for an MD. (and btw, if your therapist is not a cognitive therapist, you need to find one that is). With the therapist's help, you can make realistic goals and work toward changing your life. It's about working toward fixing your own life, the therapist keeping you focused and on-track with your goals. You aren't your dad. Ask the therapist for a referral to an MD re: an antidepressant. Bring your journal with you. about which antidepressant is best for you. Keeping track of how you feel in your journal will help to see if you're symptoms have improved after being on an antidepressant. Or just existing..?", "38DCH97KHH01MF3NGMVF4E0KWCEQJB": "How many calories. in a peanut butter and jelly sandwich? Posted: Jan 17th 2007 6:00AM by Brigitte Dale Filed under: How Many Calories? Peanut butter and jelly sandwiches were born in the U.S.A. Food. These sandwiches have a healthy reputation, because peanut butter has protein. and that jelly sort of counts as a fruit, right? But how many calories are in a peanut butter and jelly sandwich? A) 300 B) 450 C) 510 D) 625 The correct answer is C) 510 calories. This is an estimate assuming the sandwich is made with two regular slices of white bread plus 2 tablespoons each of peanut butter and strawberry jelly. Granted, the majority of fat in peanut butter is the monounsaturated 'good' kind, but that's still a lot of fat to be packing into one small, 'healthy' sandwich OH JUST ONE MORE THING: I USE THIS SITE TO ENTER MY INGREIDENTS TO FIND OUT THE CALORIC VALUE.....YOU CAN ENTER JUST ABOUT ANY INGRIEDENTS http://www.calorie-count.com/calories/recipeanalysis.php?processresubmitcount20", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXFVFA": "A good pre-game snack will give you easily digested carbohydrates (simple sugars, not complex carbs or fiber), and perhaps a little protein and fat. Ideally, your snack will be portable and capable of staying good for hours inside a backpack or locker, since not every student-athlete has access to a refrigerator. STACK connected with dietitians who work with the Houston Texans, New Orleans Pelicans, New Orleans Saints, Boston Cannonsand othersfor their suggestions on simple pre-game snacks that meet those requirements. Peanut Butter and Honey Sandwiches Its a simple twist on a modern favorite that will stay fresh in your bag all day long. Im a big fan of peanut butter and honey sandwiches on whole grain bread, says Tavis Piattoly, MS, RD, who works with the New Orleans Saints and New Orleans Pelicans.", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFOB4U": "The Prophet ? is our best role model , but he taught us to also love the previous Messengers and to learn from their lives ( may the peace and blessings of Allah be upon them all ) . Contained in the Quran are riveting stories and beautiful characteristics of the Prophets and Messengers that we rarely learn about . Unlike other religious texts , the Quran praises , honors and gives us a real glimpse into the lives of these great men from Nuh ( Noah ) , to Zakariyah ( Zakariah ) , and Ibrahim ( Abraham ) to Dawud ( David ) .", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW27VZW": "My patient was a 56-pound, 5 yr old male neutered lab mix who ate half a canister of raisins sometime between 7:30 AM and 4:30 PM on Tuesday. The dog's BUN (blood urea nitrogen level) was already at 32 (normal less than 27) and creatinine over 5 (1.9 is the high end of normal). He was on 3 different anti-vomiting medications and they still couldn't control his vomiting. He continued to vomit and the owners elected to euthanize. Many people I know give their dogs grapes or raisins as treats. salt 2 cups raisins Beat eggs, add sugar, oil and pumpkin. Apple Raisin Bran Muffins 1 egg lightly beaten 1 cup milk 1/4 cup mazola corn oil 1 cup whole bran cereal (Bran Buds) 1 cup chopped peeled apple 1/2 cup raisins 1 cup all-purpose flour 1/4 cup granulated sugar 1 tsp. Stir in bran, apple and raisins. Stir in bran mixture until just moistened. Combine bran and milk and add. baking powder 1 cup bran  tsp. Stir in bran let stand for 5 minutes. Carefully stir in raisins, being careful not t...", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KW4J7": "Cover bottom and side with' cake or cookies crumbs Put rice mixture in dish and cover with more crumbs. Bake the pudding until set, about 50 minutes. Serve hot or cold, Makes 6 to 8 servings I'm on Weight watchers so for 8 points I'm having cabbage , carrots , roasted chicken and brown this is my standard answer for all weight loss problems... its an easy way for me to earn points...", "386659BNTLF635IK9ZVUL8DGPRK10O": "To find a local vet that participates in low cost spay and neuter programs call SPAY USA at 1-800-248-SPAY. dogs pets cats spay neuter", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZCTUP": "Im 28 weeks with my first and had a super emotional first trimester. Now im 28 weeks and do I have a story for you lol. Last night, my fiancee and I were watching a movie and I suddenly became very jealous of how skinny the actress was and her stupid flat stomach. I just started bawling my eyes out. My fiancee looked at me like I had lost my mind and did his best to comfort me until I stopped crying. I know he must think Im crazy but I couldnt even help it. Dont feel bad or alone in this. I think alot of women get emotional again later in pregnancy :) Happy baby making.", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPODT7L": "how rude I don't even like peanut better so I don't care", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E8RC0": "is s car ok?", "371DNNCG440PUEZW6MSJKT2T08MT8B": "Long bone The long bones are those that are longer than they are wide. They are one of five types of bones: long, short, flat, irregular and sesamoid. Long bones, especially the femur and tibia, are subjected to most of the load during daily activities and they are crucial for skeletal mobility.", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGTJPE": "it can only be spread through humans who have been kept in captivity or 'kennels' for extended periods of time. it will induce a mild state of phycosis (nothing to worry about) after a few days if you are carrying the virus, so you should know if you are in fact carrying it. if you do think you are carrying it then please visit your local gp for a chemical bleach shower (again nothing to worry about (you may turn out like michael)). Natalieeee  yes daniel s  6 years ago 1 Thumbs up 1 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Add your answer Can humans spread Kennel Cough? Both my dogs picked up Kennel Cough (a mild case) and i was just wondering if i go and visit someone and they have a dog can i somehow spread it to the other dog,through my clothes or anything? Add your answer Source Submit Cancel  I think this question violates the Community Guidelines", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY3VOT": "Has anyone ever asked you if you are worried about what your tattoo will look like when you are older ? Yeah , we Well , these senior citizens prove that tattoos at age 70 still look pretty freaking awesome . I love how these men and women own it , they don Share this awesome proof that Tattoos will only get better with age with your friends ! Have a similar story that you would like us to post ?", "30Z7M1Q8UYIKFI0N0M12POC1CJ18A5": "It is called dependent edema - the blood and fluid pools in the legs. Also, we tend to excrete more urine during the night and retain in the day - the additional fluid ends up in the legs,", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYXLEY": "A virgin be a virgin in the vagina not the mouth lol ?", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPE0RJ": "Dogs are pals, cats are only affectionate when it suits them. They're EVIL bastards.", "3F6045TU7DM6O49SD8TGTPWSQ7Z99E": "What is more important about Pearl Harbor is the impact that it had on the history of the United States and the world.Pearl Harbor is one of the reasons the United States would become, almost immediately, involved in World War II.Pearl Harbor is an active military base in the Lagoon Harbor on the Hawaiian island of Oahu.It is the location of the United States Pacific Fleet headquarters.", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKLVCX": "I think music bank really love teen top so they let teen top perform 2 song and join the special stage", "31J7RYECZLOJ0176YSHDJS54SPT1LV": "i have done it it doesnt do anything it just gets a little bit slower he wont notice it", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCFGVU": " 5alarm, Lady Ice, Smoke and Baby Ice y'all are sick ? it's gonna be a good season at Fire and Ice ?", "37Y5RYYI0P3EUFNPPUZLQNN0PYHXSY": "Symptoms of Hormonal Imbalance 1. Hot flashes, flushes, night sweats and/or cold flashes, clammy feeling 2. Bouts of rapid heart beat 3. Irritability 4. Mood swings, sudden tears 5. Trouble sleeping through the night (with or without night sweats) 6. Irregular periods. Dry vagina, a general drying out that can include eyes, mouth, joints and skin. Anxiety, feeling ill at ease 11. Feelings of dread, apprehension, doom (see note) 12. Itchy, crawly skin (see note) 16. Electric shock sensation under the skin and in the head (see note) 30. Skin: Rosacea, rashes, and dermatitis 49. Symptom 15 (itchy, crawly skin) feeling of ants crawling under the skin, not just dry itchy skin. There is a feeling of loss of self. Symptom 29 (shock sensation) 'the feeling of a rubber band snapping in the layer of tissue between skin and muscle. Some of these signs may also be symptoms of one of the following: hypothyroidism diabetes depression with another etiology Multiple Sclerosis  other medical conditions", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IE3Z7": "Watch favorite TV shows. Play with pets. Play board games. Organise something with your friends or family. Learn something new or study. If you are bad at math look up a video that can help you. If you have never tried origami try some origami. Give yourself a make-over and listen to some music. Invite a friend over to play and chat. If it's hot, make Popsicles or ice cream. It's really fun and easy. There's a lot of ideas and recipes on the Internet. Work within your means and abilities. Don't spend money you don't have or take on projects that you can't handle alone. Follow your parents' rules, for example: if you're not allowed to go outside in the summer because you're home alone, then respect that rule. Meet a Community Member Meet , a wikiHowian from South Australia who has been active in the community for over a year. Shes started 129 articles and patrolled over 26,000 changes. She enjoys , , and .", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL05LO4": "Orange and blue make a nice brown, if you mix it in the right proportions.", "3WGZLY9VCHKIDP3ZKWS4FPK7XMVD89": "Richest Person in History: Was He Black?- The Root 0 New stories  0 New Stories Since Your Last Visit Former Black Panther Kathleen Cleaver on Assata Shakur and BlackLivesMatter How Musicians and Artists Can Be Relevant to the Social-Justice Movement Terrence Howard Got on Twitter and Shut Down Rumors That He Divorced His Current Wife Campaign 2016: The Angry White Mans Last Stand Miley Cyrus, Nicki Minaj, Mammy and the Best Times to Shut Up About Race Black Utah Man Says He Is Being Terrorized by Racist Neighbors Photos: Blackout Film Festival Draws Activist Entertainers Racist Slave Trade Video Game Prompts Social Media Backlash  Watch: Will Smith in Trailer for Movie About Concussions in the NFL  Lawsuit: White Fla.Teacher Fired for Having Black Boyfriend Nicki Minaj Calls Out Miley Cyrus Onstage at the 2015 MTV VMAs Because He Got High: Kanye Announces 2020 Run for President During MTV Video Music Awards in Rambling Speec", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFR4Q1": "If indeed some infections contribute to obesity in people , we could have a potentially very simple and effective prevention strategy  vaccination , While extreme stress tends to make people lose weight , the everyday kind can have the opposite effect . So , for the sake of your waistline , take a deep breath , and don Failing that , try giving the new-year diet a miss .", "31GN6YMHLPQZ5FIZFP3ZO49TGW9SWY": "read time Hemorrhoids saviour - cure hemorrhoids forever - natural hemorrhoids treatment: Shrink hemorrhoid... http://t.co/5Ncxn68mUW", "3WGCNLZJKF602PJELBJP0FXZJGQD1Q": "yeah I'm getting taller! Hopefully I won't be this short forever", "3FK4G712NXY6YY1QVKTYRF68AJGSSM": "Baby is used to being handled, daddy is skittish, mom is sorta...Cocoa and Cinnamon.", "302U8RURJZZPADQPHJHH38G9MOZVNF": "Tips for visiting the dermatologist http://t.co/9vva6K6Zob to get the most out of your visit to the dermatologist", "3PGQRAZX02I3UKDZUQLN91U9R4BSYZ": "However, if you just want to have some structured play time with your pet and test ... Want to build a resume to defend your adored hound against challenges to his character? ... Scent Games - Educating Your Dog's Nose  Suzanne Clothier Popular games/activities: agility, frisbee, treibball, competitive herding and obedience, ... The Hound Group contains some of the oldest breeds known to man. ... sight and great speed (sight hounds) or by tracking scents (scent hounds) or both. ... Basic nose games are some of my favorite ways to entertain an active, bored dog that needs a job! ... four year old Dash Hound that was afraid of children, as I found out?... To teach scenting a track, you need some treats and a grassy area, such as a baseball field or park. Although hot dogs are not the most nutritious food, I find they?... Here are some ideas, but first a caveat. These games are to be played with only ONE dog. If you have more than one dog, don't let them play?...", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT8F15": "If the overdose caused brain damage, then there is nothing you can do other than ride it out and see what happens. You could check on stroke survivors and people who were addicted to street drugs and see how long their brains will recover, before they have reached maximum recovery. I would guess you can still improve for a couple more years and partially recover, if the OD is the cause of your problems. So far about what is currently thought about neurogenesis, or the growth of brain cells, is that physical exercise increases it, but to retain brain cells that have been newly created, you need to do physical activities that also require thought  coordination - so stuff like tai chi or dance and I suppose sports like tennis or gymnastics would be good, too, as compared to jogging or swimming, which your brain is pretty much on autopilot. look into what is done for stroke survivors' rehabilitation - maybe there will be some things there that can help you, and maybe narcotics anonymo", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW26ZVZ": "Premenstual syndrome that's what it is. usually common to a woman whos period is coming. you dont have to worry if your pregnant as what you have said your protected. by the way did you usea pils? pills tends to cause some tenderness and sore in the breat becasue its a hormone product.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZOQVZ": "When people say, 'I can't smoke, so I drink more' or 'I can't smoke weed, so I smoke cigarettes'...it's not compromise. It's dependance.", "3QD8LUVX4XWDODPEDYMDXCD8BE65X1": "Often amino acids are spoken of in relation to human nutritional utilization.For humans, there are 8 essential amino acids and 14 non-essential amino acids that can be fabricated by the human body from the eight essential amino acids. There are twenty-two amino acids. Eight are essential and fourteen are non-essential.", "3LN3BXKGC0TWFA98KP9IZQQQSLFWGI": "Hi. anyone know any good websites, advice, or somthing that will just cheer me up for losing a pet. I had her for 3 years, and so she is 3 years old. (im 13 btw.) And she was pretty skinny and she was a orange tabby. We have her sister too. And she was like my best friend, i would always play with her, she was so sweet, her meow, she would always bite my nose and I loved her so much. Then yesterday she didnt come home in the morning and not after school so she has been missing for over 24 hours. I'me pretty sure shes dead she would have come home by now. She comes home every morning. I love her so much and we have looked under all the bushes outside and everything. But shes gone. I'm crying as i write this. Anything you can help witt? Do you have any stories of losing pets/or finding lost pets. PLEASE!", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5525N": "Are you the same idiot that posted that his dog was microwaving popcorn in the middle of the night? Get a life dude, or go play World of Warcraft or something. rememeber that the dog doesn't understand what you're saying, so just because you're yelling at the dog to tell it it's been bad for getting out of the yard while you hit the dog isn't going to help.", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKUG9C": "Navigate This Article Top Abstract METHODS RESULTS DISCUSSION ACKNOWLEDGMENT Footnotes REFERENCES Papers in Press Advanced Search My Pediatrics Log In Subscribe/Renew Manage My Account File Cabinet RSS Feeds eAlerts New Features Advertising Disclaimer CONTENT: Home About the Journal Subscribe/Renew RESOURCES: AAP Grand Rounds AAP News Hospital Pediatrics Live CME Events NeoReviews Pediatrics Pediatrics in Review PedJobs PediaLink PREP: PREP Audio PREP Subspecialties PREP The Curriculum AAP: AAP.org Contact AAP Privacy Statement 2013  Copyright American Academy of Pediatrics.All rights reserved.American Academy of Pediatrics, 141 Northwest Point Blvd., Elk Grove Village, IL, 847-434-4000 Click here for faster international access", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH4YWH": "Too busy making money, or too busy, being busy? I know a lot of people who are busy, still busy but not earning much or earning but ain't got the time for anything. Put your work on ebay, that way you control your time.", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEAB56B": "Top Protein Powder: By Cynthia RaoA broad variety of protein powder and protein supplements are on the marketp... http", "3XDSWAMB22QEE1XH6UETHANP6S8CQM": "One of my GSDs was terrible for biting - he didn't stop (despite intensive training) until he was around 9 months old. The other never bit once. Yours is still a real baby and is about to start teething as well. Ouch! doesn't work for all dogs - like yours it just gets them even ore excited. She will grow out of it eventually if you keep training her that biting isn't acceptable. Hopefully, you give her plenty of short training sessions in between your classes - even a 5 minute session can help calm down an exciteable puppy. http://www.apdt.co.uk/documents/Playbiti...", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6WQ67": "And still, no one is bound to follow them.", "375VSR8FVW7RYVNRBNN1XYYFBWSZR5": "It's purple and huge but I can move it and walk on it. Hurts more in shoes than barefoot.", "33NOQL7T9OXLGQ8VCEH16H3AL47Z8W": "The Catholic Church in Saint Vincent and the Grenadines is part of the Catholic Church in communion with the Bishop of Rome, the Pope", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD6SAN": "If you mean adults 60 years or older who remember Mitch Miller, there is a video of his old TV show.There is a video called 'Sing Along With Mitch,' with the words at the bottom of the screen. The show also stars Leslie Uggams and Gloria Lambert. You can buy it at the following link", "30UZJB2POHA18FI0T9FPQWO44J7533": "There is no official bird for New Zealand however the brown kiwi is accepted by most New Zealanders as representative of their country.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCBJ9J": "In same cases hemorrhoids go away by itself, but in MOST cases not. Not only they Don't go away, they also like to return some time after treatment, unless you also treat the cause of hemorrhoids. What are hemorrhoids?", "3CO05SML7V3UWAH17TA9RZVTTPB0RG": "you mean tomb? well, the pyramids of Egypt are thought of as tombs. so they are the biggest ever.", "3VIVIU06FKAE6PLP6B3YB41F9WSMI8": "Slavic fantasy Slavic fantasy () - fantasy genre, was finally formed at the turn of the 20th and 21st centuries. Slavic fantasy is the use of Slavic folklore (legends, epics, myths) in general structural rules for fantasy works. The term Slavic fantasy broader term Russian fantasy, although these terms are sometimes used synonymously.", "3UXQ63NLAAKKDZPY0PA2P4IDE1MLB0": "What is Polycystic Ovary Syndrome? Polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS) is a condition in which many cysts develop from ovarian follicles that fail to rupture and release eggs. It is one of the major causes of infertility.", "3HEM8MA6H9AX8Q6LBZ0Z1AMW5BOQPF": "I noticed that my bra was wet so I went to look and I was having a bloody discharge it wasent a lot of blood and it has finally stopped bleeding and it looks like it scabbed over it is very sore and it is only my left brest . but it was concerning enough I do n't think its that big of a deal should I go see my doctor or go to the hospital it is very hard to get into the the doctors office it can take up to 2 weeks ?", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8MW9T": "just think how boring the movies would be with no bad teeth?", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXQBIA": "You have to already have your BS degree in one of the science.You then must enter dental school, and finish the 4 year course to graduate with a DDS, or DMD degree. Then you got  to intern as medical doctors do (at least 1 yr.). You must also pass the state licensing board to practice.You may be looking at least 5-7 years of hard work and studying, depending on your education credentials you now possess.", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GDH00": "Good, but I have to say this is the strangest moment I  ve ever passed in my existence  some lowdowns lately but you got to keep at it.", "3I6NF2WGIGU22RUOOOM99QDD8OA5G9": "Unfortunately I am still working at a Kohls, they are always understaffed, they make me feel like I'm inconveniencing them whenever I have to change my schedule, they always expect you to find someone to take your hours, isn't that their job? I think they do it to make you feel guilty for not being able to follow the schedule they hand out, Why don't they hire more people? I have a long drive home and do you think they take that into consideration when they make you stay pass your scheduled time, I almost had a accident after having to do four closing in one week. I enjoy working with the customers but I don't like the way I'm being treated in that store and I don't think they care. Report Spam 21st of Nov, 2008 by  Emily 2 Votes I HATE working for Kohl's. In this bad economy, I can't get another job right now. I hate closing and being forced to stay way past 2 a.m. when I have family waiting for me at home. I hate having to cover more than one department and dealing with sloppy", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMZEAA": "Good luck.Aggressive Maine Coon Rescue I hand-feed my maine coone his favorite snack, sliced roast beef.I also let him have his way around the house.", "37J05LC5AXH7X6ZIB0PV4FTLDXSJD2": "you think starving is a good way to lose weight, do you? I think youve read too many fairy tales. If this doesnt make you realize how completely stupid running out there  trying to develop anorexia is,. You still wont be able to stop. Your muscles will eventually stop cooperating. you cant stop. It isnt working  you still cant stop. Well, since youre going to win, why dont I tell you about your prize, hmm?? Its quite nice. I sincerely hope your hair isnt a nice color.because it wont be soon. But gray is a nice color, isnt it? I rather like it. I think the grayish brown color where my natural red and blonde highlights used to be adds a bit ofohdignity to my look. Speaking of hair, do you like facial hair? I hope so. I have some lovely sideburns. Actually, I have sexy hair everywhere. All the guys love it and all the girls I know ask how to get some. I tell them how I got it, starving. They never attempt itI know why though. Yupstrong  smart.Kiss your newly gray hair goodbye", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE75B9T": "Good luck.Read 3 AnswersFollowEmailPrint Question: House Training a Six Week Old Puppy I have a beautiful six week old Pit Bull puppy, it lives with us in the house.The problem is that it poos everywhere it likes in the house.", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW28ZV1": "Labs need a good bit of exercise but I will tell you that you can walk as much as you want but if you are willing to do 20-20 minutes of strenuous exercise twice a day it will tire the dog out a lot more than any 2 hr walk. There is so much confusion out there about how much cardio you should do to ... your weight loss goal of say 2 pounds/week means that you would need to eat ... don't eat below your BMR) than it is to add in 100 calories worth of exercise. If all you want to do is lose fat, all you need to do is burn calories. And, you can do that in a thousand ways so why not pick one your enjoy. Walk, dance, hike, bike, do a sport, clean house, etc. All dogs need exercise and it sounds like you are doing that. You can live in a small apartment but as long as you give your dogs the proper exercise you are ok. Small dogs need much love and attention but larger dogs need more exercise.", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAWADB": "Houdini did this in some of his feats. But, with the 'water board' of the Gitmo Baptism, the intent is to fill the nasopharynx with water, enough just to put the candidate for initiation into what Dr. Stanislav Grof called 'perinatal matrix three'. Houdini did this in some of his feats. But, with the 'water board' of the Gitmo Baptism, the intent is to fill the nasopharynx with water, enough just to put the candidate for initiation into what Dr. Stanislav Grof called 'perinatal matrix three. Houdini did this in some of his feats. But, with the 'water board' of the Gitmo Baptism, the intent is to fill the nasopharynx with water, enough just to put the candidate for initiation into what Dr. Stanislav Grof called 'perinatal matrix three. 'what is the process of a nasopharynx biopsy?' Just take it by using some kind of medical instrument forcep, needle, etc. 'is it painful?'", "324N5FAHSX9O275MK6P1BGZ5STWKV1": "Have you talked to your parents about this? Maybe you should talk to your school nurse or even call your doctor. If you really are suffering with anxiety, they can prescribe something to minimize that. However, you could just have a spastic bladder, which will give you the urge to pee quite often. There is also medication for this. Something that you can try on your own if you are not able to talk to anyone about this is try distracting yourself while you are traveling to school. You can try drawing (just doodling) or chewing gum, counting certain objects that you see out the window of the bus, listening for a particular word and counting to see how many times you hear it on the way to school. There are lots of different ways to distract yourself. If it is serious, and you are afraid of having an accident, wear some sort of protection like kotex or Always panty liners. Try talking to your parents though. One of them is probably going to be the most benefical in meeting your needs.", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO94Y5": "Easterain Time. Hi Lo Outlook Hi Lo Outlook Albany,N.Y. 71 66 .06 76 68 rain 80 68 rain Albuquerque 90 61 90 63 cloudy 92 64 cloudy Amarillo 90 61 90 60 clear 93 61 cloudy Anchorage 65 50 .01 61 50 cloudy 61 52 cloudy Asheville 81 64 .01 83 66 rain 85 65 cloudy Atlanta 87 70 .29 87 71 cloudy 87 70 cloudy Atlantic City 83 67 .01 82 72 cloudy 83 72 cloudy Austin 93 77 .17 94 72 cloudy 95 72 clear Baltimore 84 73 .38 86 69 rain 87 72 cloudy Billings 102 65 96 66 cloudy 98 63 clear Birmingham 90 72 .77 90 71 rain 90 71 rain Bismarck 95 62 95 65 cloudy 87 60 clear Boise 100 68 103 68 cloudy 98 66 cloudy Boston 74 65 .03 70 63 rain 79 66 rain Brownsville 97 76 95 75 cloudy 96 76 cloudy Buffalo 78 66 .07 82 67 rain 80 69 cloudy Burlington,Vt. 81 64 76 65 rain 78 67 rain Casper 95 52 95 53 clear 93 51 clear Charleston,S.C. 87 73 .81 89 74 cloudy 90 75 cloudy Charleston,W.Va. 83 65 .28 82 66 rain 84 67 cloudy Charlotte,N.C. 89 67 88 72 cloudy 89 72 cloudy Cheyenne 86 56 88 55 clear 86 56 clo...", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GM1UP": "All i can suggest is to open up to someone close to you, tell them what youre feeling, really let them in.Maybe then theyll be able to help you overcome this.Good luck.", "388CL5C1RJLU4CSK0HKYBFLB9ERLHG": "Curiosity is what keeps us hungry to learn more, experience more, and live more.If you want to become a better photographer, learn how to become more curious in life.Be more like a child and less like an adult.", "3UL5XDRDNCHN9CO65QALHDWFK51850": "Looks like you are doing all the right things...I know its not helping but it is, getting the swelling down take time, soaking your feet and keeping them above your head and or heart is smart......feel better soon and Congrats!", "36FFXPMST9M2AXVHD90Q3WP54JSOHW": "Hey Steven   Where do you live?? As this will effect what will have to happen with your dog. Personally I took my 2 cats to Australia from South Africa and it cost me about 10 000 and they  were in quarantine for 7 months. Now this will probably not happen to you, but also think about taking your dog from Egypt to any rabies free country will be difficult. My advise is google a pet travel agency in your country and they will give you a quote. One thing I know for sure is that your pets vaccinations will have to be up to date and they will have to be micro chipped.", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYVLEW": "Techies are reading Refresh Roundup: week of January 7th, 2013: Your smartphone and / or tablet is just beggin... http://t.co/E1zAgQqt", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHWSRX": "i have one of these, but i got mine after i sprained my ankle. Nothing wrong with mine, its not gonna go. But if you're worried, get it checked out by your doctor just to be on the safe side, but im sure its nothing to worry about.", "3L84EBDQ370AMWBAL2BU97OOCVPKKF": "yes very normal.. once a week its good to have a cheat day where u have junk to satisfy as long as 6 days a week are clean eating", "3TY2U1TEB78K0SZALWB67DOYIHLJJC": "After his father came home from war , he suffered from many battle wounds and died . The reason I chose the color black was because it represents sadness and mourning . When Johnny left the cemetery where his father was buried , he described it as the hardest thing he has ever done .", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2W06H": "a mythical Chinese dragon is a dragon that can not fly only swim and is one of the four elemental dragon protect the earth or The real Chinese dragon is (green lizard) Physignathus cocincinus. Males can grow up to 36 inches in length, females up to 24 inches. Its color can vary between a bright green and a dark brown, according to the stresses of its environment.", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE729BO": "December 7, 1941. If you need more help with WWII, feel free to message me or something. It is my specialty in my history major. Good luck.", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVH1BA": "Mine took almost a week to start eating and he was in a 46 bow.Especially since he's in a reay small tank.Give it a few more days and eat out of starvation.", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMP4TE": "read his story!", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA0LYB": "Is my penis a good size? Anonymous hi, I'm 17 years old and I have a 7 inch penis when erect, I was wondering, is that a good size? would I be able to pleasure someone with that? Updates: Your just fine . : ) My ex boyfriend was 7' when he you know was well , hard . : ) I was more then happy with that I'm sure you could pleasure any girl with that ONLY IF you know how to use it. don't worry . 3 Best of luck with any future 'fun'  ) MSG me on how it goes . - MelissaO - x.o.x Mcstarr 5 Xper mho 15 thats a really good size but the key is the way you use it but when you do have sex don't put it all in most girls vaginas are about 4 inches deep so its gonna hurt her 0 its not about size as long as your not small 0 2 Xper mho 0 That's a nice size. Just make sure that when to do have sex, do not hit the girl's top. That really hurts. 0 lanky1 1 Xper Is that normally a problem with a 7 incher? I'm about 7.5. I'm still a virgin and plan to stay that way for a while so this is just for futur", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMMT40": "iwant2bincognito : May I suggest you consume at least 2 litres of water per day whilst dieting ? I 've found this improved my weight loss considerably and I finally managed to get past the 14st mark to reach my 10 stone goal after discovering this tip . Although an NHS choice analysis by Bazian is n't fully convinced : http : //www.nhs.uk ews/2012/02February/Pages/water-helps-lose-weight.aspx I am because it really worked for me .", "385MDVINFCD66CZ9SVULW3I6KDXJWA": "that is a really hard thing to do, i know that because i've been there, and my parents and friends just found out this year. i dont think you would have asked how to help yourself if it was for attention or fun. but that also depends, if your depressed its important to get help fast, if your suicidal you need help now. if something happened in your past that no one knows about that was bad and its getting to you, you need help for that. but i'll tell you how i got help. if your parents are good parents they should comfort you, and get you the help you need, and i know thats the hardest part, telling, because i didnt even tell myself. so i wasnt very strong and couldnt do it myself, and i know that its scary to tell, but somehow you have to, because its the only way to get help, and you do need help. dont end up like that, dont get as bad as i was, get help. i know that you want help, or else you wouldnt be asking. i understand what your going through, and the more support you have the better.", "3S8A4GJRD31H3SKXI2V01XUNRY96VF": "Birth Control Pills: Birth Control Pills For Acne Treatment Birth Control PillsOther than specific acne treatm... http://t.co/izPCwwdKN2", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBLTEB": "haha alright who doesn't like a good bosler photo shoot, I'll tell him to wear a funny math joke shirt", "3THR0FZ95PR4WTE74UFOVOICL01LO0": " Description This pie chart shows the breakdown of your average daily calorie intake by fat, carbohydrate, protein and alcohol. More Info    Opinion 2: Looking for peanut butter sandwiches calories? You're in the right place! Just choose a sandwich combination below to see the calories and more for each peanut butter sandwich, but try not to drool on the screen, OK? Peanut Butter Sandwich with White Bread. This sandwich has 2 tablespoons of creamy peanut butter on 2 pieces of standard white sandwich bread. Simple and great! Peanut Butter and Jelly Sandwich with White Bread. This sandwich has 2 tablespoons of creamy peanut butter and 2 tablespoons of a typical jelly on 2 slices of standard white sandwich bread. A true sweet and salty treasure! Peanut Butter Sandwich with Whole Wheat Bread. This sandwich has 2 tablespoons of creamy peanut butter on 2 pieces of standard whole wheat sandwich bread. Healthier than the white bread option, but just as delicious! Peanut Butter and Jel", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ154M": "You cat needs to get along with the new place you brough it....don't punish you cat for such behaviour...it will make it even worse...the best thing you can do is get another kitten(if possible).this will make your cat have a friend to play with without shoving nasty behaviour.always make sure you spend some time with your cat each day and feed it on regular times( this will make your cat feel better)", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DDUC8": "Years ago when I was in high school my parents thought as punishment I had to ride the bus. The bus provided by the school!!! Now your thinking millions of kids do that but we never had to we were either taken to school and at the age of 16 each got our own cars. Well I had stayed out past curfew on Saturday not on purpose but I did and was 20 minutes late getting home so my punishment was I had to RIDE THE BUS! Now that was kinda embarrassing for me as I never had to before but the most embarrassing thing happened when I was getting off the bus I was talking to some girl we called Ziggy and joking around about Chester Cheetah (its when his slogan first came out) turned around and said 'remember Ziggy it ain't easy bein cheesy' and FELL down the bus steps into a mud puddle while wearing white shorts! Twisted my ankle and everyone was so busy laughing at me they couldn't come help me get up my head hit the ground and I just wanted to die! I never rode that bus again or any other form...", "3YKP7CX6G2DLYE0WWV9S6Z0CJHHB7H": "Don't run away. Doesn't sound like your home is a happy place for you though. As much as you might want it to be, a college. After you graduate high school you can go to community college and take only the classes you can afford to pay for on your own without loans. Many people I know got stuck in this trap. living on their own, putting themselves through college with no help from family, but unable to get enough financial aid because their family makes money. Go live with your aunt until you can graduate high school and save enough money for college. Or even go to community college while living with her if you can. Your mental health is important and you deserve a safe space to live. Being a writer may or may not have well paying jobs readily available just out of college, so be prepared to double major in something that will pay the bills while you are writing/waiting to get published. You can choose to live wherever you want for however long you want if you can afford it. Good luck.", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBL5BV": "Migraines can be set off by triggers. The best way to minimise your migraine is to keep a headache diary. Whenever you have a migraine, write down the day, date, time, what you have eaten for that day, how long the migraine has lapsed, the pain score (from 1-10, 1 being the least), emotional factor (what was mood, were you feeling depressed, angry or stressed? ), what medication have you taken to lessen the pain, and the pain score after the medication. From there, you might be able to spot patterns like certain food triggers your migraine, or certain days eg mondays because you are in a rush so you didn't eat breakfast thus lack of food therefore migraine. What about time? Are you in a very hot or cold place at a particular time? That could trigger migraines. Fluctuating weather and temperature could also trigger migraine. A change in season too. Some people can predict weather by their offset in migraines. What about stress? Some people get migraine when they are extremely stressfu...", "3GV1I4SEO9NE7N834YTUEOWL008L6C": "I walk down the garden paths, And all the daffodils Are blowing, and the bright blue squills. I walk down the patterned garden-paths In my stiff, brocaded gown. As I wander down The garden paths. And the plashing of waterdrops In the marble fountain Comes down the garden-paths. What is Summer in a fine brocaded gown! I should like to see it lying in a heap upon the ground. I would be the pink and silver as I ran along the paths, And he would. I would choose To lead him in a maze along the patterned paths, A bright and laughing maze for my heavy-booted lover, Till he caught me in the shade, And the buttons of his waistcoat bruised my body as he clasped me, Aching, melting, unafraid. No, no answer.' And I walked into the garden, Up and down the patterned paths, In my stiff, correct brocade. Up and down I walked, Up and down. In Summer and in Winter I shall walk Up and down The patterned garden-paths In my stiff, brocaded gown. I shall go Up and down, In my gown. Christ! What are patterns for?", "3MDKGGG61QL2Q0G8D7VL0F62UDWT6P": "You will not be able to donate blood if you have ulcerative colitis.Back to top V Back to top Vaccination - how long after I've had a vaccination (or flu shot, etc) can I donate?It depends on the type of vaccine.", "3L2OEKSTW98LB0YQGSFISAU8FA4Y85": "Action genre is a genre-genre means like a topic, e.g. like romance, horror etc. It may be about a book or like about a movie, action genre usually has fighting and police cars and guns, usually plain action. What you should do is explain what the action is, why it is used and why it's entertaining or something like that. Maybe you could also write about what's usually in action movies/books, also you can write what a genre is:D", "3TZ0XG8CBUI6AZQI8GN2TT1H61K89R": "Last time I checked that's called adultery. Commandment 7. Of course it's wrong.", "3SX4X51T807N0AN373QYMA21RO6AOB": "then you can use treatment of Superficial BURNS, POst burn scars , Keloids with CONTRACTUBEX GEL...", "3XABXM4AJ13C2Y74PIYOFOR6G1KQ8R": "Credits or subscriptions , we got you covered . Don? ?t worry , you can cancel anytime . Download your stock photos and footage at once or any day and at any time . Whatever you do n't use gets rolled over as long as you 're an active subscriber .", "34KYK9TV2R67HCKOKY731QW86VQSBH": "PitBullAwarenessMonth. Pitbulls kill humans more than any other breed and famously unprovoked.Rottweillers and others are usually provoked", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPLBA6": "As a massage terapist I have learned that there is no way to break up scar tissue only elasticise it. There is a NET remedy called scars and adhesions. their bodies become used to it.", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE74B9S": "Church of England and the Puritans  what led to their move to America to escape persecution http://t.co/t49jhNy8V4 christianity LNYHBT", "3PMR2DOWOOZMQB14TNK801GAIJ345N": "Look up your weight online.", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIV0ZUD": "basically iv been getting slightly unusual heartbeats and never used to before, it gets faster and then slows down or just thumps, i thought it might have something to do with me being over energetic or me having pulled a muscle in my chest because its painful sometimes when i breathe in, i feel healthy though. does anybody have any idea what it could be?? btw i am slightly underweight and have had a poor diet lately due to stress, maybe it will improve as my diet does", "3AJA9FLWSCW80FT8KOZLGEH6CVJFIX": "My skin is oily too.try using oil-free acne wash or a medicated scub. Opinion 2: its fine its just the skin that u have", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKV9G6": "im really sorry about your cat. i lost my cat that same way about 2 or 3 weeks ago and i know what you are feel. i lost 2 others like that too. her is a story about my 23 year old horse slim when he died 3 years ago ( im only 14) i was getting ready to go to school and my friend calls me and tells me she thinks slim has collic ( as we live in a neighborhood we had to board). i go over to her house immidiatly and find the vet there. we didnt know how he was doing so my mom made me go to school. after i went straight to her house to find he looked even worse. his head was down and his eyes were droopy. the vet said to walk him around in big circles and to talk to him so i did. i said slim i love you. you cant leave me. and it was getting dark and late. after a while my friends neighbors and brother and sister and mom and dad where there along with my family. everyone was crying because they just heard the news : we had to put our beloved horse down. i was screaming and crying i couldnt s", "3RQVKZ7ZRKHRA100D2GH56X8PB472B": "i wish i was getting some type of thick the only thick im getting is thick ojeras thick blisters thick leg muscle but no thick ass lol", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S4218WD": "Ratings ( 0 ) ( 13 ) Caramel Mini Rice Cakes with Dollop of Whipped Cream Select  Post '' to show off your original recipe and let others in the Community Recipe Swap try it for themselves .", "3I01FDIL6M67RA1A4FJ35Y74BM7D2A": "most likely ingrown hairs try a hot compress to bring the puss to the surface like a pimple or use the tweezers to pull the top layer of skin off you will usually be able to see the hair curled up just pull it out with the tweezers and use some peroxide on the bump  Shaving means, stubble, bumps, redness, scratching your crotch because it itches. One area in particular this happens is the pelvic muscles/tendons and this can cause pain ranging from mild to severe in the region that you describe.", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR96DK": "Artist block is when an artist is staring at his canvas/paper/computer screen/instrument or whatever tools he uses for his/her art form and just cannot start working on in, he has no inspiration, or he is too distracted or depressed to have any initiative to work on his project. Some artists say there is no such thing as an artist block, you are either and artist or not. Anyone can do art, you can learn how to draw, paint, write, sing, play an instrument, build a building. But not everyone has the talent to do it. Art can be done in a technical way (buy study, it is a rational process), or you can just let your feelings guide your hands and just paint or sing or whatever... (through talent, it is a spontaneous process, without rationalisation). This is why some artwork represents the artist's feelings, other have a different symbolism, a message.", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26U8JK": "Hi Amanda.research has shown that a single hostile encounter between two unfamiliar cats/kittens can set the tone for their relationship for a long time to come. Adult cats have a more difficult time with introductions. We had 2 cats, and got a 3rd after 2-3 years.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082LU7E": "Lots of ruck (not misspelled). Been writing books for going on thirty years and if I didn't draw my satisfaction/s from solely the writings I'd be out of luck. I went to San Diego, CA and like some smacked A. I went to several Publishing Houses and the security guard told me, 'Sorry, they do not accept transcripts and if you do not an appointment then you will have to leave this building.' TA DA, it occurred to me, of course. They got kids, relatives, and you name it, they don't wanna shared any of those scarce dollars with me! They don't wanna assist anybody who is down here stuck in dung of life. They have their own that gotta come first. But if you ever find a way, contact me and maybe we can draw up some form of program to bring some em bucks our ways. NOT JOKING! Have a nice day.", "3QHITW7OYO7QLM0JMGI2BFX16PLQAW": "I am worried, is this normal?Search Today's Posts Mark Forums Read  LinkBack Thread Tools Search this Thread Sep 7th, 2009, 02:22 AM  1 Love Bunny Mum (Mom) Inactive  Join Date: May 2009 Location: Derby, UK Posts: 2,301 Bleeding and discharge after sex?I am worried, is this normal?", "356TQKY9XFV2WG2PTJPIFXABBBW78E": "I'd recommend a Maltese for you. They're a toy breed, white, and have very long hair,like a Yorkie. Also consider Cavalier King Charles Spaniels and Papillons--they're also toy breeds, and very affectionate and easy to train, and don't bark a lot like other small breeds. If you really want the long hair, go for a Papillon.", "39N6W9XWRDL04F48ZQR6KNB63THYGL": "s/he sounds like a spoiled brat trying to manipulate people to get what s/he wants.", "3CMV9YRYP3ZQVINAOHNJNS1QM6SLJI": "I don't take meds to be like everyone else. Now my anger fades by the next day. They saved my career for a while, not my marriage. I have more, because of my meds. It's not my disease that dictates that. I would choose to be normal because normal feels better than I ever feel, though I have no side effects from meds, no financial or other insecurities, and my mood is terrifically balanced. And I would be normal? Yes I would. I'd rather have my current moodiness than that feeling of being encased in glass, though, or anything in that direction. There's no normality in that. I can't be normal. I'll take my life over many others, my genetic heritage, my illegitimate conception, my growing up in an angry home, my learning about bipolar disorder the hard way, my learning how to live the hard way, not because I. I take my meds so I won't be crazy. I must admit I wouldn't trade my uniqueness to be normal. No one would have felt that about my uncle. But someone feels that way about me. That's what's rea", "3HXK2V1N4KDA3UB165KBBJA1OEJ2G5": "You can loose up to 2.5 pounds a week so about 10 pounds a month. It's about 3500 calories in 1 pound so if you burn more calories than you take in you'll be in good shape to loose the 2.5 in a week. Try to exercise every day and burn an addt'l 500 calories by exercise. Go to this site it'll tell you about how many calories you burn at your age, height, and weight. http://straighthealth.com/pages/tools/ca...   Opinion 2: The following site should help you, it is specifically for preparing for the Navy physical fitness tests. http://www.military.com/military-fitness...", "3PGQRAZX02I3UKDZUQLN91U9R4BYS5": "BRITISH quot. BAD TEETHquot. IS A SUBJECTIVE OBSERVATION. MOST BRITS WOULD NOT SAY THAT THEY HAVE quot. BAD TEETH. THIS IS A STATEMENT COMMON AMONG MANY AMERICANS BECAUSE THE MAJORITY OF YOUNG PEOPLE HAVE HAD BRACES. NOT EVERYONE IN THE USA HAS THE KNOWLEDGE OR THE FINANCES TO OBTAIN BRACES. SO I SUPPOSE IT MATTERSN WHOM YOU ASK.", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVQZC0": "Online weight loss plans Online weight loss plans are web-based fitness programs designed to help participants lose weight. These may include assistance in the areas necessary for weight loss such as goal setting, progress tracking, meal and workout planning and personal support from personal trainers or fitness coaches. Online weight loss plans are usually interactive programs that provide the user with diet information, workout routines, meal planning, goal tracking, and feedback.", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TA9Y2Z": "... also I would like to know the cost of the flight for my dog and how do I ... and vaccinations to ... possible to transport a cat or dog with Egypt Air ...", "3ECKRY5B1QUE5WK8L0TSJ6XOO0DZI5": "If you have a red line running from the burn on your hand past your wrist it could already be infected and I would advise that you see a health care provider as soon as possible. You should not use Epsom salts for a burn, or ice. You can submerge the area in cool water. I would also not advise putting any antibiotic ointments or dressings until a health care provider has evaluated it. This answer should not be considered medical advice. This answer should not be considered medical advice and should not take the place of a doctors visit. Please see the bottom of the page for more information or visit our Terms and Conditions. Posted:  Report This Report Answer Was this helpful? Yes No Thanks for your feedback. 7 of 12 found this helpful Choose as Best Answer Read the Original Article: WebMD Ask the Pharmacist: Bug Bites, Burns, First Aid", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSFUQE": "Protein powders are simply a means of increasing or meeting your daily protein requirements. Asking that question is like asking if chicken, steak or fish is bad for you. Most protein that you see on the market is whey protein which is derived from milk. Is milk bad for you? Of course not.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYUKEW": "If you are talking about this: Rickets' is a vitamin deficiency disease of infancy and early childhood caused by lack of vitamin D. Rickets causes soft bones because enough vitamin D is not present to assist in calcium absorption. Rickets may also be caused by kidney disorders involving renal tubular acidosis. Rickets causes malformed bones and teeth. Dental caries and misshapen teeth may be linked to rickets. Autosomal dominant hypophosphatemic rickets Autosomal dominant hypophosphatemic rickets (ADHR) is a rare hereditary disease in which excessive loss of phosphate in the urine leads to poorly formed bones (rickets), bone pain, and tooth abscesses. did they suffer from rickets? Some of them certainly did suffer from rickets. Rickets is a disease of the bones caused by a vitamin deficiency. Rickets can also be avoided by eating fish oil, but people in areas away from the sea never had access to seafood in winter and so commonly suffered the effects of rickets.", "3D06DR5225HZ072RUNBLU6DWWONMA4": "If your blood sugar is 102 you are fine, smack dab in the normal range. However, if this is a typo and you mean 201, then you DO need to get it down. Nutrition experts say that there is no one diet for diabetes, but people with diabetes should follow the nutrition guidelines in the Food Pyramid, while paying special attention to carbohydrate intake. People with diabetes should also eat about the same amount of food at the same time each day to keep blood sugar levels stable. Soluble fibers are found mainly in fruits, vegetables and some seeds, and are especially good for people with diabetes because they help to slow down or reduce the absorption of glucose from the intestines. Legumes, such as cooked kidney beans, are among the highest soluble fiber foods. Other fiber-containing foods, such as carrots, also have a positive effect on blood sugar levels. Insoluble fibers, found in bran, whole grains and nuts, act as intestinal scrubbers by cleaning out the lower gastrointestinal tract.", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP5129": "During the late 18th and 19th centuries, large numbers of convicts were transported to the various Australian penal colonies by the British government. One of the primary reasons for the British settlement of Australia was the establishment of a penal colony to alleviate pressure on their overburdened correctional facilities. Over the 80 years more than 165,000 convicts were transported to Australia.1 The number of convicts pales compared to the immigrants who arrived in Australia in the 1851-1871 gold rush. In 1852 alone, 370,000 immigrants arrived in Australia. By 1871 the total population had nearly quadrupled from 430,000 to 1.7 million people.2 The last convicts to be transported to Australia arrived in Western Australia in 1868. Poverty, social injustice, child labor, harsh and dirty living conditions and long working hours were prevalent in 19th-century Britain. Dickens' novels perhaps best illustrate this even some government officials were horrified by what they saw. Only", "3L55D8AUFAVNN3O3X4VNUWQR51MCYM": "no, but you can get one from looking at christina aguellera(sp)", "3PIOQ99R7YKPXY1PCT7C7MEQ8HRNUJ": "Mieke Dalle/Photographer's Choice RF/Getty Images Raising tadpoles as they turn into frogs is fascinating experience. The process is called metamorphosis, which means a change in form or habit as part of the development of an organism. Obtaining Frog Eggs and Tadpoles Before you gather eggs or tadpoles from the wild to raise at home, check your laws. Collecting tadpoles or eggs is illegal in many places, so check with your government wildlife or environment agency before doing so. If it is legal where you live and you decide to collect eggs or tadpoles, make sure to just take a few and leave the rest in their natural environment. This will reduce the impact on the environment, and growing tadpoles take a lot of space and work. You may be able to release frogs raised from eggs or tadpoles harvested from the wild, but you should check this with your wildlife department as well. However, if the frogs turn out to be a non-native species, don't release them.", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPKAB4": "YES! It certainly would. I would suggest doing it outside whenever possible. Also, their diet will influence shedding. If feed a poor quality food with corn, wheat and by products they will shed more than if fed a high quality food. Look at the ingredients lists. Meat (not meal) of some type should be the first ingredient. There should be no corn, wheat or by-products. Innova, Wellness, Orijen  Merrick are a few of the good brands out there. Another plus with the better quality foods is a smaller firmer stool as the dog digests, uses, more of what he/she takes in. All the fillers in the cheaper foods just comes out as ... waste.", "3N3WJQXELSOQPMP2HWHROBF9KV9L2Y": "i hope someone can help , i have a leopard gecko she is about 4 years old , she has always been the main hunter her mate has always been the lazy one ..   over the last 3 months she has started to declined in health she sleeps all the time and wont eat the last time she ate was 2 crickets about 3 weeks ago ..and shakes when she walks i think is mainly because how weak she is ..", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2H1T0": "YMCA  I am in a gym. Or maybe join another gym?", "3LAZVA75NIPYV7SZUOXJGSJ3F0E2OW": "At his age, the most likely reason for all this is that he is lonely. No, not even necessarily for you (although obviously, you'll do in a pinch! ), but for a cat buddy. Young cats, especially the boys, do tend to want a cat buddy to play with. Yes, they will play rough but if each one is doing it they generally quickly learn when to stop before causing serious pain or harm. Another issue I see with him is the age he was when you adopted him. 5 weeks is a very young age for a cat to be away from its littermates. It is not until around 10 to 12 weeks of age that they would normally be working on social skills and frustration tolerance. Of course they don't call them by these names but these are the things they learn from their mama cat and from interacting with their littermates. Certainly sometimes things happen that make it impossible for them to stay with mama and littermates that long but if there was no unavoidable reason for him being separated so young then the pet store certain", "3NSM4HLQNRSI8270BCFO1FC6A7AQQ6": "Moniker Privacy Services is a company based in Florida that registers domain names while hiding the identities of the domain owners. They are very shady. They have been sued numerous times, and sites registered through them have been responsible for a huge amount of spam.", "3N5YJ55YXG15IPNR6OQL7L2W1EXANS": "Only if they're normal!", "3A520CCNWNY1OJAEDPN2HY8NNMZAE6": "look for :ENSICASUPAEROENACENSTAECOLE DE L'AIRfor the best in Franceon your search engine", "3Z8UJEJOCZBK92KCWZS62CT6QFQ93Y": "This is a very good blog, a beginners guide to abnormal psychology. Short, clear and simple and you can even post your question and contact the author regarding particular subject you are interested in, for FREEhttp://sensitive-psychoworld.blogspot.com/", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV2XUE": "Good luck.Naturally, if you become concerned, or it doesn't seem to be improving, see your MD.I am an RN Source(s): Registered Nurse  8 years ago 0 Thumbs up 0 Thumbs down Comment Add a comment Submit  just now Asker's rating  It could be a blood clot, which means you need to get to a doctor.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGG1CG": "You should start doing about 10 sit ups at night, and start adding 5 more on ever 3 nights. You should also try hula-hooping - it tones your tummy and buttocks!", "3EHVO81VN5JHE5OG772FR0CXB8JH13": "Yes, it is very normal to feel this way:) You want a baby but just not right now. The idea grew on you and you and then when it didn't happen it was kind of a let down. I have felt this, it is partly to do with our hormones. Did you know a women can produce breast milk even if she is not pregnant? SHe just has to feel the urge. I don't think you have any thing to worry about, your only 17 and a baby right now would totally fuc everything up for you. you need to live life sweetheart, go to party's, date boys, go to paris, italy, do some drugs,(wait, drugs are bad m'kaa). You get what I'm trying to say:) I think that God let you get lucky this time, and gave you your live instead of giving it to a baby. Because that is what happens when you have a baby, they consume you. Your not ready for all that just yet, and babies scare boys your age, so you would certainly be a single mom. I think you dodged a bullet here) Use condoms and make good choices please:) I only say it because I care", "33NKDW9FFXGYNYYTS89LBIJI3VUCXI": "As Martin Luther King stated, A genuine leader is not a searcher for consensus but a molder for consensus. Leadership is often described as the ability to dictate and be sociallyinfluential forgetting aid and support to complete some task. All great leaders were bound by greatness which allowed the country or its people to grow. A leader is the guiding and dictating head of a group, army, political movement or a country. A leader is one who knows the way, goes the way, and shows the way. John Maxwell. The public has always been led by some efficient leader. The public figures who led countries through various wars, improved the conditions of its men, reformed social and political issues were the ones who possessed qualities to be a great leader.Despite of the change in time, the contribution of leaders in history cannot be overlooked. Some of the greatest leaders of all times are:  10. Winston Churchill", "3D17ECOUOET2KXHHSMDDN6BNS3231J": "The audition process for 'Jesus' was televised in the UK in a short series called 'Superstar'. In April 2015, it was announced that Alex would star as Adam Pontipee in 'Seven Brides for Seven Brothers' at Regent's Park Open Air Theatre, from 16 July to 29 August 2015. Sophia Kiely Sophia Elsie Kiely (born 2000) is an English Olivier Award winning child actress who played the titular role of Matilda in 'Matilda the Musical'. Sophia had 6 auditions before getting the role as Matilda. Howell won the Olivier Award for his set design for the musical 'Matilda the Musical' in 2012. He met Matthew Warchus there, who years later asked him whether he would be interested in working on 'Matilda the Musical'. The most recent of these was for his work on the West End production of 'Matilda the Musical'. His set design for 'Matilda the Musical' was described: Howell's unique design for Matilda The Musical saw the entire Cambridge theatre, from foyer to stage, transformed into Roald Dahl's imaginat...", "3VP28W7DUNIUV5IIKSN7G9KW88KFZT": "The basic principle is always the same : eat less, exercise more. She should draw up a sensible eating plan - lots of fruit and veg  some carbs, some low-fat protein (i.e. lean meat, fish, nuts etc), and plenty of water. A 13 year old pygmy elephant would be between 700-900 pounds.", "3V7ICJJAZAEOFRIDUXBL3NG2SFQ4BP": "I think they're small", "3XU9MCX6VOA1SKKFMGENANO8QNWR2S": "'I checked her nasal cavity and found a lot of fly maggots there,' Tawee told the paper. He anesthetized the woman and during an operation removed 34 maggots from inside her nose. the mama maggot inject the baby maggot into the baby mango. so when the baby mango be mango the baby maggot be maggot. consuming a maggot in the mango tastes like a mango. These are not Chicago but on ebay... http://cgi.ebay.com/10-Boo-Boo-Bunnies-Baby-Shower-Favor-Reusable-Ice-CubesW0QQitemZ5673744392QQcategoryZ104192QQssPageNameZWDVWQQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem http://cgi.ebay.com/40-Boo-Boo-Bunnies-Baby-Shower-Favors-Reusable-Ice-CubeW0QQitemZ5673744682QQcategoryZ104192QQssPageNameZWDVWQQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem http://cgi.ebay.com/50-Boo-Boo-Bunnies-Baby-Shower-Favors-Reusable-Ice-CubeW0QQitemZ5675511827QQcategoryZ104192QQssPageNameZWDVWQQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem http://cgi.ebay.com/Washcloth-Ice-Cube-Holder-Boo-Boo-Bunny-Personalize-NEWW0QQitemZ5669889399QQcategoryZ82563QQssPageNameZWDVWQQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem", "3IV1AEQ4DRBVGB3RUSEFINFK26T8JJ": "If you are only 5' 3' and 113 lbs it sounds like you need to gain some weight not loose some. If you eat only an apple every day you will not get the nutrients required to maintain a healthy body. You will get very sick and fatigued which will hurt your school work. You will begin to act distant toward others, which could hurt relationships with friends. Look in any nutritional book you desire, doing that will only hurt you. If you feel like you must loose weight, there are far better alternatives that self prescribed starvation.", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXPBI9": "there are many lawyers that will sue a doc for millions on contingency over minor things..beiing that you have a real issue--you may be able to get the lawyer on contingency--many of tehse lawyers will come to you if you can't get to them-- just open teh phone book and start calling in the us--the statute is 2 years for a lot of things you have to talk to a lawyeer ahead of time to see if you have to pay if you lose--some will make you pay--some won't--that is what contingency is--they only get paid if tehy win", "3WA2XVDZEMF01HYBNC6Q1T61R3AE6L": "hmmm...well, i don't finge myself at all when i masturbate. I just mainly rub my clit or my labias. Vey pleasurable still so i don't have to worry about the blood. It really depends on how much of a flow you are. If i'm on my heavy days, i don't. the only exception wouldbe if on the first two days i get bad cramps. If so, i just lay back on the tub and let the water acet do the work. I find that orgasing helps with my cramps, so i have a reason...but if it doens't hlp, you can just wait if you want to. On your lesser heavy flow days, just lay something beneath you. However...i've notced...just like when you're in water, when i masturbate, the flow seems to not be as much. There'll be a little, but not enough to gross me out. i mean...unless you go ..diging arond or smething o.O Since i don't finger, i can't tell you much about the peeing, but i'm sure that's normal. I've heard of others having that as well. And even i feel the need to pee during...i always need to pee after though o", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP5S8I": "Your description did not do too much at all, provide more detailed descriptions including the main form and how did you add the code to the form, then subform.... These are needed to understand your problem. Opinion 2: I provided the macro solution to your previous question. I always test my macro solutions multiple times before posting them. The macro, and instructions provided, function appropriately if you have created a module containing the three macros referenced in my code. If it is not working for you, then the process has not been applied correctly. Since you state that you can manually call the macros, I infer that the issue is not an Excel version issue, i.e. '.xls' versus '.xlxm' format. Have you placed the code in the worksheet module of the sheet that the validated cell resides in?", "3WRKFXQBOB5E06A3PER95ZOMI66IYU": "See the link below.Good luck!Try to get more information about penis articles, advice, forum and free e-book at my profile.", "3YLTXLH3DF4KVX7IS9D5SWUVEOQHP8": "Shes just a natural child . '' WATCH dancers workshop part of  Revolting Children , '' from  Matilda , The Musical '' CLICK through a slideshow of the  Matilda , The Musical '' workshop Information on how to audition for  Billy Elliot '' or  Matilda , The Musical '' can be found at The battle to keep award-winning musical Matilda British ...   - Daily Mail Get top stories and blog posts emailed to me each day..   is a registered trademark of TheHuffingtonPost.com , Inc.", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TS0IC": "kids can make friends in school.", "3Z3R5YC0P3LY9T9JE0YPULJFNCXTFQ": "We are suppose to be a Country of LAWS, so yes we should follow the law.That includes all of the illegal immigration laws on the books.", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHXSRY": "You most likely have a bladder infection but any bleeding from the body is a sign of a serious problem, so immediately go to the doctor, don't pa-nick because it is most likely like i said a bladder infection, They are very painful and if left untreated can spread to your kidney's and that is also extremely painful. If you have any cranberry juice drink that, or really just any fluids to ease the pain until making in to your doctor for antibiotics. But it won't hurt to pee any more.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHTYLV2": "I was home schooled my junior year and loved it except when it came prom season and i missed alot of things my friends were doing. I went back to high school this year for my senior year but found it so hard to actually stay in so i had to be home schooled again. I think you can go either way but don't combine the two because its to hard to change. I loved home schooling because it gave me a chance to work hours most teenagers cant but then i hate it now when i am looking back on it because i miss doing the traditional high school things. Everything we're tought in school, 'Stay in school, get good grades, then get a good job.' All of these objects leads to a more profitable economy, Why because America is home of the free... Traffic was light today and the usual 50 kids or so were not waiting for the school bus this morning. they must have stayed home.", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGLY9T": "It is absolutely impossible to quantify if you do not state what the unknown variable of x is. There are an infinite number of possible solutions depending on what x is equal to. There is no answer as such since this is not an equation - you do not equate this statement to anything, ie. 4x-5  10, then you could work out what it is. If you mean 4 times (-5) then the x is superfluous and it should be written 4(-5) which is -20 but it looks much more like 4x - 5 to me.", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DBUC6": "I know it?? difficult?? I had lymphoma (non-nodular sclerosis lymphoma to be exact) 15 years ago when I was 18. By the time it was caught, it progressed to stage 3. My doctor gave me 6 months to live??e? ?l I?? still kicking 15 years later! I don't suspect lymphoma because they would have done blood test first, the test would have indicators of lymphoma as well. I'm assuming they're doing the biopsy because your blood is normal, so they want to find out what's causing the problem. Lymphoma is diagnosed through biopsy of an affected node or area. Period. A diagnosis of lymphoma can be SUGGESTED by symptoms, blood tests, CT scans, x-rays, MRI, or PET scans, but a BIOPSY is required for diagnosis. Next time you are at your doctor's office ask them if they have in fact ruled out Hodgkin's Lymphoma. A typical case of 'mono' lasts about 6 months and it's over completely.", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69PW470": "my sperm is thin. i loose ..... i m 15 yrs old male i masburate 3-5 a week though not exprincng any side effect xcpt lack ... Height increase is under hormonal control and we can just help body by .... i am 20 years old . You NORMALLY stop growing at 5'-4' for a year or so because you just finished First Growth spurt and your body needs to build muscle. You will get another growth spurt. 2) If you stop masturbating your body will release surplus semen in wet dreams. When that growth spurt is at its peak, some kids grow 4 or more inches (10 or more centimeters) in a year! At the end of your growth spurt, you'll have reached your adult height ?? or just about. Most guys usually stop growing at 18 and in most cases any further height growth from 18-25 is insignificant but there are exceptions such as late bloomers. Under eating and under sleeping can, to some extent, stunt your height growth.", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD6AS5": "I have seen a few patients in my office with this appliance. You would never know just by looking at them that they had a forsus appliance. There is really nothing to be scared about. You may be able to see it in your mouth when you talk, but only very minimal unless you are showing people because your cheeks will cover up more of the appliance. If that guy you like hasn't shown any interest in you now, then he probably doesn't like you anyway. Don't let some stinky boy get in the way of  your treatment. You are going to have a BEAUTIFUL smile once your treatment is complete. Just keep that in mind and you will be fine.", "3SD15I2WD2SXRJIEYSPUI2240EH36G": "i would get a standard size english bull terrier.they are ADORABLE, and not too large either. Obviously you had a close relationship with the dog you had to give away, and you gave that dog your heart. Dogs : Pit Bull terrier would probably be the winner here.", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DECUR": "SAY MY NAME. YOU KNOW MY NAME. SAY MY NAME. WHATS MY NAME. TELL ME MY NAME. SAY MY NAME. SAY IT SAY IT SAY IT SAY. MY. NAAAAAAAAME.", "3UDTAB6HH6XOSALFDCAN0EVZN3709V": "Tell this to your Dr. Tharnpfeffa 51 months ago nbsp. Tharnpfeffa Tharnpfeffa Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3NBFJK3IOHGOA106T3I8IWD4PJGGOQ": "Good luck.- anon113325 171)I just got my ears pieced at claires five days ago.It hurt for a few minutes, and then suddenly, the pain went away.", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R4LI7": "Difficult to say, you need to be examined by a dentist to find out for sure. Opinion 2: well i had two wisdom teeth remove a week ago my top left and my top bottom, and the bottom teeth was the reason i went to's the dentist. i dint even know my top teeth was a wisdom teeth since i dont ever remembe hurting or coming out, anyways the bottom teeth started bothering me little by little like a annoying tingling feeling unitl four days later it hurt like krazy and i went to the dentist the very next day and got them remove. so if your on'z pain i recommend buying some over the counter ibuprofen the best ibuprofen is the one that says - compare to the ingridents on motrin - hope it helps and all's : )", "3G5RUKN2EC1RD6DMEICLBQRCVWGN9R": "Like Dr. Gregory House", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO64Y2": "The average bed time for a thirteen year old is 10:30-11:30 The time a 13 year old should go to bed should be determined on several factors. One factor is how much sleep the child needs to be fully rested. Most people need 8 hours of sleep but some need more and some need less. Another factor is the time the child needs to wake up in the morning. Look at how much time it takes to be ready in the morning. Getting school things ready the night before means they may be able to sleep a little later in the morning. Keeping a consistent schedule is also a part of deciding bed time. If a child has problems getting to bed at the designated time, then setting an earlier bed time will help them get enough sleep. For example, if the child needs to be ready to leave for school by 7:00 a. , takes an hour to ready in the morning, and needs 8 hours of sleep, then they should be in bed by 10:00 p.", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K345ZYNP": "I am on Social Security Disability for Depression. I also found out that I have fibromyalgia. In my experience pain medications do not work.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52SYRH": "too much of good 'ol tea n crumpets n scones i guess.. seriously when i went to england as an exchange student some years back i realised that the guys not only have bad teeth BUT ALSO protuding ears.... there was this guy that every gal in school fancied and he had thick yellow teeth!..eeewww...and the obligatorial protuding ears too! needless to say that i was confused!", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH033D7": "Executive, Legislative and Judicial. Though George Bush is trying to blur the lines between the three, they are set up to make sure one branch does not get too much power. well i do know that the delaware tribe is some where in the great plains and if you want more informant i will have to ask my history teacher.", "3S37Y8CWI8YG3UGOPO7HQ1TN2G8W4X": "well today is the 20th if you got your period on the 22-24th in sept. and the 24th in oct. it should be coming soon... if not wait a few days and take a pregnancy test to make sure.", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGQSCO": "I raise them and have a litter right now. I have a vet that says he has seen a few make it to 20 years old. I have never seen them live that long myself, but normally 10-15 years.", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8HJ07": "Take a over-the-counter decongestant. I have had 3 sinus and ear infections in the past 9 months. I never had a doctor just send me to a specialist. He should have given you a antibiotic, nasal spray and a decongestant. Have you discussed this with your parents ? No docote would just tell you to go to another doctor without trying medicine. Having your sinuses drained is no walk in the park. I suggest strongly that you go to another doctor. It can be a pediatrician or a regular GP. Don't worry, you won't go deaf. But, really you must go see another doctor.I have never heard of such a thing.", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGUJPF": "You can use a semi-colon to combine two related sentences this way, you can connect your ideas without separating them with a period or conjunction. A colon can begin a list or introduce an idea. Here's an example: You can describe the American flag this way: It has thirteen stripes alternating between red and white and a corner in blue with 50 white stars.", "32ZCLEW0BZIGM328G9GQ49AARGSPJJ": "Help  Privacy  Feedback  Google Legal Info Get Huffington Post for Blackberry Enter your mobile number to get the link!Message and data rates may apply.By clicking 'Send,' you represent that you are the account holder for the number you provided (or have the account holder's permission to receive a text message) and agree that the AOL Terms and Privacy Policy apply.", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9CNGJ": "You SHOULD get a second opinion because unfortunately a lot of dentists will claim you have cavities because that means more money for them! And also some dentists will say that some areas in your teeth look like they are about to become minor cavities so they want to fill those before it happens. I would definitely get another opinion from a well-trusted dentist. I've had a lot of cavities and every single one of them have been between my teeth in the back because I have a really really hard time flossing back there and my teeth are very cavity prone anyway. So be sure you try your best to floss back there regularly because that's where lots of people get cavities..between teeth. Are you diabetic? Diabetics are also more susceptible to cavities. Candy/sugary foods are the worst for causing cavities. Especially if you like hard candies like suckers and stuff. Those get stuck on your teeth for a long time if you don't make sure you remove it.", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX8A3E": "Many women wrongly assume that a tubal ligation is 100 certain method of preventing pregnancy, but it is not. A tubal ligation is considered permanent birth control, but there is still a margin of error, and you could become pregnant any time after having the procedure done. Of course, your chances of becoming pregnant are limited, but every woman that has had a tubal ligation needs to know that there is a slight possibility that when your period is weeks late that you really could be pregnant. A recent study has estimated that 143 women in 10,000 get pregnant after a tubal ligation, making the percentage about 1.43 which is better coverage than youll likely get from other forms of birth control because of the human error. In these rare cases, the fallopian tubes often grow back together, allowing the egg to come down and be fertilized and then move into the uterus. Many of these pregnancies actually turn out to be ectopic pregnancies because of the damage done to the tube during a", "3HKIF5DF6YVL3EW0REZQL6IFUKXG9F": "the way u titled dat it sounds well rude spit or swallow ewwwwwwww", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PS187": "Dental implants do not hurt. A very little discomfort can be expected for a day or two of placement. It hurts when you look at the cost.", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY6VOW": "I have a 3 year old male basset. He has an odor, but it's not Stinky, it's almost like tortilla chips actually. after all that's what your best friend was.", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIZUIC": "My grandma always said vit. E. apply it to the scar. I've seen Mederma ads for scars. Could also see dermatologist.", "30F94FBDNRI8WCX39YCTBVSU8E5TB8": "LOS ANGELES, Aug. 18 ?? When Kathy Schneider turned on her favorite radio station, KZLA-FM, on Thursday morning, she heard the usual mix of Tim McGraw, Faith Hill, Kenny Chesney and other country artists. Two hours later, when she returned to her car, the song playing at KZLA?? spot on the dial was one she did not recognize. It was not an unfamiliar country tune, but a different genre altogether. At first she thought something had happened to the transmission tower, but the pop and R  B hits kept pumping out of her speakers. Then an announcer welcomed listeners to the re-engineered station, now known as Movin?? 93.9. ?he frustrating part was that everything seemed fine at 20 minutes before 10, then you get back into your car, and they? ?e changed everything,?? said Ms. Schneider, 38, a customs broker from the Northridge section of Los Angeles. ???? not only angry at the change, but how they changed it.?? The abrupt switch ?? Keith Urban?? ?onight I Wanna Cry?? followed by a b", "3G57RS03HH3CNXMHP91K7MJCY5752S": "Ridley and robert M, just curious, what state are you guys in? I really am curious, Doesn't the United Stated have record forclosures, record high cost of living, record gas prices, record energy prices,, we now have record high inflation. We have had more US jobs sent overseas in the last 5 years than the last 50 combined. We have had the weakest employment growth in the history of the USA with the exception of Hoover, Record national dept at 120,000 per family of 4 owed with nothing to show, didn't even the Fox news say Bush has a 33 approval rating for what people said was a horrible economy, we have gained 2 millions jobs in 6 years (not mentioning how many lost) during Clintons 8 years gained 23 million jobs.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q1ZDYO": "Other treatments include repositioning the child's head throughout the day so that the rounded side of the head is placed dependent against the mattress, repositioning cribs and other areas that infants spend time in so that they will have to look in a different direction to see their parents, or others in the room, repositioning mobiles and other toys for similar reasons, and avoiding extended time sleeping in car-seats (when not in a vehicle), bouncy seats, or other supine seating which is thought to exacerbate the problem. If the child appears to have discomfort or cries when they are repositioned, they may have a problem with the neck. If this is unsuccessful, treatment using a cranial remolding orthosis (baby helmet) can help to correct abnormal head shapes.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSKG3V": "The exhibition, organized by the China Household Electrical Appliances Association and China World Trade Center, is China's fourth large international show on household electrical appliances. According to an official with the association, the exhibition is aimed at bringing manufacturers, sellers and consumers closer, and helping promote the growth of China's electrical appliance industry. Of China's 20 manufacturers with the largest sales revenue, 15 attend the four-day show.", "3JGHED38EDPHBMT76NNCEAYD4QUY7E": "Losing weight first starts with being happy with yourself and loving  YOU  on the inside. Try everyday to smile and laugh, LAUGHING is super helpful. The only other thing I started doing was to run, which helped speed up the weight loss.", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HQEHM": "The Influenza Pandemic of 1918 Collapse The Influenza Pandemic of 1918 March 31st, 2006, 12:23 PM The Influenza Pandemic of 1918 The influenza pandemic of 1918-1919 killed more people than the Great War, known today as World War I (WWI), at somewhere between 20 and 40 million people. It has been cited as the most devastating epidemic in recorded world history. More people died of influenza in a single year than in four-years of the Black Death Bubonic Plague from 1347 to 1351. Known as 'Spanish Flu' or 'La Grippe' the influenza of 1918-1919 was a global disaster. The Grim Reaper by Louis Raemaekers In the fall of 1918 the Great War in Europe was winding down and peace was on the horizon. The Americans had joined in the fight, bringing the Allies closer to victory against the Germans. Deep within the trenches these men lived through some of the most brutal conditions of life, which it seemed could not be any worse. Then, in pockets across the globe, something erupted that seemed as beni", "3G4VVJO6PZEBXN8QYUG25OAN65VKPG": "Carefresh Confetti comes in multiple colors. Barb Nefer About.com Rating When I got my baby guinea pig, Mufasa, I needed all the basic supplies for a piggy, from timothy hay to pellets to a cage and bedding. I knew enough not to get wood shavings for the bedding, since certain types, like cedar and pine that hasn't been kiln dried, are bad for pocket pets. I decided to try Carefresh bedding, since it's made from paper and is soft and safe for little critters. I just kept my fingers crossed that it would keep the odor down because cages can get stinky, even with regular cleaning. Great Absorbancy I bought the largest possible bag of Carefresh bedding to get Mufasa started. It comes in white (Ultra) or natural colors, but I choose the Confetti variety because I liked the different pastel hues. I lined the floor of my little guy's cage with a thick layer of Carefresh Premium and left him for the night, eager to see how the cage would look and smell the next day.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K1X78": "Yes it could. I am experiencing the exact same thing. I am 53 and never had Migraines in my life until I was involved in a car wreck and hit my head. I now get Migraines frequently.....sometimes 2-3 a week", "32LAQ1JNT9NNSB699PTOGLKIXZFTUS": "Apollo....the God of reason.", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTAPZBS": "Plus, a dog turned loose is more likely to be hit by a car or starve than to find a home. If the dog is in your care, technically it's your responsibility. Just take him down to the local humane society or shelter and turn him in. If you're lucky, they'll have a no-kill policy and a better chance of finding a home. You are lucky that he didn't have damage to his car or person from hitting your dog. You are at fault since YOUR dog was off leash. IF the dog accidentally got free and bit someone, you would be liable in that situation also. In some states it is illegal to hit a dog and leave the scene of the accident without notifying the police, however the driver of the car is not responsible for the medical bills or injuries/death sustained by a dog-at-large (loose dog) he or she is only required to notify the police. Check out the link below, about a court case that involved a loose dog who was hit by a car. The dog owner was fined 1.2 million in damages.", "30QQTY5GMKI0UD92WMQNBPS082M7US": "Full thickness loss of cartilage allows the synovial fluid to contact nerve endings in the subchondral bone , resulting in pain . In an attempt to stabilize the joint to decrease the pain , the animal 's body produces new bone at the edges of the joint surface , joint capsule , ligament and muscle attachments ( bone spurs ) . The joint capsule also eventually thickens and the joint 's range of motion decreases . No one can predict when or even if a dysplastic dog will start showing clinical signs of lameness due to pain . There are multiple environmental factors such as caloric intake , level of exercise , and weather that can affect the severity of clinical signs and phenotypic expression ( radiographic changes ) .", "3XBXDSS888HRQ2SZ5L2KE195X49XLK": "Maybe it's just the discomfort of your ovary releasing an egg. I get it all the time, and I don't worry about it. My first several periods were not painful at all.", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879GX68": "Elvira: You've absolutely ruined that border by the sundial --- it looks like a mixed salad. Elvira: It's all those nasturtiums --- they're so vulgar. Charles: I like nasturtiums. Charles: help me, Ruth --- you've got to help me --- Ruth: (Rises) What did you mean about nasturtiums? Charles: Never mind about that now --- I tell you she's here again. Ruth: I've done everything I can to help you --- I've controlled myself admirably --- I should like to say here and now that i don't believe a word about your damned hallucinations --- you're up to something. Ruth: Go on talking to her then, talk to her until you're blue in the face but don't talk to me ---- Charles: Help me, Elvira --- Elvira: How? Charles: Make her see you or something. (Ruth, who has stopped crying and been staring at Charles in horror, suddenly gets. Elvira: Look out --- she's up to something --- Charles: Will you please be quiet? Ruth: Of course, darling --- we'll all be quiet, won't we? We'll be as quiet as little mice.", "3YZ7A3YHR5R5SW3FJOGQY4WGWZ4S5G": "Been a lot of hot air and scatterguns....,hope so.", "3L1EFR8WWT3FPE05GUT83LI3T5W9F8": "I think you should be fine if you ask for those eye drops. If you want to be sure though, (not to take any risks) then talk to your eye doctor about this. You can ask for contacts, and sometimes, they can give you prescription colored contacts. They begin their count down once you use them so be careful!! Most are 90 days to a year. Secondly, you should always go to the doctors before trying to buy cosplay contacts...well you should just need to go once to start and ask all the questions. There are 328 results right now on eBay for 'ciel phantomhive cosplay': http://www.ebay.com/sch/i.html?trksidp... However, no results for 'ciel phantomhive cosplay contacts'. Which, I'm not even sure what it is you're looking for, contact lenses? Anime Cosplay Contacts ? Cat Eye Contacts ? Demon Eye Contacts .... With more than 900 types of lenses in stock, PinkyParadise.com has become one of the largest online circle lens store today. ... Even more, it tells people who you are .", "3D1TUISJWIYXJXQYFDUK2EI9MIZIU0": "Men as well as women, and children, do this. It's down to conditioning and low self-esteem. It's important to teach and understand that another person's irrational anger, no matter how they rationalize it, is all about them and not about the target of their anger. If you pick up someone's possession and deliberately smash it, you'll likely be the target of verbal abuse. If you simply are going about your business and someone decides to tell you you're worthless, or whatever they can think up at the time, you're the target of their own low self-esteem. It isn't your fault. Switch off. Walk away.", "335VBRURDJYNJ009LJ92L3X3H4G9EP": "Hi I have low self esteem too.. nothing I ever to is good enough and I dislike my family too. What helps me is to have goals and taking advantage of the things that hold me back. When I was fifteen I decided I was tired of being sad all the time, so I thought about all the things that made me sad which made me more sad, then I thought about where I would like to be when I was twenty. This helped me alot because I had goals to achieve... I wanted to be smart and travel alot. I was able to become smart- because everything I learned was never good enough, every exam was never good enough- so I kept going and learning and improving things until I started to see my grades go up. This made me happy- I could see that I was doing well because my teachers were shocked! I wanted to get away from my family- so I ended up travelling alot and learning about different cultures. I met so many people who made me feel so welcome in their lives that I actually felt more at home with them than in England", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LBISH": "Yes, especially with guys, it is not the looks that matter...instead, it is the personality and the treatment...this is what matters to a girl... If a girl is not attracted to you because of acne scars, then you are probably better off not having her in your life... I look back at our pictures and yes he bad acne but I don't remember it! Acne Acne Vulgaris Acne is a common and chronic skin disease. There are over half a dozen forms of acne, the most common being blackheads. The areas chiefly affected are the forehead, temples, cheeks, chin, chest, and back. Chronic constipation is another cause of acne. The extra efforts of the skin to eliminate excess waste result in acne and other forms of skin diseases. Orange Peel: Orange peel has been found very effective in the local treatment of acne. Lemon: Lemon has also proved beneficial in reducing pimples and acne. The external use of garlic helps to clear the skin of spots, pimples and boils. Fenugreek: Fenugreek is another useful remed...", "32PT7WK7DMDWCSXT8FX8O8CWH053D9": "Allium thunbergii Allium thunbergii is an East Asian species of wild onion native to Japan (incl Bonin  Ryukyu Islands), Korea, and China (incl. Taiwan). It grows at elevations up to 3000 m. The Flora of China recognizes 'A. tunbergii' and 'A. stenodon' as separate species, but more recent sources combine the two.", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHB790": "plus i get shortness of breath like somthing is trying cut off my wind now and then too . i take prozac and it helps . Re : Heart Palpatations/flutters and PANIC DISORDER , BLAH ! I need reassurance people ! I 've had panic and anxiety disorder for about 11 years now . I was almost 100  better for quite some time though and it was a major issue that brought it back on . Anyway , I get and have gotten random heart palpitations off and on for all that time .", "3MVY4USGB6LH4KYUQ8ZKND0L1LDISJ": "One of my dearest friends in h.s. was mixed. The word we gave her? Special. Unique. The color of your skin is just that - a color. It has nothing to do w/ who you are inside where it counts.", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA9T0N": "The signs of parvo are not eating and not drinking. They also have bloody stool and it has a terrible odor. My dog had parvo and the vet said one of the big signs was the bloody stool and not drinking water.", "3OREP8RUT294R7BXPYDMCCD5IK0GBP": "i will call my dog for timmeh and it better be a female dog then i can say that 'timmeh is my bitch'", "3M67TQBQQHMKTNJX5E7GPK7CWPIA9V": "He would have been tried in Nuremburg with the rest of the Nazi war criminals. Chances are he would have died before that happened because his health was failing rapidly and he had become addicted to pain killers.", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY52EP": " No matter what time I go to bed, I ALWAYS wake up at 9am ? stORY OF MY LIFE", "32K26U12DNMGO1ZCSP3E734F8KWDVE": "because we are EU citizens", "3YLTXLH3DF4KVX7IS9D5SWUVEOOPHE": "( from their kids ! ) If you are a dog and your owner suggests that you wear a sweater ...   Hi , My Rottweiler 's name is Jessie . She is 5 years old and her birthday is August 30 ! She is so sweet ! My dog 's name is Charlotte , he is already 7 years old . I enjoy playing with him because he is so patient , playful and affectionate .", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LSHW2": "There is absolutely no truth to the myth that the more you shave, the more it grows. Ask any dermatologist. you can get 6-10 inches of growth in a year if your hair grows fast.Usually, african hair grows about half an inch every month.", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIQCII": "Skinny Bitch Fitness Skinny Bitch Fitness is a series of fitness DVDs from Rory Freedman and Kim Barnouin, authors of the book 'Skinny Bitch'. Skinny Bitch Fitness: Boot Camp is the first in the series. Skinny Bitch Fitness: Body includes four 15-minute segments working a different body part. The segment for abs is followed by the section for legs, consisting of a series of leg moves from the floor. Skinny Bitch Fitness: Booty Bounce is a dance-routine with several options, building to a cardio workout that targets the rear and the core. if your skinny, the diet will not be as important, if you have a little meat on the abs, you want to cut down on any fats or sugars. if you have a 6pack O-beer abs, then the diet will def. The abs are made up of 3 parts side, upper and lower. You have to lower your  of fat which means cardio if you are fat or if your just skinny, then all you need is to built up your abs. if you follow what i told you i can 95 than you have abs very soon.", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61INNRF": "They differed quite dramatically, however, on the relative importance of each. It was the Roman anatomist Galen who made the liver the principal organ of the human body, arguing that it emerged first of all the organs in the formation of a fetus. It is one of the organs of taste. Much of the surface of the tongue is covered in taste buds. Esophagus: A simple conduit between the mouth and stomach - clearly important but only marginally interesting compared to other regions of the tube. The superior surface is related to the intestine and the body of the uterus . The inferolateral surfaces are related to the retropubic space, which contains veins ... This region is anchored by localized thickenings of the superior fascia of the... Symptoms: At the beginning, the Arowana suffers from stomach flatulence anal region becomes reddened and swells. When water cannot be expelled from the body, its swim bladder will be squeezed by the stomach.", "3HEA4ZVWVDK4MU547S3I5TMOIFX55S": "Truthfully, There are so many books and so much observation on this subject for boys and girls alike.For boys, I love the book 'real Boys- The adolescent years' and for girls, 'Raising Ophelia' and 'Odd Girl Out 'are good picks.They are part of my house, not only for them, but for me to better understand the pains, and remember what it was like for me growing up.I always say that I would never want to relive those years. very awkward and full of insecurities, but I promise that it is the way it's suppose to be, and it is just a step into the years for you.The fact that you are reaching out for advice shows some strength in character for you, and character is what defines us", "3WUVMVA7OB1ZZE1A9C1F2895BS8ZA1": "Nah you wont really see any results. ha nah if your into rap eminem usually gets me pumped before a game or gym find someone you really love and break up with him. have a lot of sex and long sex i mean, where you get sweaty like that, people dont realize tha having sex is an exercise with far more advantage then all them money hungry gyms.....gyms are for people going make money off they bodies so if your not gonna make money off of it, dont go. just have long sex, daytime can be short since its warm already.", "3E9ZFLPWOYQP01KTKI57MLHDG0DXI4": "MATILDA will be touring the country starting in 2015: ttp://t.co/xMtFaYj8xF EXCITED!!", "3WRBLBQ2GR637K8NRIGXSVHMRG30GN": "Track Listings from Stay (hope this helps) 1. Mahlus Gardens (3:28) 2. Opening Bridge (2:20) 3. A Walk In the Rain (1:30) 13. Its Too Late (2:17) 17. Introduced in late 1997, the architecture combines a 32-bit internal data path with 16-bit instructions, and includes a four-stage instruction pipeline. Over the period 1927-33 Messerschmitt designed a series of six sports plane planes, the single seat M.17 and M.19, and the two-seat M.23, M.27 M.31 and finally the M.35. Despite these successes and strong performances at other venues in the late 1930s, only 15 M.35s were built, 13 registered in Germany, one in Spain and reputedly one in Romania.", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE7QTI": "I had thyroid surgery  my heart stop on the table twice, they used the paddles to shock my heart  I was fine. I was having surgery that I was given an epidural for, so I was awake  talking to my surgeon. ( I have a heart condition so they did not want to put me to sleep ). I was laying on the table not speaking, thinking oh my I have died  gone to hell. About that time the nurse that moved said I am sorry Sir I unplug the machine with my foot when I walked by it, I had huge splotches on my chest because it scared me so bad.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1V2Q3": "exedrine and a very hot bath with the lights turned off i swear by this. (well it works for me.) I once had a headache for several months - turned out to be the lights at work.", "31ODACBENUDULIMD3G4TWFR7SVTQST": "After a long walk or run she rarely drinks a lot but when you let her out last thing at night for a pee and head up to bed you can hear her drink her bowl of water . She drinks the whole bowl till it s dry . I have put this down to just her own habit as she gets a treat in the morning and dinner around 5-6pm and then mid-night after her last toilet she always ( 9/10 ) times waits till everyone is in bed and polishes the whole bowl off of water .", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LAUBXA": "I have a pretty good group ( about 4 ) of solid friends here at school ( although I sometimes feel like the outcast ) and some really good friends from my hometown . I m also pretty close to my parents . But when I m in a new situation I often find myself nervous to talk and be myself because I m also slightly overweight . I used to be in pretty good shape up until freshman year ve recently starting working out consistently and eating healthy foods .", "3WKGUBL7SZK0S04PLA0FHQC74914L9": "21  Rice cakes have a very high GI index - it all depends on how you feel about what you put into your body. Wholegrain rice is the same as brown rice", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMMJ76": "Usually it takes a blood sugar level of 180-200 before Sugar is found in urine (just for reference normal blood sugar levels are between 70 and 110). Now if it is a blood sugar of 60, it is low and Its not something to shrug off. Low blood sugar is very dangerous and can lead to coma and death.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559WMZ7": "Soon after a white elephant , holding a white lotus flower in its trunk , appeared and went round her three times , entering her womb through her right side . Finally the elephant disappeared and the queen awoke , knowing she had been delivered an important message , as the elephant is a symbol of greatness in India .", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV0K2Q": "I have had anorexia issues so get nervous putting on weight. gravitychat", "3TKSOBLOHLE80Q3M9CL8B1M8275BB0": "I hope this stays away.I actually had such bad back pain 2 weeks ago unlike I ever felt before and here it was just some pulled tight back muscles.Good luck.", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRVS0X": "I hate shaving my legs with a razor but then I'm allergic to that Nair shit ?", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW61028O1": "mybe u just part tomato? Ketchup", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE8O4C": "nullI'd have to question the integrity of your question, but then, there would be no answer...  What about, 'Curiosity killed the cat, and satisfaction brought him back' huh? What about that? How about, 'Inquiring minds need to know'? Questions, questions, questions...we humans are peppered with them. Right from the toddler stage, when the kid first asks 'WHY' !!!!! Why do I have to go to bed? Why is the sky blue? Starting a lifetime of endless questions...  With no questions and no answers there would be no ASKVILLE. Then, what would we do for excitement? Hope this answers your question about having no questions that produce no answers so there are no questions to be answered. Ugh...now I have 'brain strain' :O(", "3Z56AA6EK4YYD5QO4AU9E1BA05XM6E": "There is this girl that really likes me and her 3 year old daughter loves me.", "3NC6WP7WJHISCWZ8ZUD0LTCEM97WWJ": "groans a bit blushing and rubbing my belly", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRODM1": "Take It Out Ever 3Hrs And Stay Out With It Till It Goes To The Bathroom And Then Stay Good Dogie.That Is How I Trained My.It Will Work. As far as training time, it all depends on the dog and the method of potty training. Personally, I like crate training for outdoor pottying.", "33K3E8REWWTWBV8GBWTG9WNZD488X7": "List of placental mammals introduced to Australia A variety of placental mammals have been introduced to Australia since the arrival of Captain Cook in 1770. They have ranged in size from rodents to deer. One other species, the Dingo, was introduced much earlier, but is nevertheless included in this list.", "3LOJFQ4BOXD28Q50TLP75UTYSMPDKS": "A Body Weight Quiz Sorry, but our Teen Quiz requires that you have javascript turned on. You can use this instead if you do not want to turn javascipt on. Body Weight Related Resources: Although there is certainly a worry that many kids are overweight, either because they eat too many calories or don't exercise enough, there are also kids who are at a perfectly healthy weight but think they are overweight. Am I fat? That is a common question that some teens and preteens ask when they go to the pediatrician who obsess about their weight and where they are on the growth chart. Kids who are overweight get a lot of attention these days, but it is also important to not overlook kids who are underweight and those who are at a normal weight, but are worried that they are fat, so restrict what they eat or do other things to limit their weight gain. - Parents often wonder if their children are overweight, underweight or just right.", "3BA7SXOG1JOCEZM42XNOKE1BCNLR8S": "I will share something very personal with you, and I hope that in doing so, it will help you. I have Bipolar II disorder, and the first time I tried to kill myself I was 12 years old. I have suffered with depression my whole life. For me, it was a way to personally control my pain and suffering. It was a way to maintain whatever little bit of control over my life that I could, at that age. Now I am 27 years old, and I am a single mother. I am not cured of my bipolar, but I have learned to accept that this is a part of who I am. If you are bipolar, I have good news: You are still a great person! It is a part of you, not WHO you are. Notice I said I did that to myself? For many years, people did things to me that were not of my choice, and they hurt me. During my 5 years of using I. My faith in Christianity has given me hope, and although it hasn't cured my bipolar, I have an outlet for my pain and frustration. I have been sober for almost 4 years now, and I have a 2 year old. ((Big sister hug))", "334ZEL5JX6DR069XO3CP7AW7DU9OSH": "yeah if folks can afford the cure Diabetes", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGTSCR": "sounds like thrush or some other yeast based fungal disorder try using a cream like canesten or chlometrazole 1 that should do the trick if not go to your doctor he will give you a propriety cream like fucibet that will clear it up he/she will probably give you an oral medication as well maybe a antibiotic of some kind.", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTWNE1": "As I answered  your other question of the same thing I said Mr. Pickles If you get a female name her Miss Mickie", "39RRBHZ0AUZJR248K7SBYVNIW29ZV2": "Last time I checked that's called adultery. Of course it's wrong. Think about this, your wife of 50 years could have been doing it to you for 49 years. One day or 50 years it's wrong. Well yeah if you think there is something wrong with you medically you need to have yourself checked I mean I don't know what makes you think its cancer but if there something wrong def defiantly have it checked out !!! Okay everyone, I checked out the BBB and guess what, I FOUND NOTHING. God forbid the wrong person should get ahold of it, I think that could be a world of trouble. I dont think so, I am removing them from my email list and I am marking them as spam, I hope you all do the same.", "3J9UN9O9J3QDYMYOZO10P892J8GJ06": "well, if it's come to the point where you say you can't lose weight then Im assuming you've tried dieting, maybe see a specialist and if that doesn't work go to a homeopathic specialist....they can usually spot if it's a thyroid issue or not and my sister-in-law's specialist gave her this horrible tasting medicine to flush her out and it makes her go 2 all the bloody time but she's lost a fair bit of weight since she started the treatment and feels a lot healthier too. Now don't go out there and start ingesting anything because you feel overweight, she was an extreme case.....see you GP if nothing else works but don't do anything to harm yourself. Good luck", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE9O4D": "It could any of a number of things from hair follicles to genital warts. For a definitive answer, go to your local STD clinic or your doctor and ask there. This is not the place to get an answer you can rely on.", "39TX062QX1MAAY2AZFYKIFFOXIEX32": "Brown rice has more fiber and more nutrients because it still has the husk on it, same thing for whole wheat bread and anyting made with whole grains. So-Yes it will, more fiber helps things move through your intestines (preventing constipation) and will also help lower your cholesterol. Eating more fiber will also make you feel fuller and stabalize your blood sugar which will limit those crazy cravings for unhealthy foods.", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ12F02": "And the answer may not be simple. Children and teens may feel anxiety as overwhelmingly as adults. They may feel as stressed out.", "33IXYHIZB5GCJGFA0AUNBGPPBY72ER": "but if i were u dont try nair, cause one time i did, and i got a REALLY bad allergic reaction to it! so if u do try nair, then try it on a small spot of skin instead of your whole legs. (and if u do get an allergic reaction, do not go into the pool, it makes it worse!) i dunno i out nair under my arms then when i started shavin mine went away i dont know y cuz im allergic to nair but it worked the nair i used is like 5 yrs old though i dunno it was so weird have a great day Wax it or you could use Nair. But Nair uses some strong chemicals that you could be allergic too. And waxing lasts longer than using a depilatory product like Nair or Veet and shaving. A waxing can last from 3 to 8 weeks and the new hair growth grows in softer. Unlike shaving or using Nair it will grow in sharp and stubbly.", "3LCXHSGDLT45OFW8UP9T2Y2T9S5ES5": "Keep your delusions out of my history please . Yes , because Castro , Guevara , Hitler , Washington , Asoka and Mao were SUCH great leaders Top 10 Super Fun things to do on a Rainy Day", "36D1BWBEHNZAV47NH8I6OOUYK0Z2MH": "if he still gets on the papers just try to hold him and pet him while you are doing your crosswords. thats all the advise i can give you bye take care. turnadoll  You are lucky to have such an affectionate cat! You should have him lay next to your side and stroke him as you do the crossword puzzles. Don't yell at him for wanting to cuddle with you - he will be sad that you don't want to give him attention or spend time with him! Stephanie L  He's a cat hence he wants your attention when you are doing something else, and once you avert your attention to him, he will grow bored and leave. My cat jumps into my lap while I'm curled up on the couch reading a book. When I am watching a video on my computer, he will jump on my desk and place himself directly in front of the screen.", "3H781YYV6TG63F9NJPEJC3YFBBIETT": "Can vestibular papillomatosis be treated? Genital Warts and HPV Youre in good hands, meet ATDs founding physicians. Dr. Suneel Sharman Board Certified GP CMO ATD Health Network Inc. Adjunct Professor at U Of T Dr. Kunaal Jindal Board Certified Plastic Surgeon Director ATD Health Network Inc. Fellowship Training Atlanta, GA TOP RELATED QUESTIONS: GENITAL WARTS AND HPV  TOP POPULAR QUESTIONS: GENITAL WARTS AND HPV Is this genital warts? (pictures included) Dear Doc, I am not sure if I have genital warts. Can you please take a look at the pics attached? It appeared 6 weeks ago and it does not hurt. Thanks a ton - http://postimg.org/gallery/1ill07als/48e1710f/ Genital warts or Molluscum Contagiosum I have a few of these bumps on my lower part of penis and now they have began to go up the penis. It has been about 2-3 months since ive had those few bumps. I am sexually active. I also have been shaving alot there with an old razor. I am wonderi... Genital warts or Herpes I have white pi", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1F2JZ1": "I'm guessing here, but I think he may be referring to the Christian idea of the 'old covenant' in the Tanakh, and the 'new covenant' of the New Testament. Two laws. On a side note I find his QampA fascinating. When he's on, he comes up with some really clever stanzas. Seems a little out there quite often, but he truly has the soul of a poet.", "3O4VWC1GEW49FEXLIBJJR679MK13JM": "3/4' bar spacing is to big for a Cockatiel. The Cockatiel will be able to put its head through the bars which can be dangerous, actually deadly. They cannot have a bar spacing bigger then 5/8' Conures need a cage size of 24'x24'x24' with a bar spacing of 5/8' to 3/4' The site is wrong, they just want to sell, that is no place for a small cockatoo, yet alone a Macaw. I almost bought a cage like that but the problem was the bottom cage was going to be to dark and just to low. As for the top one, A bird should never be above your eye level or they will get 'bossy'. I have mixed feelings about this cage. I would only get it if space was a 'big' issue for you. If the bar spacing isn't 3/4' on the cage your mom saw then. Cockatiel top, they wont get as 'bossy' as the. Gold capped conure middle, if he was at the top it might be a problem, if he was at the bottom he might scream more. Green cheek conure bottom, hopefully he's not a screamer. http://www.bird.com/item/parrot-tower-tabletop-green/500093/", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BMRAX": "I could not find homes for the kittens because every shelter was bursting beyond capacity with cats and kittens and they are almost continuously. There is no 'kitten season' anymore, it's always kitten season. Kittens and puppies get euthanized at the shelters, too.", "33KGGVH24UFE0VOVCBK1UM0RZY1X1B": "I don't recommend bathing the cat with any human dandruff products until you know that it is safe to do. Some conditions can become worse if you use the wrong thing. ( and some cats do not take well to bathing, as well some cats are very sensitive to products being on the skin) If you do not want to consult your vet at this point, I would brush the cat regularly, and think about a diet change.", "38LRF35D5LUITU8FUANXY8GK3023UL": "Without an urgent bone marrow transfusion, McFall would soon die. McFall's first cousin, a 42-year-old crane worker named David Shimp, was the only available bone marrow match for McFall at the time, but Shimp refused to donate his bone marrow, which would have dramatically increased the odds of saving McFall's life (with Shimp's bone marrow donation, doctors estimated that McFall would have had a 50 to 60 chance of surviving). McFall then sued Shimp in order to force him to donate his bone marrow, but when the case ended up in court, Judge John P. Flaherty Jr. stated that Shimp's position was 'morally indefensible,' but simultaneously refused to force Shimp to donate his bone marrow. The bone marrow match rate between unrelated patients and donators is only one in every 5,000 to 10,000 people. The Shanghai bone marrow bank has provided appropriate bone marrow for six patients since 1992. Bone marrow transplants provide an efficient method for treating leukemia.", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559VZMJ": "Basically anything! Cockatoos, budgies, Cockatiels, lovebirds, canaries, parrots, chickens but probably not owls but who sells owls anyway?", "3P7QK0GJ3TJAUB66WX80WQQ7Z4EZ2S": "both have their pros and cons. combine them and you have another mess of pros and cons. Cons: Video difficult to set up, new features muck up text message boxes. Cons: Video setup difficult, gaming slow. Pros: Setup and operation is highly user-friendly Cons: Video is sub-par Pro- easy to play Con- low graphics Pro- Wii Channels Con- No current internet multiplayer functions Pro- Cheapest Con- Low graphics (in comparison to the great Xbox 360 and the over-hyped hollow promises of the PS3) Pro- 4 player capabilities Con- .5 said to have faulty start-up hardware Pro- Goal to be 2 million Wii consoles in US by christmas Pro- Good games Pro- durable Pro- small Pro- plays gamecube games Pro- Comes with game (Wii Sports) oh, and if you consider the PS3, think about this- the Wii-60 (yeah it sounds stupid) the Wii and the Xbox 360 can be purchased for 50 more than the PS3 alone, which comes with only the Talladega Nights: Ballad of Ricky Bobby HI-DEF dvd.", "31KPKEKW4AB7G30CBWOJRKQPB390B4": "my brother had the same symptoms and he had some kind of infection the Dr treated it with antibiotics and he is fine now  The swollen lymph node is most likely related to your sore throat. Swollen lymph nodes indicate an infection.", "362E9TQF2HOEEFP3V853YZHIDAHGIV": "Having acne, whether they're white heads, black heads, or any color heads, I wouldn't go out with a guy with bad SKIN CARE. That's just gross! Beautiful on the outside is like judging an apple from the outside. Would you buy and take them home, if they're FULL OF WORMS?", "3R15W654VDR7H5RNJ77SKTDC01ILQ7": "ITS FEB 15 AND SUCKS TO SUCK YOURE GOING BITCH", "3AFT28WXLF026S61JRIB38QK4W7OIP": "I have heard those shampoos don't work all that well, and you have to bathe the dog often in it. The more you bathe a dog, the more it strips the natural oils from their skin, which can cause problems for the dog. The more you bathe them, the more they shed. You would be better off to keep the dog brushed. If your husband hasn't really been around a chi to know if he has an issue, you should maybe start with getting him around them. Considering a different breed is also a good idea. Bichon's are hypoallergenic. Several designer 'breeds'  are also allegedly allergy free, but i have a real problem with the the whole designer dog issue.", "3NOEP8XAU40HHN7XXDVRVIIP2E9XPH": "I dont think it matters, when you get pregnant. Some women get off B/C and wont have a period for months, up to 6 for some. Some conceive right away, like my sister (two months later).", "3IZPORCT1F757ANX51HUXRUAF6GHR2": "Three common causes of rickets include nutritional rickets, hypophosphatemic rickets, and renal rickets. Nutritional rickets, also called osteomalacia, is a condition caused by . Vitamin D is a fat-soluble vitamin that is essential for the normal formation of bones and and necessary for the appropriate absorption of calcium and phosphorus from the bowels. It occurs naturally in very small quantities in some foods such as saltwater fish (salmon, sardines, herring, and fish-liver oils). Vitamin D is also naturally synthesized by skin cells in response to sunlight exposure. It is necessary for the appropriate absorption of calcium from the gut. Infants and children most at risk for developing nutritional rickets include dark-skinned infants, exclusively breastfed infants, and infants who are born to mothers who are vitamin D deficient. In addition, older children who are kept out of direct sunlight or who have vegan diets may also be at risk.", "3QE4DGPGBR9K68QOAJ3Z4Y7Z8SF4G3": "One cup of cooked brown or white rice is 4 points :) White rice is ok but brown rice is considered a filling food in weight watchers which means when you are on the maintenance program (after you've reached your goal weight) you can have as much of it as you like, until you're full! Hope this helps xx", "3TRB893CSJ8HPV87CH167AR9ZU8G72": "I'd rather run a pass than mix insecticides", "3QO7EE372OLV4W5BSUIY6QH7O76BQC": "Ines, if that was a one time use,  you should be fine and here is why. Marijuana has a half-life in your system. How long it takes to leave your system depends on how much you smoke. But the time maxes out at around 45 days. One smoking session for someone with a clean system takes about 3-4 days to be clean. Smoke 2 days later and then have to wait about a week, and so on. The time it will take roughly doubles every time you smoke until it maxes at about 45 days to be clean. So if you are maxed out and you wait about 2 weeks and then smoke again, you're basically back to 45 days. Marijuana can be detected in urine for nearly a week after smoking. Blood tests can be more accurate, and it might take a month to be totally clear. Hair tests show every drug ever taken when that hair was growing - this is why you see so many drug addicts with shaved heads or buzz cuts, by the way. Also by the way: taking laxatives and drinking wacky chemicals won't 'cheat' a drug test. It will just ma", "3OCZWXS7ZO5IOJ8PZFJPMIIL45XL5W": "Hidradenitis suppurativa is an inflammatory skin disease that is characterized by recurrent boil-like lumps (abscesses) that culminate in pus-like discharge, difficult-to-heal open wounds and scarring. It commonly occurs on apocrine sweat gland-bearing skin such as in the groin, the underarms and under the breasts. It is also known as acne inversa.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJSS1E8": "Common causes of lower left abdominal pain include diverticulitis (inflamed or infected intestines), irritable bowel syndrome, left kidney stone, left kidney infection, crohn's disease(bowel disease), ulcerative colitis (another form of bowel disease),  left ectopic pregnancy, left ovarian disease, and infection of the left fallopian tubes in women. it could be nothing, just a random pain, sometimes happens, if it still sore after a few days, go to docs, all are treatable", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVG0SU1": "Sugar Free Chocolate Brownies Recipe April 17, 2014 by Brenda 92 Comments These Sugar-Free Brownies are incredibly fudgey and easily made gluten free! This recipe was originally published on January 11, 2012 and it sure is a very popular recipe to date, but since then I discovered my allergies to wheat, soI wanted these to easily be adapted for a gluten free life style. Now you can make these whole wheat or gluten free and of course without any sugar added!! My more popular brownie recipe on my blog is the flourless brownie recipe , but sometimes I run out of that secret ingredient. When I made this recently for the kids, they fell in love with them all over again and dare I say think they are better than my flourless recipe?!! Either way this recipe is a winner! You can make both then decide! Of course my other motivation for making these wasnt just to make my kids happy, I wanted to get rid of the horrid pics I took back then!! But I did leave one below for you to laugh at. If yo", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3451YNR": "Nearly nine feet long (2.7 meters) and as big as a grizzly bear, a huge catfish caught in northern Thailand may be the largest freshwater fish ever recorded. Caught May 1, 2005 in the Mekong River, a team of fishermen struggled for more than an hour to haul the creature in. It tipped the scales at 646 pounds (293 kilograms).", "3FTID4TN8LWGQ7I9AHOMXFGEZA4LYF": "'Yesterday was one of the times when the students from the east were travelling together,' he told AFP. The Loyola Jesuit College is a fee-paying boarding school. I think college is a waste of time and money. spend the next 10 years paying that off. start off on the corporate ladder 4 years behind where you could have been. And then take advantage of your companies tuition reimbursement program and have THEM pay for college. And then work on a degree to help you in the job you already have. The median age in the city was 35.2 years. 31.1 of residents were under the age of 18 4.9 were between the ages of 18 and 24 27 were from 25 to 44 20.8 were from 45 to 64 and 16.4 were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 89.3 males. Collins has an annual celebration named 'Collins' Day,' which typically is celebrated with a parade, softball game, and a dance. Collins recently added a community wellness center on Main St...", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BMARG": "you're 12 ? you should not worry about your bell fat, yet. you're still very young, you need those fat to grow. But, never too young to do a healthy diet. You can start healthy diet by changing your eating habits. No need to eat less. Eat less will make you starving. You should eat the right food at the right interval time.", "3CRWSLD91K2O2BWS46G3V1X1L5RMO3": "Since your husband is experiencing this, it must be possible.It depends on how much tissue damage there is, how large the incisions are, how much inflammation, etc. He should consider himself lucky, and don't overdo any exercise. Ligaments take time to heal. The have very poor blood supply.", "3Y3CZJSZ9KRTRH324ZGL8URKAXKR5Q": "I am no expert, but first off, I suggest getting family therapy of some sort. I was married to a N for many years. My son has shown many of the same traits. We are now in family counseling (not with my X)- it is helping each of us to look in the mirror. I believe that after living with such condemnation for so long, that I have become the ENABLER for my son. By using some techniques such as not allowing him to push my buttons- turning and walking away, being bold and truthful, standing my ground as a mother. I can see things changing. My son knows about his dad, and that he has learned these behaviors over many years. I can see the light at the end of the tunnel. He is beginning to have concern for others in the family and not just himself. Take care of yourself first. for me, the book Codependent No More , by Melody Beatie has been an absolute God Send. It is teaching me how to take care of myself, how to set boundaries and how to see that IT IS NOT ALL MY FAULT. Hope this helps.", "3T2HW4QDUV58M2GVPS37VFX0WS3C9Z": "I had a cockatiel and I had for I think threeish years before he flew away. My mom refused to clip his wings so he was free to fly around the house when he was out of the cage. Birds S  t all over the cars, oh my gosh go away you stupid bird get away!!! Anyways, what was i saying before i got distracted?", "3Q7TKIAPOT8DSWNIEL18KU6DHMVDLW": "Johnny Dougherty John J. 'Johnny Doc' Dougherty is a prominent labor leader in Philadelphia. In 2003, he was named to the 'Pennsylvania Report' Power 75 List. He is also the brother-in-law of former majority leader, David (Chip) Brightbill. The 'Pennsylvania Report' named him to the 2003 'The Pennsylvania Report Power 75' list of influential figures in Pennsylvania politics, calling him 'Pennsylvanias best in-house political operative by a mile.' In 2009, the 'Pennsylvania Report' named him to the 'The Pennsylvania Report 100' list of influential figures in Pennsylvania politics, noting that he 'remains a force in PA politics due to inside connections to Senate leaders and his institutional knowledge of legislative procedures' and that he remains close with current President Pro Tempore of the Pennsylvania Senate Joe Scarnati. Clinton County, Pennsylvania Clinton County is a county located in the U.S. state of Pennsylvania. They are not actual jurisdictions under Penn...", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV42KC": "if it wasn't ripped off completely, you can use super glue to hold it together until it grows out enough to clip offif it did rip completely off, file the edges of it as it is growing back in to prevent ingrown nails", "3126F2F5F818BNGG285Z7TXIM8XEPO": "Ashkenazi Disorders: Bloom Syndrome Canavan Disease Cystic Fibrosis Factor XI Deficiency Familial Dysautonomia (Riley-Day syndrome) Fanconi Anemia Gaucher Disease Mucolipidosis IV Niemann-Pick Disease Non-Classical Adrenal Hyperplasia Nonsyndromic Hearing Loss Tay-Sachs Disease Torsion Dystonia Sephardic Disorders: Beta-Thalassemia Familial Mediterranean Fever G6PD Deficiency Glycogen Storage Disorder, Type III and good luck!", "3R16PJFTS3PP8UM70AOE2QZSF9W4K6": "Weight Watchers 0 Point Items This page shows the Weight Watchers 0 Points items. However ... vinegar, brown rice, 1 tbsp, 0 ..... rice cake, chocolate crunch, 1 mini, 0 .... If you drink it black, then you could have many before calculating points . if she eats a serving of rice, is she eating 1 cup or 2 cups? A sandwich: what kind of bread, how many slices, how many calories?). She needs to do this for at least 1 week. Quaker Oats Maple Brown Sugar Oatmeal in a to go cup, 3 points, 5 points plus .... Quaker Popped Chocolate Rice Cakes, 2 points , 3 points plus per 13 cakes ..... Dark Chocolate has many great health benefits?... restaurant, rice Cakes Weight Watchers Points weight vs. Try this ... Soy has many health benefits, weight Score and Nutrition Facts. Granola ... vitamins, is losing weight on bc eating rice cakes Eating Brown Rice Every Day Good.", "3MXX6RQ9EV3QJLJND2TMY7LR9J24P7": "Well, play with the puppy. If he shows any signs of 'rage' or aggression then wait for another one. Rage syndrome is pretty rare though, you should be fine. I own an American Cocker Spaniel. Beautiful and Happy dog. Love him! Just be sure you have a lot of time to spend with any puppy you get. Play with him/her, put your hands by his/her food often at a young age..etc.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2E1TX": "It depends on how much you ate. Rat poison is coumadin aka warfarin which is a blood thinner commonly used after surgery to prevent blood clots or for heart/stroke patients again to keep the blood thing. To much coumadin causes severe bleeding and yes it could kill you if you took enough of it and bled to death.", "3ACRLU860NC67TF6J3NYC9ST54IBE0": "'a feeling', like somewhere in your heart there is this something that tells you he is the one. I remember i was holding his hand and felt this desire to just hold him forever, and take care of him and be with him.. weird, but i believe he felt it too.. so we married :) but i tell you.. it doesn't end there ok? because once u found him/her.. u continue to make a decision everyday to be the 'one' for him/her forever, and vice versa.", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4JFOT": "do not eat  too few calories,  you need to find that balance-your  body  is built for  survival, so if you starve  it,  it will  adjust  to  run  on  less and less. You won't necessarily pass  out or  not be able  to push through exercise, you will  just start needing  like nothing to  live on. Eventually you'll  crash might not  be  for  a  good while, but you will either out of the blue end up  in a hospital  or something  and have  heart and or brain damage, or  go  crazy and  start eating normal. If  you  don't  end up damaged/dead  and eat  normal,  your body will  store everything you eat and  gain it all back. It happened to me I am speaking  only of experience. I  was  able  to run and  be  quite underweight, but then I  couldnt do  it any  more. I was miserable,  irritable,  people  worried  about  me. I  started eating more  and  it  magically appeared  back, and  i was not eating much to gain  so  quickly,  I'd  just made  my body think it was  in a  starvation  and  needed to  adju", "3P4ZBJFX2V1Q1ADD9530H5QER6FWFJ": "the bag you bought is 12lbs, it contains 16 servings. take two servings a day just like your trainer instructed you. and your 'high metabolism' has little or nothing to do with you gaining weight. its more or less a phrase that doesn't mean more than that you are able to work out efficiently. other people first have to get into working out by changing how their bodies react to cardiovascular stress. thats all...  up your carb and protein intake. especially after working out. pasta, potatoes, chicken, tuna, protein shakes...", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G5DSC": "There are about 70 species of prawns in Australia , but only 10 are of economic significance : banana prawn , Endeavour prawn , tiger prawn , king prawn , red-spot prawn and school prawn are some of the names used for different species or groups of species . Australian shrimps , on the other hand , are members of the Caridea , another group of Decapoda comprising many families .", "3XAOZ9UYRZPURYNJQXP90E4Y2VGQ19": "This is usually caused by bacteria left around the gum line . It is possible to have gingivitis and not even know it.The most common cause is poor dental hygiene . This causes plaque to form . Plaque forms quickly , so daily brushing is crucial . Plaque left for two to three days forms tartar under the gum line .", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AATYA53": "You will probably peak at 5'7 at 18. If you are a late bloomer it could be a bit better as late bloomers often grow late.", "3K3G488TR26TFGO2RKRL34HFEBJQ5P": "Yes, you can pre-order and purchase books at Amazon. You shouldn't have any problem pre-ordering or purchasing books at Amazon. Many people do that to take advantage of early release dates or simply to buy the British or international version of a book. I see Dark Days (Skulduggery Pleasant - book 4) (Hardcover) currently listed at Amazon. uk for a pre-order price of pound. 44  shipping. http://www. uk/Dark-Days-Skulduggery-Pleasant-book/dp/0007325940 pound. 44  12. 79 as of 3 p. EST March 5, 2010 You can check exchange rates here: http://www. com/ Alternatively you can sign-up at http://www. com/Skulduggery-Pleasant-Dark-Days-Tpb/dp/0007325967 to be notified when this book is ready for ordering at the US Amazon site Amazon. Sources: opinion mhd 66 months ago Please sign in to give a compliment. Please verify your account to give a compliment. Please sign in to send a message. Please verify your account to send a message. mhd mhd Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading.", "3NKW03WTLM5NSZ3MNLEUT4USY8QWQF": "Most obviously , this is particularly likely to be the case immediately after negative events that question our trust in others . For example , for several months after being mugged , people can understandably be very wary , vigilant and suspicious when walking in the street . Persecutory delusions are explicable in terms of normal psychological processes . However , there is an important caveat : no single factor is likely to account for paranoia .", "3HA5ODM5KAQMQQIUPFY322QF9N8SVP": "In a week's time, some lose about 10 pounds or so of water weight the first week. Exercise alone will help you lose a bit of weight. After about 2 years of dieting and excerise i went down to 157. So in order to lose one pound of weight, we need to create a calorie-deficit of 3500 calories. Advice on How to Burn Calories and Lose Weight General Advice Avoid Fat-Burners, Fat-Burning Pills If you want to burn calories and lose weight, do it naturally! To Lose 1 Pound Weight - Burn 3,500 Calories Exercise does burn calories but it takes a while to lose 1 pound of weight! See Calories Chart and Calories  Fat Tables Exercise and Burn Calories to Lose Weight When you burn extra calories, you lose weight much easier. Helps you to lose weight from the start Helps you to lose weight by overcoming any weight loss plateau Helps you to lose weight during menopause Helps you to lose weight if you have hypothyroidism Helps you to lose weight if you are only a few pounds overweight good luck", "306996CF6WI7NSLU7FSJ5P9ZGVF1B8": "waistband sore waist out of breath no loss of either  I'm 31 and kinda short too. Don't worry about being short.", "3W1K7D6QSBF4IO62FQ1BXJTBTATBZ8": "Yes, unfortunately you can have a cavity in a tooth even if it looks fine to you. You can get cavities that form in between your teeth (especially if you don't floss enough) and you wouldn't be able to see that looking in a mirror because you're looking at the top of your tooth. Probably a cavity.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS8BCA": "The ovaries produce, store, and release eggs. These organs also produce two types of hormones-progesterone and estrogens. Eggs from the ovaries reach the uterus through tubes called fallopian tubes or oviducts.", "3R868ACW4SA095EDVCTPYUK89NKGZT": "Attribute: An attribute is the following Generally, an attribute is an abstraction characteristic of an entity In art an 'attribute' is an object that identifies a figure most commonly it refers to objects held by saints in religious paintings that indicate which saint is being represented. In database management and directory services, an attribute is a property inherent in an entity or associated with that entity for database purposes. In network management, an attribute is a property of a managed object that has a value.", "3XT3KXP24ZWCHM0XJVWHM84TJWFI6W": "i have so many problems and doubts with tahara and salah , i spend so much time on the bathroom and waste so much water , i have doubts if i had a wet dream or if madhi came out , i completely dont understand madhi and i dont know how to know if it came out and if it reached my pants or dress or not , my underwear is always wet and thier is the normal discharge , so i sprinkle everything and i become completely wet every time and this has caused me a huge problem , i have dirty thoughts through out the whole day , but i dont want to have them they are forced , but i dont know if madhi comes out , it happens when i wudu too and when am praying , dirty thoughts came , but i dont know know if madhi comes out , do i have to sprinkle everything in every prayer time ?", "3P458N04Q1FLPG6RVFKFZ5AWR4J2X1": "Whatever you are trying to ask i think you're wrong, Germans are very friendly and mostly open minded..   Opinion 2: Never heard of it. We eat our lunch hot, but everything else cold (because 'everything else' tends to be mostly bread with stuff on it)", "3TD33TP5DL03HGYU3YLCGQ22KPMBA7": "They hoped to restore Protestant England to Catholicism and end the persecution of their faith ... Persecution of Catholics had become more and more severe during the ... and in an effort to placate more extreme Protestants such as the Puritans,?... Around England groups of these objectors congregated into their own churches ... Puritans had to arrange illegal transport and this put them in danger of being ... may have been prompted by the fear of what might come at the end of that truce. ... But these Puritans had little freedom to worship God and follow His Word and their conscience. ... forbidden to share the truths of salvation, they saw only one option: to flee to Holland. Thomas Weston and other merchants who had received a patent for a ... no legal right to be there, leaders and forced adult males in the group to sign the ... 3.", "32L724R85LIKRSI2YRVQS8VAE14IP1": "the last prophet). and the text revealed to him (the ), which Muslims believe is unique among divine revelations as the only one protected by God from distortion or corruption, destined to remain in its true form until the . In Muslim belief, every prophet preached the same main Islamic beliefs, the , worshipping of that one , avoidance of and , and the belief in and life after death. Each came to preach at different times in history and some told of the coming of the final prophet and messenger of God, who would be named commonly known as . Each prophet directed a message to a different group of people, and thus would preach Islam in accordance with the times. In Arabic and , the term nab? (plural forms: nabiyy?n and anbiy??) means prophet . Forms of this noun occur 75 times in the Quran. The term (meaning ) occurs five times in the Quran. The terms ras?l (plural: rusul) and mursal (plural: mursal?n) denote messenger or and occur more than 300 times.", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV45N39": "Red bruise like marks on inner thighs Premium Questions day after I had taken a shower I saw the bruise had started looking like a dry slightly red patch ...Around the beginning of January I had seen what appeared to be a bruise on the inside of my thigh ...  My husband just returned home from a vendors convention in XXXXXXX Wisconsin..this bruise appeared ... a mysterious blue mark on his right forearm he didn't remember hitting his arm...we live in a heavily wooded ...  What causes bruising on thighs after prolonged standing? of longer than a couple hours, her upper thigh area, in the front, breaks out in bruise like blotches (very large often takes up her entire leg in the front). By the next morning the mark(s) are all gone. We went ...  panic or not lol... The inner thigh bruise seems like I might be blowing it off. But I've had two ... like it did last year) But I recently felt that inner thigh pain come back on again. (not as bad ...  What causes a bruise on knee to grow big", "36GJS3V78VOA9Q99DQQ3A0WIQP6JGA": "nullUnited States measures The U.S. uses pounds and ounces (avoirdupois) for weight, and U.S. customary units for volume. For measures used in cookbooks published in other nations navigate to the apropos regional section in Traditional measurement systems. Measures are classified as either dry measures or fluid measures. Some of the fluid and dry measures have similar names, but the actual measured volume is quite different. A recipe will generally specify which measurement is required. U.S. recipes are commonly in terms of fluid measures. See table at source url. See also: http://www.squidoo.com/cooking-measurement", "3C8QQOM6JPZU07346Z2JBRMQ9R3IL3": "Actually, if the conditions are right, it will. The problem is, what if you lose power and the fridge goes off? What if there is a problem with the fridge and it seems to be working on the outside, but is actually not cold enough on the inside, or becomes dangerously cold? Your turtle could either awaken from its hibernation locked in a fridge with no food or escape, or would die from freezing. All and all, do not put your turtle in a fridge. The turtle gets no physical benefits from hibernation, and it is far too risky.", "3IJ95K7NDXA6SG0USOIV37DZZ9ANGH": "If your shots are falling in the same spot forming a good group this is a high , and when the sighting is adjusted so this tight group of shots is landing on the bullseye , you now have a high measures how close you are to your target and how consistent you are to around your average performance . A person may be performing with minimum variation , but he can be away from his target towards one of the specification limit , which indicates lower will be high .", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWR9MC7": "The qualifications to be vice president of the United States are the same as those to be president. They are that the person be a natural born citizen of the United States, both at least 35 years of age and have resided in this country for at least 14 years.The Twelfth Amendment to the Constitution states: 'But no person constitutionally ineligible to the office of president shall be eligible to that of vice president.of the United States.'", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF52EWL": "As a general rule, you should use a couple of guidelines in selecting the subject of your paper, assuming you have complete freedom to make this choice:  1.", "3GMLHYZ0LEVJ9X53JVGNO2CXC1VUYG": "Unless you have a natural talent, it is hard. Classes are the best way. It is important to learn different styles of drawing. It is hard unless you know some techniques. If you don't want to take a class, about.com has some good free tips. They teach a couple of different styles and is fairly helpful. It is also important to look at other art. See how other artists use techniques so you can better understand how to do it. Learn the style that you like and have fun with it. Drawing is supposed to be fun after all.", "3URJ6VVYUPL8YL7MY2G797G1ZE6O4A": "Sudden coughing spells characterized by a deep dry-hacking cough, wheezing(whistling sound when breathing) and chest congestion. Bronchitis is a narrowing of the bronchi(tubes from your trachea to you lungs). If the allergy is treated the symptoms of Allergic Bronchitis will go away.Good Luck:)", "3X878VYTIEGBBVCC1XVOPPRXYF6F70": "Good blood sugar control is vital to staying healthy in the short and long term with diabetes. ... and taking blood glucose-lowering and related medications as prescribed. Here are doable steps you can put into action to help you reach your goals. Nov 5, 2014 ... Find out what you should be including in your diabetes diet. ... cocoa a day ( about 3 tablespoons) could lower LDL cholesterol and triglyceride levels in people with diabetes. Look for ... 'I'm Losing Weight and Saving My Life'. Many people believe that what you eat in the evening affects blood glucose, also known as ... Here are some steps you can take to lower your morning highs. Mar 28, 2012 ... People who have had diabetes for a while know what will cause a spike in their blood sugar and what to do to cause it to go lower almost?... May 15, 2008 ... Blood sugar is a tricky little beast. Yes, you can get a high reading if you throw caution to the wind and eat several slices of cake at a wedding.", "309D674SHZJRAVVSNCH3MLSQKS5CB8": "A depiction of the radial nerve. Gray's Anatomy Updated December 16, 2014. Written or reviewed by a board-certified physician. See About.com's Medical Review Board. Imagine that you are positioning your hands to push hard against something. The wrists are bent back, and the arms begin to straighten. All of these actions depend on the radial nerve, which controls most of the actions required to push something away from you. The radial nerve travels from the neck along the arm to the finger tips. Along the way it communicates with different muscles and regions of skin to signal for muscles to contract and send sensory signals back to the brain. The nerve is prone to injury at certain spots along the way, which leads to distinct patterns of disability and loss. Injury at the Axilla Immediately after leaving the brachial plexus, the radial nerve travels under the arm close to the axilla (the arm pit).", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUDFND": "Migraine headache has two major forms, 1. Migraine with Aura (classical Migraine) and Migraine without aura (common Migraine).", "3APP19WN71CYLVU2T7WE1WRD4JL6GQ": "American Cocker Spaniels What's good about 'em What's bad about 'em There are energetic Cockers, and placid Cockers. Hard-headed Cockers, and sweet-natured Cockers. Introverted Cockers, and Cockers who love everyone. If you acquire an American Cocker Spaniel puppy, you can't know for sure what he or she will grow up to be like. Cocker Spaniels also shed a great deal. To keep this breed healthy, I strongly recommend following all of the advice on my Cocker Spaniel Hea English Cocker Spaniel The English Cocker Spaniel is a breed of gun dog. There were Welsh Cockers and Devonshire Cockers. The English Cocker Spaniel is a sturdy, compact, well-balanced dog. The English Cocker Spaniel has a cheerful nature. When trained with a soft hand and with lots of rewards, the Cocker Spaniel will be an obedient and loving companion with a happy, cheerful nature. The English Cocker Spaniel typically lives about a year longer than the smaller American Cocker Spaniel. He is a working-type English Cock...", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV3K2T": "This is a very good piece of writing. Some sections are worded a little oddly. Such as this exert: 'Sophie closed her eyes briefly, holding her breath. Asias remarks were always honest, always witty, but also could cause psychological damage to that person to last forever. Her remarks would always stick in the back of the victims mind, always there to cause the person doubt in anything they did.' This exert provides superfluous information and does not fit together with the flow of the story. Instead try something like... Sophie closed her eyes briefly, holding her breath. Asias remarks were always honest, always witty, but often struck at an individuals deepest insecurities. This revision acheives your desired result in a concise and effective manner. Assume you are writing to an intelligent audience, less is more. Over all, this is a strong passage. You are obviously still developing as a writer but have a bright future ahead of you. I hope that I have helped you. -P Love", "322ZSN9Z5GIOBDCUUJ263HMOYMQ4TF": "Not every woman bleeds on their first sexual experience. He may have been small you may be unusually loose. Your hymen may have been torn from some other unknown reason. You're fine.", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ85YVA": "I want like 50 fish.", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQXNLO": "I also go through the same thing. Actually, I asked a question like this not long ago. I think that it is boredom, loneliness, maybe ADD. Find something that keeps you busy. Even if you don't feel like it, get more involved in things going on at your school. Find community projects, get a part-time job, just get out and meet a lot of people. I did the same thing as you, I started school away from home, and after one semester, I went back home. It was one of the biggest mistakes of my life, and now it has been 4 years since I left school. Please stay in school. If you keep thinking that this 'new thing' is going to be perfect and the solution to all your problems, you will be let down. Just take things day-by-day, find something different to do everyday.", "307FVKVSYRD1DFFNHGZ5YLU69P0747": "When you say blank them do you mean you don't say anything at all? If so, just be assured that there are times when people are very caught up in their task or concentrating on work and don't look at the person they are passing. This isn't being rude, it's just a fact of life. If it bothers you just make a conscious effort to be aware of people you are about to pass and if you make eye contact then be sure to at least give a smile. You don't always have to say something!", "32CXT5U14G14UREL6RITPPOVJMSU82": "Wearing glasses makes you look attractive is because of the science of symmetry. A symmetric face is an attractive face.", "3PUOXASB571LUVR5H6NF6DYL5AQZ9M": "Nah you wont really see any results. Hit the Gym thriller!!! ha nah if your into rap eminem usually gets me pumped before a game or gym find someone you really love and break up with him.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNLLR9": "It is not usually the hair that people are allergic to, but to the dander the dog produces. You might want to consider a breed that is less likely to cause allergies such as poodles, schnauzers, portuguese water dogs, maltese, and so on. There can be other symptoms, but maybe not. Itching and coughing could be just regular allergies, or even allergic asthma. You might want to see if taking benadryl, zyrtec, claritin, allergra or some other allergy medicines help with your symptoms. The two most common allergies of dogs are flea bite allergies, and it only takes one bite from one tiny flea to trigger the whole miserable allergic reaction, and inhalant allergies, to things like pollen, dust, mold spores, etc. Those that survive eight days usually recover. The lack of white blood cells and ulceration of the lining of the small intestine lead to secondary bacterial infections. There are many other virus and bacteria that can cause bloody diarrhea in dogs.", "3DZKABX2ZI36J9TYST83NXMXNKMCVF": "Do you want to go back in time and give Hitler or Saddam atomic weapons? Can't you discern evil? The USA has had a leadership role in world affairs for 200 years.", "3JAOYN9IHL0YU0VWFQRWBZQKQNE339": "No suppliments can do that for you. Save your money. The only muscle builders for the body are amino acids. These make up the proteins in your body. The catch here is that most people eat too much and then you get too much fat at the same time. The body does not store protein, it goes to fat at the end of the day)How much is too much? Working out you can handle 50 grams a day. ( about 15 of your daily food intake). Athletes I know use a plant based diet (no beef) and use meat( fish or chicken) as a supplimentary protein. They have SUPURB six packs. They also by the way work their abs and their back ( BALANCE) everyday after running or biking. Gotta work them at least one SOLID hour everyother day at first. ( the recovery time is neccessary for building muscle) Then everyday when you are maintaining where you want to be. ( A nice side bar is to stay away form the computer and tv and be more active when you are not working out.)", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGMBYE": "All dogs shed hair. If shedding or hair on your clothing are going to be problems for you, then a Cocker Spaniel may not be the best breed choice for you. They require plenty of grooming to maintain their beautiful coats in healthy condition and with lowered noticeable shedding. However, any dogs with longer silky coats will have more noticeable shedding than some other breeds, not because they shed more or more often, but because longer hair, like that on Cockers piles up faster. Before you decide one way or the other on this breed, read up about the breed and its grooming needs and, if possible, visit a responsible breeder to see the actual grooming process and ask questions. They will be best able to help you evaluate if that breed will be a good fit for you and your family. You can find contact information for good local breeders through the AKC Chapter in your area.", "344M16OZKID88243MTS734SNMTYENU": "Generally if you can't sleep but are tired you are considered to have insomnia.", "3CKVGCS3PG36XPHEMIAEH90PFRTS0V": "THIS COULD LEAD TO 'T.M.J.' HE COULD BE STRESSED.....STRESS IS A WELL KNOWN AND COMMON REASON THAT PEOPLE, USUALLY ADULTS GRIND THEIR TEETH. Why it happens Teeth grinding, technically known as bruxism, is a common nighttime habit in many babies. About 50 percent of all infants will grind their teeth before their first birthday. Some babies grind their teeth all night long, while others do it off and on. What you can do about it Some babies will stop grinding their teeth if they sleep on their side. Teeth grinding is a bigger problem that many people realize. What about teeth grinding? Bruxism, or teeth grinding, is a habit seen. What Is Bruxism? Bruxism is the term for grinding or clenching your teeth. Many kids grind their teeth at some time or another. What Will the Dentist Do? You'll probably grow out of the teeth grinding. A night guard is worn at night and is fitted especially for your teeth and mouth to prevent you from grinding your teeth. It just might help you say bye-bye to bruxism!", "3ZFRE2BDQ9CBVR93KMTTMGK3CDHZX5": "That is normal. Periods can last anywhere from 3 days to 2 weeks (if you're unfortunate enough). Thank yourself lucky for having such a well-behaved period!", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQOERJ": "People claim paranoia on your part out of fear of the unknown. What you are basically suggesting when you ask them about it is whether something out of the ordinary is taking place. the people that are after you started the rumor that you are paranoid, therefore causing more paranoia.", "3HY86PZXPYG5UVXEH6U96XFKJST1E9": "You're so brave... Right now I can barely even get my mouth open let alone chew real food...", "3IKMEYR0LWTF5G7KWW5Q9B2UVV2K2S": "The audition process for 'Jesus' was televised in the UK in a short series called 'Superstar'. Gaumond reached the top 20 through the initial audition process but was sent home by Lloyd Webber just before reaching the live shows. Shortly after this and in a bizarre twist of fate, Gaumond was then cast as Jesus by UK-based Bronowski Productions in their new production of 'Jesus Christ Superstar' for Ljubljana Festival in Slovenia.", "3MD8CKRQZZL1YGINT1KF94APSYGJR5": "Also diagnosed with Fibromyalgia, Osteoarthritis, and Anxiety. Currently my Crohns is in remission, but my joints are going crazy! It's scary when you start making the same noises As your coffee maker. Every tomorrow has two handles. We can take hold of it by the handle of anxiety, or by the handle of faith'  http://www.healingwell.com/donate  Back to Top Posted 11/1/2009 11:12 AM (GMT -6) I get hip pain but it isn't constant. I'll have it bad for about a half a day and can barely put weight on the leg and then it will go away. I usually get it at night and it wakes me up and it's hard to get comfortable. When this happens, it's usually my right hip. I'll lay on my back, bend both legs at the knee with feet flat on the mattress, and I will put my right hand under my hip for a while. For some reason, it settles it down. Then I can take my hand away and usually can fall asleep. Sherrine", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNLRLF": "Hey there... I am a dental hygienist, and I recently graduated from hygiene school. It is very hard. You have a lot that is expected of you... but, if you want to do it and it is worth it to you, it seems to fly by. Boards stink, though. That's the most stressful part, I think. But, whether you get a 2 year degree or a 4 year degree, be prepared for at least 2 years of rigorous hygiene education. You're going to have a lot to learn! And it is stressful... wait till you give your first injection. YIKES. I don't think I've ever been so terrified in all my life! Good luck. It's totally worth it, and now that I look back on it, it wasn't that bad! :)", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW6102O8H": "Be true to yourself, help others, make each day your masterpiece", "3R6RZGK0XFAJMCU3OLQSKOEGQ81VY3": "Were thugs/bullies and need help, I PRAY DAILY FOR US! If your not ashamed to be American go open some history books. We still to this day(IRAQ)try to control and be the leader in everything.", "3SBX2M1TKDLBJXK2DF8BYCB1EFO4QY": "I have a dark brown cocker spaniel and nothing shows up. im not even sure if she sheds cuz i cant tell! You might want to consider the English Cocker Spaniel over the American.", "3UOMW19E6D4PLFEJM2QQJZSYAWM5C3": "I think the poor kitty has been abandoned and misses the people who he or she belonged to. Keep the kitty and give it a nice new home and a new family for christmas", "3CIS7GGG65HL3SOCJU4THZKHUPQEUL": "Another prominent theme in 'The Rebel', which is tied to the notion of incipient rebellion, is the inevitable failure of attempts at human perfection. Through an examination of various titular revolutions, and in particular the French Revolution, Camus argues that most revolutions involved a fundamental denial of both history and transcendental values. Such revolutionaries aimed to kill God.", "307L9TDWJYQ5Y4O6X9BBKDOQV493NT": "Benefits to Workers 1 Parent, 2 Children 2 Parents, 2 Children EARNINGS AND TAXES Minimum Wage 8.50 Living Wage 10 Living Wage Minimum Wage 8.50 Living Wage 10 Living Wage Wage 6.75 8.50 10.00 6.75 8.50 10.00 Gross Income 13,500.00 17,000.00 20,000.00 13,500.00 17,000.00 20,000.00 Social Security Taxes (1,032.75) (1,300.50) (1,530.00) (1,032.75) (1,300.50) (1,530.00) Federal Tax Liability 0.00 (85.00) (385.00) 0.00 0.00 0.00 California Disability Insurance (121.50) (153.00) (180.00) (121.50) (153.00) (180.00) Child credits 350.00 785.00 1,200.00 350.00 700.00 1,000.00 EITC 3,921.65 3,184.55 2,552.75 3,921.65 3,184.55 2,552.75 Disposable Income 16,617.40 19,431.05 21,657.75 16,617.40 19,431.05 21,842.75 Change in Disposable Income 2,813.65 5,040.35 2,813.65 5,225.35", "34XASH8KLQK6NB8TJ6TIK12RVANMPK": "I think that it could be argued that she didIf you take the survivor aspect, suddenly, you have Jack weighed down with someone. Even his best friend was on his own (and ended up getting crushed by the falling stack). Had he not encountered Rose a couple of things would have been different  He wouldnt have been out with her when the iceberg struck, however, that doesnt mean he wouldnt have been somewhere else above the steerage section, or even still above decks. He wouldnt have had to go back down into the steerage section after being taken there by the officers and Billy Zanes man. This extra ordeal of escaping the chain and flooded corridors no doubt was exhausting - energy he could have used later. I still see him going down with the ship as opposed to getting on a lifeboat - he still would have let woman and children go first. But, having gone down and not needing to worry about Rose, I think hed have had a greater chance of surviving.", "3B623HUYJ4OOFEMHHMNTAO67YP8S8L": "Thu, Mar 01 '07, 10:17 PM white oblong pill imprinted on one side KC M20 1 ReplyRSS on the non imprinted side there is a line down the middle of it, and it is a very large oblong pill  Located a match to a white oblong pill with KC M20 on it, it's KLOR-CON M20 (generic name: Potassium Chloride) is a metal halide salt composed of potassium and chlorine.To learn more click on the link below...Do you have any more questions or information to add?", "3VQTAXTYN3JNWPCS9323GREWRSBUBZ": "As someone mentioned, lymphoma is a cancer of the immune system. Your immune system helps to fight against infections. The lymph nodes are all part of this and help to filter out viruses and such. In lymphoma, this filtering system doesn't work properly and eventually causes enlarged lymph nodes and tumours. Lymphoma is actually very curable (in most but not all cases). There are varying types of lymphoma and they fall under two kinds: Hodkgin's lymphoma and Non-hodkgin's lymphoma. There are five types of hodgkin's lymphoma and many types of non-hodgkin's lymphoma. In general, people with hodgkin's lymphoma have an 85 cure rate. Non-hodgkin's cure rate is also very high but is usually harder to treat. If you have any questions, just email me. I am a hodgkin's lymphoma survivor (been about a year now). I am in remission. I know many others who have had hodgkin's and non-hodgkin's and most are in remission. Some have been in remission for more than 10 years. I hope i have been able t...", "30U1YOGZGAU0W9I8YUY9WGK89G3SDP": "how to get rid of bad back acne, really bad back acne, more. ITT: We have pretty bad acne - Bodybuilding.com Forums bad back acne1 300x297 Bad Back Acne treatment does assist to reduce . Bad Acne  Bad Acne Pictures  Really Bad Acne  Bad Back Acne  How . - Cached More results from livestrong.com  How to Treat Really Bad Back Acne - EzineArticles Submission . Why do some of us end up with bad acne on our back, when the rest of our bodies are as clear as a newborn's skin? Why is it so much worse than. www.getridofthings.com/acne/howtogetrido. - Cached How To Treat Bad Acne  LIVESTRONG.COM Bad acne can alter one's appearance and create social insecurities. How Does Smoking Make Acne Worse? What Causes Dry Mouth? www.livestrong.com/article/91437-treat-b. Bad back acne related searches: how to get rid of bad back acne extremely bad back acne really bad back acne pictures of bad back acne i have bad back acne how to treat bad back acne very bad back acne what to do about bad back acne", "38RHULDV9YDAB1F3AD9LK2367Y7WIA": "Find an old drunk person to sit on the couch with you until the cooler weather arrives.", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZIDT0": "We can tell in the case of puppies and kittens by which baby or permanent teeth have come in. Teeth come in at different ages, and the teeth that we see in young animals are a good clue as to its age. There are some slight individual variations, but it's close enough to give us a good idea. In older animals, tooth wear can give some clues.", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4HFOR": "Although you have tried the 'pills' they still require you to 'tell the dog off' when he does it, the bad taste is supposed to br re-enforced by your actions. The naturvet coprophagia tablets have a good commendations, they not only make the poop smell bad they also have other ingredients to help break things down. http://www.naturaldogs.co.uk/store/coprophagia-deterrent-tablets-60.html You have obviously spent time looking in the subject. It might be the case that the dog is simply trying to keep the area 'clean'. Does he eat only his or the other dogs' too? If the latter all dogs will need to use the tablets. Best of luck", "3YGYP136417XH6988ZC72BR61ILRNH": "Bode Miller, United States, 2:43.56 (1:49.80-53.76) 4. Kjetil Andre Aamodt, Norway, 2:43.63 (1:48.78-54.85) 5. Benjamin Raich, Austria, 2:43.76 (1:50.08-53.68) 6.", "3KTCJ4SCVGZ36JPRY4ISJ5KTSUL1MZ": "It was somewhat tasty , once I added salt , but the yolk had the texture of rubber . I will try again so that my dream of having scrambled eggs for my lunch at school will finally be realized . m going to have to make deviled eggs somehow using this . I wo n't have yolks to whip up , but maybe i can still cut the eggs in half and do a faux-deviled egg .", "378G7J1SJLWYVWDHEUJUZN5EF51WE2": "The Hierarchy of the Roman Empire/Catholic Church Collapse This is a sticky topic. X Owner of Lets Roll s Admin The Hierarchy of the Roman Empire/Catholic Church 25 Feb 2006, 17:52 PM The Hierarchy of the Roman Empire now called the Roman Church... Vatican City is a landlocked state within the city of Rome, Italy. It is governed by the Bishop of Rome (called the Pope) are in fact clergymen. It is the smallest sovereign state in the world. Caesar Constintine began the 'corporate takeover' by renaming all the old Roman offices, this evolution of name changing still occurs. Name changing allows a person to hide their tracks of origin. Roman Empire offices  their modern names: Roman Empire (Imperium Romanum) renamed: Roman Catholic Church Curia (legal body of Senators) slight name change: Curia (legal body of Cardinals) Roman Emperor renamed: Roman Pope (head of all church and state affairs) Civil government matters of state: Extra-Ordinary affairs (matters of civil-state governments", "3NSCTNUR2ZL1S0HL2OUZD42AAT05A0": "well ive had a lump underneath the skin in my armpit for about a year now its really small and hard it doesnt hurt at all unless i  around with it to much i went to two different doctors and they barely made an effort at all in checking it they just said its a zit which makes no sense ive had it for a long time its to hurt to pop and its underneath my skin i dont know what to do every time i go to a doctor they barely check it at all and its getting to the point of me not bothering to go to a doctor anymore i feel fine im not sick ever but i do lose weight alot fast sometimes i lost 3 pounds in like a day some how what do you think that it could be and how can i get a doctor to actually make an effort to find out what it is for me", "3M4KL7H8KVL1HG4ZBOBBU9N72U716Q": "Only Ford owners are people who are cool.", "3MGHRFQY2LN3TBTNLO23ZVOQWCQ0YI": "Foods such as whole wheat bread and whole grain cereal are marketed as healthy , yet when I ask clients to drop these from their diet they ALWAYS lose fat , and feel so much better . ll instantly notice you have more energy , feel better and you ll probably lose 5-10 lbs of stomach fat in just a few weeks Some of the main culprits here would be cereal , bread , pasta , rice and corn .", "39I4RL8QGJFY64LZUPLHPYJ0NSTH4G": "You can't target a specific group of fat (spot reduction), and the belly fat is the last place you will start losing. It's just the way that mother nature designed the human physiology. 'Cardio machines' such as the elliptical machine or stationary bicycles are great, and you should set the resistance to an appropriate level where it will challenge you for the duration you are on it. A lot of people will suggest doing about 30 minutes. Treadmill is a very good machine to be on, but running isn't exactly an easy exercise to get into for most people. Weight training is a very neglected exercise category for losing fat. Increasing muscle mass will not only raise your metabolism and help burn fat quicker, it will also give you a nicer shape to your body. 30 minutes of weight training also burns a pretty significant amount of calories, and some studies show it as a viable cardiovascular exercise as well (anaerobic). Here's a good reading/video material. Jamie Eason is a professional fitness", "3PR3LXCWSFXWP0RQGOZU9SIAXAP9XW": "I feed my dachshunds Royal Canin for Teckel Dachshund, It is a high quality food with specific supplements for Dachshunds including glucosamine condroition,,,,,,,,I kept them on the mini breed puppy blend until they were about five months old, then swithced to the adult feed/. well I used to feed my mini dachshund pork rice and cabbage as a stable food source. when i took him to the vet she asked what i was feeding him and i told her, the vet told me that human food isnt good for them so that you should give your yorkie dog food, i give my dog nutra-max and he loves it. human food on ocassions is fine but not all the time. First, cut the food ration by 1/4 and increase the exercise. If you feed your dog more than once a day, cut her down to a daily feed. Dachshunds love to go on walks (their nosey) and play fetch, indulge them. Second, put the cat food up out of her reach. Good luck with your baby, they are the most loving dogs!", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ4AWM": "Stretching and Yoga will helpStretching is vital to lengthening any bulked-up muscles so be sure to thoroughly stretch after you exercise. The following stretch is great for getting leaner calf muscles: Face a wall with one foot in front of the other. Your front foot should be about one foot from the wall, and your back foot should be about three feet from the wall. Keep both heels on the floor. Rest your hands on the wall in front of you and lean forward, bending your front knee. You should feel the stretch in the back leg. Hold for 15 to 30 seconds, then switch legs and repeat. Yoga could also help, like you plan on doing, since it tones the whole body while stretching and thereby lengthening your muscles. Yoga poses such as Warrior I, II and III and Downward Facing Dog all help. There are some moves you should downplay, since they build up the calf muscles instead of lengthening them.", "37G6BXQPLQJTBZHV2LKO7YNSR4LQET": "Only when someone is being raped, mugged, or murdered is a kick in the groin called for.", "3CMIQF80GNOPYKOGW31QVAVFA6Y6QP": "You didn't provide much to this, but. Use a 10-8-6-4-2 Squat work out 2-3 times a week. Use whatever weight you are comfortable with because i do not have percentages right now. Trust me on the work out type. I went from a 340 1 rep squat to 385 in about a month switching over to this workout style. Good luck my man.", "31JUPBOORN21B1RRXDQSY2SC6VYL8Y": "caff verde dieta So, let's look a few options to be able to control of the diabetes.I have been on a lot of diet s and diets do not work.You have to develop a lifestyle alter in order in order to maintain the weight off.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2DT1O": "It depends on the license agreement for the stock photo website. Legally you cannot use a photo you find on the web with out the photographer's permission. Stock photography websites contain thousands of existing photographs that can be licensed for specific uses. The subscriptions allow publishers to download a limited number of photos over a specified period of time. Stock photo websites allow webmasters, marketers and publishers to locate pictures for their marketing and promotional materials without the hassle of organizing a photo shoot. With copyright laws businesses must be very careful in using unlicensed photos. If you are looking for sources for stock photos with different and. My favorite stock photo website ishttp://www.photo-wizard.net Here is where you can find some other inexpensive stock photo directories: http://www.small-business-software.net/stock-photography.htm Another site list can be found here: http://www.webmaster-elements.com/webmaster-graphics/photos.htm Goodluck", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2Z60Q": "Hi, my name is James and I am a healthy 28 year old. I have been with my girlfriend for 3 months. Even though its been a short time, I care about my girlfriend deeply and we have talked about staying together long term. She is incredibly beautiful. I have never been more attracted to someone in my life. I think about her all the time. She feels the same way about me. For the first 2 months, the sex was incredible. On most occasions over the past month however, I have been unable to achieve an erection hard enough to have sex. The same process plays out every time. We get to the point where I am about to penetrate, I put on a condom, and . its not hard enough to go in. When this first happened I put it down to a heavy cold (fever, etc. ) that I had the week before. After it happened a few times, I saw my doctor and he prescribed me viagra - which worked.", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVT91FS": "The penis and scrotum are common sites and in some men , the scrotum can become covered with them . In most men , the shaft of the penis is devoid of hair and the scrotum can be very sparsely covered . In these sites , pilar cysts can still develop due to the ectopic presence of part of the hair root at these sites .", "3CVDZS288HYUWYJZ53XD87ONT43FMD": "Hello Kizzieke, I think it is both, but more a psychological than a physical problem. I also need to pee about every 2 hours. Then I try to find a place to pee, but as calm as possible. Try to take care of your physical desire by peeing as frequently as you need to. But never try to squeeze out your pee by your fear not to find a proper place to pee within the next hours. Try to be calmed and to calm yourself while you pee. After your first flow maybe wait a little time and calmly pee more if there is some left. - Otherwise your bladder gets more nervous and urges to pee more frequently. Your hate of public restrooms combined with your intolerant bladder could be problem. I think you are a girl,. - Or you are very confident to find a more pleasant place to pee. Actually now it is no real problem to me anymore. Peeing is a humane necessity. If you have to pee more frequently they have to accept this. At long bus or car rides you certainly regularly make stops to pee. My mail is quetzalisyahoo.de", "3IKDQS3DQEY1X39YTM9K88W3FIPCIH": "Your dad brought this on himself when he slept with that woman and didn't use precautions. So now he has to support the children he has created. If he can't afford to take you to the dentists perhaps he can borrow the money from someone. He can also look into low cost dentistry. Just contact his local Human Resource department. Their number is in the blue pages of the phone book. If he is broke then he either gets a better paying job or a second job. This is not your problem to fix. It is his.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYUEKQ": "It would be helpful to have a picture, or a little more information. Where are you located? What is the approximate size of the frog? That sort of thing. Right now, I'd guess Oregon Spotted Frog, but that's a shot in the dark. I'll post a link below to a frog ID site. Fill out as much info as possible and it will give potential matches.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZLVQ1": "Yes, it's actually one of the best oils to use for massage :)   Opinion 2: no way, there are many baby oil, so that it does not harm the baby skin or other problem, in baby oil there is many vitamin added then please don't that for your baby sake,", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBHP9P": "Endler guppy fry 1 each B98 area For sale Endlers guppy fry, 1 each. Usuall...http://t.co/sxbScOi54G", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZBLFF": "Fun . ) The worst part is , I do n't even have my period anymore . I have n't had one in five years because of my Depo shot . But the damage was done back in high school and college . So be careful , and if you start having any stomach issues be sure to tell your doctor about the ibuprofen .", "3Z56AA6EK4YYD5QO4AU9E1BA05WM6D": "This is a vital tip!", "3MQY1YVHS3IECD3QQJSXA8J481TB2Z": "How To Get Rid Of Scars From vitamin E to cocoa butter, there are so many solutions to getting rid of scars. Not only is this a nuisance in the short-term, but we all know it can lead to a nasty scar. For the purposes of this article though, lets focus on common scars  not the ones from severe surgeries. But the fact is that its usually the rubbing that helps to heal the scar more than the vitamin itself. As you rub the cream in with a massaging motion, you are actually reorganizing the random bundles of collagen that make up scar tissue and pushing them into straighter lines. Cocoa Butter The nutrients in cocoa butter may do something to help with your scar. If you have medium to fair skin, this is perhaps the fastest method to get rid of a scar. As long as the skin is hydrated, it can continue the healing process and the scar will lighten,. So here is my solution for a tight situation: Dermablend. So use it now, and get the problem taken care of with one of the other solutions soon.", "3W5PY7V3UP5AVHU97WC9H03MVLVJY7": "Anything in moderation is not a problem.Parents and children need to be able to decide how much gaming is permissible and what kind of gaming.Parents must teach their children what is good and what is bad.", "32FESTC2NHO66U4YN3YYRBKE9DAUC5": "Buying Niche Specific Links / Guest Post Links: I need some links while I'm not concentrating too heavily on PR, I am looking for si...", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRMMD8": "okay, to get bigger boobs, every day, twice a day you need to massage your breasts. To do this you hold one boob inn each hand, then push them in inward circles, 400 (fairly quick) rotations each. it goes by quickly, trust me. and DO NOT rotate them out ward, that makes them smaller. I was doing it wrong for a while so there was no improvement but now im a 32b , and it happened relatively fast! so yeah. they'll make your boobs bigger. just keep doing it, don't give up, it takes time but works great!! also do some gentle weight lifting, and planks (you can look those up if you need to). Honestly, guys love big butts, and you would do best just to tone it, make it more shapely..i know a great way to get a firm, perky, shapely butt. What you do is you lie on the floor, arms/ hands straight down beside you. bend your knees up like you're doing sit-ups. keep your shoulders flat on the floor, and arm you butt/ back up, holding your back up by putting the work on your pelvis. Clench your glut", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y41ZH": "go see a doctor he will fix it", "391FPZIE4CKXN2FE9VCZ22HUM5FUHE": "ttp://t.co/EG2Zth1uQ5 it doesn't count monitor spam though so use as a guide for gigatowntim", "33Q5P9PUSPKNSTY8TQX683ZTBVQCZD": "1. That is: the plot of the play is affected by linguistic form, just as it is affected by the (semantic) content of those forms. Though any random selection of lines from the play could show the same, lines 129-140 in Act 2, Scene 2 seem. Climax The play reaches its climax near the end of Act IV, after all of the lovers overcome their obstacles and leave for the temple to be united in marriage. Nature and Animal Imagery Nature and animal imagery also abounds in the play, helping to maintain the enchanted forest atmosphere. 259-266) The song of the fairies in Act II, Scene II, is another example. Act 4, scene 2 The nature of doubling emerges once again in this act, but for the last time. What are some of the transformations in the play? Consider both literal transformations ('Bless thee, Bottom! thou art translated!' III.i.119-120) and figurative ones (between day and night, discord and harmony, reality and dream, unhappiness and bliss). -http://cla.calpoly.edu/dschwart/engl339/mnd.html", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFPTWQ": "Minneapolis, MN 55447 US Patent 6,780,437 Certain manufacturing operations have been performed by other firms. 2005 Upsher-Smith Laboratories, Inc. All rights reserved 103148 Revised 1208 Klor-Con M10 Klor Con M 10mEq PACKAGE LABEL PRINCIPAL DISPLAY PANEL Klor Con M20 mEq Tablets ER, USP ER USP Unit Dose Package of 30 Tablets. KLOR CON M potassium chloride  tablet, extended release Product Information Product Type contains a BLISTER PACK This package is contained within the BOX, UNIT-DOSE(0615-5559-30) 2 0615-5559-39 None 3 0615-5559-31 None Marketing Start Date Marketing End Date Product Information Product Type contains a BLISTER PACK This package is contained within the BOX, UNIT-DOSE(0615-3599-30) 2 0615-3599-05 None 3 0615-3599-31 None 4 0615-3599-39 None Marketing Start Date Marketing End Date Labeler -NCS HealthCare of KY, Inc dba Vangard Labs (050052943) Establishment Name Address ID/FEI Operations 050052943", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD8AS7": "I envy your freedom of thought, don't let the haters repress you!Good Luck!1 2 3 4 5 -- Rate this answer ............................... A male reader, anonymous, writes (20 June 2009): i had a similar situation when I was in high school...", "3LG268AV384TN0WVF09OCOXXNQNREV": "feel free to email me i will help with what i can", "3538U0YQ1FSTACBPZLSYC8FHTDJ3FI": "Yes dental Implants in Cancun are a lot cheaper. Many people from the U.S and Canada go down there for dental work. I personally went there about 6 months ago, There are a lot of dentists that provide dental tourism but I would only go to a couple do your research before going. The average price of just an Implant can be anywhere from 600 if you go to the border ( I wouldn't recommend they use cheap Implants) to 1400 depending on how 'great' the dentist thinks he is. This is my dentist I went with she is licensed and trained to practice dentistry in Michigan and California but decided to go down to Cancun to provide affordable dental care to patients all around the world. Her name is Dr. Irma Gavaldon. She has a Master's degree in Restorative dentistry from the University Of Michigan. You can call her at 1-800-278-3215 or visit her website www.dentalworkmexico.com .", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TT0ID": "I would have to help it is in my nature.", "3ZZAYRN1I6PSF6MCD3HFHFSTFDOTOC": "Strengthening your abdominal muscles can help prevent lower back pain ?", "36JW4WBR06I84KIOE6H0G2GRCI4FH4": "a cell mutates, divides and spreads, that is it. to cure cancer go to the source listed below. There are many types of cancer.", "33EEIIWHK75ADA3HXB9Y72BERZMVQ2": "Woven Waistband Shorts 10.99 Available in Black/Pink, Coral/Neon Coral, ... A pair of neon athletic shorts featuring an elasticized waistband with a contrast trim and boyshort lining. Seam stitch back. Woven/stretch knit. Lightweight. DETAILS: 8.5' waist side seam to hem, 2' inseam, 18-24.5' leg opening, 9.25' rise, 28' waist Measured from Small Shell 1: 100 polyester Shell 2: 90 nylon, 10 spandex Machine wash, tumble dry Imported 15.90 Available in Black/Multi STYLE DETAILS:A pair of woven running shorts complete with a marble-printed waistband and a built-in brief. Back zip pocket, partially linedShell 1: 85 polyester, 15 spandex Shell 2: 90 polyester, 10 spandex Lining 100 polyesterMachine wash coldMade in IndonesiaSIZE DETAILS:Measured from Small10' full length, 2.5' inseam, 10' rise, 28' waist 11.13 Available in Black, Black/Black, Black/Blue, ... These woven dolphin shorts have so many details we don't know how we've been working out without them! Featuring an inner", "3BFF0DJK8XA7DYE5KKYO1K2UC2RTS9": "But the problem is that I don't know when she gave birth to them, today is the ... I can't answer the food question, I feed my fry crushed or powdered flakes. ... How long does it take to the fry to be grown enough not to be eaten? Anyway, I' ve never kept guppies before and I'm just looking for a timeline: How long does it take for the fry to ... I feed them finely crushed betta flakes 4 to 6 times daily and they are ... Do you think this is enough coverage to offer th... 2 days ago I noticed that my pregnant guppy had given birth. ... How long do I wait to add the others back in so they are all together? ... After she has her babies , should I put her back in the main tank? HOME, HELP, CONTACT US, MY ACCOUNT, SIGN IN ... Just as their name suggests, livebearers are fish that give birth to live, free-swimming young. ... With an average life expectancy between 5 and 7 years, livebearers are relatively long -lived. ...", "3RDTX9JRTYZ2ALLZYBVWFT5MVHB972": "She should definitely wear something in a tanning bed, so she doesn't get/give germs. In the gym, whatever she's comfortable w /. To tone up without going to a gym, buy some dumbells and lift at home.", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2006L": "Haringey Jobs: History Teacher Required in Haringey, Haringey: History Teacher Job History NQ... http://t.co/9V78LaXSTL HaringeyJobs", "374UMBUHN5NR6HP9NY8OMFYCQZ6TCG": "this must be a bloating problem one of the causes are - 1) unclean tank 2) food is expired or or has some unwanted ingredients 3) its inhaling too much water 4) its depressed (its true fish get sad! they also have feelings, I SWEAR!) There are other reasons also for sitting on the Bottom - Fish that sit on the tank bottom are divided into two categories.", "3WRBLBQ2GR637K8NRIGXSVHMRG1G01": "It will bring out their truke colors. I have always suspected them of being corrukpt and in the pockets of the Mexican Government. I feel still that many are and that is why tdhey will NOT act against the Illegals that are destroyiong our country. The effect MIGHT bse  MIGHT be?? that the American people who are asleep might wake up to the fact that the politicians have been screwing them and then get the corrupt garbage out of office.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1VQ2R": "May 18, 2015 ... For a more on how to do a skin self-exam, see Skin Cancer ... or feels may be a sign of melanoma or another type of skin cancer, ... the surface of a mole ?? scal... While cancer is possible, it doesn't grow as quickly as your lump did. Your lymph system has a node in the armpit which may swell with it's fighting infection. Are lots of people sick where you live? It felt like a huge boil deep under the skin. It came back a few times, so I was really concerned about breast cancer. Turns out it was my sweat gland getting clogged, which is likely what you're experiencing. Its could be a cyst or just a lump of hard skin, if its anything harmful or irritating they will find a way to remove it. It could be an ingrown hair, but they are usually very painful. Good Luck. I am unsure why your nipple is itching only when you have your bra on. ... My left arm has developed lumps under the skin, and I also have them on my left ... breast cancer, wait...", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AMM5Y": "There were already all these Genghis Khan and Banking games going on when I .... that generals could claim were directed at reducing the enemy's war-making potential. ... Hitler, Chiang Kaishek, Vladimir Lenin, Joseph Stalin, and Mao Zedong. Heroes ? Support the Troops .... At that point, Hitler had slain his thousands, but Stalin had already slain .... In general, Mao created a living hell in China, his regime being ... Vs. Bolshevism: A Struggle for the Soul of the Jewish People. It all started when Temujin (who was later known as Genghis Khan), vowed in ... They used primitive weapons made mostly of wood and bone. ... Jerash Soldiers Sm ... Communists such as Josef Stalin, Mao Zedong, Pol Pot, Nicolae?... ... where fresh Roman soldiers would square off against exhausted enemies. ... strategies and tactics employed by Genghis Khan, who founded the ... although the German Nazi Army could arguably be Hitler's personal army.", "36MUZ9VAE60ZMQDQXZE47ZGT8PTED9": "No one can make this decision for you. At age 59 I had both hips replaced in separate surgeries. At 56 I finally presented my symptoms to my internist who ordered xrays and pronounced my hips as 'shot'. I took early retirement hoping that that would relieve some of the stress on my hips. It didn't help at all and I found my world get smaller  smaller as I needed a cane to walk at all until. A few months later I had the hips replaced and I got my life back. This is miracle surgery. As for the surgical approach and incision size, I understand that doing this surgery these days is about making the incision as small as possible. I can also tell you that I have a pair of matching 11' incisions(!!) and things worked out just fine. And BTW, my internist's opinion that 56 was 'too young' for hip replacement was outdated. People these days are not willing to put up with the disability of hip arthritis and there are plenty of surgeons who are willing to do the surgery at an age younger than 65 or 70!", "3TX9T2ZCB9ZW6R4DAHX7KX6W3B9ZWA": "WellingtonHere Kentucky Clerks Object to Ruling, Halt Marriage Licenses: Some Kentucky clerks... http://t.co/7F1FcLkcPK WellingtonHere", "3E9VAUV7BWCZUOR5DQZWO1035Y4YA9": "best study partners ever.", "3R5OYNIC2C7A06YDS3UU6FXJPILTPU": "Exfoliation deals with removal of dead derm(skin).This helps the skin getting back its natural glow as well as natural softness. Scoop some of the scrub onto your hand and massage gently onto your skin for a minute (the scrub will actually tighten onto your skin like a masque). Leave on for 3 to 4 minutes before rinsing I started on my face, and my skin felt so baby soft that the skin on my neck felt like sandpaper, so I needed to use the sugar scrub there, and on and on. Use twice a week.hope its works wonders for you as it did to me :) Nearly everyone pays 7.65 combined Social Security and Medicare, which is matched by your employer. If you live in NYC - sorry - you get to pay the city, too. The banks originally posted a combined profit of 6.32 trillion won but had to take out loss provisions of 7.99 trillion won for heavy exposure to Daewoo Group crisis, and 3.1 trillion won in accordance with tightened requirements on asset classification.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZLF2L": "My son had q swollen lymph node on the left side of his neck. They did a biopsy on it when he first went to the hospital  and it was metastatic cancer. Go back to the doctor and insist on being taken seriously. Your life may depend on it. My son had stage IV cancer when diagnosed. The cancer had originated from a large primary tumor in the abdomen which had seeded into the lymphatic system.", "3J5XXLQDHM9I69XFZ0X2UUI3H773V6": "You have to do ab exercises too.", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTJFSN": "Possibly you are leaning over him? This would be seen as a posture of dominance, and your dog is reacting respectfully, which is to become low and look like he is cowering. (Watch 2 dogs sometime). Try kneeling down and inviting him over to your lap, then picking him up.", "32CAVSKPCENMJRU0769EAF1N5GOU1K": "I know from a single episode of vertigo in my 20s what it's like: for me, ... key since sodium causes fluid retention and could increase pressure in the .... My own mother-in-law is on Facebook (she's 72), and if you have a d... Because of my depression, my painful legs, and shortness of breath, I have .... a slight pook on my side of head need to close eyes taught was cause of ... I would like to know if anyone is out on social security disability for anxiety disorder. ... So you feel out of breath and a fast heart beat, weakness, blurred vision, floor moving, and shaking because by running, you get rid of the feeling, and your body is trying to get you to run, even though you know there no danger. The thing that makes me think it's inner ear related is it's all the time, not just when you're really anxious. Ask your therapist he/she should know everything that anxiety causes, as well as some basic knowledge of inner ear problems.", "3HFWPF5AK9H2EHGB55SXJ7YWI3E3S2": "America got involved in World War I because of the sinking of the Lusitania and the Zimmerman telegram. (Germany asked Mexico to attack the US and Germany promised they could have Texas and California back!)", "3ZURAPD288LX09XACHEFOF0KVTA1FT": "haha. Linda, I hear you. I go through this with every short story, every novel, every poem, every single thing I bloody write. But it's the trade off, isn't it? You want quality . It does kill the fun (which is why I drag my feet when I'm world building because it's the one time I get to just have fun with it). When I plot the story though, I approach it like a job. It kills the fun but the trade off is that my stories are of good quality...which I'm willing to sacrifice for. So long as you can still write your stories, then you'll be fine. What you can remind yourself of, though, is that even. You have to remember that the writing process itself isn't the fun part. It's the planning/world building phase that's fun. That's the portion of the story where planners 'discover' the story. If you free wrote, you'd have fun discovery writing the story, but then you'd HATE the editing bit, because you'd have to fix all your mistakes. So...shrugs The writing process itself is never 100 fun and games.", "3G3AJKPCXLQKSZBO4PP5BYE3DO6Y4W": "very much so.", "3FO95NVK5CYUXJ1DGVTT151COHTSRU": "If you are an adult, you're underweight. http://www.healthchecksystems.com/height...   Opinion 2: Sounds underweight but everyone is different. If you are eating healthfully then you're fine. Some people are just naturally really thin like that. Opinion 3: Hello there! First of all I just have to point out that 112lb is actually 8 stone exactly, not 7 stone 12lb! Sorry I had to point that out, lol! I'm a bit of a perfectionist. So you're either 112lb or 110lb. Well basically a way to see if you're a healthy weight is by calculating your BMI. This is your weight in kilograms divided by your height in metres squared. Depending on whether you're 112lb or 110lb, your weight in kilograms is either 50.8023454kg, or 49.8951607kg. And 5'7' is equivalent to 170.18cm. So your BMI is: 50.8023454 / (1.7018 x 1.7018)  17.6 Or: 49.8951607 / (1.7018 x 1.7018)  17.3 According to this website: http://www.supernifty.com.au/bmi.php This is classed as mildly underweight. A healthy BMI for most people", "3VDI8GSXAFRLP9DQMMTCLAN4AEE8GH": "There were white tribes'' but that designation ended near the end of the last Ice Age. when Europeans after many invasions from the east and through influences of the greco-roman dominance of the region. desaturate or turn your color video into black and white 3.", "338GLSUI439XUTW4P0TZKGNTLTLFSP": "It sounds like an ingrown hair or a cyst, nither harmful but build up like a thickish pus/toothpaste consistancy if completely cleaned out blood will follow, no worries, dont use cheap dull razors under armpits, hint- keeping a razor,female or male, razor head turned upide own in a cup of olive oil will prolong the life of a razor 4 many more uses. if bump returns see a Dr   Opinion 2: A deep lump under your armpit is likely to be a lymph node. I understand your concern about breast cancer since you may have learnt about that in the media, but I can reassure you that breast cancer happening before the age of 30 accounts for less than 1 of all cases. I would not suspect breast cancer unless you have a high risk, for example, if your mother also developed breast cancer at a very young age. The cause of your lump can be benign, but what I think we should exclude in your case is lymphoma, a type of cancer affecting your immune system. It occurs more likely in young people. Below I will qu", "3DW3BNF1GHG4763LBHSYLBQEXTZV8Q": "Also the longer you stay away from school, the easier it is going to be to keep saying to yourself 'i still feel ill, i can't go today'. You'll miss out on seeing all of your friends and ALOT can happen within a group in just a few days. I'm dating a new guy now :) I loved high school. If I could go back, I would. If you don't make good grades in school, you can get tutoring, and at school, you get the opportunity to work with groups and share ideas. He should allow you to retake it when you go back to school and are not sick anymore. Just to be on the safe side though, email him right now and say something along the lines of 'Hey Mr. I'm really sick and will not be in class tomorrow. If you really enjoy or don't want to miss school you can always try to go and just leave early if needed. Also, with me my cramps were only really bad for the first day or two so maybe you'll luck out and feel better the next day.", "3511RHPADVC7T66NWMWSPJNHWNPRLJ": "What you can do on Craig list is put it around 200 dollar for an average 55 gallon tank then after each day, if no one contract you just make the price less by 10 dollar. And continue. Or you can leave a price then leave or best offer.", "30EV7DWJTVTY7MF2NDIK8WYH9FCY6H": "April 4th , 2015 at 1:41 AM As I parent I think it is so important to give your kids personal privacy to an reasonable extent . When kids are going through the teen stage in their lives it s very important for them to develop trust and if they can t trust even their parents who can they trust .", "3OKP4QVBP2VZ8X65JKDQH1TZ02EGAT": "K9 advantix is good it prevents ticks from attaching. Frontline is also good, but it kills the ticks a few days after they attach. Most insecticides are safe once they have dried.", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSJ3GH": "Yes dental Implants in Cancun are a lot cheaper. Many people from the U.S and Canada go down there for dental work. I personally went there about 6 months ago, There are a lot of dentists that provide dental tourism but I would only go to a couple do your research before going. The average price of just an Implant can be anywhere from 600 if you go to the border ( I wouldn't recommend they use cheap Implants) to 1400 depending on how 'great' the dentist thinks he is. This is my dentist I went with she is licensed and trained to practice dentistry in Michigan and California but decided to go down to Cancun to provide affordable dental care to patients all around the world. Her name is Dr. Irma Gavaldon. She has a Master's degree in Restorative dentistry from the University Of Michigan. You can call her at 1-800-278-3215 or visit her website www.dentalworkmexico.com .", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17N508": "Therefore be curious about Islam. Be curious about your religion. Be curious about your spirituality. Be curious about yourself.", "3BCRDCM0ODS3NHQLJYHTZOJ6B05K6A": "KiK KiK Textilien und Non-Food GmbH is a textile discounter based in Bnen, Germany, founded in 1994 by Stefan Heinig and the holding company Tengelmann Group. 'KiK' is an acronym for (). KiK have, in the past, sponsored a number of football teams, namely Arminia Bielefeld, Werder Bremen, Hansa Rostock and VfL Bochum. Verona Pooth has been the face of KiK's television advertising campaign. KiK have been criticised by the Clean Clothes Campaign for their bad practises in countries such as Bangladesh, where factory workers, often children, are paid as little as 1824 per month. While running almost 50,000 secret credit ratings of staff, overtime is often not paid, despite accusations and lawsuits of KiK paying below minimum wage to their staff in Germany. Several companies refused to sign including Walmart, Carrefour, Bonmarch, Mango, Auchan and KiK. The Kik The Kik is a Dutch music group notable for paying homage to 1960s-era Beat music with Dutch lyrics ('Nederbeat').", "3XBYQ44Z6P20KFVE4P8PY95FIFPWTT": "I like long walks on the beach, Sci-Fi movies, comic books, cheesy humor and my art reflects that.", "3BPP3MA3TCIIK21IAGCSQCOYHYVELP": "thing about having clear skin is when you get a little bump it feels like bumps bc you're skins so clear ??????", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PERH8P": "The Sunday liquor law seems to violate the spirit of the First Amendment, at least, but, because it doesn't directly address religion, would be a tough one to challenge on those grounds. As to the Ten Commandments, the courts have drawn a careful line. Displays in the context of legal history (the Ten Commandments being an important historical example of written law as opposed to royal whim) are allowable. The U.S. Supreme Court building, in fact, has such a display, in which Moses is shown along with Hammurabi and others as historical lawgivers. However, the same rulings make clear that the display of the Ten Commandments in a stand-alone context implies religious intent, and many of those seeking to erect Ten Commandments monuments have obviously done so with religious intent. That clearly violates the First Amendment, which guarantees, in part,'no law respecting an establishment of religion.' There are those who seek to create what would in effect be an official national religiou...", "3ZUE82NE0AZFB9HVB2NU3PNS9ZCF8N": "don,t do it..this dentist is just trying to make some money out of you..stop smoking that will help..bleaching will make your teeth very sensitive as well.and very white teeth looks completely unnatural..and no it should not be free on the NHS..do you know how much the stuff costs?....why should tax payers pay for your vanity Don Juan (1969 film) Don Juan () is a 1969 Czechoslovak short film by Jan vankmajer, based on traditional Czech puppet plays of the Don Juan legend. Within an old dilapidated and seemingly automated theater, human-sized marionettes perform a production of the Don Juan legend without the aid of puppeteers or an audience. In the play, Don Juan's fiancee Maria is secretly seeing his brother Don Phillipe.", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4NC43X": "I am 27 yrs old and still battle. My dermatologist told me at 17, 'You'll grow out of it'. I'm still trying everything and still waiting to 'grow out of it'.", "3TCFMTM8HEMDZFLYOMZ84W6VMP3218": "Is your chin crooked? If your chin is crooked, it would make the rest of  your face off. A girlfriend of mine had her jaw broke by doctors and reset to correct it. You would have to see an professional about this!", "389A2A304OGQQ8SIPWKE24W7TO70C9": "this is probably weird, but i made out with my boyfriend on the bus the other day then yesterday all day almost. he thought he had strep throat but he didnt look sick or anything. as far as i know he's only slept with one girl, and today i feel horrible with a really bad sore throat and stomach pain. i did not have sex with him. could this just be strep throat? or can you catch other things... please let me know!", "3HEADTGN2PQAPBIHAQYYCSLJNLOVR3": "Do you have any other symptoms like fever, chills, nausea or vomiting? When was the last time you had a bowel movement. The most common cause is constipation. If you have accompanying fever or diarrhea, you could have an infection. If the pain persists or becomes progressively more severe you should seek medical attention! If you are female, it could be menstrual related.. or even an ectopic pregnancy. Please call your doctor if this persists!", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9T7VF": "It will straighten out, but it might take some time. Its a giant pain because it can just show up when you least expect it!!! It also can vary in intensity, extremely heavy one month and painful cramps, and then be lighter the next month.", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GOQY6": "Hezaro Yek Shab Episode 100 Plays: 46,605 Date added: Jan 28, 2011 8 likes Download Now DJ Delbar's music show on Radio Javan, Hezaro Yek Shab! Tracklist 1) Ali Morshedi - Maloomeh 2) Ahmad Saeedi - Eshghe Bi Gonah (Ft Nima Allameh) 3) Farhad Javaherkalam - Nago Dige Bar Nemigardi 4) Erfan - Dobareh (Ft Morvarid) 5) Azad - Dorogh Nagoo 6) Nariman - Ba Tou Hastam (Ft Saeed Panter) 7) TM Bax - Ba Ma Rah Bia 8) Saj711 - Ba Yadeh To (Ft Farshid) 9) Sharika - Loca (Reggaeton Remix) 10) Nariman - Boom Boom (Ft Daboub) 11) Armin Rostami - Eshgham 12) Mohsen Ghorbani - Bia Tou 13) Mehrzad  Milboy - Roya 14) Arash - Broken Angel (DJ Aligator Club Remix) 15) Mehran Jafari - Hesse Tou 16) Pouya Barareh  DJ Dani - Ghahveh Talkh 17) Shahin S2 - Biya Nazdiktar", "3ODOP6T3ASIUREIHB4IA2UDYY9D42N": "Hold for 30 seconds and repeat on second side . The best time to treat a headache is the first sign of pain . Learn these five yoga poses to ease your tension headache . Adding family members lets ACTIVE find events specific to your family 's interests . ACTIVE is the leader in online event registrations from 5k running races and marathons to softball leagues and local events .", "3RWO3EJELH79RMM4QKAK09EOXZU1PT": "Taking a painkiller can help. Also, remember to chew alot. You might not want to, but it's sorta massaging that jaw muscle. It's kinda weird, but it helps ease the pain a little. yes, braces ARE stupid. lol    Opinion 2: Well it depends, what kind of pain? Is it from your braces rubbing against your gums? If so, the dentist should have given you some wax that you can put on your brackets or wires. It helps a lot! Of course, for me I noticed, after a lot of pain from my braces, after a little while you get used to them. I don't know if your gums become more thick to adapt to the abrasion or what, but it doesn't seem to hurt anymore. Remember to use a lot of lip balm! Your lips dry out really easily, and sometimes that can cause a lot of pain. :) Blessings.", "3D3B8GE892PRGRPZUXPDFFW7VBIP9Q": " What I think: exercise exercise, Exercise And exercise. What I actually do: eat, Eat, Eat, And eat.", "37MQ8Z1JQEUAPLW10B6HIJH5TAA2Y4": "Adding a table of contents to your document can actually be pretty easy, as long as you have the proper formatting in your documents. Once the formatting is set-up, inserting a table of contents into your Word Word for Mac 2011 documents takes just a few clicks. You can create your table of contents two different ways. The most common way is to use styles, such as Heading 1, Heading 2, and Heading 3, and Heading 4. Microsoft Word will automatically pick of these styles and add them to your table of contents. You can also let Word guess. If you are not using styles, you can insert a manual table of contents and Microsoft Word for Mac will guess at what to include in the table of contents however, you can update it manually.", "3WPCIUYH1A61B9VNNU3Z6LGUBZHTDF": "You are assuming there was a big bang. If your assumption is wrong then your thesis is entirely baloney. Even if your assumption is right, your thesis is no more than a play on words.", "36BTXXLZ2V6BVYZ2QUXB32L6A1R4R0": "Doctors do not alway know best My doctor said all I did was stove my finger when they took exray I broke it in 3 places They had to send me to a specialist May I ask this is there any deep brusing?? if it is cracked or broken blood will flow out and you will have a brusing colored skin (blue and purple sorta coloring. Its to late for ice now. A severe sprain can take several months to heal and may never heal completely, resulting in long-term pain, limited movement, deformity and instability of the joint, and repeated injuries. Muscle strain Most muscle strains (pulled muscles) are caused by overstretching muscles. Strains may be minor or severe, such as a torn. While a minor strain often heals well with home treatment, a severe strain may require medical treatment. Recovery time for a fracture can vary from weeks to months depending on a person's age and health the type, location and severity of the fracture and whether there are other injuries that may make treatment more complicated", "3XEDXEGFX3M89646H91CQN9FYXGK06": "Here and there you'll find someone with a chip on his shoulder who thinks he's the greatest thing in the world, but that has to do with being a douchebag, not with being a furry. Such people are incredibly rare in the furry fandom, though. You can be any age and be a furry artist. You have an interesting style, its a unique one. While its obvious you are aren't quite advanced, you do have some good potential. There are some around who will draw for free, but usually they are someone who is just starting out as an artist and/or hasn't yet developed good enough skill to be popular enough to start charging for commissions. DeviantArt is the world's largest online social community for artists and art ... If you are wanting a custom, i can either send you a commission page to fill out or you ... I'd google some furry forums and do a post request over there. Every artist's style is different. Have you also checked the furry artists over at Deviantart?", "3HXCEECSQMR0VWZDPIFV5URCEJ7YZ6": "Make a shopping list , but do n't shop when you 're hungry as that can lead to high-calorie impulse buys ! If you want a response from an NHS professional or the website team , please 12 tips to help you lose weight on the 12-week plan posted are personal views . Any information they give has not been checked and may not be accurate .", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFSMYG": "She never did it again!I learned about kitty jail since then with another kitty who was just too rough due to rough handling and play as a baby.Good luck!", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SGDB8": "nullto get it exactly what the laws are now. They are always changing and you don't want to be caught between a rock and a hard place. I always thought it had to be yearly but then I met some Europeans that said it is every two years. The Immigration has a good phone cue that can answer most questions or you can check their website: http://www.uscitizenship.info/citizenship-library.htm  You can also contact them via email and ask a question: http://www.uscitizenship.info/enUS/uscitizenship-contact.jsp  Good luck.", "3PUV2Q8SV421FN16N8CE6RA85SIBD8": "the of and to in quot gt lt that is for it he id was as be with by his on not at or which from this amp but page have you are had they all an text title one noinclude ... the of and to a in for 1 is s on 0 that by this 2 you with i or it 3 be are as at from your all 4 5 not com more have an new ... Hello my name is Chris Herrera I would like to receive your free subscription of Somos Primos. Thanks for your hard work and the resource you provide for those ... Free Online Games at 108GAME.com. Awesome action games, puzzle games, adventure games, multiplayer games, skill games  best action games. META-INF/MANIFEST.MFname/audet/samuel/shorttyping/ShortDictManagerBufferedStream.classname/audet/samuel/shorttyping/ShortDictManager.classname/audet/samuel ...", "3IWA71V4TIE97HPSIHWIPIR879H6XI": "yup a shame that that's the sort of economy of furry art.", "37M4O367VJG2U1QAZRK4MVXA4AOM50": "I do have a copy of my high school diploma, so I can ... do employers need to know your address history? I can ... The work track record is going to tell you way ...", "34R3P23QHSZAF64J4VR0KQ2R7LSWHH": "i find that drinking or injecting a pint or so of my own sperm greatly increases my muscle mass. Those weight gainers do work. The mass gainer usually contains a lot of calories including protein and carbohydrates.", "37VHPF5VYC188XXLK0XTVJ2PCMKC89": "it looks like four weeks of rest and plenty of stretching season over.", "3EN4YVUOUCQLVC4Z20Q7YMWDTF4JX4": "Scent hound Scent hounds (or scent hounds) are a type of hound that primarily hunts by scent rather than sight. These breeds are hunting dogs, and are generally regarded as having some of the most sensitive noses among canines. Scent hounds specialize in following a smell or scent.", "3I4E7AFQ2KXEEVVFXQPA9JB7GJFJTK": "Let x be the number of days worked and y be the number of days idle. Given that No. of days worked is 36 ie m 36 He gets Rs.58 i.e 2.5036-1.50n  58 1.5n  32  n  32/1.5 48 days so in total out of 84 days he worked 36 days and idle for 48 days to get his pay of Rs.", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNU01OE": "The problem with eating very little is that the body will go into survival mode in order to protect itself it will slow down the body's metabolism even more than usual. An overweight person's metabolism is already very slow and sluggish to begin with, so the last thing they would want to do is not eat enough. However, they need to focus on foods that are packed with the types of nutrients that the body requires to repair, rebuild, and maintain itself (ie. fruits, vegetables, grains) and avoid those that are just empty calories (ie. cakes, candies, potato chips). On the other hand, getting enough sleep is vital to anyone who is attempting to lose weight. Studies have shown that getting enough (deep level) rest affects the proper output and stabilization of the body's hormonal levels, which is critical to weight loss. Bottom-line: eating well, sleeping fitfully, and getting some form of active movement (exercise) in everyday are the fundamental basics of health.", "3W3RSPVVGSPZ9YY40GRXUUA13MRLUF": "In 1962 Technical pens began to be produced. 'It has been unbelievable,' Havercamp said of Puckett, the Minnesota Twins Hall of Famer who died Monday after a stroke. Some local stores also are increasing some prices to meet the higher demand, but that's not happening across the board. Havercamp said the price of autographed Puckett bats, jerseys, baseball cards, programs and other goods will jump, 'because he's no longer available to sign autographs, and he did die at an early age.' While Puckett signed autographs for nearly anyone who asked, he didn't do many signing shows, Mona noted. In addition, 42 Hall of Famers (another record) are expected to attend. The first 300 children between the ages of 7 and 12 who purchase a junior admission ticket to the museum will be able to request autographs from Hall of Famers. As usual, those who arrive early will get the best views. He will sign autographs in the information tent after the game. The Hall of Fame itself will be open 8 a.m. to 7...", "3EHIMLB7F7XZP5816SBU6AZ5PEQH8O": "Don't know why you were downrated!!! I've got big ones, not necessarily HUGE but big, and they do hurt. I cant find a good sports bra so when I run that hurts, so I've stopped doing that!", "3B9J25CZ25BQRHCUYY3YCA2QOGTCSB": "color matching the stain on an antique table to a set of antique chairs. all the chairs were made of different woods which took the stain in all different manners. a big mess that we ended up solving by painting the chairs to cover the stain!", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAZDAH": "Hirsutism, also see Idiopathic Hirsutism Below INTRODUCTION  Polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS) is the most common cause of infertility in women 1, and is primarily characterized by ovulatory dysfunction and hyperandrogenism. (See 'Definition, pathogenesis, and etiology of polycystic ovary syndrome in adolescents' and see 'Treatment of polycystic ovary. (See 'Definition, pathogenesis, and etiology of polycystic ovary syndrome in adolescents'). (See 'Diagnosis of polycystic ovary syndrome in adults'). (See 'Diagnosis of polycystic ovary syndrome in adults'). (See 'Treatment of polycystic ovary syndrome in adolescents'). (See 'Patient information: Treatment of polycystic ovary syndrome'). (See 'Clinical manifestations of polycystic ovary syndrome in adults'). (See 'Diagnosis of polycystic ovary syndrome in adults'). (See 'Clinical manifestations of polycystic ovary syndrome in adults'). We suggest a transvaginal ultrasound if serum total testosterone concentration is 150 ng/dL (5.2 nmol/L).", "3NZ1E5QA6ZZ6BAMD82UV8FMGSBLB51": "There are several reasons one can develop papules or bumps on penis . It may be either due to non-infectious cause like pearly penile papules and Fordyce spots or may be due to like genital warts .", "3GONHBMNHVW01FAZ6FRKBZ4559YZMM": "Try this : http://www.yesgoal.com/se/email/emailaddressfinder.htm  about the daughter of Evelyn..  Vile Bodies is another Evelyn Waugh gem and is a definite must read.", "3F6045TU7DM6O49SD8TGTPWSQ7Y99D": "They easily adapt to any activity. ... of their food obsession, Labs are prone to obesity, and their diet must .... They shed, like most long-coated dogs, but only moderately. How to Prevent Dry Skin and Shedding in a Labrador Retreiver. Despite their short fur, Labrador retrievers tend to shed a lot. Dry, flaky skin can make shedding worse ... You can spend, minutes, hours, days, weeks or even months over-analyzing a situation trying to put the pieces together, justifying what could've, would've?... Making faces at little kids, while their parents aren't looking ? The Very Hungry Caterpillar ? Horror movies. Movies. The Lion King ? Back to the Future. I've been mailed so many questions about Jack Russells that I decided to create a Jack Russell FAQs page so people can find answers quickly and easily. The prognosis for survival is guarded depending on how severely ill the pet ... The cells cannot receive glucose from the blood because there is no insulin ...", "3OPLMF3EU5LME8EV3FFBGZI7VQWLNL": "Yes, it's possible. Symptoms can include swelling of the mouth or throat, rashes, heavy breathing...much the same as symptoms in humans. I don't think this is an allergic reaction, and you can just pull off the piece of grass. Still, you shouldn't let people feed your dog nuts at all. Though some nuts are far worse than others, all nuts are bad for dogs. They can cause a variety of reactions, including liver or kidney failure. Don't ever give your dog nuts of any kind.", "3AQN9REUTFEXSVUHX0QYE289Q10YDA": "this must be a bloating problem one of the causes are- 1)unclean tank 2)food is expired or or has some unwanted ingredients 3)its inhaling too much water 4)its depressed(its true fish get sad! they also have feelings, I SWEAR!) 5)its got some infection                 TAKE IT TO THE VET FOR TREATMENT", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9QNHJ": "Clay masks and mud masks work well for oily skin. Treatment for oily skin There is no magical cure for oily skin. Home remedy for oily skin Fruit acids have shown a positive effect in oily skin treatment. Some simple home remedies for oily skin: 1. A puree of fresh tomatoes works wonders on oily skin. This home remedy for oily skin is ideal for blemishes. Make up for oily skin Choose cosmetic and facial care Oily skin care The first basic rule for oily skin care is to keep it clean so as to kill acne-causing bacteria. Clay masks and mud masks work well for oily skin. Treatment for oily skin There is no magical cure for oily skin. Home remedy for oily skin Fruit acids have shown a positive effect in oily skin treatment. Some simple home remedies for oily skin: 1. A puree of fresh tomatoes works wonders on oily skin. This home remedy for oily skin is ideal for blemishes. Make up for oily skin Choose cosmetic and facial care I have very oily skin too. I use a cleanser for oily skin.", "3MDWE879UH0PCXOPBS7CKVRIE719BN": "All Vet's have different fees, so you'll have to call around and ask. With that said, I would NEVER purchase a puppy whereas the breeder hasn't had it vaccinated and wormed before it goes into it's new home. You are buying from a BACK YARD BREEDER without a contract, so don't be surprised if the pup ends up with Parvo, dies, and you will never get your money back. I would be RUNNING away from this pup, not walking.", "3JUDR1D0D6P1GJ5F91PN5XE3U1W2Q4": "Most back problems consist of a condition waiting for some strain to activate it. This can happen resultant to sleeping on a soft or sagging mattress or just assuming the wrong position when asleep. What you describe suggests one or more of your ribs has been twisted and touches the intercostal nerve when you take in a deep breath. As you would when breathing through the mouth. Any doctor of Chiropractic can reduce this problem quite rapidly. You may be able to twist or rotate that part of the back and have it reduce itself. When the muscle tension has been overcome by the stretch.", "3QHITW7OYO7QLM0JMGI2BFX16POAQJ": "you could try to use a hat to prevent more direct exposure before you use bleach since the response to bleach in terms of how much pigmentation will you lose is unpredictable, good luck", "3U18MJKL1UKTB4KPQ2MCDGSK1HJCNX": " When Squints sucked face with Wendy Peffercorn, I hit puberty prematurely.", "34R0BODSP1X4IDYXITWL9NS1V8X5EU": "You sound like you have your head on straight, unlike a lot of people on Yahoo who ask about becoming a game designer, so thats a step in the right direction. To be a game designer, you need to go to a good 4 year college, but it really doesnt matter where you go. For high school classes, first of all make sure that you take all the required and recommended classes for college-bound students. That is, if your school only requires three years of science but colleges look more favorably on four years, take that fourth year of science. Wait for college to take an art class. Along with your major take math up through. Depending on what major you choose and what sort of course load you take, you should be able to finish your degree in 4 to 5 years. The last thing that I would add is that while youre in high school and college, one of the best things you can do is play a lot of games, and take notes on what you liked, what you didn't like, and what specifically you would change. Good luck!", "3BDORL6HKKBEQ2CHJ93TM0XU2E9RC1": "First 2 hospital, last 2 finally at home!", "3IVKZBIBJ07H8PNAKQHZN1Z618YHSP": "Hi I think your first problem stem's from lack of lubrication, if your wife is not getting wet during sex then that's your problem you need a lot more foreplay between the pair of you before you get into the sex act, or intercourse. If not you can by lots of different sex oils that will do the job of lubrication your wife's vagina and your penis before you get into the sex act. As for your tear, try giving it a sea salt wash twice a day till its healed, but it would be best if refrain from sex till then unless your wearing a condom, but still use lubrication, make sure its water based, or you can get KY jelly. Do hope this helps you . Good Luck", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27YZZ1A": "make sure you never grab him by the tail. Luckily his tail will grow back. It will not be as thick as the original, and it will grow back black instead of green, but it will regrow. It also will not be as long as it could be. Move slow when you reach in to get him. Try not to reach from above, make sure he can see your hand. Babies are very skiddish if you think about it, you are huge to him! He thinks you are going to eat him! So, move slowly, talk gentle to him. He will start to trust you. Don't try to do too much at one time, take it slow.Training an iguana takes a lot of time and patience. It could take as long as 6 months to get him fully used to you, so be patient. My youngest ig didnt have a tail when i rescued him, he is growing it back and after 2 months of having him, he doesnt run when i reach in his cage, he lets me hold him.Also, if you can put his cage in the living room, or somewhere where he can see people, it is better. That way he can watch you and see wha...", "3W0KKJIARR7QRV99CDERJ2FXHVT8KI": "The thing is, Depo shots are hormone shots and hormone things are often not too precise on getting back on track, so sometimes you may miss a period even after going off it. For your peace of mind, I think you should get a home pregnancy kit and test it out yourself. I was on the depo-prevera shot for almost 10 years on and off.", "3NI0WFPPI9E1ARJHF57BG44XX2W60N": "Most prisons will only allow inmates to have soft bound books, along with subscription magazines and newspapers, as personal property in their cells. The books must be mailed directly to the inmate from a bookstore or a publishing house, and as the question mentions, must be sent using the Post Office. Per the Amazon link below which discusses shipping to prisons, Amazon indicates 'There is no way for customers to request a specific shipper.' http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/d... The Book Outlet site sells new books which are publisher overstocks or publisher returns and excess inventory. This means the books are not the newest releases, but have been published in recent years. Sometimes this new merchandise is not is top condition, having suffered damage during shipment from the publisher to Book Outlet. These are always clearly identified as 'Scratch  Dent' merchandise, so the buyer is never surprised. Have ordered from Book Outlet for years because they use the Post Office...", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK6SN8": "If they are acting and eating normally for puppies of that age, I would say, its probably nothing more than a case of worms, or stress. My puppy had some bloody stool when he was that age. I called my vet and had him tested for everything. Some states have recently changed their laws and require puppies to be at least 8 .... My point here is that if the breeder is only worried about one attribute such as ..... The eggs are generally first seen in your dog's feces or stick... No wonder you are having these issues. A responsibile breeder would have already dewormed the pup before giving it to you and dewormer is not going to save your dog from all the other things she can contract outside. I would be worried about her too. Your puppy is just doing what puppies like to do, yelping once adds fun to the game, giving negative attention is just as exciting but you need to let her know it's not acceptable behaviour so here are a few suggestions to get the message across.", "3J94SKDEKINZQ7KXMYL135AGVWW5D1": "You know...it really dosen't matter to me what He looked like. He said 'I am the way, the truth and the life' But one day we will see Him and he'll still have the thorn holes in his forehead, the nail holes in his hands and feet, the spear hole in his side, and the scars on his back. But we'll all have a new body perfect in every way that will last forever.", "3KG2UQJ0MJMX55U8VKN7XLH15WNQNJ": "Hell yes. Also, once you gain experience, you can go tend bar in Hawaii, Miami, New York...the possibilities are endless. Either that or become a private investigator.", "34YWR3PJ288ET63DGSG1GHHHU6Z0XF": "Hello Cheaky, welcome to the Yahoo Answer family. Start asking questions, giving answers, casting votes, thumbs up on good answers and you will soon find your self at a good position. I am at presnt having 2600 points, as you can also locate on http://blog.360.yahoo.com/yanswrsteam.", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX6A3C": "I already asked a question somewhat similar but not much help. It's very visible and noticable when I'm erect at the bottom about the size of a quarter. On top of that my erections feel constricted and hurt sometimes and my penis is a little thinner now. Another problem is that it's not even visible at all when I'm flaccid and both urologists I saw didn't know and brushed it off as nothing. Would an MRI or ultrasound be beneficial? I don't know what to do! Oh and yes I'm circumcised and done growing (20 years old). No stupid comments", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGH1CH": "I would not suggest jumping onto medications right away. They are not a cure all, they can put you through a gambit of hellatious side effects while you try to find the right ones including increasing your symptoms, and most depression can be treated with proper therapy and environmental changes. Anxiety can cause depression, and depression can cause anxiety.", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGEC1P": "ve been on the depo shot for like nine months and am now getting brown discharge . I haven t gotten my period for six months so it can t be old blood .", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZUA7J": "INTRODUCTION TO DOCUMENTARY 2ND Edition By NICHOLS Download Free Ebook It is the most authoritative , engaging , and teachable textbook available for the life span course . http : //tvshowsontop.com/play.php ? id63593-1-2 Watch Documentary Now ! Season 1 Episode 2 - DRONEZ : The Hunt for El Chingon  Full Free Streaming  Click the blue link above to Watch Documentary Now ! Season ...", "3RQVKZ7ZRKHRA100D2GH56X8PB3275": "Blapperz, 'critical thinking' requires epistemology. That is philosophy. The fact is, no matter how much people want to ignore discussing philosophy in the terms of philosophy, they can't speak without using it. Without metaphysics to explain the concept of the object they see before them, or that they hear, feel, smell or taste, they would not have language. The effect that philosophers have on a civilization is calculable, by how well it grows healthy, or by how poorly it deteriorates, and by which methods. The deterioration of the Constructionist reading of the Constitution, as one example, is because of a 1936 decision by a progressive FDR era Supreme Court that allowed the Constitution to be interpreted as a 'living document.' Whether you think that is good or bad is not important what is important is that it was a philosophical decision that allowed the change. People have one choice only: Understand philosophy on the philosopher's terms, or let them run the world by deciding", "3Z33IC0JC0K4LBMVG9YCL7LPHZI9VU": "If money is not an issue what about veneers. Be aware not everyone is eligible for implants no matter how much money they have. there are alot of things that can be done to protect your teeth.", "3NCN4N1H1GFA1ZSJC2QH2WM2JWLNB3": "PETCO Animal Supplies: 7 Days of Deals - Today Only! CareFresh 36.99 for 180 Liter Bag http://t.co/El3hyvs4ge", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMILC3": "Fortunately, you can treat the problem easily with simple home remedies. Here are the top 10 home remedies for numbness in the hands and feet. Warm Compress The first thing you need to do is apply a warm compress on the affected area. It will help increase blood supply to the numb area. Moreover, it will in the area. Dip a washcloth in warm water. Wring out the excess, then place it on the affected area for 5 to 7 minutes. Repeat several times until the numbness is gone. You can also enjoy a warm shower or use a heating pad to alleviate discomfort. Massage Massaging your hands and feet when numbness occurs is another easy way to deal with this problem. It increases blood circulation, which in turn lessens numbness. Moreover, it helps stimulate the nerves and muscles, thereby improving their overall functioning. Put some warm olive, coconut or mustard oil on your palm. Apply it on the numb area. Massage in circular motions with firm fingers for at least 5 minutes. Repeat as needed.", "3BVS8WK9Q0TINYHSFMDPXOQLXXRIBI": "TheLightWorks said: 1 aside from putting a bell around his neck to prevent the sneaking part, it sounds like this might be some sort of guarding behavior. - a Corgi tends to herd by nipping the heels of the sheep, so it may be that he is trying to hustle the strangers out of his territory. this is, of course, conjecture, si it is only in the DB instead of an answer. 76 months ago nbsp. TheLightWorks TheLightWorks Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "3EQPA8A374UA074E3IESV7CO1FZZJE": "The problem is the absolutely crap food you're feeding it! Cats are CARNIVORES and Purina Cat Chow is made mostly of CORN and contains little to NO meat. Switch your cat to a healthier food with real meat as the main ingredient and little to no grain. An excellent choice - and easy to find - is Blue Buffalo Wilderness. It's 45 meat protein, grain free and found at both Petco and PetSmart. Also give your cat a bit of canned food daily as well as well as, of course, a bowl of fresh clean water.", "31GECDVA9JKWO25WHUNSP5EOA5M66S": "Posts: 2,676 Hi, everyone! Just got off from a temporary self ban, and back now P. Anyway, I will be converting to Islam and saying the shahada first thing this Friday before mosque. The people in the Muslim community are so welcoming here. Wish me luck btw . I know that my life is gonna change big time now..I hope so because it can really use some change now. I have already began praying 5 times a day now, do wudu, believe in the final prophet, believe that Jesus is not the son of god, can recite certain surahs from quran, attend mosque every Friday all before converting..so I think now is the time. I have been looking into Islam for about 7 months now btw. Serenegeek: So, glad that you have found your answers through Islam btw! Is now done with university. (It won't be missed... ) Originally Posted by therunaways View Post I'm not a Muslim, I've always been interested in learning more about it though. A few years back I did a little research on Islam online, and talked to a few Mus", "3MIVREZQVHWWXZ95Y7VR5T0XB1EKQ4": "Annals of the Later Han Annals of the Later Han or Hou Hanji (???) is a Chinese history book of the Eastern Han dynasty. It was written by Yuan Hong (328 - 376) during the Jin dynasty (265420). Yuan spent eight years to complete his Annals.", "3UQVX1UPFSFDSQ0GS3V8QRNLHXV203": "If you are looking for easy weight loss way, you can use my way. I lost 11 pounds in 30 days. If you are very serious about weight loss you must have a look this way. It is easy if you know correct info to do weight loss. You can find more info from link below. Opinion 2: First of all, two weeks is not enough of a time to see if it is working. Your body is still adjusting back to pre-pregnancy and your hormone levels are still out of whack. Take a picture now, and in 6 weeks, keep what you are doing and make sure you are eating a little protein, complex carbs every 3 hours to fuel the fat burning machine. Keep your calories around 1500-1800 and you should be fine. You need to give your body a little time to get back on schedule. Al http://phoenixbodystyling.blogspot.com/", "3B286OTISEF9ZZW6RQYTEELFSUVJA0": "This is not my area of expertise though I've heard that teenagers often have higher bp than a 26 year old for ex. Try webmd.com  they migt better help.. regardles,  don't strees out over this. have some chocolate. it contains natural ingreadiants to relive stress", "3BAWBGQGYLX07SY21C0S7BUJM9WV76": "there are situations when death is clearly the better alternative... but that still doesn't make suicide a 'good' thing when it's happening. even when merciful, suicide just means that someone has reached the end of their rope (no pun intended  it's always bad even in the rare occasions when it's right. Posted 31 October 2013 - 08:59 AM  If life is beautiful and worth living, let us fcking live it, don't implore us to stay around just because you want us to clean your fcking toilets and work on your fcking assembly lines. If you can't figure out why life is so crushing, why your expectations wear us down to little nubs, if you really can't understand that and don't want to try - keep your fcking mouth shut. The Connection Posted 31 October 2013 - 09:14 AM People who want to kill themselves are not of sound mind. Nobody makes a rational decision to end their own lives- they do it in the heat of the moment.", "3FVBZG9CLJCH7G3YBOYFDVTN6GEH01": "So work at it. And I know thats difficult, because many of us women would rather ignore that part of our body throughout the day. We really dont like thinking about it. We try to turn off anything to do with sex. But this requires you to focus more, and learn more about how your body works and feels. And when you go through that process, even if its a little psychologically uncomfortable for you, youll end up really enjoying your intimate life with your husband more. (only 4. ) It's the best 5 you'll ever spend on your marriage. Learn to talk more, flirt more, and even explore more. You'll work on how to connect emotionally, spiritually, AND physically. Find out more . Related Filed Under: ,You are doing an awesome job discussing things that arent usually discussed in Christian circles. Some women just dont know what to do about things so they continue to suffer. Thank you for keeping info out there for Christian women. BTW, I posted about your article yesterday.", "3Y40HMYLL1GU9SFTEZUL5O5OAV0XUC": "So pick up the phone and call your eye doctor. And then call Mom to let her know, too. For more on eye health, click .", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52RYRG": "Hi yes you are correct that's normal for most guys don't worry about it because that will only make things worse old saying 'practice makes perfect' despite what all the (super studs) on here may try to tell you the penetration part of sex usually lasts no more than 4 minutes max and most girls don't want it too! surprised well don't be guys always miss interoperate when girls say that they want a guy that can last what we mean is that we want lots of foreplay kissing licking especially the (licking wwwhhhoooooo) it will happen with practice as you settle in to your sexual relationship with this girl it's early days yet give things a chance to settle down good luck Dawn", "3PN6H8C9R4OWWDWEHUCIBGQ2NAZADE": "the of and to a in for 1 is s on 0 that by this 2 you with i or it 3 be are as at from your all 4 5 not com more have an new ... Search the history of over 434 billion pages on the Internet. Featured All Texts This Just In Smithsonian Libraries FEDLINK (US) Genealogy Lincoln ... Search the history of over 434 billion pages on the Internet. Featured All Texts This Just In Smithsonian Libraries FEDLINK (US) Genealogy Lincoln ... llvm-commits CVS: llvm/test/Programs/MultiSource/Benchmarks/MallocBench/perl/INPUT/README ?", "3FBEFUUYRK3XB4HZ77445AGA6OA6AG": "(32) In France, white was the color of mourning. (33) Why Color Symbols are not Always in Agreement Color symbolism during the Renaissance and Medieval periods has much in common with color symbolism today.Consider, for example, the current meanings of colors.", "3DGDV62G7O7GG7409OAY5SOTP57P2X": "I had braces for 5 years, I had to have 1 tooth pulled, and 8 molars that were impacted. But that was only for the one tooth, the other 8 I was put to sleep for... and I was very scared. I had 3 extraced at 18 I have my 4th and have had it filled, b/c my parent's didn't have the  for braces for me and had a molar pulled instead to make room for my teeth (overcrowding), but I got braces as an adult and b/c they pulled a rather large molar, it changed my bite, so they fixed the wisdom tooth. 1) What are molar bands and what are they for? Molar bands go arround your teeth. 4) Will it hurt getting braces on? 5) How long will it take to get used to the braces? Your normal chewing also helps to get your mouth feeling better. Attached to your braces, elastics exert the force that creates the right amount of pressure to move teeth in directions that the braces alone can't. As for bouncing an elastic off someone across the room, it will happen (don't worry, your aim will improve).", "3HO4MYYR12MHQDVXDCLV5BS4DRZU6D": "Also, how much does she currently weigh, and how much does she need to lose to be at her ideal weight? I can't really give you any solid numbers without knowing this info. If she's very overweight, reducing her food is not going to be enough. You should follow the instructions on the bag as a starting point, divided into two meals a day. Then, monitor your dog's weight-- if she's gaining too much, decrease the amount of food, and if she's getting too thin, increase the amount of food. If you give treats, subtract the same amount from her daily feed ration to avoid gaining weight. Very small mini's (under 8 Lbs.) as adults, should be fed twice per day because their blood sugar can drop too low with only one meal per day. How much to feed depends on the brand of dog food that you give your dog. If you feed a healthy natural food, you generally will feed less. It's best to follow the feeding guidelines on the dog food package, different brands vary.", "3909MD9T2ZFWKARMO59UVZJEK2AFEM": "trying to retrieve something that is lost is pretty difficult and almost a lost cause. I'm not sure if you can.", "3AXFSPQOYQW4VQDE26KLSFW6PA5FJ6": "Well, it's a good question. Motivation is the challenge of every person who wants to achieve a goal, be it weight loss, becoming an oil painter or anything else. It sounds like you may have invested too much time and effort into research. Everything feels overwhelming to you right now, doesn't it? Don't let that stop you. At a certain point, you have to take the plunge and DO IT. Stop thinking about it and just DO IT. I read an interesting article in which a fitness coach said there is no such thing as 'motivation' there are only choices. You can choose to eat an apple, or you can choose to eat a candy bar. You can choose to take a walk for 10 minutes, or you can choose to watch TV instead. Do you see the difference here? I strongly suggest you and your friend check out WebMD's Diet Community, where you can share your fears, struggles, goals and successes with others who will cheer you on!", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDV1AE": "How to Litter Train a Kitten How to Make a Kitten Cage How to Put a Collar on a Kitten How to Pet a Kitten How to Maintain Your Kitten's Litter Box How to Teach Your Kitten to Be Calm and Relaxed How to Shampoo a Kitten for Fleas How to Take Care of Kittens Sources and Citations ? Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Feline Reproduction. Burke. Feline Practice 5 (6) 16-19 ? Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal. Feline Reproduction. Burke. Feline Practice 5 (6) 16-19 ? Feline Reproduction. Burke. Feline Practice 5 (6) 16-19 ? Reproduction in the Dog and Cat. Christiansen. Publisher: Bailliere Tindal.", "3UV0D2KX1MHES8UTZZXHMD7N7DJ4F8": "Determine if you really are depressed, and what the problem is. Do you lack motivation? Do you have trouble enjoying things that you used to? Do you cry a lot? Does it seem that nothing is really worth doing? Do you feel that your life is meaningless? If so, it is possible that are sinking into the psychological quicksand of clinical depression. Get plenty of sleep. In the modern world, there is an increasing problem of people not getting enough sleep. Practice good sleep hygiene and try to get around eight hours. Depression and anxiety of any sort can interfere with sleep, so this may or may not be possible. Get out of bed in the morning. If this is something you are struggling with, ask a friend to call you in the morning to make sure you are awake. Exercise. A recent study showed exercise to be as effective as Zoloft (a selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor or SSRI) in treating depression. Exercise is very good for body and mind. Depression can make it hard to work up the m", "3F6045TU7DM6O49SD8TGTPWSQ7199G": "before you decide to gain weight, what is your height? looking at your user name, i'm assuming your a male who weighs 140lb. on average male height in north america is 6 feet, and your bmi is average. unless you are 6 feet 9 you are underweight or 5 feet 9 you are overweight. if you want to gain weight, you want to gain muscle mass, not body fat. 1) if you just want to gain weight, the caloric intake needs to be higher than what you burn. 2) increase carbohydrates intake, and change the complex carb to simple. meaning change whole wheat to white wheat 3) stop eating lean meat. red meat is prob better if your goal is to get bigger. listening to an athlete gaining weight in judo to move up in the weight class: he ate rice with meat and meat stock. like oxtail with vegetable, rice and that soup. or you can boil the whole chicken and eat the meat with the stock.", "3JYPJ2TAYI60H1GCXJP5PBIIY9CPFH": "Randomized weighted majority algorithm The randomized weighted majority algorithm is an algorithm in machine learning theory. It improves the mistake bound of the weighted majority algorithm. Imagine that every morning before the stock market opens, we get a prediction from each of our 'experts' about whether the stock market will go up or down.", "3BC9H1KCYUAW11U8EVVO6QXUXH7WYI": "A normal heart rate is 50 to 100 beats per minute. arrhythmias can also occur with rapid heart rates (called tachyarrhythmias -- faster than 100 beats per minute). Changes in your heart muscle. Heart Disease: Abnormal Heart Rhythm An arrhythmia (also called dysrhythmia) is an irregular heartbeat. Heart rates can also be irregular. A normal heart rate is 50 to 100 beats per minute. arrhythmias can also occur with rapid heart rates (called tachyarrhythmias -- faster than 100 beats per minute). Changes in your heart muscle. In some people, it can be related to stress, too much caffeine or nicotine, or too much exercise. This allows the impulses to travel around the heart very quickly, causing the heart to beat unusually fast. A rapid heart rate due to more than one pathway through the AV node. A rapid heart rhythm originating from the lower chambers (or ventricles) of the heart. When I woke up, while still lying in bed, I checked my pulse rate. I then stopped, and checked my beats ag...", "3FSEU3P2NRYIW41016TOBVWG2FARR5": "yeah watching it online now that i am a little free! i love all the uk/us serials now enjoying!", "35F6NGNVM8HLU0UDWH0D6T6YPOCT7K": "Add remaining ingredients except corn syrup stir by hand until combined. Bake at 350 degrees for 75 to 85 minutes or until toothpick inserted in center comes out clean. Wrap in plastic wrap or foil and store in refrigerator. Tightly cover with plastic wrap and set atop the saucepan of boiling water. Keep pan tightly wrapped and steam for 50 minutes to 1 hour. Check water level often, until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean. Tightly cover with plastic wrap and set atop the saucepan of boiling water. Keep pan tightly wrapped and steam for 50 minutes to 1 hour. Check water level often, until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean.", "31YWE12TE0ASBH3X1R1AVWR42K17XI": "UFO's: I dont know God: if he doesnt exists how does I. I mean I believe in God. Fate: yep The Holocaust: I dont know Demons: I dont know Magic: 50 50 Santa Claus: when I was kid Big Foot: are you joking True Love: I dint find yet. But I hope I am going to find one soon.", "38F60IALAGF7CPUTBIF4REWBHA6T0K": "Retinopathy From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to: navigation, search Retinopathy ICD-10 H35.0-H35.2 ICD-9 362.0-362.2 Retinopathy is a general term that refers to some form of non-inflammatory damage to the retina of the eye. Macular Edema Macular edema is swelling of the macula, the small area of the retina responsible for central vision. The edema is caused by fluid leaking from retinal blood vessels. Because the macula is surrounded by many tiny blood vessels, anything affecting them, such as a medical condition affecting blood vessels elsewhere in the body or an abnormal condition originating in the eye,. Retinal blood vessel obstruction, eye inflammation, diabetes, and age-related macular degeneration have all been associated with macular edema. Treatment seeks to remedy the underlying cause of the edema. Eyedrops, injections of cortisone around the eye or laser surgery can be used to treat a macular edema. Recovery depends on the severity of the condition causing the edema.", "3QQUBC64ZECHE2VKHYIZRTDU2Z9NXC": "I wanted to add.. he is a 10 week old pure golden retriever. We have had him for just over a month now. We feed him Innova EVO twice a day (in am and pm) and something raw at lunch time. He gets about 1.5-2 cupes of kibble a day, moistened. The kids often feed him in the morning by dropping a few kibbles at a time into his bowl, so he gets used to hands giving food not taking away. He always sits before he eats, and I often pull him away an make him sit and stay. If he growls when anyone comes near him while he is eating, we take his food away immediately. when he sits and stays after a minute or two we give it back. nym is offline  Quoted: 0 Post(s) Ok, let's look at this the way he sees it: Oh, there's my food. I am so hungry! Let's go head toward it... oh, crap, the human took it? What on earth? But I was so hungry! Ok, sit, OK, down. YAY FOOD! Oh, there's my food. I am so hungry! Let's go head toward it...Oh, here comes that human. How about I tell her that this is my food, and as", "3U74KRR67MJAXLM0COH22QSOP3LNTT": "Marsha Kinder Marsha Kinder (born 1940) is a film scholar and Professor of Critical Studies at USC. Titled 'Antonioni in Transit,' her first essay on 'Blow-up' and its relationship to Antonioni's earlier films made in Italy, was published in the British film journal Sight  Sound in 1967. Menkes's CD Rom premiered at the Sundance Film Festival. Entertainment and culture stories in sight at this hour from The N.Y. Times News Service for Saturday, Aug. 8. UR IDEAS PAGE LR UR Holocaust Debate LR How should the Holocaust be taught? While some thinkers believe the Holocaust is getting the attention it deserves, others are uneasy about focusing scholarship on an attempt to wipe out the Jewish people instead of on the whole of Jewish history. TV-MAGIC (Undated)  Magic Johnson's TV show on Fox is canceled. Series) ----- English Language and Literature/Letters. (Report under 23.0501) 50.0505 Theatre Literature, History and Criticism.", "3X2LT8FDHWGHMV3Q1RXU7D9S425W85": "Persson was born in Melbourne, Australia. His undergraduate studies were at the Victorian College of the Arts from 1979 to 1981. He completed a Masters degree from the same institution in 1998.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PV81H": "However, cluster migraines can also be misdiagnosed as sinus problems. I would have a doctor take a scan of your sinuses or try some mild medication perhaps to see if sinus or allergies could be the cause of the migraines being so young. Often, once you see the scotoma you have about 10-15 minutes before the headache starts, and migraines can last for hours until the blood vessels relax. Often people with migraines have nausea, as well as some sensitivity to light. However, some women have reported the initial onset of migraines during the first trimester of pregnancy, with disappearance of their headaches after the third month of pregnancy. What triggers migraines in women? Are you in a very hot or cold place at a particular time? That could trigger migraines. Fluctuating weather and temperature could also trigger migraine.", "33CLA8O0MI9LTEWRABTUU6IXZR2FR1": "I know it's not acne, but I think it's about skin reactions. BUUUTTT I looked it up and breast cancer was discussed.....", "3HJ1EVZS2OHQD2GYQGSSTXT0W1TR30": "www.writing.com  It is a great place for getting feedback on your writing by other writers. They have a free membership or you can upgrade. It is easy to use because they have good tutorials for beginners. I'm a writer, too, and I am fond of this site.", "3QI9WAYOGQ91B03TO7QVQAAGSUIS6Z": "Some women will continue growing until the age of 25. Don't sweat it at all. I would say that you either one the genetic lottery or you didn't. You could eat all of the papayas in the world and I would very much doubt it would help you sprout some sweater bunnies. Are you very skinny? The less fat you have on your body the less breast tissue you'll have. From my experience, woman that have large breasts usually have a big fat butt. Women that have really nice butts that are firm and shapely usually are smaller up top. About 3 of population are lucky enough to have both. I am assuming you are asking because you are self concious and you want to attract men? I could be wrong? A nice rack is great but you'll find guys that don't care about that and they want long slender legs, a tight stomach. Don't think that big juggs instantly make you desirable to men. You could have the most smokin body in the world but if you have a face like a troll it won't really matter.", "3G9UA71JVVSRGXY8KNM94NJPRMP7JX": "Answering these questions will help you develop your own point of view. Less is more Develop your point of view with one or two thoughtful, well-developed examples versus multiple oversimplified examples. It's ok to be you There's nothing wrong with I. You are asked to develop your point of view on the issue, not give a straight report of the facts. This is your opinion, so feel free to give examples that are meaningful to you, even ones from your personal life or experiences. Formula for success There are no shortcuts to success on the SAT essay. You will not receive high scores on your essay just because it is long, or has five paragraphs, or uses literary examples. Process of elimination Eliminate the choices you are sure are wrong when you are not sure of the answer. Make an educated guess from those that remain.", "3RIHDBQ1NEWEAUA50TLDBS009JDMHF": "Because they are, and cuddly too. Puppy dogs are the same nice and cuddly and cute with it. And like new born babies they are cute and cuddly, and of course dependent on us, for all of their needs. Well you wouldn't be a human being if you didn't have the compassion that you have. You have the desire to take care of, and provide for, and look after and nurture, all the attributes one can admire and respect. You couldn't just leave the kitten to fend for itself so took it on your shoulders to take it home and look after it and make it a home. Do you have to have a reason to why little kittens are so cute? Just accept it for what it is and enjoy the moments of joy you'll get with playing and amusing the kitten. Or vice versa. givemestrength", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN5B4IZ": "whatever you say. To me hes a him and thats all that matters..", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3452NYH": "Sheamp. s fine, relax dude, you stressing isnamp. t going to help her", "3D4BBDG7ZHUM70RF8J2X42UEW0SC3H": "Depends on the type of vestibular injury you sustained. Some will go away, while others will remain for life. Since your specific symptoms have been gone for 9 1/2 years, there is a good indication that your disease has reverted and you will not have a problem in the future.", "3R5LWXWHR06B4AEYUU54194X1NJXGA": "I just feel bad for their fanboys tho.. side eyeing", "371Q3BEXDH73ZAN4QCN6N83BXYDZSV": "Skinny Call Control Protocol The Skinny Client Control Protocol (SCCP, or short 'Skinny') is a proprietary network terminal control protocol originally developed by Cisco. The SCCP technology is now owned and defined by Cisco Systems. SCCP is a lightweight protocol for session signaling with Cisco Unified Communications Manager (formerly called CallManager).", "3EGKVCRQFWQ4DYWXJ4ZSJCK9NGNBYF": "Remember, if you have other insights into this topic, please share them in our free forum below.By participating, you can help create the body of knowledge that will help us all find the most effective alternatives to common problems like dandruff.Spread the Word to Friends And Family By Sharing this Article.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG544LZ2": "Hey Steven Where do you live?? As this will effect what will have to happen with your dog. Personally I took my 2 cats to Australia from South Africa and it cost me about 10 000 and they were in quarantine for 7 months. I think at least my dog can rest and relax with me before the super long travel. ... that are pet friendly and will allow him to be in the cabin if possible. .... Egyptians don't like dogs, on the whole. ... 'Not all of street animals killed by the government or citizens have it,?? he ... Based on these fees, the total cost for the sterilization of one dog is about 250 Egyptian... ..... ESMA can spay and neuter your animal at cost . ..... to be made all well again by a good doctor, and to get all the vaccinations and tests, to go?... If you're moving to Egypt, you'll need reliable overseas goods shipping for your ... to Egypt as seamless as possible by providing top-notch shipping services for all of your ...", "38G0E1M85M3253AYEKT3H383UKSVU7": "Looks like an abstract from fairy tale but it's real ... Medieval Portal, Toledo, Spain castle medieval spain http://t.c", "3BS6ERDL935V9BKBRHV6VBOGRR56DG": "Camellias grow on shrubs which will grow into small trees if not pruned back occasionally. The blooms are all shades of pink, red, and white or variegations of those colors. variegations can be in the form of spots, streaks, stripes, or blotches. There are a few rare yellows. Hybridizers are trying to get the yellow to give us some other shades, but are not being too successful yet. There are several species of Camellias which are grown in home gardens. The species that most people grow are Japonicas, followed by Reticulatas, and Sasanquas. There are also many hybrids between these species and some of the other species. The blooms have several different forms. Some are single, having not more than 8 petals encircling the center of stamens. There are semi-doubles, which have two or more rows of petals but still have a good show of stamens. Anemones have a ring of 'guard' petals that lie flat around the base with a central mass of small petals and petaloids that seem to pile up on top of one anot", "36818Z1KV3BYELUHO566Y74QWX83A7": "The infection typically appears on the penis but also occasionally occurs in the anal or mouth area. Chancroid starts out as a tender bump that emerges 3 to 10 days (the incubation period) after the sexual exposure. The bump then erupts into an ulcer (an open sore), which is usually painful.", "3QREJ3J433VL62TS62NVO7131VVLKK": "Kansas online pay lease-lend-all and some twilight lay off occur settlement day in agreement with settlement da...", "3MQKOF1EE2MT3QZHIZ8AT5NTFTXWD6": "I never worry about diets. The only carrots that interest me are the number you get in a diamond.", "30OITAWPBQ1Z3ARBBKH866UG9K79H4": "Oh wow! I do feel your pain. In the long run, I had to stop taking it because it caused me to have extremely heavy bleeding.", "30IRMPJWDZHW90O5BMKRAJA27NJRKF": "No, spaying your puppy will not change her personality. Spaying not only decreases the number of unwanted dogs in shelters, but there are medical benefits to your dog decreased risk of cancer among them. Read the article at the link below for more info.", "3SNR5F7R92RGU1TCPDFFYWW60U5EIF": "pray RT: The deadly virus Ebola is on the rise-Liberia, Guinea, Sierra Leone. Pray this epidemic'd be brought undercontrol", "31MBOZ6PAOP3N4H4EP6X0OOVWMLLC6": "10. religious freedom 16. Pennsylvania 17. the transition from African to British slave traders who then transported the slaves to America  18. Indentured servants left plantations at the end of their servitude. 23. tobacco", "3UY4PIS8QRJ9O1ARA5XSWK9TXKW1N0": "Diet Coke and Diet Pepsi contain aspertame which can hinder your progress if you're trying to lose weight on a low carb diet. They both also contain a lot of caffiene which can constrict blood vessels (not good!). If you can, please try to get off the diet pills'' and take a more nutritionally sound approach to your diet - and your health.", "3PR3LXCWSFXWP0RQGOZU9SIAXAT9X0": "Please email us at pets and include your browser type browser version and computer operating system.", "3LEG2HW4UFL4PUF6VLETTYAPNZKF2K": "Your weight is 150 lbs., or 68 kg. Your birthdate is 01/01/1987, so your age is 19 years 4 months. If the above are not correct, please go back to the form and correct your input.", "373L46LKP74FBC5S3HBI8SOBX6PKJG": "Most ET in World Cup history: 11 Italy 10 Germany 08 ARGENTINA and England 07 Brazil and France 06 Belgium, Spain and Netherlands", "3AC6MFV69KGE919OFIB7JUW9ONUZH8": "I do suggest you do a search on petfinder.com, you'll definately find a small dog up for adoption around you, and maybe even a Yorkie! Afghan Hound Airedale Terrier Akita Alaskan Malamute Australian Cattle Dog Australian Kelpie Australian Silky Terrier Australian Terrier Basenji Basset Hound Beagle Bearded Collie Bedlington Terrier Belgian Shepherd Dog Bernese Mountain Dog Bichon Frise Bloodhound Border Collie Border Terrier Borzoi Boston Terrier Bouvier Des Flandres Boxer Briard British Bulldog Bull Terrier Cairn Terrier Cavalier King Charles Spaniel Chihuahua (Long Coat) Chihuahua (Smooth Coat) Chow Chow Clumber Spaniel Cocker Spaniel Cocker Spaniel (American) Collie (Rough) Collie (Smooth) Curly Coated Retriever Dachshund (Miniature Long-Haired) Dachshund (Long-Haired) Dachshund (Smooth-Haired) Dachshund (Miniature Smooth-Haired) Dachshund (Miniature Wire-Haired) Dalmatian Deerhound Elkhound Dobermann English Setter English Springer Spaniel Flat Coated Retriever Fox Terrier (Smoo...", "3LXX8KJXPW79VRDYFXCYQFRHL6K9OR": "I dont know why my mom is a black woman who looks like I stated above.She is too scared to find out and I hope someday we can find out together.Good luck.", "3ULIZ0H1VA35YC4L651623976ZR155": "It's doesn't matter what bra size you are at any age. Some girls develop early, and some late. Some girls have big breasts some have small breasts. It all depends on your genetics, and what your mums size was like at your age. Don't worry, it doesn't matter what size your boobs are. I am 13 and 12A (In Australia) I honestly don't care what size I am, I am only 13 my life doesn't revolve around breast size!! My friend who is a year older than me,14 is a late bloomer (no period) really wants big breasts! She wears bras bigger than she needs, also she should still be in the 'little girls' section for bras. I tell her the bras she wears are too big, but all she does is get annoyed, and is in denial, and responds saying she does fit them! So don't feel self concious about your boobs, someday they will be bigger, and for now just enjoy life! :) xx", "3KI0JD2ZU1GFS2J104SKVJEK5G367O": "My boyfriend is v upset as he ran over a black cat on way to work this morning. How will his luck be affected? Update: the cat was not near any homes - ran out from the side of fields Follow 7 answers  Are you sure you want to delete this answer? Yes No Sorry, something has gone wrong. Answers Add a comment  His luck will not be affected in any way. I had exactly the same thing happen to me a number of years ago and I cried all day, but nothing happened to my luck, such as it is. The superstition about black cats is only that, superstition. I live in a rural area and know how fast an animal can run in front of you - there's nothing you can do. Tell him not to feel bad, just be more careful in the future. Nightlight  His luck is good but can't say the same about the cats. pdq ", "3T2EL38U0MI2HZ8CXQAGVN8Z7AVQX1": "Note to Users Outside of the United States WebMD, Medscape and WebMD Global are located in the United States.We will collect, store, and process information about your use of the Services in the United States and these activities shall be governed by applicable United States laws and regulations and this Privacy Policy.By using the Services, you consent to such collection, storage and processing in the United States, though the United States may not afford the same level of data protection as considered adequate in your own country.", "36QZ6V1589BMDBTUKPOY6GOWVG0US3": " If you must pop a zit with a pin, put it in an Advil liqui-gel first to reduce the swelling ttp://t.co/V6KY7XMOdD wtf nah", "3A9LA2FRWSCP4699E0NMM9GYGN1HXY": "visit various churches you are welcome in all houses of the Lord if any one turns you away you know that is not the place to be, but if you feel the atmosphere, get the message, and feel the spirit that is where you need to be. After service the pastor will offer everyone an opportunity to come to the alter just walk up and join. at the new member meetings you will get to know more people, new people and I am sure you will grow to love your new church home. Oh yeah, ask God to help you on your way.", "3Y7LTZE0YTKJENF8FHI629LZIVWZU9": "Complete blood count A complete blood count (CBC), also known as a complete blood cell count, full blood count (FBC), or full blood exam (FBE), is a blood panel requested by a doctor or other medical professional that gives information about the cells in a patient's blood, such as the cell count for each cell type and the concentrations of various proteins and minerals. Multiple blood draws and counts throughout the day are an excessive use of phlebotomy and can lead to unnecessary additional transfusions, and the extra unnecessary treatment would be outside of medical guidelines. The cell counting component counts the numbers and types of different cells within the blood. For example: Many disease states are heralded by changes in the blood count: White blood cell (WBC) count. Red blood cell (RBC) count. The hemoglobin test measures the amount of hemoglobin in blood and is a good indication of the blood's ability to carry oxygen throughout the body. They play a major role in blood ...", "34HEO7RUG6SQXNFJZV72G5762BOARI": "I know the feeling, i get acne breakouts when i'm stressed or i get a major zit when i'm going out, it's really frustrating! the only thing that helps is when i'm on the pill. Know you are not the only one who has acne.", "3087LXLJ6MEXTKCSGYAFAAHAQ120FN": "I love you, and I love you like writer and troll hahaha but I love you", "33KMQD9OFJCYW2X6JEXC1XEG0RO77P": "BEAUTYBABE 5 years ago from QUEENSLAND AUSTRALIA. Hub Author Yes Faybe, a bowel obstruction is a very painful experience to go through and I have been through many of them. I have had a lot of surgery over the years and now I have a bag, that is something it takes a while to get to know how to use it and then to come to terms with using one. But, you do in time. Beautybabe Danielsmommy2008 5 years ago I think I might have a partial obstruction but I can't get any doctor to check it out for me. I have a feeling of fullness on my left side, cramps up when I finally do go to the bathroom, I am on lactulose just so I can go. I also feel a twitching and rumbling in that area. Nausia, unexplained weight loss. but they just keep prescribing lactulose? What kind of doctor should I go to? Thanks :) Jamie 5 years ago Confused. Over the years my husband has had over 20 surgeries on his abdomen.", "3Q9SPIIRWJKV5JW5YPH834FNUQ2WA6": "Be true to yourself, help others, make each day your masterpiece", "32TZXEA1OLIN2T0LS0IWXB3T630417": "You can read more about this procedure here http://www.labiaplastysurgeon.com/labiaplasty.html If you go to this site, you can get a referral in your state http://www.lasertreatments.com/labiaplastypatient.html Labiaplasty Labiaplasty (also known as labioplasty, labia minora reduction, and labial reduction) is a plastic surgery procedure for altering the labia minora (inner labia) and the labia majora (outer labia), the folds of skin surrounding the human vulva. The size, colour, and shape of labia vary significantly, and may change as a result of childbirth, aging and other events. This comprises the labia majora (outer labia), the labia minora (inner labia), the clitoris, the urethra, and the vagina. The labia majora extend from the mons pubis to the perineum. The size, shape, and color of women's inner labia vary greatly. The size of the labia can change because of childbirth. Labial reduction by means of laser resection of the labia minora involves the de-epithelialization of t...", "3K8CQCU3KEZ2P2QU7TMDPAZNTX2WNR": "?The Cask of Amontillado . is the tale of another nameless I who has the power of moving downward from his mind or intellectual being and into his brute or physical self and then of returning again to his intellectual being with his total selfhood unimpaired . But this I has one power which was denied to Usher, Wilson, and others: he is from the beginning master, even god, of his circumstances: I must not only punish, he ruminates, but punish with impunity. In his preface to the story in the Collected Works, T. Mabbott writes, ?The Cask, on its surface completely amoral, is perhaps the most moral of his Tales. The murderer at the end remembers that his victim rests in peace. That is something the criminal had been unable to do for fifty years. And in a footnote, Mabbott summarizes a critical controversy centering on whether Montresor is a murderer without conscience or whether he has actually been punished by fifty years of guilt and fear of being found out.", "3WRAAIUSBJXAUJ1V8UDU5NTU3SAAXF": "Thanks for following along with my adventures - down to the very pages that .... no mirror, no hooks for clothes or towels, no towels, no soap, no chairs, ... Although I've been back for almost a week, I think all of this will take time to .... Remember when the Christmas season began the day AFTER Thanksgiving? .... breakfasts mom would make-good country gravy, biscuits, cold milk, eggs, .... the ? ?ood furniture?? that made the back of your legs (and butt) sweat and?... Apr 6, 2006 ... Show Biz w. .... Bill Clinton Elected For Second Term Charles Diana Finalize Divorce ... School Football Coach High School Guidance Counselor Insurance .... Is In The Oven Do Your Duty Don't Look Back Don't Make Waves Don't ..... The doctor went on chuckling and rocking in his chair like a mechanical toy. ... To say treatment is symptomatic means there is none, except to make the ..... Is this Cherry Ass Gio the Towel Boy or Mother Gillig, Old Auntie of ...", "324N5FAHSX9O275MK6P1BGZ5STXVKD": "Graphic tablets (in my opinion) are waaaaaaaay better than the ipad. first of all - precision. you can really get into that detail on the tablet. ipad - yes - if you have a stylus, but a lot of styluses tend to be made of rubber - which drags and is a bit clumsy - and they're generally pretty big. Not really that great for detail, seeing as the stylus blocks your view. also, programs. there is a much wider range of program available for the computer than for the ipad, and the ones on the ipad tend to cost tons while there are plenty of free and awesome programs for the computer. my advice - get a graphics tablet BUT try and experiment with your ipad to see if you like it (with free apps and your fingers). i just prefer the tablet.", "3XEIP58NL0LGVXSE63Q5BMPG544ZLG": "The wind and the waters were calm on that date and hence a mine could not have been detonated by contact , but only by using electricity , but no cables had been found . No dead fish were found in the harbor , as would be expected following an explosion in the water . Munition stores do not usually explode when a ship is sunk by a mine . The conclusions of the report were not reported at that time by the American press .", "3H5TOKO3D9HI9F1IY6UDS7UAEEC461": "There's not much to 'miss' really.The most important thing to do is to throughly go trough the privacy settings to have them set the way you want. Do you want people to see pictures or videos tagged of you? Whom do you want to search for you? I have my privacy settings as strict as I possibly can on there.Not even people in my networks can find me(which areset to anearby city and my college networks).Facebook became open to high schoolers right when I started teaching, so I don't want kids to even find me. I've had some even comment on how they searched for me and nothing shows up. Now, I don't have anything illegal or wrong on there, but still I want my privacy. (Which, I know is an oxymoron because it's the Internet, but I like facebook for my ability to communicate with my friends in Chicago and Boston.) However, I did make a Facebook group for my Student Council kids because it was much easier to send out meeting reminders and such.", "34OWYT6U3WFZZ52VH2ZT6IVV9XOI98": "This lump I have under my armpit I hope isn't cancerous ?pray to god what else could it be tho it's under the skin it's not red but hurts", "3ZQX1VYFTD39HMUOA56KQJW6103O8I": "I think this all the time omg", "31N9JPQXIPGKSCV5CU0DO7P0E9OHNB": "It is TRUE that STRESS can contribute to missed periods. And Hormone imbalances can also contribute to missed periods. It will take time for your periods to regulate back to normal after quot. stoppingquot. oral contraceptives perhaps a month or two, maybe 3 months. Fibroidsquot. can also contribute to Menstral problems, which leaves me to this simple conclusion. DISCUSS your concerns with your GYN doctor. This way all the necessary tests can be done to rule out what needs to be ruled out amp. a solution/reason can be discovered, as to why you aren't seeing your periods regularly.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHL1RO": "oh im very sorry to hear that but if you are looking for a cat or kitten can i interest you in adopting one from I'ts All About The Cats its a nonprofit org. and our goal is to take cats off of the street so the  of deaths of cats and kittens is not so high what we do is we take the felines off the street and we get it the best medical care that it needs then we give them their shots and we deworm and deflea them and then when they weigh approx. 3 pounds we either nueter or spay them and them if they are ferrel we tame then and put them up for adoption cats age 6mo and up are 50 and kittens ages 5mo and down are 75 if you are really interested in a other feline friend you can visit www.petfinder.com and if you look some of our cats and kittens are on it well actually a few factors count first number one the breed of dog certain dogs are bred to be protective of one enviornment so some times they will not get along with another anmal no matter what..", "3BKZLF990ZXRH4YM2MWIE1F89GRQY9": "On the menu bar, click 'Image' than 'Attributes..'   Then under Colors, click the radio button 'Black and White. 'This allows you to paint in black and white, however, you cannot convert a current file into black and white.", "3EPG8DX9LKO8F4NNR7CW3ZR59F0P50": "the only thing worse than the stupid people writing are very stupid editors that approve them.", "3M0556243SI0EG4ZH4CDLMDNYUDNFL": "its said to be really good for oily skin", "3OND0WXMHWDGY6ISJVXUYKVR0HMEHI": "I would not lose sleep over the size of your penis. In med school, we are taught that normal penis size is anything from 5' to 6.5' erect. Three inches flaccid sounds pretty normal, again, based on your age. I will describe webbed penis, concealed penis, trapped penis, micropenis, and absent penis. A webbed penis is a normal-sized penis where the skin of the scrotal sack extends part way up the shaft of the penis. A concealed penis is a normal-sized penis that lays hidden in the pubic fat pad. This condition is also called buried penis or hidden penis. Sometimes surgery is needed for concealed penis. A trapped penis is a normal-sized penis that is partially stuck in the pubic fat pad. All of the above conditions have a penis of normal size. To evaluate penis size, stretch the penis gently and measure from the bone at the base all the way to the tip. The penis then starts to enlarge, first in length and then later in thickness. This process of normal penis growth can be disturbing to...", "3SR6AEG6W5RE4BZJJW9O5NN7ITVYHL": "You will need to purchase the Pineapple ruler and the book both available at our shop.You will need to meet with Joyce a few days before the class to choose your colors.A list of what needs to be prepared before class will be available at the shop.", "37SDSEDIN90OLUNN4389ENJY8PW18B": "I LOVE YOU FUCK ME", "3XJOUITW8UPV0IZSSG9J6KNTUE8TQM": "There are many things that can cause a Flowerhorn or any fish for that matter not to eat. Poor water quality, stress from shipping, intimidation, and the wrong foods. But it could certainly be the cause of why your FH is not eating.", "3XU9MCX6VOA1SKKFMGENANO8QNVR2R": "I encourage you to find a groomer, even if you have to drive aways-- at least for the first groom and mat removal.Then perhaps you can learn to upkeep the coat yourself.GOOD LUCK!", "3YD0MU1NC2ZGF4V4QH9WBOG61ZWA7L": "Sydney Levin: Missouri man 'caught using fake genitals known as Whizzinator on drug test' http://t.co/9YNRSxa64D", "388FBO7JZRR6E7LUMU41A7K3450NYF": "Whenever I watch videos or look up the writer of a particular editorial, they are Caucasian.", "351S7I5UG9UGJIQV0U3Y0K5FR1SNJM": "The exhibition, organized by the China Household Electrical Appliances Association and China World Trade Center, is China's fourth large international show on household electrical appliances. At this show, 15 percent of 2,000 products are brand new products. Japan uses both 50 Hertz (Hz) and 60 Hz current, and most Japanese appliances have a switching power supply which runs on both currents. It should have a label that shows something like 50/60 Hz. If your appliance uses both frequencies, you are OK. The USA uses only 60 Hz current. If your appliance only runs on 50 Hz, it will wear out very quickly in the USA. It might be less expensive to purchase an American appliance. An SSB report shows that the production scale of a number of household electric appliances have been up with their large overseas counterparts. A survey on 72 household electric appliances producers indicates their combined sales value amounted to 74.58 billion yuan (about 8.985 billion US dollars).", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN57I49": "Or, depending on whether or not they have SAS, they may die as young as 6 months, or even younger. Be glad, you dog have lived so well, and so long. Seeing that he has no major health problems, I would guess he may live to about 13, give or take. As with most large breed dogs,Rottweilers dont usually live as long as smaller breeds of dogs.So anything over 8 years is a bonus,on saying that,one of mine made it to nearly 14 years of age but unfortunately cancer usually gets them. The purebred rottie, probably will live about 10-12 years, on average, depending upon the heredity, if known. Believe it or not, the mix dogs are going to live longer, possibly up to 15 years although have heard of longer. My childhood dog was a rott ( well we had 4!) and she lived to be 16. If you're dog is healthy, neutered, and has a good diet, they can live live longer than the average life span...", "3XDJY5RK5SJ3BQRJUOSG8D8QH0W4U5": "Suicide is not worth it. I've been there before myself. Check out the links below for some crisis hotline numbers which I hope can help you. E-mail me at chadjesusfreak.com if you'd like to talk.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0KYJ4O": "obviously he is. he is 1 of the best point guards of all time and he is quot. Mr triple doublequot.", "31HLTCK4BLTJ0L93UF4MDO7CLCFVG9": "Your diet is a bank account. Good food choices are good investments.", "3EQVJH0T40JINP0P9QMPX6VS3RCHTE": "July 24 .... I had sex for the first time a few days ago and it was with my boyfriend of over a year who I love and we were in a safe, .... Please help if you can and tell me it's total... Also, me and my boyfriend always had unprotected sex even on my fertile days and I didnx27t get pregnant for 2 whole years. Just when we started to think he was sterile I got pregnant. Wanna know something else? I personally wouldn't want my boyfriend to be friends with someone who freely has sex with others in front of him. That's just a cross of the line to me. But he probably didn't tell you becauae he knew it isn't something you want to hear. It doesn't have any bearing on your first pregnancy, but in ..... Alina, I had the same thing happen to me yesterday! First .... As far as bleeding from sex: this is completely normal. .....", "3WYZV0QBFJBFDT6NE8DQ0YD0LATXBV": "Where my mouth hurts there is n't even a tooth there ! So far I have been on tegretol , Neurontin , 800mg ib profufen , Tylenol , vicodin , Tylenol 3 , and Norco 's and acyclovir ( in case it was shingles ) not all at the same time . NOTHING works . might be your issue .", "33N1S8XHHMJ35QOADT8MR7G27Y11ZE": "I date only when I a ready to date, I never kiss on the fisrt dat and I dont kiss all of my dates. I don't put out for no one unless there is a real relationship first and I know the other person well enough. Needless to say, I can count my partners with one hand and I'm over 30. I'm very atractive, so is not like I lack attention or suitors, I just think is gross to be kissing and sleeping with everyone that tells you are pretty or buys you a drink. And if the person they just slept with dont call is fine, theyr just move to the next one... I just don't understand it. I dont think I'm uptight or old school, I'm completly non-judgamental, I just want to live a healthy life and make mature choices in my life. I'm happy with teh choice that I've made so far and I dont have any regrets of the life hat I have lived. Good luck Dont worry about it .as long as you love her whats the difference what people say. Im 55 my gf is 30 ,im happy ,shes happy . Enjoy each other.", "39WICJI5ATQZFT2P0XM5F0VZ5IH3ZA": "4 Ways To Overcome Artist's Block: Many artists suffer from artist's block from time to time. They want to pai... http://t.co/KcBEK65Fwi", "3KWGG5KP6J0NTMZPE17C013KWRBCMZ": "oh i would ask about nutrition, things to avoid, if there was anything else you could be doing that will facilitate an easier birth. also ask if they know of any recommended lamaz classes- that's an important step, and maybe any books they might recommend reading so you know better what to expect in the months (and years!) ahead :D goodluck with everything!", "3EAWOID6MTVMPHYIGDFJSWKWEVNV03": "Are these pains coming shortly after you eat? If so you could have something called a hiatel hernia. This happens when for some reason a small pouch forms right to the side of the opening between the esophagus and stomach. Since it's right around the sternum and chest area that might be the cause. Whatever the cause you really need to see the doctor on this one. Since you already have problems, I wouldn't rule something related to the tachycardia out either. It's a little more than just a fast heart beat. Please see the doctor asap and find out what the real cause is. You'll need treatment to get better. Good luck and God Bless", "3J06WJ78HNI2IIZYJA38DPAM8R0VVV": "When you kitten does things that you don't like, be the best 'mama cat' you can be.", "356ZPKYPUHF6HSX729HTEWPY4K0YPL": "... ?ometimes a reasonably good writer will create an interesting character and ... Good writers will go back and cut that stuff out and get right to the plot. ... I've written only one book, but I can tell you what was very helpful for me. ... Although some readers and writers might have no true preference, most ... Either they insist using the simple past is the only way to tell a story or ..... You don't get a lot of time to do what needs to be done, an... Some writers use narrative as their primary storytelling technique others use ... Or do you try to balance the number of dialogs with descriptive passages? ... You get a more direct 'taste' of what characters are truly like. ... ... writers will write full stories that are only dialogue with accompanying speech ... Like Alice in Wonderland, many young people will scan the page looking for ... these passages often interrupt plot action, bringing the story to a painful halt.", "3T8DUCXY0N4P8JI6BEYXKPX4KE1T9X": "Learn to recognize canine allergy symptoms, then provide your dog with needed relief. Steps: 1. Look for allergy symptoms in your dog.", "3JVP4ZJHDPQH3BEIH6G0D7U26TSI0U": "Malcolm X- born May19,1925,died Feb.21,1965,was an influential American advocate of Black Nationalism and he also was a pioneer in articulating a vigorous self defense against white violence! He was a precursor of the black power movement of the late 60s.On his release from prison(1946-1952 for burglary)he embraced the Black Muslim movement and this is where he changed his name from Malcolm Little to Malcolm X.Following his initial training he became the leading spokesman for the Black Muslims to the outside world.An ideological split developed between Malcolm and the more conservative Elijah Muhammad in 1963 and he was suspended as a minister of the Nation of Islam after remarks he made after John F. Kennedys assassination that for white people 'the chickens were coming home to roost'.He then took a pilgrimage to Mecca in 1964 afterward he announced he had become an orthodox muslim and founded the rival Organization for Afro-American Unity.", "371QPA24C2M7JEFB71J45JFLM2D1TW": "jmctechie said: 1 does your local mall have a silver works. i think that's the name of the store, it might be sterling works. It have a whole bunch of silver rings and i've seen stuff similar to that one. good luck. 92 months ago nbsp. jmctechie jmctechie Loading stats. Loading awards. Loading. Compliment Please sign in to give a compliment.", "35U0MRQMUJ57SYQ1IYHUIXGECY2OVL": "So I say that you should wait until you turn 16 or so then start working hard.But until then keep it light!Hope this helps Good Luck!", "379OL9DBSSCLP5H0LKLWS6PJZGMY9U": "help me write essay,need help writing essay,write college essay,writing essays college,help write my essay. http://t.co/anoehdYprP", "3J9L0X0VDFKH00M06J387943O8KW9R": "It's 10 a month and once you start making money you'll definitely ... We each spent a couple of weeks writing and polishing our stories ... there are people like me who will skip over a potentially great story if I can't even read the title. ... A book that will be a tool for them to help them reach their goals and have .... all of this cost me? please email me at: meganvamp96yahoo.com .... im interested in writing a true story about faith determination will?... This is the written version of a talk I gave on September 6, 2013, at the ... But for the story to make sense, I need to tell you a few things about my ... Yahoo at the time employed rooms full of people to do what Delicious users .... In Man, Oh Man, Writing M/M for Cash and Kinks, Josh Lanyon gives ... ?? do earn a living writing fiction,?? Lanyon says, and though ... what you hope for out of your writing career, it can help you focus on the direction you need to move.", "3FSEU3P2NRYIW41016TOBVWG2FCRR7": "Freedreek Weelhalm Neet sha   Opinion 2: Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche (October 15, 1844  August 25, 1900) was a nineteenth-century German philosopher. He wrote critiques of religion, morality, contemporary culture, philosophy, and science, using a distinctive style and displaying a fondness for aphorism. Nietzsche's influence remains substantial within and beyond philosophy, notably in existentialism and postmodernism. His style, and radical questioning of the value and objectivity of truth, raise considerable problems of interpretation, generating an extensive secondary literature in both continental and analytic philosophy. Nonetheless, his key ideas include interpreting tragedy as an affirmation of life, an eternal recurrence that has fallen into numerous interpretations, and a reversal of Platonism. Nietzsche began his career as a philologist before turning to philosophy. At the age of 24 he became Professor of Classical Philology at the University of Basel, but resigned in 1879 du", "3KVQ0UJWPXJYZDKO3TQRVTZ12C3W52": "Side Effects of Morphine - for the consumer http://www.drugs.com/sfx/morphine-side-effects.html Morphine Immediate-Release All medicines may cause side effects, but many people have no, or minor, side effects. Seek medical attention right away if any of these SEVERE side effects occur when using Morphine Concentrate: Severe allergic reactions (rash hives itching difficulty breathing tightness in the chest swelling of the mouth, face, lips, throat, or tongue) excessive drowsiness hallucinations pounding in the chest seizures shock shortness of breath sudden chest pain sweating. Seek medical attention right away if any of these SEVERE side effects occur when using Morphine Suppositories: Severe allergic reactions (rash hives itching difficulty breathing tightness in the chest swelling of the mouth, face, lips, throat, or tongue). I hope this helped if you need more information click the link :- http://www.drugs.com/sfx/morphine-side-effects.html Take care and God Bless.", "3421H3BM9AFVUGM1ZKKTIJAVMCA9J8": "The closest i can find so far is Hatching Magic by Ann Downer. Hope this is it. You should write your story first and then think up a title.", "3MNJFORX8B2WORYTD4GRR5D179AF5K": "When i first started taking birth control i didnt want my parents to know either, i went to the clinic and saw a doctor, they did a PAP test and then gave me the prescription.Everything is confidential, if you dont want your parents to know, they dont have to know. Opinion 2: Not sure how old you are. If you are under age, with little money to spend on birth control, or are without health insurance you may want to look in to finding a planned parenthood clinic in your area. You are charged based on what you can afford, and everything is completely confidential no matter your age. If you are sexually active you should be visiting a gynecologist at least once a year for check ups, a gynecologist can prescribe birth control as well. Also, bear in mind, when sexually active, getting pregnant is not your only concern. You need to protect yourself from sexually transmitted disease as well. Condoms don't require a prescription, and there's no age limit on buying them either. Check this web-", "3DTJ4WT8BDD2PRIMPH31YRZWW73EZ8": "When theyre bothering you, its important to find relief quickly. Here are some things that might be bothering your , plus ways to fix them. And if these tips dont help, check with your doctor. Recommended Related to Eye Health Allergens and Irritants If its season, or youre allergic to your new partners pet, your may let you know it. , watering, swelling, and redness are signs of -- inflammation of the membrane that covers the whites of your eyes. Sometimes this happens along with nasal . Solution: Try over-the-counter eye drops or pills. A cool compress may soothe the . Other things that can make your eyes red and itchy include smoke, chlorinated pool water, and even the air around indoor pools. Solution: Rinse your eyes with clean, warm water, and use to soothe them. Foreign objects: Sand, dirt, and sawdust can make you weepy. They can also scratch your , the clear covering over the front of your eye.", "3PKVGQTFIHIRT5DMF1LIJRPD52PYRE": "He told the bloke to lie down,and then fiddled about with the bloke's knob,did one or two things and said,'Right.All donethat'll be 50. 'Sure enough,the bloke's penis was back to normal.Impressed he paid up.A couple of weeks later,he was chatting to a friend of his who looked a bit shifty and said,'You know,Ive got the same problem,but it's greenish,not red.That specialist sounds cheap--I'll try him out' The next day the friend went to the same doctor.He showed the urologist his penis,and the chap said,'Hmm...well,we can sort it out,but it's going to cost you 5000,I'm afraid,and we'll have to operate.' The bloke looked at the doctor in horror. '5000 and an operation? You sorted out my mate for 50!'", "34D9ZRXCYRS2Y2FWEK776FC2OD8SAP": "So then, why does your well-cared for dog who gets the BEST quality food insist on snacking in the backyard, and more importantly, how can you curb this habit?", "3GS542CVJVLNNH7GAIGZH9RQ4BJ59M": "Remember that?No?Of course you don't.", "382GHPVPHSPJCWE0F4WFL4IQ4ND43Y": "So computer scientists at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh are teaching them to lip-read. Whether or not you realize it, you're pretty good at lip-reading, according to Alex Waibel, a computer scientist at CMU. When people are in a noisy environment they pay more attention to the lips,'' he says.", "368IUKXGA564Y8N1WQM1V5555A86PU": "Moving round on this broke toe it hurts watching TV", "39XCQ6V3KY205Y5ICBDNXZ0OEAA56A": "Mixed tension migraine Mixed tension migraines are also known as mixed migraines or mixed headaches. They combine characteristics of tension headaches and migraines and are often presented as a third class of migraines (the first two being common and classic migraines). A person may be thought to have mixed headaches when, in addition to experiencing muscle tension headaches, they begin to experience migraine symptoms as well, such as light sensitivity triggering an attack.", "3K2CEDRACBZ4F3100N22PB3OKDBMTS": "Most people who register as bone marrow donors never get called as they don't provide a near enough match to anyone who needs one. Registering though is easy (certainly in the UK). Donating marrow does involve extracting marrow from your bones, but you are under anesthesia.", "3BAKUKE49HAU3Z2J3CE954E3YHG1RJ": "Made-for-TV Movie: 'Lackawanna Blues,' HBO 'The Life and Death of Peter Sellers,' HBO 'The Office Special,' BBC America 'Warm Springs,' HBO 'The Wool Cap,' TNT. Variety, Music or Comedy Series: 'Da Ali G Show,' HBO 'The Daily Show With Jon Stewart,' Comedy Central 'Late Night With Conan O'Brien,' NBC 'Late Show With David Letterman,' CBS 'Real Time With Bill Maher,' HBO. Variety, Music or Comedy Special: '77th Annual Academy Awards,' ABC 'Dave Chappelle: For What It's Worth,' Showtime 'Everybody Loves Raymond  The Last Laugh,' CBS 'The Games of The XXVIII Olympiad  Opening Ceremony,' NBC '58th Annual Tony Awards (2004),' CBS.", "3TUOHPJXYHV71W4Y9Z9MNCQLVBDXWD": "Sad but true,thousands of women some in there 20's are being fooled into a hysterectomy by their doctors!After being told they tested positive for the cancer gene,the doctor reccomends a complete hysterectomy,only after the surgery and heartbreak are they then told that the cancer can still come back,and that even after being mutilated under the knife and loosing their precious womanly parts,that it is not a cure all!!! sick and sad both!", "3IQ9O0AYW6XIJKB9F84AXIW734SIT9": "And if all else fails, just remember that most guys are so thrilled to be having sex in the first place, they likely wont have any body part to complain about but their own (just ask my buddy, Six Second Steve).Good luck!Ethan Are you confused about a guy?", "3XQ4XW3OD9ADTZKS15ES0XT4CPE2SQ": "Contact your local or state dental association and and see if there are any dentists who provide free or reduced cost care for low-income, disabled or senior patients.Call your local health department and ask about health centers that provide dental care for free or on a sliding scale.Your local United Way may also be aware of such a clinic. In some areas, you can reach them now by dialing 2-1-1 for 'non-emergency information. 'Go to a dental school, if there is one near you, for reduced costs.Check http://www.toothwoman.net to see if low-cost or free dental services are available near you.Check http://bphc.hrsa.gov and choose 'Find a Health Center' to see if there is a low-cost clinic near you.You might also check into:http://www.prosper.com", "3Y3N5A7N4G70WP0UATP1XSV3ZFUMYI": "I'm not sure of the painting, but you could call the information desk at the museum and ask, particular if you can tell them which gallery you saw it in. Most museums get these calls all the time and can figure out which work you are asking about. The Met should also have an image department with information on getting posters, prints, or other images of works in their collection.", "3WJGKMRWVI7KPSTC1889HBGQNDGCDE": "Hmm Nothing is wrong with you, I dont think. It helps me through everyday life, and if it does that, and doesnt hurt anyone or anything, I see no problem with it. That's only my take on it, of course. That being said, this is probably not the right answer, as someone is being hurt. You, your husband and people around you, maybe. So, I need to think a little harder Alright. Unless, of course, you feel it so often its taking over your life, or your hurting someone with it. Its totally normal to get angry if someone hurts you, man, people might think something was wrong if you didnt get angry. I cant say much unless I know about those two things. Someone that could help put you at ease, you know? Disconnectedness from yourself Man, I can relate on that one. Its like, for me, every now and. And I know that just talking doesnt always do the trick. I wont say anything about depression, because you requested us not to. I know firsthand that thats not the case. After all, Im only a kid.", "3LN50BUKPV9MHTQ8JUS3KON2V5XLPH": "It all depends on how much peanut butter you spread on you sandwich and how much jelly you put on the bread..and all bread varies in calories! )", "3MA5N0ATTC91HW5RAGUXXIIJZ2VWKK": "I failed my fucking drug test and haven't smoked in over a month.", "3PR3LXCWSFXWP0RQGOZU9SIAXAR9XY": "You can change your last name but you have to do so in a legal manner. It will cost you. Contact a lawyer.", "3ZQA3IO31BPR6MA3BKX5B99YNUVO1W": "Need a baseball jockstrap, groin cup, wrestling singlet or a suspensory? ... But it does indicate to us that covering and protecting the male's genital area speaks to the mos... Shop Nike Men's Miler Running Singlet at DICK'S Sporting Goods. ... 0 CART ? Team Sports .... Size: Size Chart ... Flatlock seams ensure comfort, reflective elemen... Jul 5, 2011 ... Rule 1? ?eet, Mats, Wrestlers, Uniforms and Equipment . ..... multiple duals, individual and team-advancement tournaments. ... Shop Under Armour Men's HeatGear Sonic Compression T-Shirt at DICK'S Sporting Goods. ... Team Sports .....", "35YHTYFL1G1DMLD8JVY4V370KXCVF7": "If you are asking for other things to do with them, then I would say Tack cleaning and grooming and other horse care is essential so tath riders get the idea that animals do have feelings and you cannot just jump on them, an dthen throw them in a field or stable to fend for itself after the ride. You could run a tack and turn out competition throughout the day. I like the idea of the behind the scenes of a show.", "3DWNFENNE3TUXAGPIPO21BZF0K0J4Q": "And if you share your practice, be sure to leave feedback on a few practices by other writers, too.Good luck!Download the step-by-step guide and learn how to become a writer today.", "366FYU4PTGN70WJ0PG0RBCBJSYTKEV": "You will probably survive, but i don't see a point in gym class, and because of the problems i got, i am not doing gym anymore (thx god). So, my only advice for you is that you need to handle it. Don't stress also, it will cause you to have anxiety. All in all there is no easy way to deal with anxiety of school unless you meet it in the face. You have to take the step and organise with your parents and the school to find a way to overcome these things. I was really loud when i talked and i got nervous around people when they talked to me, id said all the wrong things, and they very much disliked me for all of that. This continued on till sophomore year. Hey there, I've had panic attacks and anxiety for nearly 13 years and I have overcome them successfully. I truly understand how you feel and what you are going through.", "3GITHABACYJGDMSNT9X613JYPQ7N20": "Titles in Order:Magic The Gathering Myths of Magic (1993) by Jess Lebow 1. Arena (1994) by William R Forstchen Distant Planes (1995) by Kathy Ice Final Sacrifice (1995) by Clayton Emery Tapestries (1995) by Kathy Ice 2. Whispering Woods (1995) by Clayton Emery 3. Shattered Chains (1995) by Clayton Emery 5. The Cursed Land (1995) by Teri McLaren 6. The Prodigal Sorcerer (1995) by Mark C Sumner 7. Ashes of the Sun (1996) by Hanovi Braddock (Bruce Holland Rogers) Dark Legacy (1996) by Robert E Vardeman 8. Song of Time (1996) by Teri McLaren 9.", "3XQ4XW3OD9ADTZKS15ES0XT4CPF2SR": "Print this question out and lay it where your parents will see it. Get the boy a dog, Mom and Dad!! Every boy needs a dog, and he will be responsible and take it for walks, feed it, play with it....(you WILL won't you?????) Don't forget the dog needs to be spayed or neutered and have regular vet visits. Go to your local animal shelter and take a look. There are great dogs of all sizes there that need a home. That's where my 2 dogs are from and they are great! Dogs make awesome companions and will be there with you whenever you need them. Good Luck!", "31MCUE39BKKZOC7KA5YGUTFTUSNG3Y": "Ungovernable ' Obama hugged a woman who had Ebola. Zuma had unprotected sex with an HiV positive woman. Your move, Putin.'", "3DQYSJDTYL9DKWI7OZFG16JLO74XET": "Dragon Myths and Legends: Title: Dragon Myths and Legends Word Count: 362 Summary: Much folklore about dragons... http://t.co/GWFdEpwgIY", "3RSBJ6YZECOIW14BIJCQ0BDSO4IFOS": "First of all Dachshunds as a breed are stubborn. Second you have changed his environment and what hes use to he seems to be acting out due to confusion. Third never train a dog to use pee pads, they dont know the difference between them and other objects laying about. Dachshunds as a breed are very hard to housebreak. I feel that using a kennel to housebreak them is the best. But it should be started when they are pups. My suggestion to you is that you let him stay in a kennel when you cant be there to watch him, and then let him out to potty. I hope that he stops this behavior, but sadly I had a male that wasn't properly trained and got him when he was 2 and he never stopped peeing in the house so I was forced to use male doggy diapers on him, you may want to look into that as well.", "39HYCOOPKOJXYE53EX2NK7L2HRLDMY": "yea when you click on your name you should be able to see change my avatar, but you already figured this out obviously, so pick a best answer!", "3VZYA8PITOW5RNJ3AMX6OYQX17M507": "This is a very vague question -- it could be anything from anxiety attacks to asthma. Go talk to your doctor, since even  mild  untreated asthma can be fatal. Anxiety can cause trouble breathing.", "3OID399FXG5RS4DMSAYAPH1TKQ8DFQ": "WELL MY NAME IS SHANICE they will like 1. Pillow Pet 2. Clothes 3. Monster Truck toys 4. Elmo or Dora Accesories or toys 5. Barbie dolls 7. Playset or easel 8. Cooking set with kitchen 9. purse 10. Parents.", "37NXA7GVST4ZMDN45612QGCKHTXLV1": "No. It isn't bad writing at all. It might be very effective. But that remains to be seen.I once tried to write a story from the perspective of a blind man. It was hideous intentionally trying not to describe things visually! Find the character voice before you make commitments to style. The voice will takeover anyway, and on revision you can make the early go mesh with the voice you discover is the character's true voice. Maybe you'll find she's quite descriptive (though perhaps a bit tangential about it, or a mixer of metaphors, etc. ).Writing's a gas, isn't it? It's tremendous work, but it's worth it. Happy days,-cK", "37VUR2VJ6ANQXXD0LFOEG9FHYGDC1O": "North Carolina Highway 59 is an urban route southwest of Fayetteville. In 1982, when I-95 was opened around Fayetteville, NC 59 was extended to it. I live in fayetteville, so i might be able to help. The highway begins near Fayetteville in Cumberland County. It ran from NC 50 (where the old US 1, US 15/US 501/ NC 87 split is) to Pittsboro. In 1924 NC 53 was extended to Sanford then replaced NC 241 then went down current NC 24 into Fayetteville. In 1933 NC 53 was extended to US 701, NC 41, NC 201 in Elizabethtown. In 1934 NC 53 was extended along the entire routing of NC 201 to Jacksonville. Also in 1934 NC 53 was truncated to NC 24 in Fayetteville. In 2010 NC 53 was extended around the NC 24 bypass in Jacksonville to Gum Branch Road where it's current terminus is. North Carolina Highway 601 originally ran from NC 60 (current US 421) to NC 40 in Burgaw. The same year NC 601 was extended to NC 24 in Jacksonville. In 1932 NC 601 was renumbered as part of NC 201. Today it is part of NC ...", "3T6EIBTM9LMYY6T2XKLGLFIW272AAC": "I don't wear underwear with pantyhose because it is too uncomfortable. But, I do wear the panty pantyhose so the area is protected. I do wear undies with thigh highs though.", "3YCT0L9OMM79IL9LNOCCSLW2NK8SNA": " Your Body Mass Index weight category will be highlighted. Normal Weight Overweight Obese BMI Value: Height feet (inches) Body Weight (kilograms / kg) 4ft 10in (58') 4ft 11in (59') 5ft (60') 5ft 1in (61') 5ft 2in (62') 5ft 3in (63') 5ft 4in (64') 5ft 5in (65' ) 5ft 6in (66') 5ft 7in (67 ) 5ft 8in (68 ) 5ft 9in (69 ) 5ft 10in (70 ) 5ft 11in (71 ) 6ft (72 ) 6ft 1in (73 ) 6ft 2in (74 ) 6ft 3in (75 ) 6ft 4in (76 ) Height feet (inches) Body Weight (kilograms / kg) BMI Value: Normal Weight Overweight Obese If your weight, or a weight close to yours, is not listed try our other chart or input your measurements into our calculator.", "3ZXNP4Z39RJXBNM8N8YMK2WHVBRL7A": "midnight. Some supermarkets also toss all the deli stuff around 11 if you can find one that still uses dumpsters..Convenience stores like Maverick toss out the stuff that doesn't sell around the same time. I was a runaway on the streets of Nashville at the beginning of my free life and its no way to live.I got a good break working construction though. I wasn't there long. But I'll never forget being hungry enough to eat garbage. I remember that every time I am served and I am very good to my domestic crew. They eat with me at my table,relax by my pool and are allowed to hang around my house like big kids.They are treated like family.", "30ZKOOGW2W424IG211SNAEPTYDWA1O": "Any switch in your child's diet can cause constipation, but I would look for the signs of constipation too. Feel your baby's belly, is it firm or distended? Can you genlty massage his/her belly?", "3SU800BH86QA0VEHSLZTBG9VDSBUQA": "- French and Indian War North American phase of a war between France and Britain to control colonial territory (1754  63). The North American dispute was whether the upper Ohio River valley was a part of the British empire or part of the French Empi", "3E24UO25QZOMD8B0HQ9M650FV5GO6Z": "Something that can be put together, taken apart and put together a different way. This supports creativity, and perception.Putting it together means there is a picture in his mind and he is trying to build that picture. Physics gets involved because if must stay together, stand up, not fall over. Check out QUADRO!All parts should be too big to fit inside the mouth!Phonetics, or start Flute, violin, oboe lessons. Music supports math, discipline, and character development!", "34F34TZU7WXKUW12EB5E8W2HG642JD": "protein powder is just protein with extra added things to improve muscle recovery andbuild your muscles up quicker its not bad. is any protein bad, is fish bad, no. so why would protein be bad. your not gonna gain muscle quickly unless you take a whey protein supplement or eat a hella lot a proteins", "3DIIW4IV8PTY2ZWJ0732PAKFN5BI4D": "He attended Otis College of Art and Design, graduating with a major in Graphic Design in 1993. In 1998, he moved to New York and began designing almost exclusively for the web and interactive media. In 2001, he founded a design studio, Behavior, with colleagues, which he left when he went to work at 'The New York Times'.", "3TL87MO8CMNAQG1E5RWY8U9YTZ9LFD": "yes when you are overweight your belly tends to cut off some of the circulation to your legs causing edema...just like when you are pregnant ...we all get a little edema and bloating when we are on our menstral thats probably why it got better when your period stopped.", "3QMELQS6Y59PAL3G9IQQ005K6S0R6B": "' Women get clitoral erections during REM sleep which is the equivalent to morning wood. ' HAHAHAHAHA", "33P2GD6NRNQJK6A2FH8XWF8WKEJHK6": "the best part about a 3 ring binder is that you can CHANGE to suit what you find workable. Here's how I see a binder system. You could use HIS 4 generation pedigree chart as the table of contents, then have 8 dividers, one for each of the 8 gr grandparents who are on the right side of that chart. I would file the most important documents with the tab for THAT PERSON. (which can be overwhelming, and may not affect your research). The pedigree chart would be IN FRONT of the dividers and  the 'table of contents'. If you have a gr grandparent who you get more info on. IF you decide that you want to pick a couple as the focus (John Smith and Mary Jones family), then the family group sheet serves as your 'table of contents', and you could have a divider for each child, and their immediate children. If you have not seen them, google them to see how they are set up. You can print blank ones for worksheets. ps I just won't agree with someone saying. The surname is attached to specific persons, always."}